http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/A-jolly-good-fellow-say-Khannas-friends/articleshow/48704630.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:11 IST 2015||Sanjeev Khanna, Indrani Mukerjea's second husband and suspected ally in Sheena Bora's killing, may be the most surprising element in this macabre drama, but his friends and associates in Kolkata refused to cast aspersions on "Sanju" just yet.     From being the biggest dart enthusiast at one of Kolkata's poshest clubs (the CC&FC) to having a finger in every pie, Sanjeev was everyone's "best mate" and go-to guy who friends described as: "A doer... someone who could get things done."     The morning after Khanna's arrest, TOI spoke to Ajay Rawla, the man who Khanna worked for as a consultant and whose house he was picked up from on Wednesday afternoon. "It wasn't like he was hiding like a desperate fugitive in my house. We had a meeting in the morning after which he drove me home and that's when news broke on television. We were sitting, watching, wondering what steps to take when the police arrived," explained Rawla.     Seven years his senior, Khanna's association with Rawla dates back to the time they went to Mayo College in Ajmer. Later, Khanna went on to become an aide for Rawla's pet projects. Besides running his own business in wireless communications, Khanna was there setting up chef Shaun Kenworthy and Rawla's restaurant 1658 or immersed in the heritage project of converting the Bawali Rajbari into a hotel. "He was getting all the construction work and labourers in place. He was very good in helping out with permissions through his connections with excise and contractors," remembers Kenworthy.     Khanna, who seldom missed his outings at the club, motor rallies and horse racing as a prominent face in the social circuit, was not the same man before he met Indrani, recounts Bull Banthia, a close friend. "Well-read and well-versed, Sanju had a great mechanical mind with a solution for everything," is how Bull chose to describe his "jolly good friend who loved meeting new people, hung out at the club but wasn't a social climber". "It was Indrani who emerged as this socialite and drove him to consciously build contacts with those higher up in the social rung after marriage," said the Kolkata-based entrepreneur. "That's the reason why I distanced myself from them until overnight she left Kolkata with their daughter and Sanju's wallet."     While Indrani never surfaces in conversations, his daughter Vidhie, who stayed with Indrani, is a fond subject with his friends. "He would miss his daughter but was resigned to fate, hoping that someday she would find him," said Rawla, adding, "It was Vidhie who called Sanjeev on Wednesday to give him the news."     No one seems to know about any recent interaction between Khanna and Indrani. G M Kapur, a known name in Kolkata who was Intach's state convener and happens to be Khanna's "mama", seemed disturbed with "all the theorizing" of Khanna's role in the crime. He declined to look back on Indrani and Khanna's relationship but added, "The last that there was any contact with Indrani or her family was when Vidhie visited Calcutta last year to celebrate the 75th birthday of her grandmother (Khanna's mother who lives with him)."     Khanna's Facebook posts on "karma" in the weeks and months following Sheena's alleged murder on April 24, 2012, make for interesting reading. On April 30, Khanna shared photo messages: "Say whatever, whenever the f*** you want to"; "Sometimes I get so weird, I even freak myself out".     On May 24, exactly a month after the alleged killing, he wrote: "You can never tell what people are thinking and feeling unless they tell you, and usually they lie. you ask them, 'Whats wrong?' and they say 'Nothing'. You accept this because it's easier than digging for the truth. People smile when they want to cry, they laugh when they want to scream and shout. They pretend like nothing is wrong because they don't want to face the truth. Things aren't always rainbows and butterflies, sometimes you gotta scream and cry your anger and sadness to the world, because you can only hold it in for so long before something in you snaps. so when you want to cry, cry. When you want to scream, scream. Don't hide behind fake smiles, it's ok to not be alright."     ||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Sheena-docu-Michail-add-to-mystery/articleshow/48701752.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:11 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Michail, Sheena's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered have raised a number of unanswered questions.    Two days after his mother, Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Michail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai Police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed that what he gave to police was enough to prove that Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora (who are actually parents of Indrani) as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. Some questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukherjea.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Michail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43 as mentioned in reports after her arrest.    Adding more to the suspense, Michail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Michail studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board examination, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that knew that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard that her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard that she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband who she introduced as Peter Mukherjea."    The two-member Mumbai Police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Michail, who on Wednesday, was the first one to reveal that Sheena was Indrani's daughter, twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Michail's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Michail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukherjae is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Michail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."  ||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Grandparents-are-Sheenas-mom-dad-on-birth-certificate/articleshow/48704559.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:11 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Mikhail, Sheena Bora's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered led to some unanswered questions on Thursday.    Two days after his mother Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Mikhail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed what he gave the police was enough to prove Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora, who are actually Indrani's parents, as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. However, many questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter. In many cases in India involving single mothers, grandparents are known to put in their names as father and mother.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukerjea, that is, 13 years after Sheena was born.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Mikhail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43.    Mikhail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Mikhail     studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board exam, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband, who she introduced as Peter Mukerjea."    The two-member Mumbai police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Mikhail twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Mikhail 's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time, he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Mikhail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukerjea is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Mikhail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Sheena-bowled-us-over-Rahuls-uncle/articleshow/48704552.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:11 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: Had things worked out as desired for Peter Mukherjea's first wife Shabnam and her family in Dehradun, Rahul Mukherjea and Sheena Bora would have been married for over three years now.     Shabnam's brother Shaleen Singh told TOI on Thursday that in 2011 Rahul brought Sheena to their sprawling home in Dehradun to seek approval from the family for their marriage.     The entire family-Shabnam, her younger brother Shaleen, father Anand Singh and mother Seema-were reportedly bowled over by Sheena's jovial nature and affection towards the elderly people. Impressed, the family gave its "unqualified and unanimous approval" for the wedding, which was supposed to take place within a few months, said Shaleen.     Stunned by the recent development, Shaleen said, "Sheena was among those rare persons who left a deep and lifelong impact on people. She was good-looking, a sweet person, clean of heart and good to talk to. None of us objected to the wedding."     Shaleen learnt of Sheena's murder through news channels. "It would have been great if she had become a part of the family. I don't know what was the cause and motive behind the heinous crime, but all those behind the killing of the jovial-natured girl should not be spared at any cost," he said.     A former model and tele-actor, 49-year-old Shaleen today owns the Sanskar International school in Jogiwala here. He recalled the last meeting with Shabnam and Rahul in April this year. "My father Anand Singh passed away in April. They had come to pay their respects but we did not interact much."     However, Shaleen said of late the interaction between him and his sister Shabnam was limited. Although Shabnam's farm Gul-e-Shabnam and Shaleen's residence Shankar Sadan are barely 200 metres away in Badripur, meetings between them were rare. While Shaleen and his mother stay on different floors of Shankar Sadan, Shabnam stays alone at her residence and is frequently visited by Rahul.     "There are matters in each family which we do not want to disclose. We are not against each other but do not interact much. She comes to meet our mother occasionally," said Shaleen, adding that Shabnam was passionate about painting and had a studio in her residence.     Shaleen denied having any details about the presence of Mumbai police in Dehradun. "Neither Doon police nor Mumbai police have contacted me over the issue."     Staff at Shabnam's residence said she was out-of-station but they were not aware of her whereabouts.||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Kilpauk-doctor-murder-Hubby-to-approach-court/articleshow/48704411.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:11 IST 2015||CHENNAI: It's been four days since police claimed to have solved the murder of S Sathya, 24, a PG medical student. However, her husband has put forth questions that police have failed to answer. Though investigating officers confirmed Sathya was not sexually assaulted before she was killed, they leaked to some section of media saying that they changed their stance on Wednesday and said there were indications of attempt to rape on the deceased.     Police personnel revealed the details soon after Sathya's husband Dr P Sesu, also employed at a primary health centre in Perambalur, expressed certain doubts.     He alleged the police hastily solved the case citing the state assembly, which is in motion. Sathya was found dead at her house in Kilpauk on August 20.     On August 23, police arrested Harintham Depnath, a BTech graduate, who lived at the second floor on the same apartment. Neither was there any mention about sexual assault or attempt on Sathya when the body was recovered from the house. The nor did the doctors. Police didn't tell this during the arrest of Depnath on August 23. "What forced the police to reveal about the sexual harassment attempt on my wife now?" asked Sesu.     "I want to live a peaceful life with my two sons - Tamil Nesan, 6, and Karmugilan, 4. The studies and the future of my children is important for me. I do respect the police personnel who spent sleepless nights to solve the murder, but there are questions that need to be answered," he said.     "I live in Perambalur with my children, but we speak through live video calls. I have told my sons that Sathya has gone to the God, as the Almighty likes her more. "Hereafter, we cannot speak or meet her. I don't know how far my children will admit it?" said Sesu. "I will approach the court seeking a fair probe into the murder of my wife. I want to find out the real cause behind her death. I want the real accused to get punished for his deed," said Sesu.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Woman-strangles-husbands-lover/articleshow/48704388.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:11 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A woman beat up and strangled her husband's partner, an assistant professor at a polytechnic in Choolaimedu, in their Thiruverkadu home on Thursday, police said. A court later remanded the accused, 32-year-old Shruti, in judicial custody.     Police said Sambasivam, a professor at Panimalar Engineering College in Poonamallee, used to bring Rajalakshmi, home frequently and introduced her to his wife Shruti as a colleague. He even dropped her home at night. The polytechnic where Rajalakshmi worked was part of the Panimalar group of educational institutions. Shruti initially believed the two were just colleagues until Sambasivam came home with Rajalakshmi on Tuesday and said the woman was moving in with them permanently.     On Wednesday morning, Sambasivam allegedly tied a 'mangalsutra' to Rajalakshmi in front of his wife, police said, based on Shruti's confession. A shocked Shruti picked up a fight with Sambasivam who asked her to maintain a cordial relationship and take care of Rajalakshmi. On Thursday morning, after he left for college a fight broke out between the two women.     Police said Rajalakshmi allegedly abused Sruthi and went into the bathroom. Sruthi followed her in and strangled her with the 'mangalsutra'. She then tried to make it appear that the woman had fainted in the bathroom. She took her in an autorickshaw to a nearby hospital where she was declared 'brought dead'. Doctors who noticed a few marks around her neck informed the Thiruverkadu police who registered a case of suspicious death under CrPC section 176.     The body was sent for postmortem to Kilpauk Medical College and Hospital.     After finding that the two women were at home at the time of the death, police interrogated Sruthi for more than an hour but she continued to maintain that Rajyalakshmi had died of injuries sustained when she fell down in the bathroom.     "She confessed to the murder when we told her that her fingerprints had been lifted from the scene of crime," said an investigating officer. "She said she had smashed the woman's head against the wall and later strangled her with the 'thali'." Police altered the case to murder and arrested Sruthi.     Initial inquiries revealed that Rajalakshmi had been married to a man named Rajasekhar for a while and they had separated. She then got married to Suresh, a relative who worked in a private firm, a few years ago and the couple moved into a house in Mogappair.     They allegedly had frequent quarrels as he tortured her and she left him too, police found.     Rajalakshmi then got a job with Panimalar Engineering College where she met Sambasivam. The two became friends and began seeing each other. Rajalakshmi recently moved to the polytechnic in Choolaimedu, police said.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/US-journalists-killer-annoyed-colleagues-Ex-boss/articleshow/48704167.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:11 IST 2015||ROANOKE, United States: The disgruntled former US television station employee who murdered two journalists had "annoyed" colleagues but showed no signs at work of any mental health issues, his former boss said Thursday.     Vester Lee Flanagan, 41, worked as a reporter for WDBJ in Roanoke, Virginia from March 2012 to February 2013, but was dismissed for poor performance and angry behavior, general manager Jeffrey Marks said.     On Wednesday, Flanagan shot and killed two of the CBS affiliate's journalists while they were conducting an on-air interview. He later fatally shot himself.     "We are still at a loss to figure out what happened to him in those two and a half years" since he was fired, Marks told a news conference flanked by dozens of staff, many of them holding hands.     "I don't think we identified that he had mental health issues. We certainly identified that he had performance issues."     Marks defended the station's hiring record and said its parent company had "a very elaborate program to screen employees."     Flanagan passed background checks and came with only positive references, Marks said.     It was only after he was hired, Marks said, that things went downhill.     "Vester's behavior annoyed a lot of people in the news station," Marks said.     Flanagan, who went by the on-screen name Bryce Williams, alleged in a manifesto faxed to ABC News that he was discriminated against as a gay, black journalist.     Marks said accusations in 2013 that he was treated unfairly were "immediately investigated and found to be without merit."     During his employment, Flanagan complied with demands that he seek medical help, but he was ultimately dismissed.     He was escorted from the building by police and made an ominous aside to the news director -- handing him a wooden cross and saying "'you'll need this'," Marks said.     As he left, he also made a "derogatory comment" to Adam Ward, the cameraman he shot dead on Wednesday.     Flanagan filed a complaint with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and a civil action suit, which were dismissed, he said.     "All of these investigations determined that no reasonable person would have taken any of the cited incidents as discrimination or harassment."     After killing Ward and reporter Alison Parker live on the air, Flanagan posted a video of the attack on social media.||ROANOKE, UNITED STATES
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/vadodara/DCB-nabs-man-with-firearms/articleshow/48583950.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:16 IST 2015||VADODARA: Detection of crime branch (DCB) sleuths arrested a man with a country-made pistol and live cartridge here on Wednesday night. Accused Gurpritsinh Randhava was arrested by the cops after they received a tip off about him. Randhava was also involved in attempt to murder Hardeepsinh Thakore last year.    DCB received information that Randhava, a resident of New Sama Road, was in possession of a country-made pistol and was to pass by the National Highway 8 gate near Fertilizer Nagar.    Randhava had kept the pistol worth Rs 10,000 tied to his waist. The police also recovered a mobile phone from him. Randhava told the police that he obtained the pistol from Karelibaug-resident Girish Patel. "Randhava was arrested eight months ago, but was out on bail. We will be producing him before a local court to seek remand. We are also conducting investigations to find out other persons involved in this," said DCB police inspector V J Rathod.    Randhava was booked under Arms Act in the past too and also on kidnapping and assault charges. He helped Kalpesh Dalsaniya in obtaining a country-made pistol from Madhya Pradesh. On November 15, Dalsaniya shot Thakore outside his residence in Pratapgunj. Police said both Dalsaniya and Thakore formed rival groups and were at loggerheads for the last two years. Randhava was later arrested in connection with the incident.  ||VADODARA
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bhubaneswar/Two-hacked-to-death-in-Rayagada-for-witchcraft/articleshow/48582695.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:16 IST 2015||KORAPUT: Superstition has claimed two more lives in Rayagada district. Lotora Pidiaka, 65, and Apadu Melaka, 57, were allegedly killed by a group of villagers at Nathma in Rayagada block late on Wednesday on the suspicion that they practised witchcraft.    A total of three persons have been killed and one badly attacked in the district on charges of sorcery in less than eight weeks. "A 10-year-old boy from the village reportedly succumbed to some unknown disease in July and the villagers suspected Pidiaka and Melaka of casting an evil spell on him," said IIC of Rayagada police station Rabi Patra.    On Wednesday night, the villagers held a meeting in which they decided to punish the duo. A preliminary inquiry revealed that Pidiaka and Melaka were called to the meeting and assaulted by the villagers. They were later hacked to death and their bodies dumped in a nearby river, the IIC said.    "We have detained four villagers for questioning. A special police team and fire personnel have been employed to trace the bodies," he added.    Fearing police action, most men have fled the village, sources said.    On July 24, a 40-year-old tribal man of Lilipuda village under Kolnara block was assaulted. Earlier in July, a 25-year-old youth of Kan village under Bissamkatak block was murdered and his body was set ablaze on July 12. The villagers suspected them of practising witchcraft.    "We will launch a massive awareness drive against superstitious beliefs among some communities. We will request the villagers not to turn violent in false cases of witchcraft," said collector (Rayagada) Jagannath Mohanty.  ||KORAPUT
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/agra/All-civilised-people-must-condemn-murder-of-al-Asaad-by-IS-Aligarh-Historians-Society/articleshow/48581821.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:16 IST 2015||ALIGARH: Shocked that 81-year-old Syrian archaeologist Khaled al-Asaad, renowned as a pioneer in the field, was brutally killed by the IS and his body hanged on public display, The Aligarh Historians Society has issued a statement expressing hope that the killers would one day be brought to justice.    "Civilized people, irrespective of country or religion, must unite in their support for all political and military measures designed to achieve this end, especially those being made by the governments of Syria and Iraq," the statement said.     Khaled al-Asaad, an expert on Unesco World Heritage Site Palmyra, was killed allegedly for being an "idolator". Photographs of his body hanging from what appeared to be a lamppost were circulated by the IS. His crime was the careful preservation of historical sites and artefacts. He had tended to the ruins of Palmyra for 40 years, and was held captive for a month, in which time IS attempted to get him to spill the beans about the whereabouts of valuable artefacts.    Irfan Habib, president of Aligarh Historians Society, told TOI on Thursday, "It is not just an attack on intelligentsia but on civilization - the Arab civilization. It is a barbaric attack on history and archaeology. Archaeology involves the study of art and ruins. It is important and integral to historiography. But this is rejected by IS and also by the Wahabi ideology of Saudi Arabia. Wahabism has been holding a similar attitude for long. The situation is grim, as the government is also the victim here. The regime protected Palmyra for long until the offensive by IS."    Shireen Moosvi, secretary of the society, said one is reminded of the destruction of the Bamiyan Buddhas in central Afghanistan by the Taliban. The IS, however, she said, is more horrific, as its attacks are not as localised as those by the Taliban.    "Asaad spent his entire life excavating the sites. The government wanted him out of the place but he stayed put, preserving and protecting Palmyra antiquities," she said.    The Aligarh Historians Society has members in different parts of the country. It came together as a group in 1978 and was registered as a society in 1998. The organisation has been quick in condemning attacks on history anywhere in the world.  ||ALIGARH
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/kanpur/Three-year-old-raped-and-gagged-to-death-in-Kanpur/articleshow/48581473.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:16 IST 2015||KANPUR: A three-year-old girl was brutally raped and murdered in Bidhnoo police circle late on Wednesday night.     After several hours of frantic search, family members and locals on Thursday morning found the brutally battered body of the minor dumped in fields with serious injuries on her face and vital body parts.     Preliminary investigation by forensic experts confirmed semen stains on her private part, which was badly ruptured, indicating rape or attempt to rape by a gang. She was gagged to death, said the forensic experts.     Few unidentified men allegedly took away the three-year old girl sleeping with her parents outside her house in a village. They apparently raped and gagged her and later dumped her in fields.     "We searched till 5 pm and then approached the Bidhnoo police station. Few hours later, locals, who had gone to answer nature's call found the body lying in a pool of blood in the fields on the outskirts of the village. They later apprised the local police," family members said.     Victim's father further informed that the police that the girl was sleeping with him and his wife was sleeping by his side on a cot in front of the house when she was abducted.     The body was handed over to the family members after a postmortem in the district hospital. "Four slides have been prepared and sent for laboratory test," said SSP Shalabh Mathur.     A police official said the body was found 200 metres from the girl's house. She was the only girl child of her parents.     "We are probing several leads but for the time being we are going by the version of the villagers, who had spotted some men consuming liquor close to the site from where the girl went missing late on Wednesday night," said another police official.     Her dress was recovered close to the spot from where her body was recovered.     "There were serious scratch marks on her face and around her neck along with multiple injuries on her vital body parts," the police said further.     Members of investigating team suspect involvement of locals. "It must have been committed by some local," said an investigating official.     An FIR against unidentified persons on charges of rape and murder was lodged with the Bidhnoo police station by the girl's father, who is a farmer.||KANPUR
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/indore/Court-issues-arrest-warrant-against-Indore-cop-directs-to-deduct-Rs-500-from-salary/articleshow/48579038.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:16 IST 2015||INDORE: Despite repeated notices and reminder a police station in-charge failed to appear in court to record his statement in connection with a murder case of a constable, irked with this a local court in Indore on Thursday directed to detect Rs 500 from cop's salary and issued arrest warrant against him.     Seventh additional session judge Afsar Zaved Khan directed to deduct Rs 500 from salary of then police station in-charge of Kanadia police station, Dilip Singh Choudhary, who is currently posted at Tukoganj police station and deposit the amount in the court. Along with this court also issued arrested warrant against Choudhary for ignoring the notices of court and directed him to appear in court before August 25.     Advocate Amitabh Upadhaya said on February 26, 2014 Baaz team of police got information about a dead body on Bypass road. The deceased was identified as Sandeep Singh, constable of Kanadia police station. The area come under the Kanadia police station and then police station in-charge Choudhary investigated the case.     Police arrested five person in this case and chargsheet was filed in the court in 2014. Since then court had issued several notices to Choudhary to appear in the court and record his statement in the case.     On Thursday Choudhary was supposed to appear in court and record his statement, but he again failed to appear and irked with this court issued arrested warrant and penalised the cop.||INDORE
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Maharashtra-accords-Z-category-security-to-Anna-Hazare-in-view-of-recent-threat/articleshow/48574813.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:16 IST 2015||MUMBAI: Maharashtra has beefed up security around Anna Hazare , a crusader against corruption and social worker, following yet another life threat from anti-social elements.The state had awarded him a Z category security in september 2011 after a similar letter threatening to kill him was received. However, in the backdrop of murders of leading social activists Dr Narendra Dabholkar and advocate Govind Pansare, the state is not taking any risk in providing security to Hazare and several such crusaders."We have continued with the same Z category cover but have also provided special squads to secure his office and home and escort him while travelling in his SUV," minister of state for Home professor Ram Shinde told TOI.Shinde said the government has also depolyed a high-level team of investigators to get into the bottom of the fresh threat and find out the people responsible. "We are leaving no stone unturned as the list of all social activists and even RTI activists in each district is ready to ensure better security for them," highly placed sources in the home department told TOI.||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/delhi/Delhi-woman-murders-husband-cements-body-in-septic-tank/articleshow/48573922.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:16 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: A woman strangled her husband to death in front of her kids in southwest Delhi's Najafgarh. Later, she stuffed the body in the septic tank of the house.     She then asked labourers to cover the area in and around the tank with cement.     The incident took place on evening of August 15. The body was discovered on Thursday after it got decomposed and foul smell started emanating from it.     Her kids are witness to the murder. She shut them up. She, perhaps out of guilt, confessed to the brutal murder.     When probed she said that she was tired of his abusive habits. She said he would come home drunk every day and torture her so she decided to get rid of him.     The woman also slept with the body inside the bed box that night.||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/thiruvananthapuram/CET-student-killed-in-onam-celebrations/articleshow/48573168.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:16 IST 2015||THIRUVANANTHAPURAM: Thasni Basheer, 21, who was hit by a jeep during Onam celebrations inside the campus of College of Engineering, succumbed to her injuries on Thursday night. Thasni, a third year civil engineering student of CET, was in coma since Wednesday evening when the jeep hit her.    The vehicle procession, which included two jeeps, a lorry and over a dozen motor cycles, moved into the campus despite a ban against entry of students' vehicles at 3.30 am on Wednesday. The event was organised as part of an Onam celebration of men's hostel. All the students in the jeep went absconding after college principal J David filed a complaint with the Medical college hospital on Wednesday night. The jeep, which was a property of students of MH for the past several years, was found abandoned at Kariavattom campus.    Baiju, a seventh-semester student of mechanical department, was behind the wheels at the time of incident. Police has booked as case against over 15 students who were on the jeep at the time of incident. They have been charged under Section 307 of the IPC pertaining to attempt to murder.    Post-mortem was held on Friday morning. The relatives of Thasni will take her body to hometown Nilmabur by noon. The body will be brought to the campus before noon. A similar incident happened in the same campus almost 13 years ago. A student Amita Shankar was killed when rammed by a bike run by a fourth semester student in 2002.    Thasni is survived by father Basheer, who is a driver in Qatar, mother, a sister and two brothers.||THIRUVANANTHAPURAM
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Judge-who-gave-death-to-Pak-terrorist-Kasab-retires-today/articleshow/48572802.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:16 IST 2015||MUMBAI: Justice M L Tahilyani, who had sentenced Pakistan terrorist Mohamed Ajmal Kasab to death for his role in 26/11 Mumbai terror attacks, retires on Friday as a Bombay high court judge after 28 years of distinguished judicial service.    Justice Tahilyani is slated to take up a new assignment as the Lok Ayukta of Maharashtra on August 24.    Justice Tahilyani was given a fond farewell by lawyers affiliated to the Advocates Association of Western India (AAWI) in the Bombay high court on Thursday.    During his tenure as a sessions judge in Mumbai, Judge Tahilyani had tried many sensational cases, including the murder cases of music baron Gulshan Kumar and trade union leader-MP Datta Samant and also the 26/11 Mumbai terror attack case in which Kasab was executed.    Tahaliyani began his career in 1987 as a metropolitan magistrate in a Bandra court. He was appointed as additional sessions judge in Mumbai sessions court in 1997.    He was promoted as principal judge in the city's civil and sessions court in early 2000 prior to taking up the assignment in the HC as registrar (inspection). He was appointed as a judge in the 26/11 trial in 2009. He was also posted as a special judge to handle CBI cases.    The Supreme Court, in its judgement confirming the Bombay high court order on Kasab's death sentence, praised Justice Tahilyani for exemplary handling of records.    The SC observed that "in the course of hearing of appeal (of Kasab), we also came to know the trial judge M L Tahilyani. From the records of the case, he appears to be stern, no-nonsense person. But he is a true flag-bearer of the rule of law in this country. The manner in which he conducted the trial and maintained the record is exemplary."    In 2010, Justice Tahilyani was promoted as a judge of the Bombay HC.    Felicitating Justice Tahilyani at a function organised by AAWI, senior lawyer S R Chitnis described him as an "outspoken judge." Apart from listening to advocates' arguments, he (Tahilyani) would directly ask questions to the litigants to find out the truth, Chitnis said.    In his court, many couples had opted for compromise in domestic violence cases instead of moving on with litigations.    "He always kept the court atmosphere tension-free, which benefitted junior lawyers. He disposed of a large number of appeals under Prevention of Corruption Act," said another senior lawyer Ashok Mundargi. _||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Killer-of-Nalasopara-pregnant-woman-nabbed-child-rescued/articleshow/48572682.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:16 IST 2015||MUMBAI: The Nalasopara police on Friday claimed to have rescued the minor boy who was kidnapped after his pregnant mother was killed on Thursday.     The killer-cum-kidnapper, a 21-year-old from Rajasthan was nabbed from Borivli on Thursday night. A team of officers fanned out across the city to rescue two-year-old Prakash Devasi, who was kidnapped from his Hanuman Nagar home in Nalasopara (west) on Thursday afternoon. His mother Gatki (25), who was three months pregnant was killed by the accused.     The accused had made a Rs 1.50 lakh ranson call to the victim's husband Ambadas. The call was traced to Borivli, where the couple earlier lived.     Police suspect that the murderer may have sexually assaulted the victim before killing her. The police are awaiting the autopsy report to ascertain sexual assault. The accused will be produced in court later in the day.     The reason behind the killing and kidnapping is being ascertained.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:16 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:16 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/SC-acquits-Romesh-Sharma-in-Budhiraja-murder-case/articleshow/48704930.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:16 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Thursday upheld the Delhi High Court order acquitting former Congress leader Romesh Sharma in the case relating to the killing of fashion designer Kunjum Budhiraja.     A bench of Justices Pinaki Chandra Ghose and R K Agrawal dismissed an appeal filed by the Delhi government challenging HC order.     The Delhi government contended that the HC had erred in acquitting Sharma but it was strongly opposed by his counsel and senior advocate Siddharth Luthra who submitted that his client was in love with Kunjum and there was no evidence to prove his involvement in the case.     Sharma, who was alleged to be a frontman of underworld don Dawood Ibrahim, was convicted by a trial court on February 15, 2008. Kunjum was killed on March 20, 1999 at Sharma's South Delhi-based 'Jai Mata Di' farm house by a group of hired gangsters from Uttar Pradesh.     The trial court had convicted Sharma and five other accused in the case and had awarded life term to all. The HC, however, acquitted Sharma and co-accused Tejendir Verdi but upheld conviction and sentence of other four accused— Sharma's nephew Surinder Mishra, Hemchand, Santram and Ramesh alias Bobby.     While acquitting Sharma, the HC had said "Romesh Sharma and Kunjum were in love, and desired the company of each other. It does not establish that Sharma had got fed up with her". It had turned down Delhi police's contention that Sharma wanted to get rid of Kunjum as she knew about his alleged illegal activities.     "A grieving lover falling over the body of his mate and performing the rituals of a marriage can well be an expression of lasting love, and need not necessarily be a drama," the HC had said.     Sharma was in judicial custody at the time of the Kunjum's murder.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Raid-on-Bengaluru-centre-reveals-horror-tales/articleshow/48704718.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:16 IST 2015||BENGALURU: A State Human Rights Commission raid on a de-addiction centre in Jnanabharati Layout, near Kengeri, southwest Bengaluru, found 90 inmates living in pathetic conditions and subjected to inhuman treatment.     Thursday's raid followed the murder of an inmate of another de-addiction centre in Kothanur recently.     The SHRC raid on Sri Santhosh Social Service Society, also known as 4S Society, followed a tipoff. According to SHRC officials, the centre has been in existence for seven years at least, but the society couldn't produce documents of having obtained permission from the social welfare department. Commission officials said the centre had the permission from the DC and the DHO.     "Most inmates are between 20 and 35 years. They showed us signs of being physically abused. The centre has violated other norms too. Although it's supposed to have one nurse for every 15 patients and at least one in-house doctor and a psychiatrist, it didn't have any," said an SHRC spokesperson.     4 arrested for killing inmate:     Kothanur police arrested a de-addiction centre staffer and three inmates for allegedly beating to death a 28-year-old inmate. Dinesh was admitted to the centre by his family as he was an alcoholic. He was later found dead in a hospital. Family members noticed several bruises on his body. Narayana, an inmate-turned-staffer, gave some medicines to Dinesh, who later turned aggressive. Narayana sought the help of inmates Suresh, Subhan and Simon, to subdue Dinesh.     When Dinesh retaliated, the quartet overpowered him till he became unconscious. He died in hospital.||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/A-jolly-good-fellow-say-Khannas-friends/articleshow/48704630.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:16 IST 2015||Sanjeev Khanna, Indrani Mukerjea's second husband and suspected ally in Sheena Bora's killing, may be the most surprising element in this macabre drama, but his friends and associates in Kolkata refused to cast aspersions on "Sanju" just yet.     From being the biggest dart enthusiast at one of Kolkata's poshest clubs (the CC&FC) to having a finger in every pie, Sanjeev was everyone's "best mate" and go-to guy who friends described as: "A doer... someone who could get things done."     The morning after Khanna's arrest, TOI spoke to Ajay Rawla, the man who Khanna worked for as a consultant and whose house he was picked up from on Wednesday afternoon. "It wasn't like he was hiding like a desperate fugitive in my house. We had a meeting in the morning after which he drove me home and that's when news broke on television. We were sitting, watching, wondering what steps to take when the police arrived," explained Rawla.     Seven years his senior, Khanna's association with Rawla dates back to the time they went to Mayo College in Ajmer. Later, Khanna went on to become an aide for Rawla's pet projects. Besides running his own business in wireless communications, Khanna was there setting up chef Shaun Kenworthy and Rawla's restaurant 1658 or immersed in the heritage project of converting the Bawali Rajbari into a hotel. "He was getting all the construction work and labourers in place. He was very good in helping out with permissions through his connections with excise and contractors," remembers Kenworthy.     Khanna, who seldom missed his outings at the club, motor rallies and horse racing as a prominent face in the social circuit, was not the same man before he met Indrani, recounts Bull Banthia, a close friend. "Well-read and well-versed, Sanju had a great mechanical mind with a solution for everything," is how Bull chose to describe his "jolly good friend who loved meeting new people, hung out at the club but wasn't a social climber". "It was Indrani who emerged as this socialite and drove him to consciously build contacts with those higher up in the social rung after marriage," said the Kolkata-based entrepreneur. "That's the reason why I distanced myself from them until overnight she left Kolkata with their daughter and Sanju's wallet."     While Indrani never surfaces in conversations, his daughter Vidhie, who stayed with Indrani, is a fond subject with his friends. "He would miss his daughter but was resigned to fate, hoping that someday she would find him," said Rawla, adding, "It was Vidhie who called Sanjeev on Wednesday to give him the news."     No one seems to know about any recent interaction between Khanna and Indrani. G M Kapur, a known name in Kolkata who was Intach's state convener and happens to be Khanna's "mama", seemed disturbed with "all the theorizing" of Khanna's role in the crime. He declined to look back on Indrani and Khanna's relationship but added, "The last that there was any contact with Indrani or her family was when Vidhie visited Calcutta last year to celebrate the 75th birthday of her grandmother (Khanna's mother who lives with him)."     Khanna's Facebook posts on "karma" in the weeks and months following Sheena's alleged murder on April 24, 2012, make for interesting reading. On April 30, Khanna shared photo messages: "Say whatever, whenever the f*** you want to"; "Sometimes I get so weird, I even freak myself out".     On May 24, exactly a month after the alleged killing, he wrote: "You can never tell what people are thinking and feeling unless they tell you, and usually they lie. you ask them, 'Whats wrong?' and they say 'Nothing'. You accept this because it's easier than digging for the truth. People smile when they want to cry, they laugh when they want to scream and shout. They pretend like nothing is wrong because they don't want to face the truth. Things aren't always rainbows and butterflies, sometimes you gotta scream and cry your anger and sadness to the world, because you can only hold it in for so long before something in you snaps. so when you want to cry, cry. When you want to scream, scream. Don't hide behind fake smiles, it's ok to not be alright."     ||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Sheena-docu-Michail-add-to-mystery/articleshow/48701752.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:16 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Michail, Sheena's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered have raised a number of unanswered questions.    Two days after his mother, Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Michail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai Police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed that what he gave to police was enough to prove that Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora (who are actually parents of Indrani) as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. Some questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukherjea.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Michail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43 as mentioned in reports after her arrest.    Adding more to the suspense, Michail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Michail studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board examination, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that knew that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard that her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard that she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband who she introduced as Peter Mukherjea."    The two-member Mumbai Police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Michail, who on Wednesday, was the first one to reveal that Sheena was Indrani's daughter, twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Michail's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Michail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukherjae is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Michail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."  ||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Grandparents-are-Sheenas-mom-dad-on-birth-certificate/articleshow/48704559.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:16 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Mikhail, Sheena Bora's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered led to some unanswered questions on Thursday.    Two days after his mother Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Mikhail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed what he gave the police was enough to prove Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora, who are actually Indrani's parents, as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. However, many questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter. In many cases in India involving single mothers, grandparents are known to put in their names as father and mother.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukerjea, that is, 13 years after Sheena was born.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Mikhail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43.    Mikhail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Mikhail     studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board exam, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband, who she introduced as Peter Mukerjea."    The two-member Mumbai police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Mikhail twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Mikhail 's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time, he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Mikhail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukerjea is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Mikhail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Sheena-bowled-us-over-Rahuls-uncle/articleshow/48704552.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:16 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: Had things worked out as desired for Peter Mukherjea's first wife Shabnam and her family in Dehradun, Rahul Mukherjea and Sheena Bora would have been married for over three years now.     Shabnam's brother Shaleen Singh told TOI on Thursday that in 2011 Rahul brought Sheena to their sprawling home in Dehradun to seek approval from the family for their marriage.     The entire family-Shabnam, her younger brother Shaleen, father Anand Singh and mother Seema-were reportedly bowled over by Sheena's jovial nature and affection towards the elderly people. Impressed, the family gave its "unqualified and unanimous approval" for the wedding, which was supposed to take place within a few months, said Shaleen.     Stunned by the recent development, Shaleen said, "Sheena was among those rare persons who left a deep and lifelong impact on people. She was good-looking, a sweet person, clean of heart and good to talk to. None of us objected to the wedding."     Shaleen learnt of Sheena's murder through news channels. "It would have been great if she had become a part of the family. I don't know what was the cause and motive behind the heinous crime, but all those behind the killing of the jovial-natured girl should not be spared at any cost," he said.     A former model and tele-actor, 49-year-old Shaleen today owns the Sanskar International school in Jogiwala here. He recalled the last meeting with Shabnam and Rahul in April this year. "My father Anand Singh passed away in April. They had come to pay their respects but we did not interact much."     However, Shaleen said of late the interaction between him and his sister Shabnam was limited. Although Shabnam's farm Gul-e-Shabnam and Shaleen's residence Shankar Sadan are barely 200 metres away in Badripur, meetings between them were rare. While Shaleen and his mother stay on different floors of Shankar Sadan, Shabnam stays alone at her residence and is frequently visited by Rahul.     "There are matters in each family which we do not want to disclose. We are not against each other but do not interact much. She comes to meet our mother occasionally," said Shaleen, adding that Shabnam was passionate about painting and had a studio in her residence.     Shaleen denied having any details about the presence of Mumbai police in Dehradun. "Neither Doon police nor Mumbai police have contacted me over the issue."     Staff at Shabnam's residence said she was out-of-station but they were not aware of her whereabouts.||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Kilpauk-doctor-murder-Hubby-to-approach-court/articleshow/48704411.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:16 IST 2015||CHENNAI: It's been four days since police claimed to have solved the murder of S Sathya, 24, a PG medical student. However, her husband has put forth questions that police have failed to answer. Though investigating officers confirmed Sathya was not sexually assaulted before she was killed, they leaked to some section of media saying that they changed their stance on Wednesday and said there were indications of attempt to rape on the deceased.     Police personnel revealed the details soon after Sathya's husband Dr P Sesu, also employed at a primary health centre in Perambalur, expressed certain doubts.     He alleged the police hastily solved the case citing the state assembly, which is in motion. Sathya was found dead at her house in Kilpauk on August 20.     On August 23, police arrested Harintham Depnath, a BTech graduate, who lived at the second floor on the same apartment. Neither was there any mention about sexual assault or attempt on Sathya when the body was recovered from the house. The nor did the doctors. Police didn't tell this during the arrest of Depnath on August 23. "What forced the police to reveal about the sexual harassment attempt on my wife now?" asked Sesu.     "I want to live a peaceful life with my two sons - Tamil Nesan, 6, and Karmugilan, 4. The studies and the future of my children is important for me. I do respect the police personnel who spent sleepless nights to solve the murder, but there are questions that need to be answered," he said.     "I live in Perambalur with my children, but we speak through live video calls. I have told my sons that Sathya has gone to the God, as the Almighty likes her more. "Hereafter, we cannot speak or meet her. I don't know how far my children will admit it?" said Sesu. "I will approach the court seeking a fair probe into the murder of my wife. I want to find out the real cause behind her death. I want the real accused to get punished for his deed," said Sesu.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Woman-strangles-husbands-lover/articleshow/48704388.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:16 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A woman beat up and strangled her husband's partner, an assistant professor at a polytechnic in Choolaimedu, in their Thiruverkadu home on Thursday, police said. A court later remanded the accused, 32-year-old Shruti, in judicial custody.     Police said Sambasivam, a professor at Panimalar Engineering College in Poonamallee, used to bring Rajalakshmi, home frequently and introduced her to his wife Shruti as a colleague. He even dropped her home at night. The polytechnic where Rajalakshmi worked was part of the Panimalar group of educational institutions. Shruti initially believed the two were just colleagues until Sambasivam came home with Rajalakshmi on Tuesday and said the woman was moving in with them permanently.     On Wednesday morning, Sambasivam allegedly tied a 'mangalsutra' to Rajalakshmi in front of his wife, police said, based on Shruti's confession. A shocked Shruti picked up a fight with Sambasivam who asked her to maintain a cordial relationship and take care of Rajalakshmi. On Thursday morning, after he left for college a fight broke out between the two women.     Police said Rajalakshmi allegedly abused Sruthi and went into the bathroom. Sruthi followed her in and strangled her with the 'mangalsutra'. She then tried to make it appear that the woman had fainted in the bathroom. She took her in an autorickshaw to a nearby hospital where she was declared 'brought dead'. Doctors who noticed a few marks around her neck informed the Thiruverkadu police who registered a case of suspicious death under CrPC section 176.     The body was sent for postmortem to Kilpauk Medical College and Hospital.     After finding that the two women were at home at the time of the death, police interrogated Sruthi for more than an hour but she continued to maintain that Rajyalakshmi had died of injuries sustained when she fell down in the bathroom.     "She confessed to the murder when we told her that her fingerprints had been lifted from the scene of crime," said an investigating officer. "She said she had smashed the woman's head against the wall and later strangled her with the 'thali'." Police altered the case to murder and arrested Sruthi.     Initial inquiries revealed that Rajalakshmi had been married to a man named Rajasekhar for a while and they had separated. She then got married to Suresh, a relative who worked in a private firm, a few years ago and the couple moved into a house in Mogappair.     They allegedly had frequent quarrels as he tortured her and she left him too, police found.     Rajalakshmi then got a job with Panimalar Engineering College where she met Sambasivam. The two became friends and began seeing each other. Rajalakshmi recently moved to the polytechnic in Choolaimedu, police said.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/US-journalists-killer-annoyed-colleagues-Ex-boss/articleshow/48704167.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:16 IST 2015||ROANOKE, United States: The disgruntled former US television station employee who murdered two journalists had "annoyed" colleagues but showed no signs at work of any mental health issues, his former boss said Thursday.     Vester Lee Flanagan, 41, worked as a reporter for WDBJ in Roanoke, Virginia from March 2012 to February 2013, but was dismissed for poor performance and angry behavior, general manager Jeffrey Marks said.     On Wednesday, Flanagan shot and killed two of the CBS affiliate's journalists while they were conducting an on-air interview. He later fatally shot himself.     "We are still at a loss to figure out what happened to him in those two and a half years" since he was fired, Marks told a news conference flanked by dozens of staff, many of them holding hands.     "I don't think we identified that he had mental health issues. We certainly identified that he had performance issues."     Marks defended the station's hiring record and said its parent company had "a very elaborate program to screen employees."     Flanagan passed background checks and came with only positive references, Marks said.     It was only after he was hired, Marks said, that things went downhill.     "Vester's behavior annoyed a lot of people in the news station," Marks said.     Flanagan, who went by the on-screen name Bryce Williams, alleged in a manifesto faxed to ABC News that he was discriminated against as a gay, black journalist.     Marks said accusations in 2013 that he was treated unfairly were "immediately investigated and found to be without merit."     During his employment, Flanagan complied with demands that he seek medical help, but he was ultimately dismissed.     He was escorted from the building by police and made an ominous aside to the news director -- handing him a wooden cross and saying "'you'll need this'," Marks said.     As he left, he also made a "derogatory comment" to Adam Ward, the cameraman he shot dead on Wednesday.     Flanagan filed a complaint with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and a civil action suit, which were dismissed, he said.     "All of these investigations determined that no reasonable person would have taken any of the cited incidents as discrimination or harassment."     After killing Ward and reporter Alison Parker live on the air, Flanagan posted a video of the attack on social media.||ROANOKE, UNITED STATES
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:16 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/SC-acquits-Romesh-Sharma-in-Budhiraja-murder-case/articleshow/48704930.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:16 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Thursday upheld the Delhi High Court order acquitting former Congress leader Romesh Sharma in the case relating to the killing of fashion designer Kunjum Budhiraja.     A bench of Justices Pinaki Chandra Ghose and R K Agrawal dismissed an appeal filed by the Delhi government challenging HC order.     The Delhi government contended that the HC had erred in acquitting Sharma but it was strongly opposed by his counsel and senior advocate Siddharth Luthra who submitted that his client was in love with Kunjum and there was no evidence to prove his involvement in the case.     Sharma, who was alleged to be a frontman of underworld don Dawood Ibrahim, was convicted by a trial court on February 15, 2008. Kunjum was killed on March 20, 1999 at Sharma's South Delhi-based 'Jai Mata Di' farm house by a group of hired gangsters from Uttar Pradesh.     The trial court had convicted Sharma and five other accused in the case and had awarded life term to all. The HC, however, acquitted Sharma and co-accused Tejendir Verdi but upheld conviction and sentence of other four accused— Sharma's nephew Surinder Mishra, Hemchand, Santram and Ramesh alias Bobby.     While acquitting Sharma, the HC had said "Romesh Sharma and Kunjum were in love, and desired the company of each other. It does not establish that Sharma had got fed up with her". It had turned down Delhi police's contention that Sharma wanted to get rid of Kunjum as she knew about his alleged illegal activities.     "A grieving lover falling over the body of his mate and performing the rituals of a marriage can well be an expression of lasting love, and need not necessarily be a drama," the HC had said.     Sharma was in judicial custody at the time of the Kunjum's murder.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Raid-on-Bengaluru-centre-reveals-horror-tales/articleshow/48704718.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:16 IST 2015||BENGALURU: A State Human Rights Commission raid on a de-addiction centre in Jnanabharati Layout, near Kengeri, southwest Bengaluru, found 90 inmates living in pathetic conditions and subjected to inhuman treatment.     Thursday's raid followed the murder of an inmate of another de-addiction centre in Kothanur recently.     The SHRC raid on Sri Santhosh Social Service Society, also known as 4S Society, followed a tipoff. According to SHRC officials, the centre has been in existence for seven years at least, but the society couldn't produce documents of having obtained permission from the social welfare department. Commission officials said the centre had the permission from the DC and the DHO.     "Most inmates are between 20 and 35 years. They showed us signs of being physically abused. The centre has violated other norms too. Although it's supposed to have one nurse for every 15 patients and at least one in-house doctor and a psychiatrist, it didn't have any," said an SHRC spokesperson.     4 arrested for killing inmate:     Kothanur police arrested a de-addiction centre staffer and three inmates for allegedly beating to death a 28-year-old inmate. Dinesh was admitted to the centre by his family as he was an alcoholic. He was later found dead in a hospital. Family members noticed several bruises on his body. Narayana, an inmate-turned-staffer, gave some medicines to Dinesh, who later turned aggressive. Narayana sought the help of inmates Suresh, Subhan and Simon, to subdue Dinesh.     When Dinesh retaliated, the quartet overpowered him till he became unconscious. He died in hospital.||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/A-jolly-good-fellow-say-Khannas-friends/articleshow/48704630.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:16 IST 2015||Sanjeev Khanna, Indrani Mukerjea's second husband and suspected ally in Sheena Bora's killing, may be the most surprising element in this macabre drama, but his friends and associates in Kolkata refused to cast aspersions on "Sanju" just yet.     From being the biggest dart enthusiast at one of Kolkata's poshest clubs (the CC&FC) to having a finger in every pie, Sanjeev was everyone's "best mate" and go-to guy who friends described as: "A doer... someone who could get things done."     The morning after Khanna's arrest, TOI spoke to Ajay Rawla, the man who Khanna worked for as a consultant and whose house he was picked up from on Wednesday afternoon. "It wasn't like he was hiding like a desperate fugitive in my house. We had a meeting in the morning after which he drove me home and that's when news broke on television. We were sitting, watching, wondering what steps to take when the police arrived," explained Rawla.     Seven years his senior, Khanna's association with Rawla dates back to the time they went to Mayo College in Ajmer. Later, Khanna went on to become an aide for Rawla's pet projects. Besides running his own business in wireless communications, Khanna was there setting up chef Shaun Kenworthy and Rawla's restaurant 1658 or immersed in the heritage project of converting the Bawali Rajbari into a hotel. "He was getting all the construction work and labourers in place. He was very good in helping out with permissions through his connections with excise and contractors," remembers Kenworthy.     Khanna, who seldom missed his outings at the club, motor rallies and horse racing as a prominent face in the social circuit, was not the same man before he met Indrani, recounts Bull Banthia, a close friend. "Well-read and well-versed, Sanju had a great mechanical mind with a solution for everything," is how Bull chose to describe his "jolly good friend who loved meeting new people, hung out at the club but wasn't a social climber". "It was Indrani who emerged as this socialite and drove him to consciously build contacts with those higher up in the social rung after marriage," said the Kolkata-based entrepreneur. "That's the reason why I distanced myself from them until overnight she left Kolkata with their daughter and Sanju's wallet."     While Indrani never surfaces in conversations, his daughter Vidhie, who stayed with Indrani, is a fond subject with his friends. "He would miss his daughter but was resigned to fate, hoping that someday she would find him," said Rawla, adding, "It was Vidhie who called Sanjeev on Wednesday to give him the news."     No one seems to know about any recent interaction between Khanna and Indrani. G M Kapur, a known name in Kolkata who was Intach's state convener and happens to be Khanna's "mama", seemed disturbed with "all the theorizing" of Khanna's role in the crime. He declined to look back on Indrani and Khanna's relationship but added, "The last that there was any contact with Indrani or her family was when Vidhie visited Calcutta last year to celebrate the 75th birthday of her grandmother (Khanna's mother who lives with him)."     Khanna's Facebook posts on "karma" in the weeks and months following Sheena's alleged murder on April 24, 2012, make for interesting reading. On April 30, Khanna shared photo messages: "Say whatever, whenever the f*** you want to"; "Sometimes I get so weird, I even freak myself out".     On May 24, exactly a month after the alleged killing, he wrote: "You can never tell what people are thinking and feeling unless they tell you, and usually they lie. you ask them, 'Whats wrong?' and they say 'Nothing'. You accept this because it's easier than digging for the truth. People smile when they want to cry, they laugh when they want to scream and shout. They pretend like nothing is wrong because they don't want to face the truth. Things aren't always rainbows and butterflies, sometimes you gotta scream and cry your anger and sadness to the world, because you can only hold it in for so long before something in you snaps. so when you want to cry, cry. When you want to scream, scream. Don't hide behind fake smiles, it's ok to not be alright."     ||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Sheena-docu-Michail-add-to-mystery/articleshow/48701752.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:16 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Michail, Sheena's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered have raised a number of unanswered questions.    Two days after his mother, Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Michail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai Police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed that what he gave to police was enough to prove that Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora (who are actually parents of Indrani) as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. Some questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukherjea.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Michail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43 as mentioned in reports after her arrest.    Adding more to the suspense, Michail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Michail studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board examination, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that knew that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard that her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard that she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband who she introduced as Peter Mukherjea."    The two-member Mumbai Police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Michail, who on Wednesday, was the first one to reveal that Sheena was Indrani's daughter, twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Michail's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Michail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukherjae is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Michail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."  ||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Grandparents-are-Sheenas-mom-dad-on-birth-certificate/articleshow/48704559.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:16 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Mikhail, Sheena Bora's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered led to some unanswered questions on Thursday.    Two days after his mother Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Mikhail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed what he gave the police was enough to prove Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora, who are actually Indrani's parents, as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. However, many questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter. In many cases in India involving single mothers, grandparents are known to put in their names as father and mother.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukerjea, that is, 13 years after Sheena was born.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Mikhail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43.    Mikhail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Mikhail     studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board exam, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband, who she introduced as Peter Mukerjea."    The two-member Mumbai police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Mikhail twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Mikhail 's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time, he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Mikhail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukerjea is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Mikhail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Sheena-bowled-us-over-Rahuls-uncle/articleshow/48704552.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:16 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: Had things worked out as desired for Peter Mukherjea's first wife Shabnam and her family in Dehradun, Rahul Mukherjea and Sheena Bora would have been married for over three years now.     Shabnam's brother Shaleen Singh told TOI on Thursday that in 2011 Rahul brought Sheena to their sprawling home in Dehradun to seek approval from the family for their marriage.     The entire family-Shabnam, her younger brother Shaleen, father Anand Singh and mother Seema-were reportedly bowled over by Sheena's jovial nature and affection towards the elderly people. Impressed, the family gave its "unqualified and unanimous approval" for the wedding, which was supposed to take place within a few months, said Shaleen.     Stunned by the recent development, Shaleen said, "Sheena was among those rare persons who left a deep and lifelong impact on people. She was good-looking, a sweet person, clean of heart and good to talk to. None of us objected to the wedding."     Shaleen learnt of Sheena's murder through news channels. "It would have been great if she had become a part of the family. I don't know what was the cause and motive behind the heinous crime, but all those behind the killing of the jovial-natured girl should not be spared at any cost," he said.     A former model and tele-actor, 49-year-old Shaleen today owns the Sanskar International school in Jogiwala here. He recalled the last meeting with Shabnam and Rahul in April this year. "My father Anand Singh passed away in April. They had come to pay their respects but we did not interact much."     However, Shaleen said of late the interaction between him and his sister Shabnam was limited. Although Shabnam's farm Gul-e-Shabnam and Shaleen's residence Shankar Sadan are barely 200 metres away in Badripur, meetings between them were rare. While Shaleen and his mother stay on different floors of Shankar Sadan, Shabnam stays alone at her residence and is frequently visited by Rahul.     "There are matters in each family which we do not want to disclose. We are not against each other but do not interact much. She comes to meet our mother occasionally," said Shaleen, adding that Shabnam was passionate about painting and had a studio in her residence.     Shaleen denied having any details about the presence of Mumbai police in Dehradun. "Neither Doon police nor Mumbai police have contacted me over the issue."     Staff at Shabnam's residence said she was out-of-station but they were not aware of her whereabouts.||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Kilpauk-doctor-murder-Hubby-to-approach-court/articleshow/48704411.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:16 IST 2015||CHENNAI: It's been four days since police claimed to have solved the murder of S Sathya, 24, a PG medical student. However, her husband has put forth questions that police have failed to answer. Though investigating officers confirmed Sathya was not sexually assaulted before she was killed, they leaked to some section of media saying that they changed their stance on Wednesday and said there were indications of attempt to rape on the deceased.     Police personnel revealed the details soon after Sathya's husband Dr P Sesu, also employed at a primary health centre in Perambalur, expressed certain doubts.     He alleged the police hastily solved the case citing the state assembly, which is in motion. Sathya was found dead at her house in Kilpauk on August 20.     On August 23, police arrested Harintham Depnath, a BTech graduate, who lived at the second floor on the same apartment. Neither was there any mention about sexual assault or attempt on Sathya when the body was recovered from the house. The nor did the doctors. Police didn't tell this during the arrest of Depnath on August 23. "What forced the police to reveal about the sexual harassment attempt on my wife now?" asked Sesu.     "I want to live a peaceful life with my two sons - Tamil Nesan, 6, and Karmugilan, 4. The studies and the future of my children is important for me. I do respect the police personnel who spent sleepless nights to solve the murder, but there are questions that need to be answered," he said.     "I live in Perambalur with my children, but we speak through live video calls. I have told my sons that Sathya has gone to the God, as the Almighty likes her more. "Hereafter, we cannot speak or meet her. I don't know how far my children will admit it?" said Sesu. "I will approach the court seeking a fair probe into the murder of my wife. I want to find out the real cause behind her death. I want the real accused to get punished for his deed," said Sesu.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Woman-strangles-husbands-lover/articleshow/48704388.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:16 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A woman beat up and strangled her husband's partner, an assistant professor at a polytechnic in Choolaimedu, in their Thiruverkadu home on Thursday, police said. A court later remanded the accused, 32-year-old Shruti, in judicial custody.     Police said Sambasivam, a professor at Panimalar Engineering College in Poonamallee, used to bring Rajalakshmi, home frequently and introduced her to his wife Shruti as a colleague. He even dropped her home at night. The polytechnic where Rajalakshmi worked was part of the Panimalar group of educational institutions. Shruti initially believed the two were just colleagues until Sambasivam came home with Rajalakshmi on Tuesday and said the woman was moving in with them permanently.     On Wednesday morning, Sambasivam allegedly tied a 'mangalsutra' to Rajalakshmi in front of his wife, police said, based on Shruti's confession. A shocked Shruti picked up a fight with Sambasivam who asked her to maintain a cordial relationship and take care of Rajalakshmi. On Thursday morning, after he left for college a fight broke out between the two women.     Police said Rajalakshmi allegedly abused Sruthi and went into the bathroom. Sruthi followed her in and strangled her with the 'mangalsutra'. She then tried to make it appear that the woman had fainted in the bathroom. She took her in an autorickshaw to a nearby hospital where she was declared 'brought dead'. Doctors who noticed a few marks around her neck informed the Thiruverkadu police who registered a case of suspicious death under CrPC section 176.     The body was sent for postmortem to Kilpauk Medical College and Hospital.     After finding that the two women were at home at the time of the death, police interrogated Sruthi for more than an hour but she continued to maintain that Rajyalakshmi had died of injuries sustained when she fell down in the bathroom.     "She confessed to the murder when we told her that her fingerprints had been lifted from the scene of crime," said an investigating officer. "She said she had smashed the woman's head against the wall and later strangled her with the 'thali'." Police altered the case to murder and arrested Sruthi.     Initial inquiries revealed that Rajalakshmi had been married to a man named Rajasekhar for a while and they had separated. She then got married to Suresh, a relative who worked in a private firm, a few years ago and the couple moved into a house in Mogappair.     They allegedly had frequent quarrels as he tortured her and she left him too, police found.     Rajalakshmi then got a job with Panimalar Engineering College where she met Sambasivam. The two became friends and began seeing each other. Rajalakshmi recently moved to the polytechnic in Choolaimedu, police said.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/US-journalists-killer-annoyed-colleagues-Ex-boss/articleshow/48704167.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:16 IST 2015||ROANOKE, United States: The disgruntled former US television station employee who murdered two journalists had "annoyed" colleagues but showed no signs at work of any mental health issues, his former boss said Thursday.     Vester Lee Flanagan, 41, worked as a reporter for WDBJ in Roanoke, Virginia from March 2012 to February 2013, but was dismissed for poor performance and angry behavior, general manager Jeffrey Marks said.     On Wednesday, Flanagan shot and killed two of the CBS affiliate's journalists while they were conducting an on-air interview. He later fatally shot himself.     "We are still at a loss to figure out what happened to him in those two and a half years" since he was fired, Marks told a news conference flanked by dozens of staff, many of them holding hands.     "I don't think we identified that he had mental health issues. We certainly identified that he had performance issues."     Marks defended the station's hiring record and said its parent company had "a very elaborate program to screen employees."     Flanagan passed background checks and came with only positive references, Marks said.     It was only after he was hired, Marks said, that things went downhill.     "Vester's behavior annoyed a lot of people in the news station," Marks said.     Flanagan, who went by the on-screen name Bryce Williams, alleged in a manifesto faxed to ABC News that he was discriminated against as a gay, black journalist.     Marks said accusations in 2013 that he was treated unfairly were "immediately investigated and found to be without merit."     During his employment, Flanagan complied with demands that he seek medical help, but he was ultimately dismissed.     He was escorted from the building by police and made an ominous aside to the news director -- handing him a wooden cross and saying "'you'll need this'," Marks said.     As he left, he also made a "derogatory comment" to Adam Ward, the cameraman he shot dead on Wednesday.     Flanagan filed a complaint with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and a civil action suit, which were dismissed, he said.     "All of these investigations determined that no reasonable person would have taken any of the cited incidents as discrimination or harassment."     After killing Ward and reporter Alison Parker live on the air, Flanagan posted a video of the attack on social media.||ROANOKE, UNITED STATES
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/indore/MP-clocks-highest-crime-rate-in-country-murder-cases-on-rise/articleshow/48571226.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:21 IST 2015||INDORE: Madhya Pradesh has topped the list of cognizable crimes in the country, reveals the latest National Crime Record Bureau (NCRB) report for 2014.     Among the cognizable crimes, the state has recorded highest number of cases in rape, kidnapping & abduction and crime against children.     Surpassing Maharashtra - which had clocked highest number of cases in 2013 - the state this year has registered a total of 2,72,423 cognizable crimes under Indian Penal Code (IPC), which attributes to 9.6% of total crimes reported in the country.     MP is followed by Maharashtra with a record of 2,49,834 cases, which attributes to 8.8% of crimes in the country. With 2,40,475 cases, Uttar Pradesh is on the third position in the crime list and 8.4% attribution to the country's total.     Total number of criminal cases - murder, kidnap, robbery, burglary, theft, cheating, breach of trust, riots, cruelty by husband, dowry deaths, insult to modesty of women and others - recorded in the state has also gone up.     Kidnapping and abduction cases have doubled in state. As compared to 3,354 cases of kidnapping and abduction recorded in 2013, over 7,833 cases were clocked in 2014.     Of 7,833 cases, 4,546 are of abduction of girls below 18 years and 1,847 cases of abduction of boys below 18 years were reported. Everyday, 26 children are getting kidnapped from the state. Of these, 16 are girls.     Also, with 15,085 cases, state has topped the list of crimes committed against children in the country. State also recorded 5,076 rape cases, retaining the tag of India's rape capital. Cases of murders in the state have gone up from 2,112 to 2,274.     Similarly, with 4,151 cases, Madhya Pradesh has taken the third place in incidents of crime committed against scheduled castes, after Uttar Pradesh and Bihar.     ||INDORE
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/lucknow/Chowk-murder-Kin-of-victim-live-in-fear/articleshow/48567966.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:21 IST 2015||LUCKNOW: The family of school owner Taqi Raza, who was murdered on August 11 in Chowk, is scared even to step out of their house on Victoria Street. Raza's elder daughter Sheena told TOI on Thursday, " I have stopped going to college since the incident, while my sister, a student of Cathedral School, too, is not attending school, as our mother is scared to send us alone anywhere."     The family had filed a request with the administration for an armed police constable, after which a home guard who is about to retire was posted for the family's security. Sheena said on one occasion the home guard refused to go to the terrace as it was dark. " We require a man who is familiar with people in our neighborhood so that we are safe," she said.     Sheena also said the wife of her father' s assailant was a corporator in 1995 and she was now showing off her political affiliations and mounting pressure on the family.     " People who killed my father on the busy street would not find it tough to climb up a few stairs and cause harm to me, my mother and younger sister," she feared.     Sheena said she had filed a fresh request with SSP Lucknow Rajesh Pandey who had promised to deploy armed men for her family' s security, but nothing happened.     The SSP has assured deploying an armed constable soon.     ||LUCKNOW
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/lucknow/Badaun-sisters-family-threatens-to-sue-Mulayam/articleshow/48567917.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:21 IST 2015||BAREILLY: The family of the two minor sisters found hanging from a tree in Badaun last year in May has said that if Samajwadi Party chief Mulayam Singh Yadav does not apologise for his statement that the girls were not raped and that their death was related to property feud, they will file a defamation case against him soon.     Speaking at a function to distribute free e-rickshaws on Tuesday, the SP supremo said there were cases where women would name four people to settle scores when there was in reality only one rapist. He said it was beyond belief that four brothers would, sometimes, all be named as rapists. "It is not practical," he had said.     Citing the example of the Badaun case, he said it was blown out of proportion. "The CBI probed the case and found that rape was not committed at all. These were cold-blooded murders, committed by members of the girls' family for the sake of property," Mulayam had said.     "If Yadav does not apologise, we will take up the suit on Saturday. The ruling party chief says they were murdered, while the CBI has concluded that they committed suicide. If Yadav indeed knows, as we have held earlier, that the girls were killed, he should take action against the CBI for concluding that it was a case of double suicide," a cousin of the girls said.     "Which of their cousins killed the girls? My son was in Delhi at the time of the incident. My other children are five and 11 years old. Yadav should name the person he suspects," a relative of the girls said.     Asserting the claims the family had made earlier, one relative said there were five men behind the rape and murder. All five had been named in the FIR, he said.     Advocate SAH Kaukab Naqvi, representing the families of the two minor cousins, said, "The SP chief's statement was irresponsible. The matter is sub judice. Even the CBI investigators have not concluded that the girls' family was responsible for their deaths." He added that he would advise the family to wait until the court passes its order before taking up a defamation suit against Mulayam Singh Yadav.     The CBI, in its December 11 closure report submitted in Badaun's POCSO court, said the girls committed suicide and were neither raped nor murdered. The agency said the girls committed suicide ashamed that the relationship of the elder sister with Pappu Yadav, one of the men earlier accused in the case, had been exposed. The agency said the younger of the two sisters was also desirous of a relationship with the same man. Both girls, the agency claimed, committed suicide in shame after being discovered by an uncle.     The families of the girls challenged the CBI's findings in court on February 19.     The two girls, cousins aged 14 and 15, were found hanging from a mango tree on May 28, 2014. The two had stepped out of their homes, saying they would return after answering nature's call in the fields on the evening of May 27 and gone missing that night.||BAREILLY
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Crime-moves-out-of-Gujarat-cities/articleshow/48567730.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:21 IST 2015|||| 
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Maharashtra-way-ahead-of-other-states-in-railway-robberies/articleshow/48563752.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:21 IST 2015||MUMBAI: Maharashtra has earned the notoriety of having the highest number of robberies on railways in 2014 as compared to other states. Statistics with the National Crime Records Bureau show that 709 cases were registered in Maharashtra; West Bengal came second with just 120 cases. Railway police officials in Maharashtra said this spurt could be seen as they record complaints in the state though the incident may have occurred outside state limits. The Mumbai GRP will be sending a proposal to the government for instituting a minimum prescribed punishment in robbery cases.    The police in Mumbai have been booking chain-snatchers under the more stringent charge of robbery since a couple of years. The reason is that robbery charges attract a jail term of up to 10 years and can serve as a deterrent to snatchers. "We were analyzing cases of convictions for robberies. But in 10-12 case studies we went through, the convicts were sentenced to less than six months," said a Mumbai GRP official.    "We will make a proposal to the government to make changes in the law so as to have a minimum prescribed punishment for robberies. There are provisions in the Indian Railways Act, for instance, where a minimum punishment is provided for," said Mumbai GRP commissioner Madhukar Pandey.    The state also had the highest number of thefts last year (4,321) with UP a close second (4,021). Bengal had the highest number of murder cases (120); Maharashtra came fourth with 27 cases. Bengal also had maximum cases of rape (85) while Maharashtra came third (6 cases).    ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/pune/In-18-mths-150-cases-filed-under-anti-superstition-Act-most-victims-women/articleshow/48567491.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:21 IST 2015||PUNE: It took the murder of rationalist Narendra Dabholkar for Maharashtra's anti-superstition Act to finally see the light of day in December 2013. Dabholkar had drafted the original bill in 2003 and since then fought relentlessly for its passage in the face of stiff opposition.     Two years after Dabholkar's death, the Act has encouraged people who have suffered exploitation in the name of religion and rituals, particularly women, to register cases against those involved in such practices. More than 150 cases have been filed till date under the Act, officially known as the Maharashtra Prevention and Eradication of Human Sacrifice and other Inhuman, Evil and Aghori Practices and Black Magic Act, 2013.     The only conviction in all these cases happened early this year. Bhandara's chief judicial magistrate convicted an "exorcist" along with two others under the Act for trying to cure a 29-year-old woman through black magic. Investigations and trials in the remaining cases are on.     In one particularly hair-raising incident, the police arrested some members of a family in Nashik while they were preparing to sacrifice children after being told that the act would bestow upon them the powers of a mantra. The family had dug a pit and was ready to put the children in it when the police raided the spot following a complaint.     The first case under the Act was registered in Pune in December 2013 while the Act was still an ordinance. The Vishrantwadi police then arrested a maulana, Sayed Alam (36), of Shantinagar in Yerawada, for allegedly inducing a 25-year-old married woman to sit naked with him to perform a black magic ritual to cure her husband of his tuberculosis. The maulana had also told the woman that a lot of money would be generated automatically during the ritual, of which he would give her Rs 3 lakh.     In fact, the fake assurance of curing people or their relatives of diseases figures in several of the cases filed under the Act. One of the first such cases was reported from Bhagyanagar (Nanded) where two tantriks were arrested for advertising that they could treat incurable diseases with their supernatural powers. In another case, a baba sexually assaulted a young girl in Nagpur while promising a cure.     Many cases relate to people being fooled with the lure of having their money multiplied. In one incident, eight people, including one Rajandre Pagare alias Anandgiri Maharaj, duped a Nandurbar woman, Nila Mehta (49), and others of Rs 12.85 lakh while promising to multiply the money by performing some rituals. In another case, a baba from Malegaon in Nashik district took Rs 3 lakh from a Jalgaon woman while promising that she would reap a windfall soon. He also sexually exploited the woman. In Wadgaon (Nashik), a case was registered against two babas from Rajasthan who extracted money from people with the assurance of finding hidden wealth for them.     "People who suffer at hands of these babas and sadhus are coming forward with their complaints. The Maharashtra Andhashraddha Nirmulan Samiti (MANS) is training its workers to assist the police and people to register cases under the Act," said Nandini Jadhav, MANS executive president (Pune unit).     Dabholkar's son Hamid said MANS is also planning to help victims of black magic and witchcraft in other states. "Five women accused of practicing witchcraft were lynched in a tribal-dominated village in Ranchi district. We are considering how to help the people there," he said.     Activist and eminent scholar Vidya Bal said that women were the main victims of such evil superstitious practices. "Women and the poor suffer at the hands of those who use religion and rituals. It has been a long struggle to imbibe rationality in the minds of people. But we have made a start, thanks to the sacrifice of Narendra Dabholkar," she told a convention of MANS workers recently.     ||PUNE
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/trichy/Marginal-rise-in-crimes-in-city-NCRB/articleshow/48567470.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:21 IST 2015||TRICHY: Data released by the National Crime Record Bureau (NCRB) showed a marginal increase in crimes in Trichy district in 2014 compared to the previous year. The police department attributed the rise in crimes to surge in population and number of vehicles.     The district recorded 3,074 cases of cognizable offences which included murders, robberies, burglaries, house break-ins, sexual harassments, deaths caused by negligent driving, etc., in 2014.     The number of incidences of cognizable offences was 2,783 in 2013 as per NCRB statistics. The slight increase in the number of crimes took the rate of total cognizable crimes from 272.3 to 300.8 in 2014.     The spike in cases of death caused by negligent driving and thefts contributed to the increase in total cases. In Trichy, as many as 180 people died in 170 accidents of negligent driving in 2014 while the number of cases was 127 in 2013.     Speeding of vehicles, both two-wheelers and four wheelers and drunken driving were found to be the main reasons for deaths of innocent people on roads inside and outside the city. The reluctance to wear headgears while riding on two-wheelers also led to fatalities of the rider and the pillion.     Rash riding of two-wheelers by youths has become a common sight frightening motorists on congested arterial roads in the city nowadays.     "Police should fix CCTV cameras and identify rashly driven vehicles to issue notice to them. It is very unfortunate that there was no case of police chasing such vehicles and punishing them as per law," said president of Federation of Consumer and Service Organizations, M Sekaran.     A total of 241 cases of theft were registered in the past one year in Trichy while the district witnessed 190 cases in 2013.     Incidences of murders also occurred at regular intervals with the district maintaining a constant rate in the past two years that 24 cases kept the police busy with their investigation. In 2013, the number of murders was 21.     The murders were either due to a fallout of previous enmity, illicit affair and murder for gain. Police managed to arrest the accused in most of the cases but the prevention of such heinous crimes was ruled out.     Another concerning factor was the frequent incidences of burglary, robbery and house break-ins. Trichy recorded 41 cases of burglary, 24 cases of robbery and 41 cases of house break-ins. Such incidents were slightly higher in number in 2013 when 44 robberies and 44 burglaries were reported.     NCRB showed that the number of rape cases came down from 10 in 2013 to three in 2014.     When asked about the statistics, many senior officials declined to comment on record. However, on condition of anonymity they said that with the increasing population and vehicles, the crime rate would also go up automatically.     As per the data, the district had 10.2 lakh population in 2014 but there was no major increase in population in the one year.     ||TRICHY
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Medico-found-dead-with-throat-slit-in-Kilpauk-house/articleshow/48566647.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:21 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A 32-year-old post graduate student of Kilpauk Medical College was murdered in her rented house in Kilpauk on Thursday afternoon, police said. S Sathya was found by Sangeetha, her senior, around 3pm with strangulation marks around the neck and a knife stuck in her throat at the house there shared on Kumbalamman Street off Taylors Road. Police said they also found a length of copper wire near the body. Her mobile phone was missing.     Sathya, a first year PG student of obstetrics and gynaecology, had been staying with Sangeetha for the last two months. Around 9am, Perambalur native Sathya spoke to Sangeetha, who had spent the night at a friend's place, and asked her to bring her lunch when she returned.     When Sangeetha came home, she found the door latched from outside. She first thought Sathya might have gone out. Then she saw her room mate behind a rolled-up mattress near a wall, the knife still in her neck. The shocked woman informed their landlady who called an ambulance. A team of paramedics arrived in a few minutes and said that the woman was dead.     The house was owned by Dr Arul Mozhi and her lawyer husband who rented out a few portions to doctors, including Sathya and Sangeetha, and patients taking treatment in the city. Neighbours said they knew little about Sathya as she had moved into the house only two months ago but said they had seen a few of her college mates visiting her. Sathya was married to Seshu, a block medical officer in Perambalur, and the couple had two children who lived with their father. Sathya's husband is on his way to the city, police said.     Initial investigations revealed that the murder could have taken place between 9am and 1pm when Sathya was alone. It is also suspected that the killer could have been known to her. "We are probing all angles as there were no signs of a forced entry to the house," a police officer said. The knife found stuck in the slain woman's neck had been used by the two room mates to cut fruits, police found.     A senior police officer said the deceased's five-sovereign gold 'thali', which was thought to have been stolen, was later found in the room along with her gold bangles.     As news of the murder spread, her college mates kept coming to the Kilpauk police station where Sangeetha was taken for inquiry. "She joined the course only this year. It is usual among post graduates to stay in rented houses instead of hostels as they can live peacefully and pursue their studies," a police officer said.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/hyderabad/Man-held-for-murdering-minor-girl/articleshow/48566621.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:21 IST 2015||HYDERABAD: South Zone police have taken Dastagir, accused of murdering a minor girl from Talab Katta, into custody. Earlier this week, cops had stumbled upon CCTV footage showing Dastagir accompanying the girl in Aman Nagar. Soon after, they had begun hunting for him.     Sources said that Dastagir was found in Karnataka. Cops, however, are reluctant to disclose his hideout, and are questioning the accused. "We have also obtained footage in which Dastagir is seen buying alcohol from a local shop. We are certain that his intention was to rape her. The initial post mortem examination, however, shows that the girl was not raped," a police officer said on condition of anonymity.     When contacted, South Zone DCP V Satyanarayana said, "We are investigating the matter and won't let the culprit get away."     The victim, 12-year old Huda Begum, was found murdered in a water sump at a construction site in Bhavani Nagar police station limits. She reportedly had marks of strangulation on her neck.     After receiving a complaint from the victim's mother, South Zone police had formed six special teams to nab the accused. The incident had created a flutter in Old City, and a women's group even organised a protest on August 15 against the murder.     ||HYDERABAD
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/85-of-all-murders-committed-by-unlicensed-guns/articleshow/48566617.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:21 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: Over 85% of all murders committed using firearms have unlicensed guns involved. Not surprisingly, UP and Bihar make up 67% of all murders by unlicensed guns.Crime data for 2014, released by National Crime Records Bureau (NCRB) shows that 11% of all murders were committed by guns. Of over 33,000 murders committed last year, more than 3,600 murders were committed by using guns. Of these, over 3,100 were committed using unlicensed firearms.While such figures raise serious law and order concerns, the data, thankfully, show a declining trend over the past couple of years. In 2012, murders by unlicensed weapons stood at close to 3,500. This reduced to about 3,300 the next year and declined further to just over 3,100 last year.Murders by unlicensed guns have actually had a fluctuating trend over the past decade and a half. Between 1999 and 2009, there was a declining trend with close to 8,500 murders by unlicensed firearms in 1999, dropping to just over 2,700 such murders in 2009. It rose consistently since 2009 to 2012, after which it began declining again.Among states, UP and Bihar are followed by Haryana with 178 murders committed by unlicensed weapons. Almost all states have recorded more unlicensed gun killings than by a licensed firearm. Arunachal Pradesh is the only exception to this. The north-east state has recorded 14 murders by licensed firearms as against just two by unlicensed guns.Among Union Territories, only Delhi, Chandigarh and Puducherry have recorded murders by firearms. Delhi leads the pack with 76 such murders of which 70 were by unlicensed guns. Chandigarh and Puducherry recorded two murders each with one each by licensed and unlicensed guns.||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:21 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:21 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/SC-acquits-Romesh-Sharma-in-Budhiraja-murder-case/articleshow/48704930.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:21 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Thursday upheld the Delhi High Court order acquitting former Congress leader Romesh Sharma in the case relating to the killing of fashion designer Kunjum Budhiraja.     A bench of Justices Pinaki Chandra Ghose and R K Agrawal dismissed an appeal filed by the Delhi government challenging HC order.     The Delhi government contended that the HC had erred in acquitting Sharma but it was strongly opposed by his counsel and senior advocate Siddharth Luthra who submitted that his client was in love with Kunjum and there was no evidence to prove his involvement in the case.     Sharma, who was alleged to be a frontman of underworld don Dawood Ibrahim, was convicted by a trial court on February 15, 2008. Kunjum was killed on March 20, 1999 at Sharma's South Delhi-based 'Jai Mata Di' farm house by a group of hired gangsters from Uttar Pradesh.     The trial court had convicted Sharma and five other accused in the case and had awarded life term to all. The HC, however, acquitted Sharma and co-accused Tejendir Verdi but upheld conviction and sentence of other four accused— Sharma's nephew Surinder Mishra, Hemchand, Santram and Ramesh alias Bobby.     While acquitting Sharma, the HC had said "Romesh Sharma and Kunjum were in love, and desired the company of each other. It does not establish that Sharma had got fed up with her". It had turned down Delhi police's contention that Sharma wanted to get rid of Kunjum as she knew about his alleged illegal activities.     "A grieving lover falling over the body of his mate and performing the rituals of a marriage can well be an expression of lasting love, and need not necessarily be a drama," the HC had said.     Sharma was in judicial custody at the time of the Kunjum's murder.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Raid-on-Bengaluru-centre-reveals-horror-tales/articleshow/48704718.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:21 IST 2015||BENGALURU: A State Human Rights Commission raid on a de-addiction centre in Jnanabharati Layout, near Kengeri, southwest Bengaluru, found 90 inmates living in pathetic conditions and subjected to inhuman treatment.     Thursday's raid followed the murder of an inmate of another de-addiction centre in Kothanur recently.     The SHRC raid on Sri Santhosh Social Service Society, also known as 4S Society, followed a tipoff. According to SHRC officials, the centre has been in existence for seven years at least, but the society couldn't produce documents of having obtained permission from the social welfare department. Commission officials said the centre had the permission from the DC and the DHO.     "Most inmates are between 20 and 35 years. They showed us signs of being physically abused. The centre has violated other norms too. Although it's supposed to have one nurse for every 15 patients and at least one in-house doctor and a psychiatrist, it didn't have any," said an SHRC spokesperson.     4 arrested for killing inmate:     Kothanur police arrested a de-addiction centre staffer and three inmates for allegedly beating to death a 28-year-old inmate. Dinesh was admitted to the centre by his family as he was an alcoholic. He was later found dead in a hospital. Family members noticed several bruises on his body. Narayana, an inmate-turned-staffer, gave some medicines to Dinesh, who later turned aggressive. Narayana sought the help of inmates Suresh, Subhan and Simon, to subdue Dinesh.     When Dinesh retaliated, the quartet overpowered him till he became unconscious. He died in hospital.||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/A-jolly-good-fellow-say-Khannas-friends/articleshow/48704630.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:21 IST 2015||Sanjeev Khanna, Indrani Mukerjea's second husband and suspected ally in Sheena Bora's killing, may be the most surprising element in this macabre drama, but his friends and associates in Kolkata refused to cast aspersions on "Sanju" just yet.     From being the biggest dart enthusiast at one of Kolkata's poshest clubs (the CC&FC) to having a finger in every pie, Sanjeev was everyone's "best mate" and go-to guy who friends described as: "A doer... someone who could get things done."     The morning after Khanna's arrest, TOI spoke to Ajay Rawla, the man who Khanna worked for as a consultant and whose house he was picked up from on Wednesday afternoon. "It wasn't like he was hiding like a desperate fugitive in my house. We had a meeting in the morning after which he drove me home and that's when news broke on television. We were sitting, watching, wondering what steps to take when the police arrived," explained Rawla.     Seven years his senior, Khanna's association with Rawla dates back to the time they went to Mayo College in Ajmer. Later, Khanna went on to become an aide for Rawla's pet projects. Besides running his own business in wireless communications, Khanna was there setting up chef Shaun Kenworthy and Rawla's restaurant 1658 or immersed in the heritage project of converting the Bawali Rajbari into a hotel. "He was getting all the construction work and labourers in place. He was very good in helping out with permissions through his connections with excise and contractors," remembers Kenworthy.     Khanna, who seldom missed his outings at the club, motor rallies and horse racing as a prominent face in the social circuit, was not the same man before he met Indrani, recounts Bull Banthia, a close friend. "Well-read and well-versed, Sanju had a great mechanical mind with a solution for everything," is how Bull chose to describe his "jolly good friend who loved meeting new people, hung out at the club but wasn't a social climber". "It was Indrani who emerged as this socialite and drove him to consciously build contacts with those higher up in the social rung after marriage," said the Kolkata-based entrepreneur. "That's the reason why I distanced myself from them until overnight she left Kolkata with their daughter and Sanju's wallet."     While Indrani never surfaces in conversations, his daughter Vidhie, who stayed with Indrani, is a fond subject with his friends. "He would miss his daughter but was resigned to fate, hoping that someday she would find him," said Rawla, adding, "It was Vidhie who called Sanjeev on Wednesday to give him the news."     No one seems to know about any recent interaction between Khanna and Indrani. G M Kapur, a known name in Kolkata who was Intach's state convener and happens to be Khanna's "mama", seemed disturbed with "all the theorizing" of Khanna's role in the crime. He declined to look back on Indrani and Khanna's relationship but added, "The last that there was any contact with Indrani or her family was when Vidhie visited Calcutta last year to celebrate the 75th birthday of her grandmother (Khanna's mother who lives with him)."     Khanna's Facebook posts on "karma" in the weeks and months following Sheena's alleged murder on April 24, 2012, make for interesting reading. On April 30, Khanna shared photo messages: "Say whatever, whenever the f*** you want to"; "Sometimes I get so weird, I even freak myself out".     On May 24, exactly a month after the alleged killing, he wrote: "You can never tell what people are thinking and feeling unless they tell you, and usually they lie. you ask them, 'Whats wrong?' and they say 'Nothing'. You accept this because it's easier than digging for the truth. People smile when they want to cry, they laugh when they want to scream and shout. They pretend like nothing is wrong because they don't want to face the truth. Things aren't always rainbows and butterflies, sometimes you gotta scream and cry your anger and sadness to the world, because you can only hold it in for so long before something in you snaps. so when you want to cry, cry. When you want to scream, scream. Don't hide behind fake smiles, it's ok to not be alright."     ||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Sheena-docu-Michail-add-to-mystery/articleshow/48701752.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:21 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Michail, Sheena's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered have raised a number of unanswered questions.    Two days after his mother, Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Michail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai Police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed that what he gave to police was enough to prove that Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora (who are actually parents of Indrani) as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. Some questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukherjea.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Michail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43 as mentioned in reports after her arrest.    Adding more to the suspense, Michail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Michail studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board examination, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that knew that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard that her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard that she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband who she introduced as Peter Mukherjea."    The two-member Mumbai Police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Michail, who on Wednesday, was the first one to reveal that Sheena was Indrani's daughter, twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Michail's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Michail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukherjae is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Michail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."  ||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Grandparents-are-Sheenas-mom-dad-on-birth-certificate/articleshow/48704559.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:21 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Mikhail, Sheena Bora's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered led to some unanswered questions on Thursday.    Two days after his mother Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Mikhail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed what he gave the police was enough to prove Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora, who are actually Indrani's parents, as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. However, many questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter. In many cases in India involving single mothers, grandparents are known to put in their names as father and mother.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukerjea, that is, 13 years after Sheena was born.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Mikhail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43.    Mikhail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Mikhail     studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board exam, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband, who she introduced as Peter Mukerjea."    The two-member Mumbai police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Mikhail twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Mikhail 's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time, he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Mikhail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukerjea is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Mikhail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Sheena-bowled-us-over-Rahuls-uncle/articleshow/48704552.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:21 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: Had things worked out as desired for Peter Mukherjea's first wife Shabnam and her family in Dehradun, Rahul Mukherjea and Sheena Bora would have been married for over three years now.     Shabnam's brother Shaleen Singh told TOI on Thursday that in 2011 Rahul brought Sheena to their sprawling home in Dehradun to seek approval from the family for their marriage.     The entire family-Shabnam, her younger brother Shaleen, father Anand Singh and mother Seema-were reportedly bowled over by Sheena's jovial nature and affection towards the elderly people. Impressed, the family gave its "unqualified and unanimous approval" for the wedding, which was supposed to take place within a few months, said Shaleen.     Stunned by the recent development, Shaleen said, "Sheena was among those rare persons who left a deep and lifelong impact on people. She was good-looking, a sweet person, clean of heart and good to talk to. None of us objected to the wedding."     Shaleen learnt of Sheena's murder through news channels. "It would have been great if she had become a part of the family. I don't know what was the cause and motive behind the heinous crime, but all those behind the killing of the jovial-natured girl should not be spared at any cost," he said.     A former model and tele-actor, 49-year-old Shaleen today owns the Sanskar International school in Jogiwala here. He recalled the last meeting with Shabnam and Rahul in April this year. "My father Anand Singh passed away in April. They had come to pay their respects but we did not interact much."     However, Shaleen said of late the interaction between him and his sister Shabnam was limited. Although Shabnam's farm Gul-e-Shabnam and Shaleen's residence Shankar Sadan are barely 200 metres away in Badripur, meetings between them were rare. While Shaleen and his mother stay on different floors of Shankar Sadan, Shabnam stays alone at her residence and is frequently visited by Rahul.     "There are matters in each family which we do not want to disclose. We are not against each other but do not interact much. She comes to meet our mother occasionally," said Shaleen, adding that Shabnam was passionate about painting and had a studio in her residence.     Shaleen denied having any details about the presence of Mumbai police in Dehradun. "Neither Doon police nor Mumbai police have contacted me over the issue."     Staff at Shabnam's residence said she was out-of-station but they were not aware of her whereabouts.||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Kilpauk-doctor-murder-Hubby-to-approach-court/articleshow/48704411.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:21 IST 2015||CHENNAI: It's been four days since police claimed to have solved the murder of S Sathya, 24, a PG medical student. However, her husband has put forth questions that police have failed to answer. Though investigating officers confirmed Sathya was not sexually assaulted before she was killed, they leaked to some section of media saying that they changed their stance on Wednesday and said there were indications of attempt to rape on the deceased.     Police personnel revealed the details soon after Sathya's husband Dr P Sesu, also employed at a primary health centre in Perambalur, expressed certain doubts.     He alleged the police hastily solved the case citing the state assembly, which is in motion. Sathya was found dead at her house in Kilpauk on August 20.     On August 23, police arrested Harintham Depnath, a BTech graduate, who lived at the second floor on the same apartment. Neither was there any mention about sexual assault or attempt on Sathya when the body was recovered from the house. The nor did the doctors. Police didn't tell this during the arrest of Depnath on August 23. "What forced the police to reveal about the sexual harassment attempt on my wife now?" asked Sesu.     "I want to live a peaceful life with my two sons - Tamil Nesan, 6, and Karmugilan, 4. The studies and the future of my children is important for me. I do respect the police personnel who spent sleepless nights to solve the murder, but there are questions that need to be answered," he said.     "I live in Perambalur with my children, but we speak through live video calls. I have told my sons that Sathya has gone to the God, as the Almighty likes her more. "Hereafter, we cannot speak or meet her. I don't know how far my children will admit it?" said Sesu. "I will approach the court seeking a fair probe into the murder of my wife. I want to find out the real cause behind her death. I want the real accused to get punished for his deed," said Sesu.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Woman-strangles-husbands-lover/articleshow/48704388.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:21 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A woman beat up and strangled her husband's partner, an assistant professor at a polytechnic in Choolaimedu, in their Thiruverkadu home on Thursday, police said. A court later remanded the accused, 32-year-old Shruti, in judicial custody.     Police said Sambasivam, a professor at Panimalar Engineering College in Poonamallee, used to bring Rajalakshmi, home frequently and introduced her to his wife Shruti as a colleague. He even dropped her home at night. The polytechnic where Rajalakshmi worked was part of the Panimalar group of educational institutions. Shruti initially believed the two were just colleagues until Sambasivam came home with Rajalakshmi on Tuesday and said the woman was moving in with them permanently.     On Wednesday morning, Sambasivam allegedly tied a 'mangalsutra' to Rajalakshmi in front of his wife, police said, based on Shruti's confession. A shocked Shruti picked up a fight with Sambasivam who asked her to maintain a cordial relationship and take care of Rajalakshmi. On Thursday morning, after he left for college a fight broke out between the two women.     Police said Rajalakshmi allegedly abused Sruthi and went into the bathroom. Sruthi followed her in and strangled her with the 'mangalsutra'. She then tried to make it appear that the woman had fainted in the bathroom. She took her in an autorickshaw to a nearby hospital where she was declared 'brought dead'. Doctors who noticed a few marks around her neck informed the Thiruverkadu police who registered a case of suspicious death under CrPC section 176.     The body was sent for postmortem to Kilpauk Medical College and Hospital.     After finding that the two women were at home at the time of the death, police interrogated Sruthi for more than an hour but she continued to maintain that Rajyalakshmi had died of injuries sustained when she fell down in the bathroom.     "She confessed to the murder when we told her that her fingerprints had been lifted from the scene of crime," said an investigating officer. "She said she had smashed the woman's head against the wall and later strangled her with the 'thali'." Police altered the case to murder and arrested Sruthi.     Initial inquiries revealed that Rajalakshmi had been married to a man named Rajasekhar for a while and they had separated. She then got married to Suresh, a relative who worked in a private firm, a few years ago and the couple moved into a house in Mogappair.     They allegedly had frequent quarrels as he tortured her and she left him too, police found.     Rajalakshmi then got a job with Panimalar Engineering College where she met Sambasivam. The two became friends and began seeing each other. Rajalakshmi recently moved to the polytechnic in Choolaimedu, police said.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/US-journalists-killer-annoyed-colleagues-Ex-boss/articleshow/48704167.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:21 IST 2015||ROANOKE, United States: The disgruntled former US television station employee who murdered two journalists had "annoyed" colleagues but showed no signs at work of any mental health issues, his former boss said Thursday.     Vester Lee Flanagan, 41, worked as a reporter for WDBJ in Roanoke, Virginia from March 2012 to February 2013, but was dismissed for poor performance and angry behavior, general manager Jeffrey Marks said.     On Wednesday, Flanagan shot and killed two of the CBS affiliate's journalists while they were conducting an on-air interview. He later fatally shot himself.     "We are still at a loss to figure out what happened to him in those two and a half years" since he was fired, Marks told a news conference flanked by dozens of staff, many of them holding hands.     "I don't think we identified that he had mental health issues. We certainly identified that he had performance issues."     Marks defended the station's hiring record and said its parent company had "a very elaborate program to screen employees."     Flanagan passed background checks and came with only positive references, Marks said.     It was only after he was hired, Marks said, that things went downhill.     "Vester's behavior annoyed a lot of people in the news station," Marks said.     Flanagan, who went by the on-screen name Bryce Williams, alleged in a manifesto faxed to ABC News that he was discriminated against as a gay, black journalist.     Marks said accusations in 2013 that he was treated unfairly were "immediately investigated and found to be without merit."     During his employment, Flanagan complied with demands that he seek medical help, but he was ultimately dismissed.     He was escorted from the building by police and made an ominous aside to the news director -- handing him a wooden cross and saying "'you'll need this'," Marks said.     As he left, he also made a "derogatory comment" to Adam Ward, the cameraman he shot dead on Wednesday.     Flanagan filed a complaint with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and a civil action suit, which were dismissed, he said.     "All of these investigations determined that no reasonable person would have taken any of the cited incidents as discrimination or harassment."     After killing Ward and reporter Alison Parker live on the air, Flanagan posted a video of the attack on social media.||ROANOKE, UNITED STATES
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:21 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/SC-acquits-Romesh-Sharma-in-Budhiraja-murder-case/articleshow/48704930.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:21 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Thursday upheld the Delhi High Court order acquitting former Congress leader Romesh Sharma in the case relating to the killing of fashion designer Kunjum Budhiraja.     A bench of Justices Pinaki Chandra Ghose and R K Agrawal dismissed an appeal filed by the Delhi government challenging HC order.     The Delhi government contended that the HC had erred in acquitting Sharma but it was strongly opposed by his counsel and senior advocate Siddharth Luthra who submitted that his client was in love with Kunjum and there was no evidence to prove his involvement in the case.     Sharma, who was alleged to be a frontman of underworld don Dawood Ibrahim, was convicted by a trial court on February 15, 2008. Kunjum was killed on March 20, 1999 at Sharma's South Delhi-based 'Jai Mata Di' farm house by a group of hired gangsters from Uttar Pradesh.     The trial court had convicted Sharma and five other accused in the case and had awarded life term to all. The HC, however, acquitted Sharma and co-accused Tejendir Verdi but upheld conviction and sentence of other four accused— Sharma's nephew Surinder Mishra, Hemchand, Santram and Ramesh alias Bobby.     While acquitting Sharma, the HC had said "Romesh Sharma and Kunjum were in love, and desired the company of each other. It does not establish that Sharma had got fed up with her". It had turned down Delhi police's contention that Sharma wanted to get rid of Kunjum as she knew about his alleged illegal activities.     "A grieving lover falling over the body of his mate and performing the rituals of a marriage can well be an expression of lasting love, and need not necessarily be a drama," the HC had said.     Sharma was in judicial custody at the time of the Kunjum's murder.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Raid-on-Bengaluru-centre-reveals-horror-tales/articleshow/48704718.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:21 IST 2015||BENGALURU: A State Human Rights Commission raid on a de-addiction centre in Jnanabharati Layout, near Kengeri, southwest Bengaluru, found 90 inmates living in pathetic conditions and subjected to inhuman treatment.     Thursday's raid followed the murder of an inmate of another de-addiction centre in Kothanur recently.     The SHRC raid on Sri Santhosh Social Service Society, also known as 4S Society, followed a tipoff. According to SHRC officials, the centre has been in existence for seven years at least, but the society couldn't produce documents of having obtained permission from the social welfare department. Commission officials said the centre had the permission from the DC and the DHO.     "Most inmates are between 20 and 35 years. They showed us signs of being physically abused. The centre has violated other norms too. Although it's supposed to have one nurse for every 15 patients and at least one in-house doctor and a psychiatrist, it didn't have any," said an SHRC spokesperson.     4 arrested for killing inmate:     Kothanur police arrested a de-addiction centre staffer and three inmates for allegedly beating to death a 28-year-old inmate. Dinesh was admitted to the centre by his family as he was an alcoholic. He was later found dead in a hospital. Family members noticed several bruises on his body. Narayana, an inmate-turned-staffer, gave some medicines to Dinesh, who later turned aggressive. Narayana sought the help of inmates Suresh, Subhan and Simon, to subdue Dinesh.     When Dinesh retaliated, the quartet overpowered him till he became unconscious. He died in hospital.||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/A-jolly-good-fellow-say-Khannas-friends/articleshow/48704630.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:21 IST 2015||Sanjeev Khanna, Indrani Mukerjea's second husband and suspected ally in Sheena Bora's killing, may be the most surprising element in this macabre drama, but his friends and associates in Kolkata refused to cast aspersions on "Sanju" just yet.     From being the biggest dart enthusiast at one of Kolkata's poshest clubs (the CC&FC) to having a finger in every pie, Sanjeev was everyone's "best mate" and go-to guy who friends described as: "A doer... someone who could get things done."     The morning after Khanna's arrest, TOI spoke to Ajay Rawla, the man who Khanna worked for as a consultant and whose house he was picked up from on Wednesday afternoon. "It wasn't like he was hiding like a desperate fugitive in my house. We had a meeting in the morning after which he drove me home and that's when news broke on television. We were sitting, watching, wondering what steps to take when the police arrived," explained Rawla.     Seven years his senior, Khanna's association with Rawla dates back to the time they went to Mayo College in Ajmer. Later, Khanna went on to become an aide for Rawla's pet projects. Besides running his own business in wireless communications, Khanna was there setting up chef Shaun Kenworthy and Rawla's restaurant 1658 or immersed in the heritage project of converting the Bawali Rajbari into a hotel. "He was getting all the construction work and labourers in place. He was very good in helping out with permissions through his connections with excise and contractors," remembers Kenworthy.     Khanna, who seldom missed his outings at the club, motor rallies and horse racing as a prominent face in the social circuit, was not the same man before he met Indrani, recounts Bull Banthia, a close friend. "Well-read and well-versed, Sanju had a great mechanical mind with a solution for everything," is how Bull chose to describe his "jolly good friend who loved meeting new people, hung out at the club but wasn't a social climber". "It was Indrani who emerged as this socialite and drove him to consciously build contacts with those higher up in the social rung after marriage," said the Kolkata-based entrepreneur. "That's the reason why I distanced myself from them until overnight she left Kolkata with their daughter and Sanju's wallet."     While Indrani never surfaces in conversations, his daughter Vidhie, who stayed with Indrani, is a fond subject with his friends. "He would miss his daughter but was resigned to fate, hoping that someday she would find him," said Rawla, adding, "It was Vidhie who called Sanjeev on Wednesday to give him the news."     No one seems to know about any recent interaction between Khanna and Indrani. G M Kapur, a known name in Kolkata who was Intach's state convener and happens to be Khanna's "mama", seemed disturbed with "all the theorizing" of Khanna's role in the crime. He declined to look back on Indrani and Khanna's relationship but added, "The last that there was any contact with Indrani or her family was when Vidhie visited Calcutta last year to celebrate the 75th birthday of her grandmother (Khanna's mother who lives with him)."     Khanna's Facebook posts on "karma" in the weeks and months following Sheena's alleged murder on April 24, 2012, make for interesting reading. On April 30, Khanna shared photo messages: "Say whatever, whenever the f*** you want to"; "Sometimes I get so weird, I even freak myself out".     On May 24, exactly a month after the alleged killing, he wrote: "You can never tell what people are thinking and feeling unless they tell you, and usually they lie. you ask them, 'Whats wrong?' and they say 'Nothing'. You accept this because it's easier than digging for the truth. People smile when they want to cry, they laugh when they want to scream and shout. They pretend like nothing is wrong because they don't want to face the truth. Things aren't always rainbows and butterflies, sometimes you gotta scream and cry your anger and sadness to the world, because you can only hold it in for so long before something in you snaps. so when you want to cry, cry. When you want to scream, scream. Don't hide behind fake smiles, it's ok to not be alright."     ||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Sheena-docu-Michail-add-to-mystery/articleshow/48701752.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:21 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Michail, Sheena's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered have raised a number of unanswered questions.    Two days after his mother, Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Michail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai Police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed that what he gave to police was enough to prove that Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora (who are actually parents of Indrani) as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. Some questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukherjea.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Michail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43 as mentioned in reports after her arrest.    Adding more to the suspense, Michail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Michail studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board examination, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that knew that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard that her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard that she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband who she introduced as Peter Mukherjea."    The two-member Mumbai Police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Michail, who on Wednesday, was the first one to reveal that Sheena was Indrani's daughter, twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Michail's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Michail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukherjae is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Michail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."  ||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Grandparents-are-Sheenas-mom-dad-on-birth-certificate/articleshow/48704559.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:21 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Mikhail, Sheena Bora's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered led to some unanswered questions on Thursday.    Two days after his mother Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Mikhail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed what he gave the police was enough to prove Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora, who are actually Indrani's parents, as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. However, many questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter. In many cases in India involving single mothers, grandparents are known to put in their names as father and mother.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukerjea, that is, 13 years after Sheena was born.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Mikhail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43.    Mikhail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Mikhail     studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board exam, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband, who she introduced as Peter Mukerjea."    The two-member Mumbai police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Mikhail twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Mikhail 's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time, he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Mikhail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukerjea is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Mikhail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Sheena-bowled-us-over-Rahuls-uncle/articleshow/48704552.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:21 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: Had things worked out as desired for Peter Mukherjea's first wife Shabnam and her family in Dehradun, Rahul Mukherjea and Sheena Bora would have been married for over three years now.     Shabnam's brother Shaleen Singh told TOI on Thursday that in 2011 Rahul brought Sheena to their sprawling home in Dehradun to seek approval from the family for their marriage.     The entire family-Shabnam, her younger brother Shaleen, father Anand Singh and mother Seema-were reportedly bowled over by Sheena's jovial nature and affection towards the elderly people. Impressed, the family gave its "unqualified and unanimous approval" for the wedding, which was supposed to take place within a few months, said Shaleen.     Stunned by the recent development, Shaleen said, "Sheena was among those rare persons who left a deep and lifelong impact on people. She was good-looking, a sweet person, clean of heart and good to talk to. None of us objected to the wedding."     Shaleen learnt of Sheena's murder through news channels. "It would have been great if she had become a part of the family. I don't know what was the cause and motive behind the heinous crime, but all those behind the killing of the jovial-natured girl should not be spared at any cost," he said.     A former model and tele-actor, 49-year-old Shaleen today owns the Sanskar International school in Jogiwala here. He recalled the last meeting with Shabnam and Rahul in April this year. "My father Anand Singh passed away in April. They had come to pay their respects but we did not interact much."     However, Shaleen said of late the interaction between him and his sister Shabnam was limited. Although Shabnam's farm Gul-e-Shabnam and Shaleen's residence Shankar Sadan are barely 200 metres away in Badripur, meetings between them were rare. While Shaleen and his mother stay on different floors of Shankar Sadan, Shabnam stays alone at her residence and is frequently visited by Rahul.     "There are matters in each family which we do not want to disclose. We are not against each other but do not interact much. She comes to meet our mother occasionally," said Shaleen, adding that Shabnam was passionate about painting and had a studio in her residence.     Shaleen denied having any details about the presence of Mumbai police in Dehradun. "Neither Doon police nor Mumbai police have contacted me over the issue."     Staff at Shabnam's residence said she was out-of-station but they were not aware of her whereabouts.||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Kilpauk-doctor-murder-Hubby-to-approach-court/articleshow/48704411.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:21 IST 2015||CHENNAI: It's been four days since police claimed to have solved the murder of S Sathya, 24, a PG medical student. However, her husband has put forth questions that police have failed to answer. Though investigating officers confirmed Sathya was not sexually assaulted before she was killed, they leaked to some section of media saying that they changed their stance on Wednesday and said there were indications of attempt to rape on the deceased.     Police personnel revealed the details soon after Sathya's husband Dr P Sesu, also employed at a primary health centre in Perambalur, expressed certain doubts.     He alleged the police hastily solved the case citing the state assembly, which is in motion. Sathya was found dead at her house in Kilpauk on August 20.     On August 23, police arrested Harintham Depnath, a BTech graduate, who lived at the second floor on the same apartment. Neither was there any mention about sexual assault or attempt on Sathya when the body was recovered from the house. The nor did the doctors. Police didn't tell this during the arrest of Depnath on August 23. "What forced the police to reveal about the sexual harassment attempt on my wife now?" asked Sesu.     "I want to live a peaceful life with my two sons - Tamil Nesan, 6, and Karmugilan, 4. The studies and the future of my children is important for me. I do respect the police personnel who spent sleepless nights to solve the murder, but there are questions that need to be answered," he said.     "I live in Perambalur with my children, but we speak through live video calls. I have told my sons that Sathya has gone to the God, as the Almighty likes her more. "Hereafter, we cannot speak or meet her. I don't know how far my children will admit it?" said Sesu. "I will approach the court seeking a fair probe into the murder of my wife. I want to find out the real cause behind her death. I want the real accused to get punished for his deed," said Sesu.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Woman-strangles-husbands-lover/articleshow/48704388.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:21 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A woman beat up and strangled her husband's partner, an assistant professor at a polytechnic in Choolaimedu, in their Thiruverkadu home on Thursday, police said. A court later remanded the accused, 32-year-old Shruti, in judicial custody.     Police said Sambasivam, a professor at Panimalar Engineering College in Poonamallee, used to bring Rajalakshmi, home frequently and introduced her to his wife Shruti as a colleague. He even dropped her home at night. The polytechnic where Rajalakshmi worked was part of the Panimalar group of educational institutions. Shruti initially believed the two were just colleagues until Sambasivam came home with Rajalakshmi on Tuesday and said the woman was moving in with them permanently.     On Wednesday morning, Sambasivam allegedly tied a 'mangalsutra' to Rajalakshmi in front of his wife, police said, based on Shruti's confession. A shocked Shruti picked up a fight with Sambasivam who asked her to maintain a cordial relationship and take care of Rajalakshmi. On Thursday morning, after he left for college a fight broke out between the two women.     Police said Rajalakshmi allegedly abused Sruthi and went into the bathroom. Sruthi followed her in and strangled her with the 'mangalsutra'. She then tried to make it appear that the woman had fainted in the bathroom. She took her in an autorickshaw to a nearby hospital where she was declared 'brought dead'. Doctors who noticed a few marks around her neck informed the Thiruverkadu police who registered a case of suspicious death under CrPC section 176.     The body was sent for postmortem to Kilpauk Medical College and Hospital.     After finding that the two women were at home at the time of the death, police interrogated Sruthi for more than an hour but she continued to maintain that Rajyalakshmi had died of injuries sustained when she fell down in the bathroom.     "She confessed to the murder when we told her that her fingerprints had been lifted from the scene of crime," said an investigating officer. "She said she had smashed the woman's head against the wall and later strangled her with the 'thali'." Police altered the case to murder and arrested Sruthi.     Initial inquiries revealed that Rajalakshmi had been married to a man named Rajasekhar for a while and they had separated. She then got married to Suresh, a relative who worked in a private firm, a few years ago and the couple moved into a house in Mogappair.     They allegedly had frequent quarrels as he tortured her and she left him too, police found.     Rajalakshmi then got a job with Panimalar Engineering College where she met Sambasivam. The two became friends and began seeing each other. Rajalakshmi recently moved to the polytechnic in Choolaimedu, police said.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/US-journalists-killer-annoyed-colleagues-Ex-boss/articleshow/48704167.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:21 IST 2015||ROANOKE, United States: The disgruntled former US television station employee who murdered two journalists had "annoyed" colleagues but showed no signs at work of any mental health issues, his former boss said Thursday.     Vester Lee Flanagan, 41, worked as a reporter for WDBJ in Roanoke, Virginia from March 2012 to February 2013, but was dismissed for poor performance and angry behavior, general manager Jeffrey Marks said.     On Wednesday, Flanagan shot and killed two of the CBS affiliate's journalists while they were conducting an on-air interview. He later fatally shot himself.     "We are still at a loss to figure out what happened to him in those two and a half years" since he was fired, Marks told a news conference flanked by dozens of staff, many of them holding hands.     "I don't think we identified that he had mental health issues. We certainly identified that he had performance issues."     Marks defended the station's hiring record and said its parent company had "a very elaborate program to screen employees."     Flanagan passed background checks and came with only positive references, Marks said.     It was only after he was hired, Marks said, that things went downhill.     "Vester's behavior annoyed a lot of people in the news station," Marks said.     Flanagan, who went by the on-screen name Bryce Williams, alleged in a manifesto faxed to ABC News that he was discriminated against as a gay, black journalist.     Marks said accusations in 2013 that he was treated unfairly were "immediately investigated and found to be without merit."     During his employment, Flanagan complied with demands that he seek medical help, but he was ultimately dismissed.     He was escorted from the building by police and made an ominous aside to the news director -- handing him a wooden cross and saying "'you'll need this'," Marks said.     As he left, he also made a "derogatory comment" to Adam Ward, the cameraman he shot dead on Wednesday.     Flanagan filed a complaint with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and a civil action suit, which were dismissed, he said.     "All of these investigations determined that no reasonable person would have taken any of the cited incidents as discrimination or harassment."     After killing Ward and reporter Alison Parker live on the air, Flanagan posted a video of the attack on social media.||ROANOKE, UNITED STATES
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/pune/Brutality-shocked-investigating-officer-too/articleshow/48566439.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:26 IST 2015||PUNE: "Never in my 35 years of service did I come across such a brutally executed, pre-mediated and cold-blooded murders as was the case with the seven victims of the Rathi household," said former assistant commissioner of police Dilip Shinde, who had investigated the case and filed a chargesheet in the Pune sessions court.    "The killers did not spare two small children and a pregnant woman. It showed the brutal mindset they had while committing the crime," said Shinde.    "When I visited the scene of crime, I saw blood splattered all over the rooms inside the one BHK flat and bodies of the victims lying in pools of blood. I was shocked to see so many people killed in a single instance of crime for robbery," he said.    Shinde said police had set up several teams of investigators to follow the leads collected from the initial investigation. "We were able to establish the identities of the suspects within 12 hours of the crime based on the information provided by some witnesses who saw them leaving the building. Since the suspects hailed from Rajasthan, our probe focused on their likely movement in that state and we visited Rajasthan thrice and one of our teams camped there for a long time," he said.    Based on information and tip-offs provided by the Rajasthan police, they caught each of the three suspects and their interrogations helped establish the chain of events leading to the multiple murders and the events after the suspects left the Rathi household to reach their native places in Rajasthan via Ahmedabad, said Shinde.    Main suspect Narayan Chetanram Chaudhary was arrested on September 5, 1994, almost 10 days after the murders while another key suspect, Jitendra alias Jitu Nayansingh Gehlot, was arrested on November 21, 1994 and Raju Rajpurohit was arrested on October 15, 1994, from different places in Rajasthan.  ||PUNE
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/pune/In-18-mths-150-cases-filed-under-anti-superstition-Act-most-victims-women/articleshow/48566329.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:26 IST 2015||PUNE: It took the murder of rationalist Narendra Dabholkar for Maharashtra's anti-superstition Act to finally see the light of day in December 2013. Dabholkar had drafted the original bill in 2003 and since then fought relentlessly for its passage in the face of stiff opposition.    Two years after Dabholkar's death, the Act has encouraged people who have suffered exploitation in the name of religion and rituals, particularly women, to register cases against those involved in such practices. More than 150 cases have been filed till date under the Act, officially known as the Maharashtra Prevention and Eradication of Human Sacrifice and other Inhuman, Evil and Aghori Practices and Black Magic Act, 2013.    The only conviction in all these cases happened early this year. Bhandara's chief judicial magistrate convicted an "exorcist" along with two others under the Act for trying to cure a 29-year-old woman through black magic. Investigations and trials in the remaining cases are on.    In one particularly hair-raising incident, the police arrested some members of a family in Nashik while they were preparing to sacrifice children after being told that the act would bestow upon them the powers of a mantra. The family had dug a pit and was ready to put the children in it when the police raided the spot following a complaint.    The first case under the Act was registered in Pune in December 2013 while the Act was still an ordinance. The Vishrantwadi police then arrested a maulana, Sayed Alam (36), of Shantinagar in Yerawada, for allegedly inducing a 25-year-old married woman to sit naked with him to perform a black magic ritual to cure her husband of his tuberculosis. The maulana had also told the woman that a lot of money would be generated automatically during the ritual, of which he would give her Rs 3 lakh.    In fact, the fake assurance of curing people or their relatives of diseases figures in several of the cases filed under the Act. One of the first such cases was reported from Bhagyanagar (Nanded) where two tantriks were arrested for advertising that they could treat incurable diseases with their supernatural powers. In another case, a baba sexually assaulted a young girl in Nagpur while promising a cure.    Many cases relate to people being fooled with the lure of having their money multiplied. In one incident, eight people, including one Rajandre Pagare alias Anandgiri Maharaj, duped a Nandurbar woman, Nila Mehta (49), and others of Rs 12.85 lakh while promising to multiply the money by performing some rituals. In another case, a baba from Malegaon in Nashik district took Rs 3 lakh from a Jalgaon woman while promising that she would reap a windfall soon. He also sexually exploited the woman. In Wadgaon (Nashik), a case was registered against two babas from Rajasthan who extracted money from people with the assurance of finding hidden wealth for them.    In April this year, the Niphad (Nashik district) police arrested three persons for putting some "ritual material" in front of a woman's house to get a court verdict in their favour in a land dispute case. The woman, Tarabai Gosavi (58), complained to the police that the trio had put different types of pulses, eggs, lemons pierced with pins, turmeric powder and kumkum at her door in a black magic ritual.    "People who suffer at hands of these babas and sadhus are coming forward with their complaints. The Maharashtra Andhashraddha Nirmulan Samiti (MANS) is training its workers to assist the police and people to register cases under the Act. I have personally conducted over 400 training programmes where I have explained to people how these babas attempt to swindle people," said Nandini Jadhav, MANS executive president (Pune unit).    Dabholkar's son Hamid said MANS is also planning to help victims of black magic and witchcraft in other states. "Five women accused of practicing witchcraft were lynched in a tribal-dominated village in Ranchi district. We are considering how to help the people there," he said.    Activist and eminent scholar Vidya Bal said that women were the main victims of such evil superstitious practices. "Women and the poor suffer at the hands of those who use religion and rituals. It has been a long struggle to imbibe rationality in the minds of people. But we have made a start, thanks to the sacrifice of Narendra Dabholkar," she told a convention of MANS workers recently.  ||PUNE
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/pune/State-govt-lacks-will-to-arrest-killers-say-activists-leaders/articleshow/48566259.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:26 IST 2015||PUNE: The Maharashtra Andhashraddha Nirmulan Samiti (MANS) activists, leaders and workers on Thursday expressed apprehensions over the state government's will to probe into murder of rationalist Narendra Dabholkar and arrest his killers and the mastermind behind it.    MANS and other organizations marked the day with a rally that started from Vitthal Ramji Shinde Bridge, where he was killed in 2013 and continued at Manohar Mangal Karyala near Mhatre Bridge.    State president of MANS and veteran leader N D Patil said, "I doubt if politicians really want to probe into the murder cases of Dabholkar and Govind Pansare. Be it the Congress-NCP government or the current BJP-led government, the approach is same. They don't want to go into the roots of the case." It is hard to believe that the police force is completely in the dark about the killers," he said.    Congress party's Rajya Sabha MP Husain Dalwai said, "I am sorry that the Congress government in Maharashtra could not arrest Dabholkar's murderers. I don't know about my party's stand, but I am with MANS. It is not that police are inefficient, but they are unwilling to probe into the case." He also criticized former state home minister and NCP leader late R R Patil saying that the latter was not efficient enough to take a tough stand.    Aam Aadmi Party (AAP) leader Subhash Ware said, "The government is not interested in the probe as they know where it will lead."    Avinash Patil, state executive president of MANS said, "We know we are being ignored, but we will continue to fight using constitutional methods."    Various speakers supported FTII students and accused the government of suppressing students by using police force. Well-known Marathi film and theatre personalities including National Award winners Nagnath Manjule, Girish Kulkarni, actor Jitendra Joshi, Sonali Kulkarni, Kishor Kadam, Sunil Sukthankar, Sumitra Bhave and Atul Pethe came out in support of MANS.      ||PUNE
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/pune/No-justice-till-both-killers-are-hanged/articleshow/48566182.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:26 IST 2015||  PUNE: Twenty-one years after the horrifying murders of seven members of his family, Sanjay Rathi still finds it difficult to overcome the pain and suffering the rest of the family had to endure.    The President's decision to reject the mercy petitions of the two killers, convicted and sentenced to death by the court for the gruesome killings, comes as only a part of relief for him. Sanjay, who is the complainant in the case, lost his pregnant wife, Babita alias Neeta (24), two-and-a-half-year-old son, Chirag, besides his mother, two sisters and the family's domestic help.    Sanjay said, "When the mercy petitions were pending, I had sent four letters to the President's office appealing for rejecting the mercy pleas at the earliest. We also handed over a representation to the then President APJ Abdul Kalam during his visit to Pune city. Now, since the mercy pleas have been rejected, we want the killers to be hanged as soon as possible."    He said the rejection of mercy petitions has come after a very long time. "The decision ought to have come earlier considering our sufferings and justice for the beloved ones I lost," he told TOI on Thursday. "It has been 21 years that we have been suffering. The system must think about this in matters like deciding the mercy petitions of condemned prisoners," he added.    "People commit crimes and it takes a lot of time for the victims to get justice. We feel some relief from the fact that the mercy petitions have been rejected but, real justice will be done only when they will be hanged. We expect that the executions happen at the earliest so that the souls of our beloved ones get peace," said Sanjay.    He never went back to the house after the murders as he did not feel like living there. "We have been able to face the situation only because of the support of our family members, friends, relatives and also some good work done by the police and especially special public prosecutor Ujjwal Nikam. Because of them, we were able to start our life anew," he said.    "I never imagined that Raju Rajpurohit, a former employee of our sweet mart who worked with us for four months, would be instrumental in commissioning such a heinous crime. We had no enmity with him and we had no inkling about what was going on in his mind," he added.  ||PUNE
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/pune/Mercy-plea-decision-took-long-Nikam/articleshow/48566126.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:26 IST 2015||PUNE: "It pains me to see that the mercy petition has been decided after a very long time. But I am relieved that it has been finally decided by the President," said top lawyer Ujjwal Nikam, who led the prosecution's case in the Rathi multiple murders, as a special public prosecutor.    "So many death sentences have been commuted to life sentences by the Supreme Court in the recent past only for the reason of delay in deciding mercy petitions," he said, suggesting the need for a system where the President decides the mercy plea within three months of receiving one so that the death row convicts do not get the benefit of delay, which defeats a deterrent sentence.    "If mercy pleas are decided swiftly, it sends a strong message that people involved in such heinous crimes do not get any relief," he added.    The two condemned prisoners, Narayan Chetanram Chaudhary and Jitendra alias Jitu Nayansingh Gehlot, now have the legal option of challenging the rejection of their mercy pleas in the high court or the Supreme Court.    As of now, they are lodged in Nagpur Central Prison. The jail authorities told TOI on Thursday that they have not received any communication so far on the further process following the rejection of the mercy petition.    Nikam, who has represented the state in several high profile cases, including the 1993 Mumbai serial blasts, was favoured by the Rathi family. The members had written to the state government to appoint him as the special public prosecutor considering the challenges posed by the case.    The entire case was based on circumstances as there was no eyewitness, which made it challenging for the police and the prosecution to establish beyond doubt the chain of events and individual roles of the three accused (one of them, Raju Rajpurohit, later turned approver) in the brutal killings.    Nikam said, "When I was shown the chargesheet, I found that the investigation done by the police was good but, the challenge before me was to establish and present the role of each of the accused before the court. This was because the case was based on circumstantial evidence."    "The murders were executed in the most brutal manner as the killers had knifed each of the victims to death and did not spare even the two young children and a pregnant woman, who kept constantly pleading with them not to kill her as she was to deliver a child soon," said Nikam.    "The conduct of the two accused before and after the commission of murders was particularly the biggest aggravating factor that resulted in the court concluding in favour of death sentences," said Nikam.  ||PUNE
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/State-prisons-filled-beyond-capacity-have-inadequate-staff/articleshow/48561666.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:26 IST 2015||MUMBAI: The recent Supreme Court judgment, lifting the ban on releasing convicts if they fulfil norms set by the court, may not offer a respite to the "heavily overcrowded" state prisons. In the state's 51 prisons, there are over 4,100 prisoners ove and above the capacity of the jail management to accommodate them. The state spends nearly Rs 200 crore every year on management of jails.    The state government is mulling an idea of releasing around 700 prisoners, including around 150 serving life term for murder, over the next four-five months. "Even after releasing such a high number of convicts, there are chances of more prisoners adding to the list during the period and we expect a little respite from the 'overflowing' jails," home department sources said.    In an interim decision on July 23, 2015, the apex court modified the clause that had restrained states from remitting sentences. This paved the way for those convicts to walk out of jails who showed better track record during imprisonment. A senior official told TOI that the capacity of state's jails to accommodate prisoners in their barracks was 23,536. "This is the utmost capacity," he said. "However, we have 27,600 criminals behind bars, which means that there are 200 prisoners in each jail over and above their capacity," home department sources said.    An official said even the staff to handle prisoners was very less. There were three incidents in the recent past where prisoners managed to escape from jails in the absence of close vigil by the prison staff.||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/gurgaon/Gurgaon-teacher-waiting-for-bus-when-man-shot-her-thrice/articleshow/48565358.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:26 IST 2015||GURGAON: The patient for whom a green corridor was created on Thursday afternoon was on her way to a school, where she works as a teacher, when she was shot at around 7.30am.     The 24-year-old was attacked when she was waiting for her school bus at Bilaspur Chowk on the Delhi-Jaipur highway. According to police, a man who had his face covered with a handkerchief approached her on a black bike. He shot her thrice, and managed to flee the spot. An FIR against the man, who the police have so far not been %able to identify, has been lodged under section 307 (murder attempt) of the IPC and Arms Act.     Passersby rushed the injured woman to Rockland Hospital in Manesar, from where she was taken to Max Hospital. Her colleagues told police a man named Fauji, who is from Pataudi, used to wait outside the school every day. "We pray to God for our daughter's life. What led to the crime is not important now," the victim's uncle said. "We are probing and the accused will be arrested at the earliest," Rajesh Kumar, ACP (crime), Gurgaon, said.     ||GURGAON
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chandigarh/Mistaken-for-gangster-brothers-chased-shot-at-by-Punjab-cops/articleshow/48565346.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:26 IST 2015||SANGRUR: In a second case of "mistaken identity" in two months, six Punjab cops, allegedly in an inebriated condition, chased a Ford Figo car and indiscriminately fired at two photographer brothers, seriously injuring both, near Dhuri town in Sangrur district on Tuesday night.    According to officials, the cops mistook the duo for gangsters. An Akali leader was shot dead in Amritsar on June 17 after cops suspected him of being a notorious goon.    A case has been registered under Section 307 (attempt to murder) of the IPC against six "unidentified" cops, who are deputed in CIA wing of Sangrur police.    Satinder Kumar alias Honey, who is undergoing treatment at Dayanand Medical College and Hospital (DMCH), Ludhiana, along with his brother Sunil alias Happy, told TOI on phone that the incident occurred between Farwahi and Katron villages near Dhuri. The brothers, who run a studio in Sherpur town, were returning from Malerkotla after attending a function when the incident occurred.    "We had reached Farwahi around 10pm when a Martui Swift approached us and someone from that car fired at us, breaking the windowpane in front of me. I was hit in the arm and thought we had been attacked by robbers. I immediately stepped on the gas," he said.    "The Swift chased us for around three kilometres and they repeatedly fired at our car. I lost control of the car near Katron village and it veered off the road before coming to a halt right in front of the Swift. Even after our vehicle halted, the firing continued and we saved ourselves by crouching behind the seats. When we tried to get down, they fired at my brother's shoulder and started beating us with rifle butts," he added. Once they got out of the car, the duo realized that the attackers were not robbers but cops.    Satinder claimed a few villagers, who were attending a religious function nearby, reached the spot after hearing the gunfire and helped them.    An FIR registered on a complaint by Prem Chand, a resident of Katron, states that he saw six persons, of whom four were in police uniform, near the village and all of them were in an inebriated condition. "They were not even able to walk and they fled in a vehicle when the villagers started gathering there," the complaint said.    Sangrur SSP Pritpal Singh did not respond to repeated calls. SP (D) Paramjit Singh Goraya, who is investigating the case, said, "Police had information that a wanted gangster, Ghudu, and his aides were moving around in the area. When he was spotted, he fired at a police party near Faridpur Kalan village and injured a head constable before fleeing. Like the injured brothers, he was also travelling in a white Figo car. The police party mistakenly chased the brothers' car as it was also of the same make and colour. Cops mistook the two as gangsters and fired at them. Two separate FIRs have been registered." The SP refused to identify the cops involved in the incident. He said medical examination of the six cops was conducted.    On June 17, Mukhjeet Singh Mukha, a Youth Akali Dal leader in-charge of ward number 16 of Amritsar Municipal Corporation, was shot in his car by an Amritsar police team in civil clothes. Senior police officials had later claimed that Mukha was killed in retaliatory firing by police, who suspected him to be notorious gangster Jagdeep Singh Jaggu.    Following a terror alert from the Centre last week, security had been beefed up across Punjab. On July 27, three terrorists had stormed a police station at Dinanagar in Gurdaspur district, killing seven people.  ||SANGRUR
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/madurai/Madras-HC-stays-trial-in-murder-case-citing-flaws-in-investigation/articleshow/48564610.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:26 IST 2015||MADURAI: Flaws in police investigation in the murder of a college student in 2012 has made the Madras high court Madurai bench stay the trial of the case, which is pending before the additional district and sessions court in Tirunelveli and order reinvestigation.     The court observed that as far as the accused persons are concerned, sufficient materials had not been collected, except the confession given to the police, which was not admissible in the evidence. No identification parade was conducted. Medical records pertaining to the treatment, given to the deceased youth, had not been recovered. The doctor who treated the deceased, had also not been examined, the court said.     "The court, going by materials available on record, has every reason to find that the investigation has not been done thoroughly and there are lots of flaws. It will amount to doing injustice, if the trial is allowed to go on with the present materials," said justice S Nagamuthu. The judge's observation came up on a petition filed by one S Padmini, 55, seeking CBI probe into the murder of her son, Sasikumar.     On March 30, 2012, Sasikumar and three friends went to Agasthiyar Falls in Papanasam in Tirunelveli, was attacked by a group. Eleven days from the attack, Sasikumar died. Vickramasingapuram police investigated the case, while the trial is pending before the additional district and sessions court in Tirunelveli.     During hearing, the petitioner's counsel A R Jeyaruthran said sufficient materials have not been collected in the case. "If the trial proceeds, no purpose will be served. The real culprits will simply escape from the clutches of law," said the counsel. Denying it, additional advocate general K Chellapandian said when the trial was about to begin, the petitioner was trying to drag the proceedings.     Rejecting the AAG's submissions, the judge passed the order disposing of the petition by directing to reopen the investigation and entrusting the same to assistant superintendent (ASP) of police of Tenkasi, P Aravindhan besides staying of the trial. The ASP should complete his task in four months from the receipt of court order.     ||MADURAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/patna/JDU-man-found-in-injured-state/articleshow/48564555.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:26 IST 2015||PATNA: JD(U) youth wing's state general secretary Upendra Kumar Vibhuti was on Thursday found bleeding profusely from his neck and left wrist near the party' s office on Beerchand Patel Path here and was admitted to a private hospital at Kankarbagh.     Vibhuti is a named accused in the case of murder of one Awadhesh Singh on July 26 at ' Malmas Mela' held at Rajgir in Nalanda district. Police have started the process of confiscation of his property at Rajgir as he had been absconding.     Around 8.30am, Vibhuti came on foot near the party office and fell down on the street. Santosh Kushwaha, president of the JD(U)'s state youth wing, put him in his car. " On Vibhutis request, I took him to his elder brother Dharamraj Prasad' s home at Machchua Toli, who took him to the hospital," said Kushwaha.     Vibhuti' s wife Sunita Singh told police her husband left home around 9am on August 19. He told her that he had got a call from Awadhesh's son Pankaj and son-in-law for settlement of the murder case. After meeting both of them, he would go to court to surrender. But he did not return home and his mobile phone remained switched off.     Vibhuti' s brother Dharamraj Prasad told TOI, " He was almost unconscious at the time of being admitted to hospital. He could not tell us what went wrong with him."     He added, " We hail from Rajgir. Awadhesh Singh' s family named six persons in the murder case — Aftab Alam, Ashok Rai, Naro Yadav, Vidya Yadav, Dr Anil and Vibhuti. Nalanda police put up a notice for confiscation of property at our ancestral house at Rajgir on August 18 evening." Sources said the slain Awadhesh and Vibhuti had a dispute over bagging the contract of ' Malmas Mela' , which led to murder.             ||PATNA
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:26 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:26 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/SC-acquits-Romesh-Sharma-in-Budhiraja-murder-case/articleshow/48704930.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:26 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Thursday upheld the Delhi High Court order acquitting former Congress leader Romesh Sharma in the case relating to the killing of fashion designer Kunjum Budhiraja.     A bench of Justices Pinaki Chandra Ghose and R K Agrawal dismissed an appeal filed by the Delhi government challenging HC order.     The Delhi government contended that the HC had erred in acquitting Sharma but it was strongly opposed by his counsel and senior advocate Siddharth Luthra who submitted that his client was in love with Kunjum and there was no evidence to prove his involvement in the case.     Sharma, who was alleged to be a frontman of underworld don Dawood Ibrahim, was convicted by a trial court on February 15, 2008. Kunjum was killed on March 20, 1999 at Sharma's South Delhi-based 'Jai Mata Di' farm house by a group of hired gangsters from Uttar Pradesh.     The trial court had convicted Sharma and five other accused in the case and had awarded life term to all. The HC, however, acquitted Sharma and co-accused Tejendir Verdi but upheld conviction and sentence of other four accused— Sharma's nephew Surinder Mishra, Hemchand, Santram and Ramesh alias Bobby.     While acquitting Sharma, the HC had said "Romesh Sharma and Kunjum were in love, and desired the company of each other. It does not establish that Sharma had got fed up with her". It had turned down Delhi police's contention that Sharma wanted to get rid of Kunjum as she knew about his alleged illegal activities.     "A grieving lover falling over the body of his mate and performing the rituals of a marriage can well be an expression of lasting love, and need not necessarily be a drama," the HC had said.     Sharma was in judicial custody at the time of the Kunjum's murder.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Raid-on-Bengaluru-centre-reveals-horror-tales/articleshow/48704718.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:26 IST 2015||BENGALURU: A State Human Rights Commission raid on a de-addiction centre in Jnanabharati Layout, near Kengeri, southwest Bengaluru, found 90 inmates living in pathetic conditions and subjected to inhuman treatment.     Thursday's raid followed the murder of an inmate of another de-addiction centre in Kothanur recently.     The SHRC raid on Sri Santhosh Social Service Society, also known as 4S Society, followed a tipoff. According to SHRC officials, the centre has been in existence for seven years at least, but the society couldn't produce documents of having obtained permission from the social welfare department. Commission officials said the centre had the permission from the DC and the DHO.     "Most inmates are between 20 and 35 years. They showed us signs of being physically abused. The centre has violated other norms too. Although it's supposed to have one nurse for every 15 patients and at least one in-house doctor and a psychiatrist, it didn't have any," said an SHRC spokesperson.     4 arrested for killing inmate:     Kothanur police arrested a de-addiction centre staffer and three inmates for allegedly beating to death a 28-year-old inmate. Dinesh was admitted to the centre by his family as he was an alcoholic. He was later found dead in a hospital. Family members noticed several bruises on his body. Narayana, an inmate-turned-staffer, gave some medicines to Dinesh, who later turned aggressive. Narayana sought the help of inmates Suresh, Subhan and Simon, to subdue Dinesh.     When Dinesh retaliated, the quartet overpowered him till he became unconscious. He died in hospital.||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/A-jolly-good-fellow-say-Khannas-friends/articleshow/48704630.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:26 IST 2015||Sanjeev Khanna, Indrani Mukerjea's second husband and suspected ally in Sheena Bora's killing, may be the most surprising element in this macabre drama, but his friends and associates in Kolkata refused to cast aspersions on "Sanju" just yet.     From being the biggest dart enthusiast at one of Kolkata's poshest clubs (the CC&FC) to having a finger in every pie, Sanjeev was everyone's "best mate" and go-to guy who friends described as: "A doer... someone who could get things done."     The morning after Khanna's arrest, TOI spoke to Ajay Rawla, the man who Khanna worked for as a consultant and whose house he was picked up from on Wednesday afternoon. "It wasn't like he was hiding like a desperate fugitive in my house. We had a meeting in the morning after which he drove me home and that's when news broke on television. We were sitting, watching, wondering what steps to take when the police arrived," explained Rawla.     Seven years his senior, Khanna's association with Rawla dates back to the time they went to Mayo College in Ajmer. Later, Khanna went on to become an aide for Rawla's pet projects. Besides running his own business in wireless communications, Khanna was there setting up chef Shaun Kenworthy and Rawla's restaurant 1658 or immersed in the heritage project of converting the Bawali Rajbari into a hotel. "He was getting all the construction work and labourers in place. He was very good in helping out with permissions through his connections with excise and contractors," remembers Kenworthy.     Khanna, who seldom missed his outings at the club, motor rallies and horse racing as a prominent face in the social circuit, was not the same man before he met Indrani, recounts Bull Banthia, a close friend. "Well-read and well-versed, Sanju had a great mechanical mind with a solution for everything," is how Bull chose to describe his "jolly good friend who loved meeting new people, hung out at the club but wasn't a social climber". "It was Indrani who emerged as this socialite and drove him to consciously build contacts with those higher up in the social rung after marriage," said the Kolkata-based entrepreneur. "That's the reason why I distanced myself from them until overnight she left Kolkata with their daughter and Sanju's wallet."     While Indrani never surfaces in conversations, his daughter Vidhie, who stayed with Indrani, is a fond subject with his friends. "He would miss his daughter but was resigned to fate, hoping that someday she would find him," said Rawla, adding, "It was Vidhie who called Sanjeev on Wednesday to give him the news."     No one seems to know about any recent interaction between Khanna and Indrani. G M Kapur, a known name in Kolkata who was Intach's state convener and happens to be Khanna's "mama", seemed disturbed with "all the theorizing" of Khanna's role in the crime. He declined to look back on Indrani and Khanna's relationship but added, "The last that there was any contact with Indrani or her family was when Vidhie visited Calcutta last year to celebrate the 75th birthday of her grandmother (Khanna's mother who lives with him)."     Khanna's Facebook posts on "karma" in the weeks and months following Sheena's alleged murder on April 24, 2012, make for interesting reading. On April 30, Khanna shared photo messages: "Say whatever, whenever the f*** you want to"; "Sometimes I get so weird, I even freak myself out".     On May 24, exactly a month after the alleged killing, he wrote: "You can never tell what people are thinking and feeling unless they tell you, and usually they lie. you ask them, 'Whats wrong?' and they say 'Nothing'. You accept this because it's easier than digging for the truth. People smile when they want to cry, they laugh when they want to scream and shout. They pretend like nothing is wrong because they don't want to face the truth. Things aren't always rainbows and butterflies, sometimes you gotta scream and cry your anger and sadness to the world, because you can only hold it in for so long before something in you snaps. so when you want to cry, cry. When you want to scream, scream. Don't hide behind fake smiles, it's ok to not be alright."     ||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Sheena-docu-Michail-add-to-mystery/articleshow/48701752.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:26 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Michail, Sheena's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered have raised a number of unanswered questions.    Two days after his mother, Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Michail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai Police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed that what he gave to police was enough to prove that Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora (who are actually parents of Indrani) as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. Some questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukherjea.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Michail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43 as mentioned in reports after her arrest.    Adding more to the suspense, Michail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Michail studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board examination, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that knew that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard that her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard that she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband who she introduced as Peter Mukherjea."    The two-member Mumbai Police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Michail, who on Wednesday, was the first one to reveal that Sheena was Indrani's daughter, twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Michail's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Michail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukherjae is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Michail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."  ||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Grandparents-are-Sheenas-mom-dad-on-birth-certificate/articleshow/48704559.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:26 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Mikhail, Sheena Bora's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered led to some unanswered questions on Thursday.    Two days after his mother Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Mikhail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed what he gave the police was enough to prove Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora, who are actually Indrani's parents, as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. However, many questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter. In many cases in India involving single mothers, grandparents are known to put in their names as father and mother.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukerjea, that is, 13 years after Sheena was born.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Mikhail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43.    Mikhail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Mikhail     studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board exam, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband, who she introduced as Peter Mukerjea."    The two-member Mumbai police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Mikhail twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Mikhail 's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time, he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Mikhail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukerjea is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Mikhail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Sheena-bowled-us-over-Rahuls-uncle/articleshow/48704552.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:26 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: Had things worked out as desired for Peter Mukherjea's first wife Shabnam and her family in Dehradun, Rahul Mukherjea and Sheena Bora would have been married for over three years now.     Shabnam's brother Shaleen Singh told TOI on Thursday that in 2011 Rahul brought Sheena to their sprawling home in Dehradun to seek approval from the family for their marriage.     The entire family-Shabnam, her younger brother Shaleen, father Anand Singh and mother Seema-were reportedly bowled over by Sheena's jovial nature and affection towards the elderly people. Impressed, the family gave its "unqualified and unanimous approval" for the wedding, which was supposed to take place within a few months, said Shaleen.     Stunned by the recent development, Shaleen said, "Sheena was among those rare persons who left a deep and lifelong impact on people. She was good-looking, a sweet person, clean of heart and good to talk to. None of us objected to the wedding."     Shaleen learnt of Sheena's murder through news channels. "It would have been great if she had become a part of the family. I don't know what was the cause and motive behind the heinous crime, but all those behind the killing of the jovial-natured girl should not be spared at any cost," he said.     A former model and tele-actor, 49-year-old Shaleen today owns the Sanskar International school in Jogiwala here. He recalled the last meeting with Shabnam and Rahul in April this year. "My father Anand Singh passed away in April. They had come to pay their respects but we did not interact much."     However, Shaleen said of late the interaction between him and his sister Shabnam was limited. Although Shabnam's farm Gul-e-Shabnam and Shaleen's residence Shankar Sadan are barely 200 metres away in Badripur, meetings between them were rare. While Shaleen and his mother stay on different floors of Shankar Sadan, Shabnam stays alone at her residence and is frequently visited by Rahul.     "There are matters in each family which we do not want to disclose. We are not against each other but do not interact much. She comes to meet our mother occasionally," said Shaleen, adding that Shabnam was passionate about painting and had a studio in her residence.     Shaleen denied having any details about the presence of Mumbai police in Dehradun. "Neither Doon police nor Mumbai police have contacted me over the issue."     Staff at Shabnam's residence said she was out-of-station but they were not aware of her whereabouts.||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Kilpauk-doctor-murder-Hubby-to-approach-court/articleshow/48704411.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:26 IST 2015||CHENNAI: It's been four days since police claimed to have solved the murder of S Sathya, 24, a PG medical student. However, her husband has put forth questions that police have failed to answer. Though investigating officers confirmed Sathya was not sexually assaulted before she was killed, they leaked to some section of media saying that they changed their stance on Wednesday and said there were indications of attempt to rape on the deceased.     Police personnel revealed the details soon after Sathya's husband Dr P Sesu, also employed at a primary health centre in Perambalur, expressed certain doubts.     He alleged the police hastily solved the case citing the state assembly, which is in motion. Sathya was found dead at her house in Kilpauk on August 20.     On August 23, police arrested Harintham Depnath, a BTech graduate, who lived at the second floor on the same apartment. Neither was there any mention about sexual assault or attempt on Sathya when the body was recovered from the house. The nor did the doctors. Police didn't tell this during the arrest of Depnath on August 23. "What forced the police to reveal about the sexual harassment attempt on my wife now?" asked Sesu.     "I want to live a peaceful life with my two sons - Tamil Nesan, 6, and Karmugilan, 4. The studies and the future of my children is important for me. I do respect the police personnel who spent sleepless nights to solve the murder, but there are questions that need to be answered," he said.     "I live in Perambalur with my children, but we speak through live video calls. I have told my sons that Sathya has gone to the God, as the Almighty likes her more. "Hereafter, we cannot speak or meet her. I don't know how far my children will admit it?" said Sesu. "I will approach the court seeking a fair probe into the murder of my wife. I want to find out the real cause behind her death. I want the real accused to get punished for his deed," said Sesu.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Woman-strangles-husbands-lover/articleshow/48704388.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:26 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A woman beat up and strangled her husband's partner, an assistant professor at a polytechnic in Choolaimedu, in their Thiruverkadu home on Thursday, police said. A court later remanded the accused, 32-year-old Shruti, in judicial custody.     Police said Sambasivam, a professor at Panimalar Engineering College in Poonamallee, used to bring Rajalakshmi, home frequently and introduced her to his wife Shruti as a colleague. He even dropped her home at night. The polytechnic where Rajalakshmi worked was part of the Panimalar group of educational institutions. Shruti initially believed the two were just colleagues until Sambasivam came home with Rajalakshmi on Tuesday and said the woman was moving in with them permanently.     On Wednesday morning, Sambasivam allegedly tied a 'mangalsutra' to Rajalakshmi in front of his wife, police said, based on Shruti's confession. A shocked Shruti picked up a fight with Sambasivam who asked her to maintain a cordial relationship and take care of Rajalakshmi. On Thursday morning, after he left for college a fight broke out between the two women.     Police said Rajalakshmi allegedly abused Sruthi and went into the bathroom. Sruthi followed her in and strangled her with the 'mangalsutra'. She then tried to make it appear that the woman had fainted in the bathroom. She took her in an autorickshaw to a nearby hospital where she was declared 'brought dead'. Doctors who noticed a few marks around her neck informed the Thiruverkadu police who registered a case of suspicious death under CrPC section 176.     The body was sent for postmortem to Kilpauk Medical College and Hospital.     After finding that the two women were at home at the time of the death, police interrogated Sruthi for more than an hour but she continued to maintain that Rajyalakshmi had died of injuries sustained when she fell down in the bathroom.     "She confessed to the murder when we told her that her fingerprints had been lifted from the scene of crime," said an investigating officer. "She said she had smashed the woman's head against the wall and later strangled her with the 'thali'." Police altered the case to murder and arrested Sruthi.     Initial inquiries revealed that Rajalakshmi had been married to a man named Rajasekhar for a while and they had separated. She then got married to Suresh, a relative who worked in a private firm, a few years ago and the couple moved into a house in Mogappair.     They allegedly had frequent quarrels as he tortured her and she left him too, police found.     Rajalakshmi then got a job with Panimalar Engineering College where she met Sambasivam. The two became friends and began seeing each other. Rajalakshmi recently moved to the polytechnic in Choolaimedu, police said.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/US-journalists-killer-annoyed-colleagues-Ex-boss/articleshow/48704167.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:26 IST 2015||ROANOKE, United States: The disgruntled former US television station employee who murdered two journalists had "annoyed" colleagues but showed no signs at work of any mental health issues, his former boss said Thursday.     Vester Lee Flanagan, 41, worked as a reporter for WDBJ in Roanoke, Virginia from March 2012 to February 2013, but was dismissed for poor performance and angry behavior, general manager Jeffrey Marks said.     On Wednesday, Flanagan shot and killed two of the CBS affiliate's journalists while they were conducting an on-air interview. He later fatally shot himself.     "We are still at a loss to figure out what happened to him in those two and a half years" since he was fired, Marks told a news conference flanked by dozens of staff, many of them holding hands.     "I don't think we identified that he had mental health issues. We certainly identified that he had performance issues."     Marks defended the station's hiring record and said its parent company had "a very elaborate program to screen employees."     Flanagan passed background checks and came with only positive references, Marks said.     It was only after he was hired, Marks said, that things went downhill.     "Vester's behavior annoyed a lot of people in the news station," Marks said.     Flanagan, who went by the on-screen name Bryce Williams, alleged in a manifesto faxed to ABC News that he was discriminated against as a gay, black journalist.     Marks said accusations in 2013 that he was treated unfairly were "immediately investigated and found to be without merit."     During his employment, Flanagan complied with demands that he seek medical help, but he was ultimately dismissed.     He was escorted from the building by police and made an ominous aside to the news director -- handing him a wooden cross and saying "'you'll need this'," Marks said.     As he left, he also made a "derogatory comment" to Adam Ward, the cameraman he shot dead on Wednesday.     Flanagan filed a complaint with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and a civil action suit, which were dismissed, he said.     "All of these investigations determined that no reasonable person would have taken any of the cited incidents as discrimination or harassment."     After killing Ward and reporter Alison Parker live on the air, Flanagan posted a video of the attack on social media.||ROANOKE, UNITED STATES
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:26 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/SC-acquits-Romesh-Sharma-in-Budhiraja-murder-case/articleshow/48704930.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:26 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Thursday upheld the Delhi High Court order acquitting former Congress leader Romesh Sharma in the case relating to the killing of fashion designer Kunjum Budhiraja.     A bench of Justices Pinaki Chandra Ghose and R K Agrawal dismissed an appeal filed by the Delhi government challenging HC order.     The Delhi government contended that the HC had erred in acquitting Sharma but it was strongly opposed by his counsel and senior advocate Siddharth Luthra who submitted that his client was in love with Kunjum and there was no evidence to prove his involvement in the case.     Sharma, who was alleged to be a frontman of underworld don Dawood Ibrahim, was convicted by a trial court on February 15, 2008. Kunjum was killed on March 20, 1999 at Sharma's South Delhi-based 'Jai Mata Di' farm house by a group of hired gangsters from Uttar Pradesh.     The trial court had convicted Sharma and five other accused in the case and had awarded life term to all. The HC, however, acquitted Sharma and co-accused Tejendir Verdi but upheld conviction and sentence of other four accused— Sharma's nephew Surinder Mishra, Hemchand, Santram and Ramesh alias Bobby.     While acquitting Sharma, the HC had said "Romesh Sharma and Kunjum were in love, and desired the company of each other. It does not establish that Sharma had got fed up with her". It had turned down Delhi police's contention that Sharma wanted to get rid of Kunjum as she knew about his alleged illegal activities.     "A grieving lover falling over the body of his mate and performing the rituals of a marriage can well be an expression of lasting love, and need not necessarily be a drama," the HC had said.     Sharma was in judicial custody at the time of the Kunjum's murder.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Raid-on-Bengaluru-centre-reveals-horror-tales/articleshow/48704718.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:26 IST 2015||BENGALURU: A State Human Rights Commission raid on a de-addiction centre in Jnanabharati Layout, near Kengeri, southwest Bengaluru, found 90 inmates living in pathetic conditions and subjected to inhuman treatment.     Thursday's raid followed the murder of an inmate of another de-addiction centre in Kothanur recently.     The SHRC raid on Sri Santhosh Social Service Society, also known as 4S Society, followed a tipoff. According to SHRC officials, the centre has been in existence for seven years at least, but the society couldn't produce documents of having obtained permission from the social welfare department. Commission officials said the centre had the permission from the DC and the DHO.     "Most inmates are between 20 and 35 years. They showed us signs of being physically abused. The centre has violated other norms too. Although it's supposed to have one nurse for every 15 patients and at least one in-house doctor and a psychiatrist, it didn't have any," said an SHRC spokesperson.     4 arrested for killing inmate:     Kothanur police arrested a de-addiction centre staffer and three inmates for allegedly beating to death a 28-year-old inmate. Dinesh was admitted to the centre by his family as he was an alcoholic. He was later found dead in a hospital. Family members noticed several bruises on his body. Narayana, an inmate-turned-staffer, gave some medicines to Dinesh, who later turned aggressive. Narayana sought the help of inmates Suresh, Subhan and Simon, to subdue Dinesh.     When Dinesh retaliated, the quartet overpowered him till he became unconscious. He died in hospital.||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/A-jolly-good-fellow-say-Khannas-friends/articleshow/48704630.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:26 IST 2015||Sanjeev Khanna, Indrani Mukerjea's second husband and suspected ally in Sheena Bora's killing, may be the most surprising element in this macabre drama, but his friends and associates in Kolkata refused to cast aspersions on "Sanju" just yet.     From being the biggest dart enthusiast at one of Kolkata's poshest clubs (the CC&FC) to having a finger in every pie, Sanjeev was everyone's "best mate" and go-to guy who friends described as: "A doer... someone who could get things done."     The morning after Khanna's arrest, TOI spoke to Ajay Rawla, the man who Khanna worked for as a consultant and whose house he was picked up from on Wednesday afternoon. "It wasn't like he was hiding like a desperate fugitive in my house. We had a meeting in the morning after which he drove me home and that's when news broke on television. We were sitting, watching, wondering what steps to take when the police arrived," explained Rawla.     Seven years his senior, Khanna's association with Rawla dates back to the time they went to Mayo College in Ajmer. Later, Khanna went on to become an aide for Rawla's pet projects. Besides running his own business in wireless communications, Khanna was there setting up chef Shaun Kenworthy and Rawla's restaurant 1658 or immersed in the heritage project of converting the Bawali Rajbari into a hotel. "He was getting all the construction work and labourers in place. He was very good in helping out with permissions through his connections with excise and contractors," remembers Kenworthy.     Khanna, who seldom missed his outings at the club, motor rallies and horse racing as a prominent face in the social circuit, was not the same man before he met Indrani, recounts Bull Banthia, a close friend. "Well-read and well-versed, Sanju had a great mechanical mind with a solution for everything," is how Bull chose to describe his "jolly good friend who loved meeting new people, hung out at the club but wasn't a social climber". "It was Indrani who emerged as this socialite and drove him to consciously build contacts with those higher up in the social rung after marriage," said the Kolkata-based entrepreneur. "That's the reason why I distanced myself from them until overnight she left Kolkata with their daughter and Sanju's wallet."     While Indrani never surfaces in conversations, his daughter Vidhie, who stayed with Indrani, is a fond subject with his friends. "He would miss his daughter but was resigned to fate, hoping that someday she would find him," said Rawla, adding, "It was Vidhie who called Sanjeev on Wednesday to give him the news."     No one seems to know about any recent interaction between Khanna and Indrani. G M Kapur, a known name in Kolkata who was Intach's state convener and happens to be Khanna's "mama", seemed disturbed with "all the theorizing" of Khanna's role in the crime. He declined to look back on Indrani and Khanna's relationship but added, "The last that there was any contact with Indrani or her family was when Vidhie visited Calcutta last year to celebrate the 75th birthday of her grandmother (Khanna's mother who lives with him)."     Khanna's Facebook posts on "karma" in the weeks and months following Sheena's alleged murder on April 24, 2012, make for interesting reading. On April 30, Khanna shared photo messages: "Say whatever, whenever the f*** you want to"; "Sometimes I get so weird, I even freak myself out".     On May 24, exactly a month after the alleged killing, he wrote: "You can never tell what people are thinking and feeling unless they tell you, and usually they lie. you ask them, 'Whats wrong?' and they say 'Nothing'. You accept this because it's easier than digging for the truth. People smile when they want to cry, they laugh when they want to scream and shout. They pretend like nothing is wrong because they don't want to face the truth. Things aren't always rainbows and butterflies, sometimes you gotta scream and cry your anger and sadness to the world, because you can only hold it in for so long before something in you snaps. so when you want to cry, cry. When you want to scream, scream. Don't hide behind fake smiles, it's ok to not be alright."     ||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Sheena-docu-Michail-add-to-mystery/articleshow/48701752.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:26 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Michail, Sheena's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered have raised a number of unanswered questions.    Two days after his mother, Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Michail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai Police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed that what he gave to police was enough to prove that Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora (who are actually parents of Indrani) as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. Some questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukherjea.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Michail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43 as mentioned in reports after her arrest.    Adding more to the suspense, Michail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Michail studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board examination, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that knew that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard that her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard that she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband who she introduced as Peter Mukherjea."    The two-member Mumbai Police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Michail, who on Wednesday, was the first one to reveal that Sheena was Indrani's daughter, twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Michail's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Michail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukherjae is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Michail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."  ||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Grandparents-are-Sheenas-mom-dad-on-birth-certificate/articleshow/48704559.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:26 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Mikhail, Sheena Bora's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered led to some unanswered questions on Thursday.    Two days after his mother Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Mikhail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed what he gave the police was enough to prove Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora, who are actually Indrani's parents, as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. However, many questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter. In many cases in India involving single mothers, grandparents are known to put in their names as father and mother.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukerjea, that is, 13 years after Sheena was born.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Mikhail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43.    Mikhail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Mikhail     studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board exam, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband, who she introduced as Peter Mukerjea."    The two-member Mumbai police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Mikhail twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Mikhail 's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time, he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Mikhail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukerjea is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Mikhail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Sheena-bowled-us-over-Rahuls-uncle/articleshow/48704552.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:26 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: Had things worked out as desired for Peter Mukherjea's first wife Shabnam and her family in Dehradun, Rahul Mukherjea and Sheena Bora would have been married for over three years now.     Shabnam's brother Shaleen Singh told TOI on Thursday that in 2011 Rahul brought Sheena to their sprawling home in Dehradun to seek approval from the family for their marriage.     The entire family-Shabnam, her younger brother Shaleen, father Anand Singh and mother Seema-were reportedly bowled over by Sheena's jovial nature and affection towards the elderly people. Impressed, the family gave its "unqualified and unanimous approval" for the wedding, which was supposed to take place within a few months, said Shaleen.     Stunned by the recent development, Shaleen said, "Sheena was among those rare persons who left a deep and lifelong impact on people. She was good-looking, a sweet person, clean of heart and good to talk to. None of us objected to the wedding."     Shaleen learnt of Sheena's murder through news channels. "It would have been great if she had become a part of the family. I don't know what was the cause and motive behind the heinous crime, but all those behind the killing of the jovial-natured girl should not be spared at any cost," he said.     A former model and tele-actor, 49-year-old Shaleen today owns the Sanskar International school in Jogiwala here. He recalled the last meeting with Shabnam and Rahul in April this year. "My father Anand Singh passed away in April. They had come to pay their respects but we did not interact much."     However, Shaleen said of late the interaction between him and his sister Shabnam was limited. Although Shabnam's farm Gul-e-Shabnam and Shaleen's residence Shankar Sadan are barely 200 metres away in Badripur, meetings between them were rare. While Shaleen and his mother stay on different floors of Shankar Sadan, Shabnam stays alone at her residence and is frequently visited by Rahul.     "There are matters in each family which we do not want to disclose. We are not against each other but do not interact much. She comes to meet our mother occasionally," said Shaleen, adding that Shabnam was passionate about painting and had a studio in her residence.     Shaleen denied having any details about the presence of Mumbai police in Dehradun. "Neither Doon police nor Mumbai police have contacted me over the issue."     Staff at Shabnam's residence said she was out-of-station but they were not aware of her whereabouts.||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Kilpauk-doctor-murder-Hubby-to-approach-court/articleshow/48704411.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:26 IST 2015||CHENNAI: It's been four days since police claimed to have solved the murder of S Sathya, 24, a PG medical student. However, her husband has put forth questions that police have failed to answer. Though investigating officers confirmed Sathya was not sexually assaulted before she was killed, they leaked to some section of media saying that they changed their stance on Wednesday and said there were indications of attempt to rape on the deceased.     Police personnel revealed the details soon after Sathya's husband Dr P Sesu, also employed at a primary health centre in Perambalur, expressed certain doubts.     He alleged the police hastily solved the case citing the state assembly, which is in motion. Sathya was found dead at her house in Kilpauk on August 20.     On August 23, police arrested Harintham Depnath, a BTech graduate, who lived at the second floor on the same apartment. Neither was there any mention about sexual assault or attempt on Sathya when the body was recovered from the house. The nor did the doctors. Police didn't tell this during the arrest of Depnath on August 23. "What forced the police to reveal about the sexual harassment attempt on my wife now?" asked Sesu.     "I want to live a peaceful life with my two sons - Tamil Nesan, 6, and Karmugilan, 4. The studies and the future of my children is important for me. I do respect the police personnel who spent sleepless nights to solve the murder, but there are questions that need to be answered," he said.     "I live in Perambalur with my children, but we speak through live video calls. I have told my sons that Sathya has gone to the God, as the Almighty likes her more. "Hereafter, we cannot speak or meet her. I don't know how far my children will admit it?" said Sesu. "I will approach the court seeking a fair probe into the murder of my wife. I want to find out the real cause behind her death. I want the real accused to get punished for his deed," said Sesu.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Woman-strangles-husbands-lover/articleshow/48704388.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:26 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A woman beat up and strangled her husband's partner, an assistant professor at a polytechnic in Choolaimedu, in their Thiruverkadu home on Thursday, police said. A court later remanded the accused, 32-year-old Shruti, in judicial custody.     Police said Sambasivam, a professor at Panimalar Engineering College in Poonamallee, used to bring Rajalakshmi, home frequently and introduced her to his wife Shruti as a colleague. He even dropped her home at night. The polytechnic where Rajalakshmi worked was part of the Panimalar group of educational institutions. Shruti initially believed the two were just colleagues until Sambasivam came home with Rajalakshmi on Tuesday and said the woman was moving in with them permanently.     On Wednesday morning, Sambasivam allegedly tied a 'mangalsutra' to Rajalakshmi in front of his wife, police said, based on Shruti's confession. A shocked Shruti picked up a fight with Sambasivam who asked her to maintain a cordial relationship and take care of Rajalakshmi. On Thursday morning, after he left for college a fight broke out between the two women.     Police said Rajalakshmi allegedly abused Sruthi and went into the bathroom. Sruthi followed her in and strangled her with the 'mangalsutra'. She then tried to make it appear that the woman had fainted in the bathroom. She took her in an autorickshaw to a nearby hospital where she was declared 'brought dead'. Doctors who noticed a few marks around her neck informed the Thiruverkadu police who registered a case of suspicious death under CrPC section 176.     The body was sent for postmortem to Kilpauk Medical College and Hospital.     After finding that the two women were at home at the time of the death, police interrogated Sruthi for more than an hour but she continued to maintain that Rajyalakshmi had died of injuries sustained when she fell down in the bathroom.     "She confessed to the murder when we told her that her fingerprints had been lifted from the scene of crime," said an investigating officer. "She said she had smashed the woman's head against the wall and later strangled her with the 'thali'." Police altered the case to murder and arrested Sruthi.     Initial inquiries revealed that Rajalakshmi had been married to a man named Rajasekhar for a while and they had separated. She then got married to Suresh, a relative who worked in a private firm, a few years ago and the couple moved into a house in Mogappair.     They allegedly had frequent quarrels as he tortured her and she left him too, police found.     Rajalakshmi then got a job with Panimalar Engineering College where she met Sambasivam. The two became friends and began seeing each other. Rajalakshmi recently moved to the polytechnic in Choolaimedu, police said.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/US-journalists-killer-annoyed-colleagues-Ex-boss/articleshow/48704167.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:26 IST 2015||ROANOKE, United States: The disgruntled former US television station employee who murdered two journalists had "annoyed" colleagues but showed no signs at work of any mental health issues, his former boss said Thursday.     Vester Lee Flanagan, 41, worked as a reporter for WDBJ in Roanoke, Virginia from March 2012 to February 2013, but was dismissed for poor performance and angry behavior, general manager Jeffrey Marks said.     On Wednesday, Flanagan shot and killed two of the CBS affiliate's journalists while they were conducting an on-air interview. He later fatally shot himself.     "We are still at a loss to figure out what happened to him in those two and a half years" since he was fired, Marks told a news conference flanked by dozens of staff, many of them holding hands.     "I don't think we identified that he had mental health issues. We certainly identified that he had performance issues."     Marks defended the station's hiring record and said its parent company had "a very elaborate program to screen employees."     Flanagan passed background checks and came with only positive references, Marks said.     It was only after he was hired, Marks said, that things went downhill.     "Vester's behavior annoyed a lot of people in the news station," Marks said.     Flanagan, who went by the on-screen name Bryce Williams, alleged in a manifesto faxed to ABC News that he was discriminated against as a gay, black journalist.     Marks said accusations in 2013 that he was treated unfairly were "immediately investigated and found to be without merit."     During his employment, Flanagan complied with demands that he seek medical help, but he was ultimately dismissed.     He was escorted from the building by police and made an ominous aside to the news director -- handing him a wooden cross and saying "'you'll need this'," Marks said.     As he left, he also made a "derogatory comment" to Adam Ward, the cameraman he shot dead on Wednesday.     Flanagan filed a complaint with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and a civil action suit, which were dismissed, he said.     "All of these investigations determined that no reasonable person would have taken any of the cited incidents as discrimination or harassment."     After killing Ward and reporter Alison Parker live on the air, Flanagan posted a video of the attack on social media.||ROANOKE, UNITED STATES
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/lucknow/Murdered-mans-kin-live-under-shadow-of-fear/articleshow/48564518.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:30 IST 2015||LUCKNOW: Family of school owner Taqi Raza who was murdered on August 11 is scared even to step out of their house on Victoria street in Chowk. Raza's elder daughter Sheen told TOI on Thursday, "I have stopped going to college since the incident, while my sister a Cathedral student too is not attending school, as our mother is scared to send us alone anywhere."    The family had filed a request with administration for an armed police constable, after which a home guard who is about to retire was posted for the family's security. Sheena said on one occasion the home guard refused to go to the terrace as it was dark. "We require a man who is familiar with people in our neighborhood so that we are safe," she said.    Sheena also said the wife of her father's assailant was a corporator in 1995 and she was now showing off her political affiliations and mounting pressure on the family.    "People who killed my father on the busy street would not find it tough to climb up a few stairs and cause harm to me, my mother and younger sister," she feared.    Sheena said she had filed a fresh request with SSP Lucknow Rajesh Pandey who had promised to deploy armed men for her family's security, but no such happened. When contacted, SSP Lucknow assured deploying an armed constable soon.  ||LUCKNOW
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/kolkata/Snatcher-slashes-elderly-citizens-in-Kolkatas-Golf-Green/articleshow/48564345.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:30 IST 2015||KOLKATA: Elderly residents of the posh Golf Green area teamed up to kick out an armed snatcher from their locality on Wednesday evening but two people — aged 78 and 59 — were slashed in the hand with a knife. The younger victim, former Hindalco officer Subhendu Chakraborty, was cut till the bone and had to undergo surgery.     The snatcher was armed with a gun and a knife and did not expect to be challenged so fiercely. The mugging attempt has brought back fears of a rerun of the series of shootings and snatchings in peaceful residential neighbourhoods between 2012 and 2013. A majority of Golf Green residents are senior citizens who live alone as their children work abroad. Morning and evening strolls in the quiet, tree-lined area are part of the charm of this locality. Wednesday's crime is a threat to Golf Green's way of life, and residents are determined to protect it.     The snatcher's first target was 78-year-old Sushil Kumar Sengupta, a former consultant with American firm Jacob Engineering, and his wife Alia. "It was 8.30pm. We had crossed the DC Park area and were walking through a bylane towards Udai Shankar Sarani when a young man, aged around 21-24 years, blocked our way. His face was partially covered with black cloth. He had a knife in his right hand and a pistol — probably a toy — in his left. He lunged for the plastic bag I was carrying (It had clinical reports and prescriptions of Alia) but realized there was nothing valuable inside. He then tried to snatch the mobile phone I had in my shirt pocket. I immediately caught hold of his right wrist. Probably surprised that an old man can resist him, he pulled his hand away with a jerk and his knife cut into my hand," said Sengupta.     The snatcher started running towards the DC grounds just as the Senguptas raised the alarm. Hearing the commotion, another elderly resident Samir Roychowdhury came out and stood in his way but the goon pushed him and sped away. About 100 feet ahead, Chakraborty had just stepped out of his first-floor flat when he came face-to-face with the accused. "Thinking he too was trying to block his way, the assailant slashed at Chakraborty's hand with a sharp object and fled," said DC-south suburban Santosh Pandey.     Roychowdhury ran up to the injured Chakraborty as other residents got out and started shouting for help. Some rushed to help Chakraborty. Roychowdhury said: "I called the police. Some neighbours were applying ice to his hand but it was bleeding badly. I could sense that the cut was very deep because you could see his bone. Around five minutes later, Chakraborty lost his consciousness," said Roychowdhury. Chakraborty's family is worried as his injury is said to be serious.     Residents are livid that police are trying to pass off the incident as "another routine snatching". The snatcher is yet to be identified. "You should have seen the amount of blood the victim lost. It was a murderous attempt and at least three lives were at stake. I clearly saw the knife in the assailant's hand and do not believe that a piece of broken glass was used to make the cut," said Sengupta who is being hailed as a hero in the area. "You know, my son has scolded me for what I did. But how could I just let a criminal flee?" asked Sengupta.     Residents say they had never faced any form of crime till 2013 when a spate of thefts rocked the area. "Jadavpur police increased patrolling but the last eight months have been horrible. My bike was stolen from central park. Complete strangers are entering our block regularly," said Debasish Sarkar, 53, a businessman. Eighty-year-old Gopal Chandra Basu never steps out without his walking stick. "This is my only defence. Come to this area around 4pm and you will see helmetless bikers zooming around everywhere and racing each another. They care a hoot for senior citizens on the road. The police have never helped," claimed Basu.     Anup Sardar, 52, rued the fact that police put little effort into ensuring that arrested snatchers stay locked up in jail for a long time. "We helped police nab a snatcher four months ago. Within two months, he was out and roaming right next to my house," said Sardar.     ||KOLKATA
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/patna/954-of-3403-murders-in-Bihar-due-to-property-disputes/articleshow/48564332.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:30 IST 2015||PATNA: Bihar reported the highest number of murders due to property dispute in the country for the third consecutive year in 2014.According to National Crime Records Bureau (NCRB), 954 of the 3,403 murders reported to police in Bihar during 2014 were related to property disputes. However, the number of murders decreased in 2014 from 6,882 murders in 2013. In 2013, at least 822 murders were attributed to property disputes.In 2012 also, Bihar reported the highest number of murders due to property disputes. Property disputes led to the killing of at least 1,159 persons, which was 32.5% of the total number of murders in the state in 2012.Of the 3,403 murder victims in 2014, at least 933 were shot by firearms. Bihar stands second after UP in the matter of murder using firearms. According to NCRB, 787 persons were killed by unlicensed firearms and 146 by licensed firearms in Bihar. In UP, 1510 people were shot in 2014.At least 329 people were killed for personal gains while 283 people were killed due to personal enmity or vendetta in Bihar in 2014. Relationship issues led to 146 murders, of which 99 murders were the result of illicit affairs. While no 'honour killing' was reported from Bihar in 2014, at least 111 women were murdered for dowry.Bihar was witness to three killings related to political reasons while the highest number (11) of murders for political reasons was reported from Andhra Pradesh in 2014. Bihar Police also registered cases of nine caste-related murders and 22 murders due to class conflict.Patna SSP Vikas Vaibhav said, "Police in Bihar cannot directly intervene in the cases of property dispute though 70% of the complaints district police chiefs receive during their 'janata darbars' pertain to property dispute. We send the complainant to the competent authority. However, when murders take place due to property dispute, we prefer to seize the property of the accused if s/he absconds."||PATNA
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Suspended-UP-IPS-officer-Amitabh-Thakur-says-dismissal-of-Sanjiv-Bhatt-is-gallantry-award/articleshow/48563936.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:30 IST 2015||LUCKNOW: Suspended Uttar Pradesh IPS officer Amitabh Thakur has said that he personally finds IPS officer Sanjiv Bhatt's sacking by the Gujrat government as the supreme award of gallantry for doing whatever he thought was true."Bhatt's adherence to his conscience even at the cost of the price he had to pay for it makes him feel proud of being an IPS officer, at a time when he finds so many IPS officers kneeling to the ground for petty gains," Thakur said in a statement.Bhatt was sacked on Wednesday on the grounds of 'unauthorised absence from service'. Bhatt has claimed that the action had followed "a sham inquiry" into " completely fabricated charges" . Bhatt had taken on Narendra Modi, when the latter was the Gujarat Chief Minister, over the handling of the 2002 riots, while Thakur has accused Mulayam Singh Yadav, the chief of the ruling Samajwadi Party in UP, of threatening him for raising voice against a corrupt minister.Two days back, Thakur had defended Bhatt following Gujarat government's notice to the latter over a video purportedly showing him with another woman and seeking explanation for having extra-marital relationships. Bhatt denied that the man in the video was him.Thakur had said in a letter to the state home secretary that this action was an invasion of privacy.Meanwhile, a Congress member in the UP assembly on Thursday charged suspended Thakur with raising finger at the state legislature and violating service rules. Raising the issue, Anugrah Narain Singh said the officer and his family members have been continuously filing PILs since the past several years against the government."This official not only extended financial help to the accused in the murder of an advocate in Allahabad on March 17, 2015 but also made an appeal to others to do the same through social media," Singh said, adding that Thakur also launched a campaign giving statements in newspapers and media against the government.His behaviour is violative of certain sections of the All India Service Conduct Rules, 1968 and also comes under the ambit of Police Incitements to Dissatisfaction Act, 1992, the Congress member said.The state government had suspended Thakur on July 13, hours after he approached the Union Home Ministry seeking a CBI probe into the rape case slapped against him. At that time, Thakur was posted as IG (Civil Defence). He was served a 200-page charge sheet and a vigilance inquiry was also initiated against him. The UP Lokayukta has also initiated an inquiry against Thakur on a complaint by an activist accusing him of amassing properties disproportionate to his known sources of income and misusing official position.||LUCKNOW
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/entertainment/tamil/movies/news/Kamal-Haasan-gives-voice-to-the-fight-against-foeticide/articleshow/48556430.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:30 IST 2015||Concerned by the lopsided sex ratio, actor Kamal Haasan has appealed people to immediately stop murdering female foetus in the wombs. Citing that such practices are taking mankind to cannibalistic prehistoric days, he said that fighting against female foeticide is like fighting for our sister and mother. Pointing out that this is not a problem that is restricted to any area or language, he asked people not to suggest obsolete things like polyandry, quoting Mahabharata and Panchali's plight. Titled '#Fight4theFoetus', it is a campaign to make people aware of the consequences of female foeticide.  || 
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/patna/954-0f-3403-murders-in-state-due-to-property-rows-in-14/articleshow/48563219.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:30 IST 2015||Patna: Bihar reported the highest number of murders due to property dispute in the country for the third consecutive year in 2014.    According to National Crime Records Bureau (NCRB), 954 of the 3,403 murders reported to police in Bihar during 2014 were related to property disputes. However, the number of murders decreased in 2014 from 6,882 murders in 2013. In 2013, at least 822 murders were attributed to property disputes.    In 2012 also, Bihar reported the highest number of murders due to property disputes. Property disputes led to the killing of at least 1,159 persons, which was 32.5% of the total number of murders in the state in 2012.    Of the 3,403 murder victims in 2014, at least 933 were shot by firearms. Bihar stands second after UP in the matter of murder using firearms. According to NCRB, 787 persons were killed by unlicensed firearms and 146 by licensed firearms in Bihar. In UP, 1510 people were shot in 2014.    At least 329 people were killed for personal gains while 283 people were killed due to personal enmity or vendetta in Bihar in 2014. Relationship issues led to 146 murders, of which 99 murders were the result of illicit affairs. While no 'honour killing' was reported from Bihar in 2014, at least 111 women were murdered for dowry.    Bihar was witness to three killings related to political reasons while the highest number (11) of murders for political reasons was reported from Andhra Pradesh in 2014. Bihar Police also registered cases of nine caste-related murders and 22 murders due to class conflict.    Patna SSP Vikas Vaibhav said, "Police in Bihar cannot directly intervene in the cases of property dispute though 70% of the complaints district police chiefs receive during their 'janata darbars' pertain to property dispute. We send the complainant to the competent authority. However, when murders take place due to property dispute, we prefer to seize the property of the accused if s/he absconds."    ||PATNA
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/patna/JDU-man-found-in-injured-state/articleshow/48563052.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:30 IST 2015||Patna: JD(U) youth wing's state general secretary Upendra Kumar Vibhuti was on Thursday found bleeding profusely from his neck and left wrist near the party's office on Beerchand Patel Path here and was admitted to a private hospital at Kankarbagh.    Vibhuti is a named accused in the case of murder of one Awadhesh Singh on July 26 at 'Malmas Mela' held at Rajgir in Nalanda district. Police have started the process of confiscation of his property at Rajgir as he had been absconding.    Around 8.30am, Vibhuti came on foot near the party office and fell down on the street. Santosh Kushwaha, president of the JD(U)'s state youth wing, put him in his car. "On Vibhuti's request, I took him to his elder brother Dharamraj Prasad's home at Machchua Toli, who took him to the hospital," said Kushwaha.    Vibhuti's wife Sunita Singh told police her husband left home around 9am on August 19. He told her that he had got a call from Awadhesh's son Pankaj and son-in-law for settlement of the murder case. After meeting both of them, he would go to court to surrender. But he did not return home and his mobile phone remained switched off.    Vibhuti's brother Dharamraj Prasad told TOI, "He was almost unconscious at the time of being admitted to hospital. He could not tell us what went wrong with him."    He added, "We hail from Rajgir. Awadhesh Singh's family named six persons in the murder case — Aftab Alam, Ashok Rai, Naro Yadav, Vidya Yadav, Dr Anil and Vibhuti. Nalanda police put up a notice for confiscation of property at our ancestral house at Rajgir on August 18 evening." Sources said the slain Awadhesh and Vibhuti had a dispute over bagging the contract of 'Malmas Mela', which led to murder.    ||PATNA
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Dabholkar-murder-case-7-member-police-team-formed-to-assist-CBI/articleshow/48562847.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:30 IST 2015||MUMBAI: On the second anniversary of the killing of anti-superstition crusader Narendra Dabholkar, the Maharashtra government on Thursday decided to depute a seven-member police team to assist the CBI which is probing the case.     "This 7-member team which will assist CBI in Narendra Dabholkar murder case comprises one Assistant Commissioner of Police (ACP), four Police Inspectors and two Police Sub Inspectors," Chief minister Devendra Fadnavis said here on Thursday.     He said the decision has been taken as per CBI's demand of additional manpower from the state government. The investigation agency had recently sought help from police officials who have worked on the case.     "The officials will assist the CBI for three months or till the case is cracked," Fadnavis added. Dabholkar, a noted rationalist and founder of the Andhshradda Nirmulan Samiti (ANS) was gunned down on August 20,2013 in Pune by unidentified gunmen.     The state police had failed to trace the culprits and the case was handed over to CBI. Meanwhile, Shiv Sena spokesperson and legislator Neelam Gorhe met the chief minister and sought expediting the investigation into the murder of Dabholkar and CPI veteran Govind Pansare.     Gorhe said Fadnavis assured her that his government is committed to bringing the culprits to book. "He (Fadnavis) also told me that the state police will provide all assistance to the CBI in the Dabholkar case," she added.     This morning, in Pune, activists of Andhashraddha Nirmulan Samiti took out a march and the march was led by Dabholkar's son Hamid and daughter Mukta.||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/3-month-pregnant-woman-killed-son-kidnapped/articleshow/48562700.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:30 IST 2015||MUMBAI: A three-month pregnant woman was found murdered, with her throat slit, at her Nalasopara (W) flat on Thursday. Her two-year-old son was allegedly kidnapped by her killer, who called the victim's husband for ransom.    Gatki Devasi (25) stayed with her husband Ambadas (26) and son Prakash on the fourth floor of Sai Sahara building, Hanuman Nagar. Many police teams have been formed to rescue the child.    The murder came to light when Ambadas, who works in Bhoiwada, allegedly received a call on his cell phone that Prakash had been kidnapped.    The caller allegedly demanded Rs 1.50 lakhs and warned Ambadas against approaching the police.    When Ambalal went home, he found his wife lying in a pool of blood. Ambadas fell unconscious on seeing his wife, according to the police.    He gained consciousness a few hours later and informed the police.    Though the victim stays in a building that has a common balcony, nobody seemed to have heard any screams from the flat, which is in the centre. The murder is believed to have occurred between 1.30pm and 4.30pm.    The police, who suspect the killer was known to the family, found the knife used to kill the victim, who is believed to have been strangled too. The body has been sent for autopsy.    Police are questioning building residents who may have seen Prakash being taken away.    ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/delhi/24-year-old-found-dead-roommate-missing/articleshow/48562660.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:30 IST 2015||  NEW DELHI: A 24-year-old man working for a courier company was found dead at his house in west Delhi's Patel Nagar on Thursday afternoon.    Police said Satish, from Palamu in Jharkhand, shared the apartment with his friend Kunal. The duo had been living together since Satish moved to the city two months ago and worked for the same company in Kirti Nagar.    Around 11am on Thursday, Satish's uncle, Vinod, received a text message from Kunal asking him to take Satish away. Vinod, who lives in Naraina, also claimed that he got a call from Kunal soon after but Kunal's phone was switched off when he tried to call him back.    When Vinod reached his nephew's house, he found it locked. He broke in and found Satish covered with a blanket. His body was swollen and had begun to decompose, police said. Satish was rushed to a nearby hospital where doctors said he may have died two or three days ago.    Police have informed Satish's family and a postmortem will be conducted after they arrive on Friday. Kunal, meanwhile, in untraceable. "Several teams have been formed to trace Kunal who is missing after he texted Vinod. We have not yet ruled out murder as there are no visible injury marks on Satish's body," said Parmaditya, DCP (central).    The boys' landlord Bhura Ram, who lives in the same building, said he never went upstairs to check on the boys and only found out about Satish's death after Vinod showed up, police said. Bhura Ram also told police he had been asking the boys for documents to get them verified but they kept delaying it.  ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:30 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:30 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/SC-acquits-Romesh-Sharma-in-Budhiraja-murder-case/articleshow/48704930.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:30 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Thursday upheld the Delhi High Court order acquitting former Congress leader Romesh Sharma in the case relating to the killing of fashion designer Kunjum Budhiraja.     A bench of Justices Pinaki Chandra Ghose and R K Agrawal dismissed an appeal filed by the Delhi government challenging HC order.     The Delhi government contended that the HC had erred in acquitting Sharma but it was strongly opposed by his counsel and senior advocate Siddharth Luthra who submitted that his client was in love with Kunjum and there was no evidence to prove his involvement in the case.     Sharma, who was alleged to be a frontman of underworld don Dawood Ibrahim, was convicted by a trial court on February 15, 2008. Kunjum was killed on March 20, 1999 at Sharma's South Delhi-based 'Jai Mata Di' farm house by a group of hired gangsters from Uttar Pradesh.     The trial court had convicted Sharma and five other accused in the case and had awarded life term to all. The HC, however, acquitted Sharma and co-accused Tejendir Verdi but upheld conviction and sentence of other four accused— Sharma's nephew Surinder Mishra, Hemchand, Santram and Ramesh alias Bobby.     While acquitting Sharma, the HC had said "Romesh Sharma and Kunjum were in love, and desired the company of each other. It does not establish that Sharma had got fed up with her". It had turned down Delhi police's contention that Sharma wanted to get rid of Kunjum as she knew about his alleged illegal activities.     "A grieving lover falling over the body of his mate and performing the rituals of a marriage can well be an expression of lasting love, and need not necessarily be a drama," the HC had said.     Sharma was in judicial custody at the time of the Kunjum's murder.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Raid-on-Bengaluru-centre-reveals-horror-tales/articleshow/48704718.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:30 IST 2015||BENGALURU: A State Human Rights Commission raid on a de-addiction centre in Jnanabharati Layout, near Kengeri, southwest Bengaluru, found 90 inmates living in pathetic conditions and subjected to inhuman treatment.     Thursday's raid followed the murder of an inmate of another de-addiction centre in Kothanur recently.     The SHRC raid on Sri Santhosh Social Service Society, also known as 4S Society, followed a tipoff. According to SHRC officials, the centre has been in existence for seven years at least, but the society couldn't produce documents of having obtained permission from the social welfare department. Commission officials said the centre had the permission from the DC and the DHO.     "Most inmates are between 20 and 35 years. They showed us signs of being physically abused. The centre has violated other norms too. Although it's supposed to have one nurse for every 15 patients and at least one in-house doctor and a psychiatrist, it didn't have any," said an SHRC spokesperson.     4 arrested for killing inmate:     Kothanur police arrested a de-addiction centre staffer and three inmates for allegedly beating to death a 28-year-old inmate. Dinesh was admitted to the centre by his family as he was an alcoholic. He was later found dead in a hospital. Family members noticed several bruises on his body. Narayana, an inmate-turned-staffer, gave some medicines to Dinesh, who later turned aggressive. Narayana sought the help of inmates Suresh, Subhan and Simon, to subdue Dinesh.     When Dinesh retaliated, the quartet overpowered him till he became unconscious. He died in hospital.||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/A-jolly-good-fellow-say-Khannas-friends/articleshow/48704630.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:30 IST 2015||Sanjeev Khanna, Indrani Mukerjea's second husband and suspected ally in Sheena Bora's killing, may be the most surprising element in this macabre drama, but his friends and associates in Kolkata refused to cast aspersions on "Sanju" just yet.     From being the biggest dart enthusiast at one of Kolkata's poshest clubs (the CC&FC) to having a finger in every pie, Sanjeev was everyone's "best mate" and go-to guy who friends described as: "A doer... someone who could get things done."     The morning after Khanna's arrest, TOI spoke to Ajay Rawla, the man who Khanna worked for as a consultant and whose house he was picked up from on Wednesday afternoon. "It wasn't like he was hiding like a desperate fugitive in my house. We had a meeting in the morning after which he drove me home and that's when news broke on television. We were sitting, watching, wondering what steps to take when the police arrived," explained Rawla.     Seven years his senior, Khanna's association with Rawla dates back to the time they went to Mayo College in Ajmer. Later, Khanna went on to become an aide for Rawla's pet projects. Besides running his own business in wireless communications, Khanna was there setting up chef Shaun Kenworthy and Rawla's restaurant 1658 or immersed in the heritage project of converting the Bawali Rajbari into a hotel. "He was getting all the construction work and labourers in place. He was very good in helping out with permissions through his connections with excise and contractors," remembers Kenworthy.     Khanna, who seldom missed his outings at the club, motor rallies and horse racing as a prominent face in the social circuit, was not the same man before he met Indrani, recounts Bull Banthia, a close friend. "Well-read and well-versed, Sanju had a great mechanical mind with a solution for everything," is how Bull chose to describe his "jolly good friend who loved meeting new people, hung out at the club but wasn't a social climber". "It was Indrani who emerged as this socialite and drove him to consciously build contacts with those higher up in the social rung after marriage," said the Kolkata-based entrepreneur. "That's the reason why I distanced myself from them until overnight she left Kolkata with their daughter and Sanju's wallet."     While Indrani never surfaces in conversations, his daughter Vidhie, who stayed with Indrani, is a fond subject with his friends. "He would miss his daughter but was resigned to fate, hoping that someday she would find him," said Rawla, adding, "It was Vidhie who called Sanjeev on Wednesday to give him the news."     No one seems to know about any recent interaction between Khanna and Indrani. G M Kapur, a known name in Kolkata who was Intach's state convener and happens to be Khanna's "mama", seemed disturbed with "all the theorizing" of Khanna's role in the crime. He declined to look back on Indrani and Khanna's relationship but added, "The last that there was any contact with Indrani or her family was when Vidhie visited Calcutta last year to celebrate the 75th birthday of her grandmother (Khanna's mother who lives with him)."     Khanna's Facebook posts on "karma" in the weeks and months following Sheena's alleged murder on April 24, 2012, make for interesting reading. On April 30, Khanna shared photo messages: "Say whatever, whenever the f*** you want to"; "Sometimes I get so weird, I even freak myself out".     On May 24, exactly a month after the alleged killing, he wrote: "You can never tell what people are thinking and feeling unless they tell you, and usually they lie. you ask them, 'Whats wrong?' and they say 'Nothing'. You accept this because it's easier than digging for the truth. People smile when they want to cry, they laugh when they want to scream and shout. They pretend like nothing is wrong because they don't want to face the truth. Things aren't always rainbows and butterflies, sometimes you gotta scream and cry your anger and sadness to the world, because you can only hold it in for so long before something in you snaps. so when you want to cry, cry. When you want to scream, scream. Don't hide behind fake smiles, it's ok to not be alright."     ||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Sheena-docu-Michail-add-to-mystery/articleshow/48701752.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:30 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Michail, Sheena's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered have raised a number of unanswered questions.    Two days after his mother, Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Michail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai Police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed that what he gave to police was enough to prove that Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora (who are actually parents of Indrani) as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. Some questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukherjea.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Michail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43 as mentioned in reports after her arrest.    Adding more to the suspense, Michail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Michail studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board examination, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that knew that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard that her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard that she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband who she introduced as Peter Mukherjea."    The two-member Mumbai Police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Michail, who on Wednesday, was the first one to reveal that Sheena was Indrani's daughter, twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Michail's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Michail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukherjae is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Michail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."  ||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Grandparents-are-Sheenas-mom-dad-on-birth-certificate/articleshow/48704559.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:30 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Mikhail, Sheena Bora's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered led to some unanswered questions on Thursday.    Two days after his mother Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Mikhail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed what he gave the police was enough to prove Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora, who are actually Indrani's parents, as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. However, many questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter. In many cases in India involving single mothers, grandparents are known to put in their names as father and mother.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukerjea, that is, 13 years after Sheena was born.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Mikhail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43.    Mikhail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Mikhail     studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board exam, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband, who she introduced as Peter Mukerjea."    The two-member Mumbai police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Mikhail twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Mikhail 's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time, he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Mikhail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukerjea is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Mikhail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Sheena-bowled-us-over-Rahuls-uncle/articleshow/48704552.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:30 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: Had things worked out as desired for Peter Mukherjea's first wife Shabnam and her family in Dehradun, Rahul Mukherjea and Sheena Bora would have been married for over three years now.     Shabnam's brother Shaleen Singh told TOI on Thursday that in 2011 Rahul brought Sheena to their sprawling home in Dehradun to seek approval from the family for their marriage.     The entire family-Shabnam, her younger brother Shaleen, father Anand Singh and mother Seema-were reportedly bowled over by Sheena's jovial nature and affection towards the elderly people. Impressed, the family gave its "unqualified and unanimous approval" for the wedding, which was supposed to take place within a few months, said Shaleen.     Stunned by the recent development, Shaleen said, "Sheena was among those rare persons who left a deep and lifelong impact on people. She was good-looking, a sweet person, clean of heart and good to talk to. None of us objected to the wedding."     Shaleen learnt of Sheena's murder through news channels. "It would have been great if she had become a part of the family. I don't know what was the cause and motive behind the heinous crime, but all those behind the killing of the jovial-natured girl should not be spared at any cost," he said.     A former model and tele-actor, 49-year-old Shaleen today owns the Sanskar International school in Jogiwala here. He recalled the last meeting with Shabnam and Rahul in April this year. "My father Anand Singh passed away in April. They had come to pay their respects but we did not interact much."     However, Shaleen said of late the interaction between him and his sister Shabnam was limited. Although Shabnam's farm Gul-e-Shabnam and Shaleen's residence Shankar Sadan are barely 200 metres away in Badripur, meetings between them were rare. While Shaleen and his mother stay on different floors of Shankar Sadan, Shabnam stays alone at her residence and is frequently visited by Rahul.     "There are matters in each family which we do not want to disclose. We are not against each other but do not interact much. She comes to meet our mother occasionally," said Shaleen, adding that Shabnam was passionate about painting and had a studio in her residence.     Shaleen denied having any details about the presence of Mumbai police in Dehradun. "Neither Doon police nor Mumbai police have contacted me over the issue."     Staff at Shabnam's residence said she was out-of-station but they were not aware of her whereabouts.||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Kilpauk-doctor-murder-Hubby-to-approach-court/articleshow/48704411.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:30 IST 2015||CHENNAI: It's been four days since police claimed to have solved the murder of S Sathya, 24, a PG medical student. However, her husband has put forth questions that police have failed to answer. Though investigating officers confirmed Sathya was not sexually assaulted before she was killed, they leaked to some section of media saying that they changed their stance on Wednesday and said there were indications of attempt to rape on the deceased.     Police personnel revealed the details soon after Sathya's husband Dr P Sesu, also employed at a primary health centre in Perambalur, expressed certain doubts.     He alleged the police hastily solved the case citing the state assembly, which is in motion. Sathya was found dead at her house in Kilpauk on August 20.     On August 23, police arrested Harintham Depnath, a BTech graduate, who lived at the second floor on the same apartment. Neither was there any mention about sexual assault or attempt on Sathya when the body was recovered from the house. The nor did the doctors. Police didn't tell this during the arrest of Depnath on August 23. "What forced the police to reveal about the sexual harassment attempt on my wife now?" asked Sesu.     "I want to live a peaceful life with my two sons - Tamil Nesan, 6, and Karmugilan, 4. The studies and the future of my children is important for me. I do respect the police personnel who spent sleepless nights to solve the murder, but there are questions that need to be answered," he said.     "I live in Perambalur with my children, but we speak through live video calls. I have told my sons that Sathya has gone to the God, as the Almighty likes her more. "Hereafter, we cannot speak or meet her. I don't know how far my children will admit it?" said Sesu. "I will approach the court seeking a fair probe into the murder of my wife. I want to find out the real cause behind her death. I want the real accused to get punished for his deed," said Sesu.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Woman-strangles-husbands-lover/articleshow/48704388.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:30 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A woman beat up and strangled her husband's partner, an assistant professor at a polytechnic in Choolaimedu, in their Thiruverkadu home on Thursday, police said. A court later remanded the accused, 32-year-old Shruti, in judicial custody.     Police said Sambasivam, a professor at Panimalar Engineering College in Poonamallee, used to bring Rajalakshmi, home frequently and introduced her to his wife Shruti as a colleague. He even dropped her home at night. The polytechnic where Rajalakshmi worked was part of the Panimalar group of educational institutions. Shruti initially believed the two were just colleagues until Sambasivam came home with Rajalakshmi on Tuesday and said the woman was moving in with them permanently.     On Wednesday morning, Sambasivam allegedly tied a 'mangalsutra' to Rajalakshmi in front of his wife, police said, based on Shruti's confession. A shocked Shruti picked up a fight with Sambasivam who asked her to maintain a cordial relationship and take care of Rajalakshmi. On Thursday morning, after he left for college a fight broke out between the two women.     Police said Rajalakshmi allegedly abused Sruthi and went into the bathroom. Sruthi followed her in and strangled her with the 'mangalsutra'. She then tried to make it appear that the woman had fainted in the bathroom. She took her in an autorickshaw to a nearby hospital where she was declared 'brought dead'. Doctors who noticed a few marks around her neck informed the Thiruverkadu police who registered a case of suspicious death under CrPC section 176.     The body was sent for postmortem to Kilpauk Medical College and Hospital.     After finding that the two women were at home at the time of the death, police interrogated Sruthi for more than an hour but she continued to maintain that Rajyalakshmi had died of injuries sustained when she fell down in the bathroom.     "She confessed to the murder when we told her that her fingerprints had been lifted from the scene of crime," said an investigating officer. "She said she had smashed the woman's head against the wall and later strangled her with the 'thali'." Police altered the case to murder and arrested Sruthi.     Initial inquiries revealed that Rajalakshmi had been married to a man named Rajasekhar for a while and they had separated. She then got married to Suresh, a relative who worked in a private firm, a few years ago and the couple moved into a house in Mogappair.     They allegedly had frequent quarrels as he tortured her and she left him too, police found.     Rajalakshmi then got a job with Panimalar Engineering College where she met Sambasivam. The two became friends and began seeing each other. Rajalakshmi recently moved to the polytechnic in Choolaimedu, police said.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/US-journalists-killer-annoyed-colleagues-Ex-boss/articleshow/48704167.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:30 IST 2015||ROANOKE, United States: The disgruntled former US television station employee who murdered two journalists had "annoyed" colleagues but showed no signs at work of any mental health issues, his former boss said Thursday.     Vester Lee Flanagan, 41, worked as a reporter for WDBJ in Roanoke, Virginia from March 2012 to February 2013, but was dismissed for poor performance and angry behavior, general manager Jeffrey Marks said.     On Wednesday, Flanagan shot and killed two of the CBS affiliate's journalists while they were conducting an on-air interview. He later fatally shot himself.     "We are still at a loss to figure out what happened to him in those two and a half years" since he was fired, Marks told a news conference flanked by dozens of staff, many of them holding hands.     "I don't think we identified that he had mental health issues. We certainly identified that he had performance issues."     Marks defended the station's hiring record and said its parent company had "a very elaborate program to screen employees."     Flanagan passed background checks and came with only positive references, Marks said.     It was only after he was hired, Marks said, that things went downhill.     "Vester's behavior annoyed a lot of people in the news station," Marks said.     Flanagan, who went by the on-screen name Bryce Williams, alleged in a manifesto faxed to ABC News that he was discriminated against as a gay, black journalist.     Marks said accusations in 2013 that he was treated unfairly were "immediately investigated and found to be without merit."     During his employment, Flanagan complied with demands that he seek medical help, but he was ultimately dismissed.     He was escorted from the building by police and made an ominous aside to the news director -- handing him a wooden cross and saying "'you'll need this'," Marks said.     As he left, he also made a "derogatory comment" to Adam Ward, the cameraman he shot dead on Wednesday.     Flanagan filed a complaint with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and a civil action suit, which were dismissed, he said.     "All of these investigations determined that no reasonable person would have taken any of the cited incidents as discrimination or harassment."     After killing Ward and reporter Alison Parker live on the air, Flanagan posted a video of the attack on social media.||ROANOKE, UNITED STATES
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:30 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/SC-acquits-Romesh-Sharma-in-Budhiraja-murder-case/articleshow/48704930.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:30 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Thursday upheld the Delhi High Court order acquitting former Congress leader Romesh Sharma in the case relating to the killing of fashion designer Kunjum Budhiraja.     A bench of Justices Pinaki Chandra Ghose and R K Agrawal dismissed an appeal filed by the Delhi government challenging HC order.     The Delhi government contended that the HC had erred in acquitting Sharma but it was strongly opposed by his counsel and senior advocate Siddharth Luthra who submitted that his client was in love with Kunjum and there was no evidence to prove his involvement in the case.     Sharma, who was alleged to be a frontman of underworld don Dawood Ibrahim, was convicted by a trial court on February 15, 2008. Kunjum was killed on March 20, 1999 at Sharma's South Delhi-based 'Jai Mata Di' farm house by a group of hired gangsters from Uttar Pradesh.     The trial court had convicted Sharma and five other accused in the case and had awarded life term to all. The HC, however, acquitted Sharma and co-accused Tejendir Verdi but upheld conviction and sentence of other four accused— Sharma's nephew Surinder Mishra, Hemchand, Santram and Ramesh alias Bobby.     While acquitting Sharma, the HC had said "Romesh Sharma and Kunjum were in love, and desired the company of each other. It does not establish that Sharma had got fed up with her". It had turned down Delhi police's contention that Sharma wanted to get rid of Kunjum as she knew about his alleged illegal activities.     "A grieving lover falling over the body of his mate and performing the rituals of a marriage can well be an expression of lasting love, and need not necessarily be a drama," the HC had said.     Sharma was in judicial custody at the time of the Kunjum's murder.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Raid-on-Bengaluru-centre-reveals-horror-tales/articleshow/48704718.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:30 IST 2015||BENGALURU: A State Human Rights Commission raid on a de-addiction centre in Jnanabharati Layout, near Kengeri, southwest Bengaluru, found 90 inmates living in pathetic conditions and subjected to inhuman treatment.     Thursday's raid followed the murder of an inmate of another de-addiction centre in Kothanur recently.     The SHRC raid on Sri Santhosh Social Service Society, also known as 4S Society, followed a tipoff. According to SHRC officials, the centre has been in existence for seven years at least, but the society couldn't produce documents of having obtained permission from the social welfare department. Commission officials said the centre had the permission from the DC and the DHO.     "Most inmates are between 20 and 35 years. They showed us signs of being physically abused. The centre has violated other norms too. Although it's supposed to have one nurse for every 15 patients and at least one in-house doctor and a psychiatrist, it didn't have any," said an SHRC spokesperson.     4 arrested for killing inmate:     Kothanur police arrested a de-addiction centre staffer and three inmates for allegedly beating to death a 28-year-old inmate. Dinesh was admitted to the centre by his family as he was an alcoholic. He was later found dead in a hospital. Family members noticed several bruises on his body. Narayana, an inmate-turned-staffer, gave some medicines to Dinesh, who later turned aggressive. Narayana sought the help of inmates Suresh, Subhan and Simon, to subdue Dinesh.     When Dinesh retaliated, the quartet overpowered him till he became unconscious. He died in hospital.||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/A-jolly-good-fellow-say-Khannas-friends/articleshow/48704630.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:30 IST 2015||Sanjeev Khanna, Indrani Mukerjea's second husband and suspected ally in Sheena Bora's killing, may be the most surprising element in this macabre drama, but his friends and associates in Kolkata refused to cast aspersions on "Sanju" just yet.     From being the biggest dart enthusiast at one of Kolkata's poshest clubs (the CC&FC) to having a finger in every pie, Sanjeev was everyone's "best mate" and go-to guy who friends described as: "A doer... someone who could get things done."     The morning after Khanna's arrest, TOI spoke to Ajay Rawla, the man who Khanna worked for as a consultant and whose house he was picked up from on Wednesday afternoon. "It wasn't like he was hiding like a desperate fugitive in my house. We had a meeting in the morning after which he drove me home and that's when news broke on television. We were sitting, watching, wondering what steps to take when the police arrived," explained Rawla.     Seven years his senior, Khanna's association with Rawla dates back to the time they went to Mayo College in Ajmer. Later, Khanna went on to become an aide for Rawla's pet projects. Besides running his own business in wireless communications, Khanna was there setting up chef Shaun Kenworthy and Rawla's restaurant 1658 or immersed in the heritage project of converting the Bawali Rajbari into a hotel. "He was getting all the construction work and labourers in place. He was very good in helping out with permissions through his connections with excise and contractors," remembers Kenworthy.     Khanna, who seldom missed his outings at the club, motor rallies and horse racing as a prominent face in the social circuit, was not the same man before he met Indrani, recounts Bull Banthia, a close friend. "Well-read and well-versed, Sanju had a great mechanical mind with a solution for everything," is how Bull chose to describe his "jolly good friend who loved meeting new people, hung out at the club but wasn't a social climber". "It was Indrani who emerged as this socialite and drove him to consciously build contacts with those higher up in the social rung after marriage," said the Kolkata-based entrepreneur. "That's the reason why I distanced myself from them until overnight she left Kolkata with their daughter and Sanju's wallet."     While Indrani never surfaces in conversations, his daughter Vidhie, who stayed with Indrani, is a fond subject with his friends. "He would miss his daughter but was resigned to fate, hoping that someday she would find him," said Rawla, adding, "It was Vidhie who called Sanjeev on Wednesday to give him the news."     No one seems to know about any recent interaction between Khanna and Indrani. G M Kapur, a known name in Kolkata who was Intach's state convener and happens to be Khanna's "mama", seemed disturbed with "all the theorizing" of Khanna's role in the crime. He declined to look back on Indrani and Khanna's relationship but added, "The last that there was any contact with Indrani or her family was when Vidhie visited Calcutta last year to celebrate the 75th birthday of her grandmother (Khanna's mother who lives with him)."     Khanna's Facebook posts on "karma" in the weeks and months following Sheena's alleged murder on April 24, 2012, make for interesting reading. On April 30, Khanna shared photo messages: "Say whatever, whenever the f*** you want to"; "Sometimes I get so weird, I even freak myself out".     On May 24, exactly a month after the alleged killing, he wrote: "You can never tell what people are thinking and feeling unless they tell you, and usually they lie. you ask them, 'Whats wrong?' and they say 'Nothing'. You accept this because it's easier than digging for the truth. People smile when they want to cry, they laugh when they want to scream and shout. They pretend like nothing is wrong because they don't want to face the truth. Things aren't always rainbows and butterflies, sometimes you gotta scream and cry your anger and sadness to the world, because you can only hold it in for so long before something in you snaps. so when you want to cry, cry. When you want to scream, scream. Don't hide behind fake smiles, it's ok to not be alright."     ||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Sheena-docu-Michail-add-to-mystery/articleshow/48701752.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:30 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Michail, Sheena's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered have raised a number of unanswered questions.    Two days after his mother, Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Michail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai Police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed that what he gave to police was enough to prove that Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora (who are actually parents of Indrani) as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. Some questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukherjea.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Michail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43 as mentioned in reports after her arrest.    Adding more to the suspense, Michail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Michail studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board examination, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that knew that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard that her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard that she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband who she introduced as Peter Mukherjea."    The two-member Mumbai Police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Michail, who on Wednesday, was the first one to reveal that Sheena was Indrani's daughter, twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Michail's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Michail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukherjae is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Michail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."  ||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Grandparents-are-Sheenas-mom-dad-on-birth-certificate/articleshow/48704559.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:30 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Mikhail, Sheena Bora's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered led to some unanswered questions on Thursday.    Two days after his mother Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Mikhail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed what he gave the police was enough to prove Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora, who are actually Indrani's parents, as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. However, many questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter. In many cases in India involving single mothers, grandparents are known to put in their names as father and mother.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukerjea, that is, 13 years after Sheena was born.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Mikhail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43.    Mikhail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Mikhail     studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board exam, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband, who she introduced as Peter Mukerjea."    The two-member Mumbai police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Mikhail twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Mikhail 's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time, he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Mikhail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukerjea is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Mikhail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Sheena-bowled-us-over-Rahuls-uncle/articleshow/48704552.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:30 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: Had things worked out as desired for Peter Mukherjea's first wife Shabnam and her family in Dehradun, Rahul Mukherjea and Sheena Bora would have been married for over three years now.     Shabnam's brother Shaleen Singh told TOI on Thursday that in 2011 Rahul brought Sheena to their sprawling home in Dehradun to seek approval from the family for their marriage.     The entire family-Shabnam, her younger brother Shaleen, father Anand Singh and mother Seema-were reportedly bowled over by Sheena's jovial nature and affection towards the elderly people. Impressed, the family gave its "unqualified and unanimous approval" for the wedding, which was supposed to take place within a few months, said Shaleen.     Stunned by the recent development, Shaleen said, "Sheena was among those rare persons who left a deep and lifelong impact on people. She was good-looking, a sweet person, clean of heart and good to talk to. None of us objected to the wedding."     Shaleen learnt of Sheena's murder through news channels. "It would have been great if she had become a part of the family. I don't know what was the cause and motive behind the heinous crime, but all those behind the killing of the jovial-natured girl should not be spared at any cost," he said.     A former model and tele-actor, 49-year-old Shaleen today owns the Sanskar International school in Jogiwala here. He recalled the last meeting with Shabnam and Rahul in April this year. "My father Anand Singh passed away in April. They had come to pay their respects but we did not interact much."     However, Shaleen said of late the interaction between him and his sister Shabnam was limited. Although Shabnam's farm Gul-e-Shabnam and Shaleen's residence Shankar Sadan are barely 200 metres away in Badripur, meetings between them were rare. While Shaleen and his mother stay on different floors of Shankar Sadan, Shabnam stays alone at her residence and is frequently visited by Rahul.     "There are matters in each family which we do not want to disclose. We are not against each other but do not interact much. She comes to meet our mother occasionally," said Shaleen, adding that Shabnam was passionate about painting and had a studio in her residence.     Shaleen denied having any details about the presence of Mumbai police in Dehradun. "Neither Doon police nor Mumbai police have contacted me over the issue."     Staff at Shabnam's residence said she was out-of-station but they were not aware of her whereabouts.||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Kilpauk-doctor-murder-Hubby-to-approach-court/articleshow/48704411.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:30 IST 2015||CHENNAI: It's been four days since police claimed to have solved the murder of S Sathya, 24, a PG medical student. However, her husband has put forth questions that police have failed to answer. Though investigating officers confirmed Sathya was not sexually assaulted before she was killed, they leaked to some section of media saying that they changed their stance on Wednesday and said there were indications of attempt to rape on the deceased.     Police personnel revealed the details soon after Sathya's husband Dr P Sesu, also employed at a primary health centre in Perambalur, expressed certain doubts.     He alleged the police hastily solved the case citing the state assembly, which is in motion. Sathya was found dead at her house in Kilpauk on August 20.     On August 23, police arrested Harintham Depnath, a BTech graduate, who lived at the second floor on the same apartment. Neither was there any mention about sexual assault or attempt on Sathya when the body was recovered from the house. The nor did the doctors. Police didn't tell this during the arrest of Depnath on August 23. "What forced the police to reveal about the sexual harassment attempt on my wife now?" asked Sesu.     "I want to live a peaceful life with my two sons - Tamil Nesan, 6, and Karmugilan, 4. The studies and the future of my children is important for me. I do respect the police personnel who spent sleepless nights to solve the murder, but there are questions that need to be answered," he said.     "I live in Perambalur with my children, but we speak through live video calls. I have told my sons that Sathya has gone to the God, as the Almighty likes her more. "Hereafter, we cannot speak or meet her. I don't know how far my children will admit it?" said Sesu. "I will approach the court seeking a fair probe into the murder of my wife. I want to find out the real cause behind her death. I want the real accused to get punished for his deed," said Sesu.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Woman-strangles-husbands-lover/articleshow/48704388.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:30 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A woman beat up and strangled her husband's partner, an assistant professor at a polytechnic in Choolaimedu, in their Thiruverkadu home on Thursday, police said. A court later remanded the accused, 32-year-old Shruti, in judicial custody.     Police said Sambasivam, a professor at Panimalar Engineering College in Poonamallee, used to bring Rajalakshmi, home frequently and introduced her to his wife Shruti as a colleague. He even dropped her home at night. The polytechnic where Rajalakshmi worked was part of the Panimalar group of educational institutions. Shruti initially believed the two were just colleagues until Sambasivam came home with Rajalakshmi on Tuesday and said the woman was moving in with them permanently.     On Wednesday morning, Sambasivam allegedly tied a 'mangalsutra' to Rajalakshmi in front of his wife, police said, based on Shruti's confession. A shocked Shruti picked up a fight with Sambasivam who asked her to maintain a cordial relationship and take care of Rajalakshmi. On Thursday morning, after he left for college a fight broke out between the two women.     Police said Rajalakshmi allegedly abused Sruthi and went into the bathroom. Sruthi followed her in and strangled her with the 'mangalsutra'. She then tried to make it appear that the woman had fainted in the bathroom. She took her in an autorickshaw to a nearby hospital where she was declared 'brought dead'. Doctors who noticed a few marks around her neck informed the Thiruverkadu police who registered a case of suspicious death under CrPC section 176.     The body was sent for postmortem to Kilpauk Medical College and Hospital.     After finding that the two women were at home at the time of the death, police interrogated Sruthi for more than an hour but she continued to maintain that Rajyalakshmi had died of injuries sustained when she fell down in the bathroom.     "She confessed to the murder when we told her that her fingerprints had been lifted from the scene of crime," said an investigating officer. "She said she had smashed the woman's head against the wall and later strangled her with the 'thali'." Police altered the case to murder and arrested Sruthi.     Initial inquiries revealed that Rajalakshmi had been married to a man named Rajasekhar for a while and they had separated. She then got married to Suresh, a relative who worked in a private firm, a few years ago and the couple moved into a house in Mogappair.     They allegedly had frequent quarrels as he tortured her and she left him too, police found.     Rajalakshmi then got a job with Panimalar Engineering College where she met Sambasivam. The two became friends and began seeing each other. Rajalakshmi recently moved to the polytechnic in Choolaimedu, police said.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/US-journalists-killer-annoyed-colleagues-Ex-boss/articleshow/48704167.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:30 IST 2015||ROANOKE, United States: The disgruntled former US television station employee who murdered two journalists had "annoyed" colleagues but showed no signs at work of any mental health issues, his former boss said Thursday.     Vester Lee Flanagan, 41, worked as a reporter for WDBJ in Roanoke, Virginia from March 2012 to February 2013, but was dismissed for poor performance and angry behavior, general manager Jeffrey Marks said.     On Wednesday, Flanagan shot and killed two of the CBS affiliate's journalists while they were conducting an on-air interview. He later fatally shot himself.     "We are still at a loss to figure out what happened to him in those two and a half years" since he was fired, Marks told a news conference flanked by dozens of staff, many of them holding hands.     "I don't think we identified that he had mental health issues. We certainly identified that he had performance issues."     Marks defended the station's hiring record and said its parent company had "a very elaborate program to screen employees."     Flanagan passed background checks and came with only positive references, Marks said.     It was only after he was hired, Marks said, that things went downhill.     "Vester's behavior annoyed a lot of people in the news station," Marks said.     Flanagan, who went by the on-screen name Bryce Williams, alleged in a manifesto faxed to ABC News that he was discriminated against as a gay, black journalist.     Marks said accusations in 2013 that he was treated unfairly were "immediately investigated and found to be without merit."     During his employment, Flanagan complied with demands that he seek medical help, but he was ultimately dismissed.     He was escorted from the building by police and made an ominous aside to the news director -- handing him a wooden cross and saying "'you'll need this'," Marks said.     As he left, he also made a "derogatory comment" to Adam Ward, the cameraman he shot dead on Wednesday.     Flanagan filed a complaint with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and a civil action suit, which were dismissed, he said.     "All of these investigations determined that no reasonable person would have taken any of the cited incidents as discrimination or harassment."     After killing Ward and reporter Alison Parker live on the air, Flanagan posted a video of the attack on social media.||ROANOKE, UNITED STATES
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Dabholkar-killers-are-being-protected-by-BJP-says-Rane/articleshow/48562068.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:36 IST 2015||MUMBAI: Former chief minister Narayan Rane alleged on Thursday that the killers of anti-superstition activist, Narendra Dabholkar, will never be caught as they enjoy the ruling party's patronage.    "During the Congress-Nationalist Congress Party (NCP) rule, law-enforcement agencies had nearly reached the killers. Now, two years later, it appears that as long as (chief minister Devendra) Fadnavis is holding the home portfolio, the killers will never be booked. The same was the case with the killers of veteran social worker, Govind Pansare. They have political shelter. They will never be caught,'' Rane said.    He said when senior NCP leader R R Patil was home minister, law-enforcement agencies had made progress in the investigation but now the probe has come to a grinding halt.    Rane came down heavily on the CM over the issue of the Maharashtra Bhushan award for Babasaheb Purandare, saying the controversy was deliberately created to divert attention from the worst drought in Marathwada region. "The situation in Marathwada is very bad. It is passing through a critical situation due to the drought. The controversy over the award has been created by the ruling BJP to divert the attention of the people. The Fadnavis government has miserably failed to tackle the drought,'' Rane said.    Rane said since there was a prolonged dispute over articles written by Purandare on Shivaji Maharaj, Fadnavis should have discussed it with all concerned. "It was inept handling of the situation,'' Rane said. He also criticized the CM for holding the award distribution ceremony at Raj Bhavan. "Fadnavis held his swearing-in ceremony at Wankhede stadium. It was wrong to organize the Maharashtra Bhushan award ceremony at Raj Bhavan. He was scared to hold the event on an open ground or in a big auditorium,'' Rane said.    Fadnavis said the government had accepted the Central Bureau of Investigation (CBI) demand to provide it officials from the state police to probe into the Dabholkar murder case. "We have deployed 6 officials, led by an ACP,'' he said.    ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bareilly/After-Mulayams-rape-remark-Badaun-sisters-kin-threaten-to-sue-him/articleshow/48561777.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:36 IST 2015||Bareilly: The family of the two minor sisters found hanging from a tree in last year in May has said that if Samajwadi Party chief Mulayam Singh Yadav does not apologise for his statement that the girls were not raped and that their death was related to property feud, they will file a defamation case against him soon.     Speaking at a function to distribute free e-rickshaws , the SP supremo said there were cases where women would name four people to settle scores when there was in reality only one rapist. He said it was beyond belief that four brothers would sometimes all be named as rapists. "It is not practical," he had said.     Citing the example of the case, he said it was blown out of proportion. "The CBI probed the case and found that rape was not committed at all. These were cold-blooded murders, committed by members of the girls' family, for the sake of property," Mulayam had said.     "If Yadav does not apologise, we will take up the suit . The ruling party chief says they were murdered, while the CBI has concluded that they committed suicide. If Yadav indeed knows, as we have held earlier, that the girls were killed, he should take action against the CBI for concluding that it was a case of double suicide," a cousin of the girls said.     "Which of their cousins killed the girls? My son was in Delhi at the time of the incident. My other children are five and 11 years old. Yadav should name the person he suspects," a relative of the girls said.     Asserting the claims the family had made earlier, one relative said there were five men behind the rape and murder. All five had been named in the FIR, he said.     Advocate SAH Kaukab Naqvi, representing the families of the two minor cousins, said, "The SP chief's statement was irresponsible. The matter is sub judice. Even the CBI investigators have not concluded that the girls' family was responsible for their deaths." He added that he would advise the family to wait until the court passes its order before taking up a defamation suit against Mulayam Singh Yadav.     The CBI, in its closure report submitted in 's POCSO court, said the girls committed suicide and were neither raped nor murdered. The agency said the girls committed suicide ashamed that the relationship of the elder sister with Pappu Yadav, one of the men earlier accused in the case, had been exposed. The agency said the younger of the two sisters was also desirous of a relationship with the same man. Both girls, the agency claimed, committed suicide in shame after being discovered by an uncle.     The families of the girls challenged the CBI's findings in court on .     The two girls, cousins aged 14 and 15, were found hanging from a mango tree on May 28, 2014. The two had stepped out of their homes, saying they would return after answering nature's call in the fields on the evening of and gone missing that night.||BAREILLY
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Pregnant-woman-killed-son-kidnapped-for-ransom-in-Nalasopara/articleshow/48561239.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:36 IST 2015||MUMBAI: A three-month pregnant woman was found murdered in her Nalasopara flat on Thursday. Her two-year-old son was allegedly kidnapped by her killer who called the victim's husband for ransom.     Gatki Singh's neck was slit by the killer using a kitchen knife. Gatki stayed with her husband Ambalal and son Prakash at Hanuman Nagar, Nalasopara (west). The murder came to light when Ambalal received a call from an unidentified person who informed him about killing Gatki and kidnapping Prakash. The caller demanded Rs 1.50 lakh. The murder is believed to have taken place at around 5.30 pm.     Ambalal informed the Nalasopara police and reached home from his workplace in Mumbai. The police suspect the killer to be known to the family as there was no forced entry into the flat. A case under sections 302 (murder), 363 (kidnapping) and 385 (extortion) of the IPC has been registered.||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/PG-medical-student-found-dead-with-throat-slit-in-Chennai/articleshow/48558648.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:36 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A postgraduate student studying at Kilpauk Medical College in Chennai was found dead with her throat slit in her hostel room on Thursday.     The student, Sathya (32) was staying with her friends in a room and pursuing her PG degree in medicine.     The murder came to light when one of her friends came to the room. Sathya's gold jewellery weighing five sovereigns was missing.     The Kilpauk police recovered a knife used by the assailant to slit her throat.     The police sent the body for postmortem and were investigating.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/thiruvananthapuram/Man-held-for-cousins-murder/articleshow/48556249.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:36 IST 2015||THIRUVANANTHAPURAM: Two men were arrested in connection with the murder of 32-year-old man at Mangalapuram here in the early hours of Wednesday.    Identying the deceased as Saiju, police said his cousin Sreeraj (28) and Akhil (25) were arrested. Saiju's wife Suja was also stabbed in the incident which took place around 2 am at the deceased's house. she is in hospital. A dispute between Saiju and Sreeraj is believed to be motive of the crime.   ||THIRUVANANTHAPURAM
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bhopal/DIC-manager-found-murdered-in-Bhopal/articleshow/48556190.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:36 IST 2015||BHOPAL: Manager of district industries centre, Raisen, Ram Dayal Bele was found murdered with multiple stab injuries near JK Road in Bhopal on Wednesday night. His mobile phone was missing. Police found mercury and a liquor bottle from the spot. The nature of stab injuries suggested more than one accused.     A person was pressuring Bele to clear loans without documents and the family of the deceased, including wife and three sons suspect he could be behind the murder. They also do not rule out chances of someone from his department involved in the murder.     Ram Dayal stayed at Minal Residency and would shuttle daily between Raisen and Bhopal. On Wednesday, he left office in Raisen, but did not reach home after which his family started calling him. In the midnight, they got a call from police that Bele was found lying in a pool of blood. Police identified him on the basis of identity card. A police team was sent to Raisen to record statements of people at his workplace. "It is a blind murder at this stage and investigation is on," police officials said.             ||BHOPAL
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/allahabad/Retired-teacher-murdered-property-dispute-suspected-in-Allahabad/articleshow/48556157.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:36 IST 2015||ALLAHABAD: A retired teacher was found murdered in his bungalow near ECC campus on Katghar Road under Mutthiganj police station on Wednesday. He was identified as 83-year-old E Peter.     Prima facie it appeared that he was strangulated to death. Circumstantial evidence ruled out loot motive. However, papers and documents were found scattered. Instead of speculating on the cause of death, the police have decided to wait for postmortem report.     SP, city, Rajesh Yadav said "We are probing the case from all possible angles, including property dispute. In the morning, maid Gudia reached the bungalow and knocked the door. She waited for an hour for response and then contacted the neighbours, who found the back door open. On entering the bungalow, they found the body on a cot and informed us."     Yadav said that Peter had retired from Jamuna Christian Inter College in 1993 and had been living alone ever since. His only son was settled in USA and would reach the city on Friday, he said.     "Circumstantial evidences indicate that killers were searching for some papers or documents. They had entered the house from back door as the main door of the bungalow was found locked from inside," he said.     The police also spoke to neighbours, relatives and others to compile information about the slain teacher.||ALLAHABAD
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/kanpur/Jyoti-case-trial-begins-in-Kanpur-first-witness-Rajesh/articleshow/48556150.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:36 IST 2015||KANPUR: Trial of the high-profile Jyoti murder case began here on Wednesday when prosecution produced its first witness, Rajesh alias Raja Nagdev, in the court of district judge. Rajesh adduced before the court how he and his family members came to know Jyoti was killed.     There was suspense among the defence battery about who would be the first prosecution witness and special prosecutor Damodar Mishra produced Rajash, who is uncle of Jyoti.     Rajesh, during his cross-examination on oath, stated that two or three days before the murder, Jyoti had made a call and had stated that she had attended a call on Piyush's mobile given by Manisha and without identifying self, the caller stated "Jaldi kaam karao ladke wale aane wale hain, mera rishta tay ho raha hai (Execute the work quickly as my marriage is going to be settled and persons from groom's side are coming)."     In cross-examination, after a few question the defence battery deferred the proceedings. The cross-examination would continue on August 22.     The special prosecutor informed that the defence had moved an application on behalf of accused Om Prakash, Poonam, Kamlesh and Mahesh to exempt them from personal attendance which was objected by him.||KANPUR
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/varanasi/Mother-daughter-duo-found-dead-in-Varanasi/articleshow/48556047.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:36 IST 2015||VARANASI: A woman and her infant daughter were found dead in their room in Baraith village of Jaunpur on Wednesday. She was identified as Antima Yadav (23) and Ayushi (10months). Her parents later lodged a case of dowry death against her in-laws. One of the accused has arrested.     According to reports, Antima was married to Suresh of Baraith village under Chandavak police station area few years back. Suresh worked out of station. His family said that Antima went to her room with Ayushi after dinner on Tuesday night. After locking the room from inside she called Suresh on phone and asked him to return immediately. The in-laws said that they broke the door after Antima did not come out till late in the morning and found the bodies hanging from the ceiling.     On being informed, Antima's parents reached the spot and alleged that she was being tortured by her in-laws for dowry. They claimed that a heated argument took place between Antima and Suresh's sister on Tuesday evening and alleged that the mother-daughter duo was murdered for dowry.     They later lodged a named FIR against her in-laws and Suresh's brother and sister. Police have arrested Suresh's brother Rajesh for interrogation.||VARANASI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/entertainment/hindi/bollywood/news/Elli-Avram-Would-like-to-do-a-dance-based-film-with-Tiger/articleshow/48555633.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:36 IST 2015||Actress Elli Avram, who will next be seen romancing comedian-actor Kapil Sharma in Kis Kisko Pyaar Karoon, says she would like to do a dance based film with Tiger Shroff as he is a fabulous actor."They are so many actors I would love to work with... I want to work with Salman but I think I would like to work with Tiger Shroff, Varun Dhawan also. I think Ranveer Singh is super funny and his energy is just too good," Elli told IANS. The "Mickey Virus" star, who alo tasted small screen with her stint in "Big Boss" and a dance based reality show "Jhalak Dikhhla Jaa", added: "I think I would really like to work with Tiger because he is a fabulous dancer and I would really love to do a dance movie with him," she added.Directed by popular duo Abbas-Mustan, Kis Kis Ko Pyaar Karoon is going to be Elli's second film in Bollywood. The comic family entertainer, which also features actors Manjari Phadnis, Simran Kaur Mundi Sai Lokur, Arbaaz Khan and Varun Sharma, is produced by Ratan Jain, Ganesh Jain and Abbas-Mustan under their banner Venus Records & Tapes Pvt Ltd in association with Abbas Mustan Films Production Pvt Ltd. The film is slated to release on September 25.For latest Bollywood updates follow us on Twitter >>> @TOIEntertain For the latest in Bollywood news, like us on Facebook >>> TOIEntertain For more interesting Bollywood news and pictures follow us on Pinterest>>> timesofindia For latest Bollywood updates follow us on G+ >>> The Times of India Entertainment||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:36 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:36 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/SC-acquits-Romesh-Sharma-in-Budhiraja-murder-case/articleshow/48704930.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:36 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Thursday upheld the Delhi High Court order acquitting former Congress leader Romesh Sharma in the case relating to the killing of fashion designer Kunjum Budhiraja.     A bench of Justices Pinaki Chandra Ghose and R K Agrawal dismissed an appeal filed by the Delhi government challenging HC order.     The Delhi government contended that the HC had erred in acquitting Sharma but it was strongly opposed by his counsel and senior advocate Siddharth Luthra who submitted that his client was in love with Kunjum and there was no evidence to prove his involvement in the case.     Sharma, who was alleged to be a frontman of underworld don Dawood Ibrahim, was convicted by a trial court on February 15, 2008. Kunjum was killed on March 20, 1999 at Sharma's South Delhi-based 'Jai Mata Di' farm house by a group of hired gangsters from Uttar Pradesh.     The trial court had convicted Sharma and five other accused in the case and had awarded life term to all. The HC, however, acquitted Sharma and co-accused Tejendir Verdi but upheld conviction and sentence of other four accused— Sharma's nephew Surinder Mishra, Hemchand, Santram and Ramesh alias Bobby.     While acquitting Sharma, the HC had said "Romesh Sharma and Kunjum were in love, and desired the company of each other. It does not establish that Sharma had got fed up with her". It had turned down Delhi police's contention that Sharma wanted to get rid of Kunjum as she knew about his alleged illegal activities.     "A grieving lover falling over the body of his mate and performing the rituals of a marriage can well be an expression of lasting love, and need not necessarily be a drama," the HC had said.     Sharma was in judicial custody at the time of the Kunjum's murder.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Raid-on-Bengaluru-centre-reveals-horror-tales/articleshow/48704718.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:36 IST 2015||BENGALURU: A State Human Rights Commission raid on a de-addiction centre in Jnanabharati Layout, near Kengeri, southwest Bengaluru, found 90 inmates living in pathetic conditions and subjected to inhuman treatment.     Thursday's raid followed the murder of an inmate of another de-addiction centre in Kothanur recently.     The SHRC raid on Sri Santhosh Social Service Society, also known as 4S Society, followed a tipoff. According to SHRC officials, the centre has been in existence for seven years at least, but the society couldn't produce documents of having obtained permission from the social welfare department. Commission officials said the centre had the permission from the DC and the DHO.     "Most inmates are between 20 and 35 years. They showed us signs of being physically abused. The centre has violated other norms too. Although it's supposed to have one nurse for every 15 patients and at least one in-house doctor and a psychiatrist, it didn't have any," said an SHRC spokesperson.     4 arrested for killing inmate:     Kothanur police arrested a de-addiction centre staffer and three inmates for allegedly beating to death a 28-year-old inmate. Dinesh was admitted to the centre by his family as he was an alcoholic. He was later found dead in a hospital. Family members noticed several bruises on his body. Narayana, an inmate-turned-staffer, gave some medicines to Dinesh, who later turned aggressive. Narayana sought the help of inmates Suresh, Subhan and Simon, to subdue Dinesh.     When Dinesh retaliated, the quartet overpowered him till he became unconscious. He died in hospital.||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/A-jolly-good-fellow-say-Khannas-friends/articleshow/48704630.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:36 IST 2015||Sanjeev Khanna, Indrani Mukerjea's second husband and suspected ally in Sheena Bora's killing, may be the most surprising element in this macabre drama, but his friends and associates in Kolkata refused to cast aspersions on "Sanju" just yet.     From being the biggest dart enthusiast at one of Kolkata's poshest clubs (the CC&FC) to having a finger in every pie, Sanjeev was everyone's "best mate" and go-to guy who friends described as: "A doer... someone who could get things done."     The morning after Khanna's arrest, TOI spoke to Ajay Rawla, the man who Khanna worked for as a consultant and whose house he was picked up from on Wednesday afternoon. "It wasn't like he was hiding like a desperate fugitive in my house. We had a meeting in the morning after which he drove me home and that's when news broke on television. We were sitting, watching, wondering what steps to take when the police arrived," explained Rawla.     Seven years his senior, Khanna's association with Rawla dates back to the time they went to Mayo College in Ajmer. Later, Khanna went on to become an aide for Rawla's pet projects. Besides running his own business in wireless communications, Khanna was there setting up chef Shaun Kenworthy and Rawla's restaurant 1658 or immersed in the heritage project of converting the Bawali Rajbari into a hotel. "He was getting all the construction work and labourers in place. He was very good in helping out with permissions through his connections with excise and contractors," remembers Kenworthy.     Khanna, who seldom missed his outings at the club, motor rallies and horse racing as a prominent face in the social circuit, was not the same man before he met Indrani, recounts Bull Banthia, a close friend. "Well-read and well-versed, Sanju had a great mechanical mind with a solution for everything," is how Bull chose to describe his "jolly good friend who loved meeting new people, hung out at the club but wasn't a social climber". "It was Indrani who emerged as this socialite and drove him to consciously build contacts with those higher up in the social rung after marriage," said the Kolkata-based entrepreneur. "That's the reason why I distanced myself from them until overnight she left Kolkata with their daughter and Sanju's wallet."     While Indrani never surfaces in conversations, his daughter Vidhie, who stayed with Indrani, is a fond subject with his friends. "He would miss his daughter but was resigned to fate, hoping that someday she would find him," said Rawla, adding, "It was Vidhie who called Sanjeev on Wednesday to give him the news."     No one seems to know about any recent interaction between Khanna and Indrani. G M Kapur, a known name in Kolkata who was Intach's state convener and happens to be Khanna's "mama", seemed disturbed with "all the theorizing" of Khanna's role in the crime. He declined to look back on Indrani and Khanna's relationship but added, "The last that there was any contact with Indrani or her family was when Vidhie visited Calcutta last year to celebrate the 75th birthday of her grandmother (Khanna's mother who lives with him)."     Khanna's Facebook posts on "karma" in the weeks and months following Sheena's alleged murder on April 24, 2012, make for interesting reading. On April 30, Khanna shared photo messages: "Say whatever, whenever the f*** you want to"; "Sometimes I get so weird, I even freak myself out".     On May 24, exactly a month after the alleged killing, he wrote: "You can never tell what people are thinking and feeling unless they tell you, and usually they lie. you ask them, 'Whats wrong?' and they say 'Nothing'. You accept this because it's easier than digging for the truth. People smile when they want to cry, they laugh when they want to scream and shout. They pretend like nothing is wrong because they don't want to face the truth. Things aren't always rainbows and butterflies, sometimes you gotta scream and cry your anger and sadness to the world, because you can only hold it in for so long before something in you snaps. so when you want to cry, cry. When you want to scream, scream. Don't hide behind fake smiles, it's ok to not be alright."     ||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Sheena-docu-Michail-add-to-mystery/articleshow/48701752.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:36 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Michail, Sheena's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered have raised a number of unanswered questions.    Two days after his mother, Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Michail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai Police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed that what he gave to police was enough to prove that Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora (who are actually parents of Indrani) as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. Some questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukherjea.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Michail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43 as mentioned in reports after her arrest.    Adding more to the suspense, Michail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Michail studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board examination, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that knew that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard that her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard that she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband who she introduced as Peter Mukherjea."    The two-member Mumbai Police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Michail, who on Wednesday, was the first one to reveal that Sheena was Indrani's daughter, twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Michail's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Michail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukherjae is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Michail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."  ||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Grandparents-are-Sheenas-mom-dad-on-birth-certificate/articleshow/48704559.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:36 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Mikhail, Sheena Bora's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered led to some unanswered questions on Thursday.    Two days after his mother Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Mikhail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed what he gave the police was enough to prove Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora, who are actually Indrani's parents, as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. However, many questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter. In many cases in India involving single mothers, grandparents are known to put in their names as father and mother.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukerjea, that is, 13 years after Sheena was born.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Mikhail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43.    Mikhail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Mikhail     studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board exam, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband, who she introduced as Peter Mukerjea."    The two-member Mumbai police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Mikhail twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Mikhail 's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time, he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Mikhail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukerjea is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Mikhail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Sheena-bowled-us-over-Rahuls-uncle/articleshow/48704552.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:36 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: Had things worked out as desired for Peter Mukherjea's first wife Shabnam and her family in Dehradun, Rahul Mukherjea and Sheena Bora would have been married for over three years now.     Shabnam's brother Shaleen Singh told TOI on Thursday that in 2011 Rahul brought Sheena to their sprawling home in Dehradun to seek approval from the family for their marriage.     The entire family-Shabnam, her younger brother Shaleen, father Anand Singh and mother Seema-were reportedly bowled over by Sheena's jovial nature and affection towards the elderly people. Impressed, the family gave its "unqualified and unanimous approval" for the wedding, which was supposed to take place within a few months, said Shaleen.     Stunned by the recent development, Shaleen said, "Sheena was among those rare persons who left a deep and lifelong impact on people. She was good-looking, a sweet person, clean of heart and good to talk to. None of us objected to the wedding."     Shaleen learnt of Sheena's murder through news channels. "It would have been great if she had become a part of the family. I don't know what was the cause and motive behind the heinous crime, but all those behind the killing of the jovial-natured girl should not be spared at any cost," he said.     A former model and tele-actor, 49-year-old Shaleen today owns the Sanskar International school in Jogiwala here. He recalled the last meeting with Shabnam and Rahul in April this year. "My father Anand Singh passed away in April. They had come to pay their respects but we did not interact much."     However, Shaleen said of late the interaction between him and his sister Shabnam was limited. Although Shabnam's farm Gul-e-Shabnam and Shaleen's residence Shankar Sadan are barely 200 metres away in Badripur, meetings between them were rare. While Shaleen and his mother stay on different floors of Shankar Sadan, Shabnam stays alone at her residence and is frequently visited by Rahul.     "There are matters in each family which we do not want to disclose. We are not against each other but do not interact much. She comes to meet our mother occasionally," said Shaleen, adding that Shabnam was passionate about painting and had a studio in her residence.     Shaleen denied having any details about the presence of Mumbai police in Dehradun. "Neither Doon police nor Mumbai police have contacted me over the issue."     Staff at Shabnam's residence said she was out-of-station but they were not aware of her whereabouts.||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Kilpauk-doctor-murder-Hubby-to-approach-court/articleshow/48704411.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:36 IST 2015||CHENNAI: It's been four days since police claimed to have solved the murder of S Sathya, 24, a PG medical student. However, her husband has put forth questions that police have failed to answer. Though investigating officers confirmed Sathya was not sexually assaulted before she was killed, they leaked to some section of media saying that they changed their stance on Wednesday and said there were indications of attempt to rape on the deceased.     Police personnel revealed the details soon after Sathya's husband Dr P Sesu, also employed at a primary health centre in Perambalur, expressed certain doubts.     He alleged the police hastily solved the case citing the state assembly, which is in motion. Sathya was found dead at her house in Kilpauk on August 20.     On August 23, police arrested Harintham Depnath, a BTech graduate, who lived at the second floor on the same apartment. Neither was there any mention about sexual assault or attempt on Sathya when the body was recovered from the house. The nor did the doctors. Police didn't tell this during the arrest of Depnath on August 23. "What forced the police to reveal about the sexual harassment attempt on my wife now?" asked Sesu.     "I want to live a peaceful life with my two sons - Tamil Nesan, 6, and Karmugilan, 4. The studies and the future of my children is important for me. I do respect the police personnel who spent sleepless nights to solve the murder, but there are questions that need to be answered," he said.     "I live in Perambalur with my children, but we speak through live video calls. I have told my sons that Sathya has gone to the God, as the Almighty likes her more. "Hereafter, we cannot speak or meet her. I don't know how far my children will admit it?" said Sesu. "I will approach the court seeking a fair probe into the murder of my wife. I want to find out the real cause behind her death. I want the real accused to get punished for his deed," said Sesu.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Woman-strangles-husbands-lover/articleshow/48704388.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:36 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A woman beat up and strangled her husband's partner, an assistant professor at a polytechnic in Choolaimedu, in their Thiruverkadu home on Thursday, police said. A court later remanded the accused, 32-year-old Shruti, in judicial custody.     Police said Sambasivam, a professor at Panimalar Engineering College in Poonamallee, used to bring Rajalakshmi, home frequently and introduced her to his wife Shruti as a colleague. He even dropped her home at night. The polytechnic where Rajalakshmi worked was part of the Panimalar group of educational institutions. Shruti initially believed the two were just colleagues until Sambasivam came home with Rajalakshmi on Tuesday and said the woman was moving in with them permanently.     On Wednesday morning, Sambasivam allegedly tied a 'mangalsutra' to Rajalakshmi in front of his wife, police said, based on Shruti's confession. A shocked Shruti picked up a fight with Sambasivam who asked her to maintain a cordial relationship and take care of Rajalakshmi. On Thursday morning, after he left for college a fight broke out between the two women.     Police said Rajalakshmi allegedly abused Sruthi and went into the bathroom. Sruthi followed her in and strangled her with the 'mangalsutra'. She then tried to make it appear that the woman had fainted in the bathroom. She took her in an autorickshaw to a nearby hospital where she was declared 'brought dead'. Doctors who noticed a few marks around her neck informed the Thiruverkadu police who registered a case of suspicious death under CrPC section 176.     The body was sent for postmortem to Kilpauk Medical College and Hospital.     After finding that the two women were at home at the time of the death, police interrogated Sruthi for more than an hour but she continued to maintain that Rajyalakshmi had died of injuries sustained when she fell down in the bathroom.     "She confessed to the murder when we told her that her fingerprints had been lifted from the scene of crime," said an investigating officer. "She said she had smashed the woman's head against the wall and later strangled her with the 'thali'." Police altered the case to murder and arrested Sruthi.     Initial inquiries revealed that Rajalakshmi had been married to a man named Rajasekhar for a while and they had separated. She then got married to Suresh, a relative who worked in a private firm, a few years ago and the couple moved into a house in Mogappair.     They allegedly had frequent quarrels as he tortured her and she left him too, police found.     Rajalakshmi then got a job with Panimalar Engineering College where she met Sambasivam. The two became friends and began seeing each other. Rajalakshmi recently moved to the polytechnic in Choolaimedu, police said.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/US-journalists-killer-annoyed-colleagues-Ex-boss/articleshow/48704167.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:36 IST 2015||ROANOKE, United States: The disgruntled former US television station employee who murdered two journalists had "annoyed" colleagues but showed no signs at work of any mental health issues, his former boss said Thursday.     Vester Lee Flanagan, 41, worked as a reporter for WDBJ in Roanoke, Virginia from March 2012 to February 2013, but was dismissed for poor performance and angry behavior, general manager Jeffrey Marks said.     On Wednesday, Flanagan shot and killed two of the CBS affiliate's journalists while they were conducting an on-air interview. He later fatally shot himself.     "We are still at a loss to figure out what happened to him in those two and a half years" since he was fired, Marks told a news conference flanked by dozens of staff, many of them holding hands.     "I don't think we identified that he had mental health issues. We certainly identified that he had performance issues."     Marks defended the station's hiring record and said its parent company had "a very elaborate program to screen employees."     Flanagan passed background checks and came with only positive references, Marks said.     It was only after he was hired, Marks said, that things went downhill.     "Vester's behavior annoyed a lot of people in the news station," Marks said.     Flanagan, who went by the on-screen name Bryce Williams, alleged in a manifesto faxed to ABC News that he was discriminated against as a gay, black journalist.     Marks said accusations in 2013 that he was treated unfairly were "immediately investigated and found to be without merit."     During his employment, Flanagan complied with demands that he seek medical help, but he was ultimately dismissed.     He was escorted from the building by police and made an ominous aside to the news director -- handing him a wooden cross and saying "'you'll need this'," Marks said.     As he left, he also made a "derogatory comment" to Adam Ward, the cameraman he shot dead on Wednesday.     Flanagan filed a complaint with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and a civil action suit, which were dismissed, he said.     "All of these investigations determined that no reasonable person would have taken any of the cited incidents as discrimination or harassment."     After killing Ward and reporter Alison Parker live on the air, Flanagan posted a video of the attack on social media.||ROANOKE, UNITED STATES
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:36 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/SC-acquits-Romesh-Sharma-in-Budhiraja-murder-case/articleshow/48704930.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:36 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Thursday upheld the Delhi High Court order acquitting former Congress leader Romesh Sharma in the case relating to the killing of fashion designer Kunjum Budhiraja.     A bench of Justices Pinaki Chandra Ghose and R K Agrawal dismissed an appeal filed by the Delhi government challenging HC order.     The Delhi government contended that the HC had erred in acquitting Sharma but it was strongly opposed by his counsel and senior advocate Siddharth Luthra who submitted that his client was in love with Kunjum and there was no evidence to prove his involvement in the case.     Sharma, who was alleged to be a frontman of underworld don Dawood Ibrahim, was convicted by a trial court on February 15, 2008. Kunjum was killed on March 20, 1999 at Sharma's South Delhi-based 'Jai Mata Di' farm house by a group of hired gangsters from Uttar Pradesh.     The trial court had convicted Sharma and five other accused in the case and had awarded life term to all. The HC, however, acquitted Sharma and co-accused Tejendir Verdi but upheld conviction and sentence of other four accused— Sharma's nephew Surinder Mishra, Hemchand, Santram and Ramesh alias Bobby.     While acquitting Sharma, the HC had said "Romesh Sharma and Kunjum were in love, and desired the company of each other. It does not establish that Sharma had got fed up with her". It had turned down Delhi police's contention that Sharma wanted to get rid of Kunjum as she knew about his alleged illegal activities.     "A grieving lover falling over the body of his mate and performing the rituals of a marriage can well be an expression of lasting love, and need not necessarily be a drama," the HC had said.     Sharma was in judicial custody at the time of the Kunjum's murder.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Raid-on-Bengaluru-centre-reveals-horror-tales/articleshow/48704718.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:36 IST 2015||BENGALURU: A State Human Rights Commission raid on a de-addiction centre in Jnanabharati Layout, near Kengeri, southwest Bengaluru, found 90 inmates living in pathetic conditions and subjected to inhuman treatment.     Thursday's raid followed the murder of an inmate of another de-addiction centre in Kothanur recently.     The SHRC raid on Sri Santhosh Social Service Society, also known as 4S Society, followed a tipoff. According to SHRC officials, the centre has been in existence for seven years at least, but the society couldn't produce documents of having obtained permission from the social welfare department. Commission officials said the centre had the permission from the DC and the DHO.     "Most inmates are between 20 and 35 years. They showed us signs of being physically abused. The centre has violated other norms too. Although it's supposed to have one nurse for every 15 patients and at least one in-house doctor and a psychiatrist, it didn't have any," said an SHRC spokesperson.     4 arrested for killing inmate:     Kothanur police arrested a de-addiction centre staffer and three inmates for allegedly beating to death a 28-year-old inmate. Dinesh was admitted to the centre by his family as he was an alcoholic. He was later found dead in a hospital. Family members noticed several bruises on his body. Narayana, an inmate-turned-staffer, gave some medicines to Dinesh, who later turned aggressive. Narayana sought the help of inmates Suresh, Subhan and Simon, to subdue Dinesh.     When Dinesh retaliated, the quartet overpowered him till he became unconscious. He died in hospital.||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/A-jolly-good-fellow-say-Khannas-friends/articleshow/48704630.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:36 IST 2015||Sanjeev Khanna, Indrani Mukerjea's second husband and suspected ally in Sheena Bora's killing, may be the most surprising element in this macabre drama, but his friends and associates in Kolkata refused to cast aspersions on "Sanju" just yet.     From being the biggest dart enthusiast at one of Kolkata's poshest clubs (the CC&FC) to having a finger in every pie, Sanjeev was everyone's "best mate" and go-to guy who friends described as: "A doer... someone who could get things done."     The morning after Khanna's arrest, TOI spoke to Ajay Rawla, the man who Khanna worked for as a consultant and whose house he was picked up from on Wednesday afternoon. "It wasn't like he was hiding like a desperate fugitive in my house. We had a meeting in the morning after which he drove me home and that's when news broke on television. We were sitting, watching, wondering what steps to take when the police arrived," explained Rawla.     Seven years his senior, Khanna's association with Rawla dates back to the time they went to Mayo College in Ajmer. Later, Khanna went on to become an aide for Rawla's pet projects. Besides running his own business in wireless communications, Khanna was there setting up chef Shaun Kenworthy and Rawla's restaurant 1658 or immersed in the heritage project of converting the Bawali Rajbari into a hotel. "He was getting all the construction work and labourers in place. He was very good in helping out with permissions through his connections with excise and contractors," remembers Kenworthy.     Khanna, who seldom missed his outings at the club, motor rallies and horse racing as a prominent face in the social circuit, was not the same man before he met Indrani, recounts Bull Banthia, a close friend. "Well-read and well-versed, Sanju had a great mechanical mind with a solution for everything," is how Bull chose to describe his "jolly good friend who loved meeting new people, hung out at the club but wasn't a social climber". "It was Indrani who emerged as this socialite and drove him to consciously build contacts with those higher up in the social rung after marriage," said the Kolkata-based entrepreneur. "That's the reason why I distanced myself from them until overnight she left Kolkata with their daughter and Sanju's wallet."     While Indrani never surfaces in conversations, his daughter Vidhie, who stayed with Indrani, is a fond subject with his friends. "He would miss his daughter but was resigned to fate, hoping that someday she would find him," said Rawla, adding, "It was Vidhie who called Sanjeev on Wednesday to give him the news."     No one seems to know about any recent interaction between Khanna and Indrani. G M Kapur, a known name in Kolkata who was Intach's state convener and happens to be Khanna's "mama", seemed disturbed with "all the theorizing" of Khanna's role in the crime. He declined to look back on Indrani and Khanna's relationship but added, "The last that there was any contact with Indrani or her family was when Vidhie visited Calcutta last year to celebrate the 75th birthday of her grandmother (Khanna's mother who lives with him)."     Khanna's Facebook posts on "karma" in the weeks and months following Sheena's alleged murder on April 24, 2012, make for interesting reading. On April 30, Khanna shared photo messages: "Say whatever, whenever the f*** you want to"; "Sometimes I get so weird, I even freak myself out".     On May 24, exactly a month after the alleged killing, he wrote: "You can never tell what people are thinking and feeling unless they tell you, and usually they lie. you ask them, 'Whats wrong?' and they say 'Nothing'. You accept this because it's easier than digging for the truth. People smile when they want to cry, they laugh when they want to scream and shout. They pretend like nothing is wrong because they don't want to face the truth. Things aren't always rainbows and butterflies, sometimes you gotta scream and cry your anger and sadness to the world, because you can only hold it in for so long before something in you snaps. so when you want to cry, cry. When you want to scream, scream. Don't hide behind fake smiles, it's ok to not be alright."     ||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Sheena-docu-Michail-add-to-mystery/articleshow/48701752.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:36 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Michail, Sheena's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered have raised a number of unanswered questions.    Two days after his mother, Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Michail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai Police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed that what he gave to police was enough to prove that Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora (who are actually parents of Indrani) as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. Some questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukherjea.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Michail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43 as mentioned in reports after her arrest.    Adding more to the suspense, Michail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Michail studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board examination, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that knew that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard that her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard that she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband who she introduced as Peter Mukherjea."    The two-member Mumbai Police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Michail, who on Wednesday, was the first one to reveal that Sheena was Indrani's daughter, twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Michail's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Michail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukherjae is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Michail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."  ||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Grandparents-are-Sheenas-mom-dad-on-birth-certificate/articleshow/48704559.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:36 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Mikhail, Sheena Bora's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered led to some unanswered questions on Thursday.    Two days after his mother Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Mikhail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed what he gave the police was enough to prove Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora, who are actually Indrani's parents, as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. However, many questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter. In many cases in India involving single mothers, grandparents are known to put in their names as father and mother.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukerjea, that is, 13 years after Sheena was born.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Mikhail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43.    Mikhail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Mikhail     studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board exam, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband, who she introduced as Peter Mukerjea."    The two-member Mumbai police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Mikhail twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Mikhail 's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time, he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Mikhail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukerjea is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Mikhail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Sheena-bowled-us-over-Rahuls-uncle/articleshow/48704552.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:36 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: Had things worked out as desired for Peter Mukherjea's first wife Shabnam and her family in Dehradun, Rahul Mukherjea and Sheena Bora would have been married for over three years now.     Shabnam's brother Shaleen Singh told TOI on Thursday that in 2011 Rahul brought Sheena to their sprawling home in Dehradun to seek approval from the family for their marriage.     The entire family-Shabnam, her younger brother Shaleen, father Anand Singh and mother Seema-were reportedly bowled over by Sheena's jovial nature and affection towards the elderly people. Impressed, the family gave its "unqualified and unanimous approval" for the wedding, which was supposed to take place within a few months, said Shaleen.     Stunned by the recent development, Shaleen said, "Sheena was among those rare persons who left a deep and lifelong impact on people. She was good-looking, a sweet person, clean of heart and good to talk to. None of us objected to the wedding."     Shaleen learnt of Sheena's murder through news channels. "It would have been great if she had become a part of the family. I don't know what was the cause and motive behind the heinous crime, but all those behind the killing of the jovial-natured girl should not be spared at any cost," he said.     A former model and tele-actor, 49-year-old Shaleen today owns the Sanskar International school in Jogiwala here. He recalled the last meeting with Shabnam and Rahul in April this year. "My father Anand Singh passed away in April. They had come to pay their respects but we did not interact much."     However, Shaleen said of late the interaction between him and his sister Shabnam was limited. Although Shabnam's farm Gul-e-Shabnam and Shaleen's residence Shankar Sadan are barely 200 metres away in Badripur, meetings between them were rare. While Shaleen and his mother stay on different floors of Shankar Sadan, Shabnam stays alone at her residence and is frequently visited by Rahul.     "There are matters in each family which we do not want to disclose. We are not against each other but do not interact much. She comes to meet our mother occasionally," said Shaleen, adding that Shabnam was passionate about painting and had a studio in her residence.     Shaleen denied having any details about the presence of Mumbai police in Dehradun. "Neither Doon police nor Mumbai police have contacted me over the issue."     Staff at Shabnam's residence said she was out-of-station but they were not aware of her whereabouts.||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Kilpauk-doctor-murder-Hubby-to-approach-court/articleshow/48704411.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:36 IST 2015||CHENNAI: It's been four days since police claimed to have solved the murder of S Sathya, 24, a PG medical student. However, her husband has put forth questions that police have failed to answer. Though investigating officers confirmed Sathya was not sexually assaulted before she was killed, they leaked to some section of media saying that they changed their stance on Wednesday and said there were indications of attempt to rape on the deceased.     Police personnel revealed the details soon after Sathya's husband Dr P Sesu, also employed at a primary health centre in Perambalur, expressed certain doubts.     He alleged the police hastily solved the case citing the state assembly, which is in motion. Sathya was found dead at her house in Kilpauk on August 20.     On August 23, police arrested Harintham Depnath, a BTech graduate, who lived at the second floor on the same apartment. Neither was there any mention about sexual assault or attempt on Sathya when the body was recovered from the house. The nor did the doctors. Police didn't tell this during the arrest of Depnath on August 23. "What forced the police to reveal about the sexual harassment attempt on my wife now?" asked Sesu.     "I want to live a peaceful life with my two sons - Tamil Nesan, 6, and Karmugilan, 4. The studies and the future of my children is important for me. I do respect the police personnel who spent sleepless nights to solve the murder, but there are questions that need to be answered," he said.     "I live in Perambalur with my children, but we speak through live video calls. I have told my sons that Sathya has gone to the God, as the Almighty likes her more. "Hereafter, we cannot speak or meet her. I don't know how far my children will admit it?" said Sesu. "I will approach the court seeking a fair probe into the murder of my wife. I want to find out the real cause behind her death. I want the real accused to get punished for his deed," said Sesu.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Woman-strangles-husbands-lover/articleshow/48704388.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:36 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A woman beat up and strangled her husband's partner, an assistant professor at a polytechnic in Choolaimedu, in their Thiruverkadu home on Thursday, police said. A court later remanded the accused, 32-year-old Shruti, in judicial custody.     Police said Sambasivam, a professor at Panimalar Engineering College in Poonamallee, used to bring Rajalakshmi, home frequently and introduced her to his wife Shruti as a colleague. He even dropped her home at night. The polytechnic where Rajalakshmi worked was part of the Panimalar group of educational institutions. Shruti initially believed the two were just colleagues until Sambasivam came home with Rajalakshmi on Tuesday and said the woman was moving in with them permanently.     On Wednesday morning, Sambasivam allegedly tied a 'mangalsutra' to Rajalakshmi in front of his wife, police said, based on Shruti's confession. A shocked Shruti picked up a fight with Sambasivam who asked her to maintain a cordial relationship and take care of Rajalakshmi. On Thursday morning, after he left for college a fight broke out between the two women.     Police said Rajalakshmi allegedly abused Sruthi and went into the bathroom. Sruthi followed her in and strangled her with the 'mangalsutra'. She then tried to make it appear that the woman had fainted in the bathroom. She took her in an autorickshaw to a nearby hospital where she was declared 'brought dead'. Doctors who noticed a few marks around her neck informed the Thiruverkadu police who registered a case of suspicious death under CrPC section 176.     The body was sent for postmortem to Kilpauk Medical College and Hospital.     After finding that the two women were at home at the time of the death, police interrogated Sruthi for more than an hour but she continued to maintain that Rajyalakshmi had died of injuries sustained when she fell down in the bathroom.     "She confessed to the murder when we told her that her fingerprints had been lifted from the scene of crime," said an investigating officer. "She said she had smashed the woman's head against the wall and later strangled her with the 'thali'." Police altered the case to murder and arrested Sruthi.     Initial inquiries revealed that Rajalakshmi had been married to a man named Rajasekhar for a while and they had separated. She then got married to Suresh, a relative who worked in a private firm, a few years ago and the couple moved into a house in Mogappair.     They allegedly had frequent quarrels as he tortured her and she left him too, police found.     Rajalakshmi then got a job with Panimalar Engineering College where she met Sambasivam. The two became friends and began seeing each other. Rajalakshmi recently moved to the polytechnic in Choolaimedu, police said.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/US-journalists-killer-annoyed-colleagues-Ex-boss/articleshow/48704167.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:36 IST 2015||ROANOKE, United States: The disgruntled former US television station employee who murdered two journalists had "annoyed" colleagues but showed no signs at work of any mental health issues, his former boss said Thursday.     Vester Lee Flanagan, 41, worked as a reporter for WDBJ in Roanoke, Virginia from March 2012 to February 2013, but was dismissed for poor performance and angry behavior, general manager Jeffrey Marks said.     On Wednesday, Flanagan shot and killed two of the CBS affiliate's journalists while they were conducting an on-air interview. He later fatally shot himself.     "We are still at a loss to figure out what happened to him in those two and a half years" since he was fired, Marks told a news conference flanked by dozens of staff, many of them holding hands.     "I don't think we identified that he had mental health issues. We certainly identified that he had performance issues."     Marks defended the station's hiring record and said its parent company had "a very elaborate program to screen employees."     Flanagan passed background checks and came with only positive references, Marks said.     It was only after he was hired, Marks said, that things went downhill.     "Vester's behavior annoyed a lot of people in the news station," Marks said.     Flanagan, who went by the on-screen name Bryce Williams, alleged in a manifesto faxed to ABC News that he was discriminated against as a gay, black journalist.     Marks said accusations in 2013 that he was treated unfairly were "immediately investigated and found to be without merit."     During his employment, Flanagan complied with demands that he seek medical help, but he was ultimately dismissed.     He was escorted from the building by police and made an ominous aside to the news director -- handing him a wooden cross and saying "'you'll need this'," Marks said.     As he left, he also made a "derogatory comment" to Adam Ward, the cameraman he shot dead on Wednesday.     Flanagan filed a complaint with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and a civil action suit, which were dismissed, he said.     "All of these investigations determined that no reasonable person would have taken any of the cited incidents as discrimination or harassment."     After killing Ward and reporter Alison Parker live on the air, Flanagan posted a video of the attack on social media.||ROANOKE, UNITED STATES
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Madhya-Pradesh-retains-rape-capital-tag/articleshow/48555492.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:40 IST 2015||BHOPAL: Madhya Pradesh once again retained the shameful tag of India's rape capital with 13 women being raped on an average every day, according to 2014 National Crime Records Bureau (NCRB) data. The state recorded 5,076 rape cases, of which close to half - 2,358 survivors were minors. Accused in 4,700 rape cases were known to survivors.    The next rungs in the rogue's gallery are occupied by Rajasthan and Uttar Pradesh respectively with 3,759 and 3,467 rape cases, states NCRB report released on Tuesday. A total of 36,735 rape cases were recorded in the country in 2014.    In another first in the shame league, Madhya Pradesh tops in sexual offences registered under Indian Penal Code with 15,170 cases, including attempt to rape, assault on women with intent to outrage her modesty, insult to modesty of women. The state is followed by Maharashtra and Uttar Pradesh with 15,029 and 12,425 cases of crime against women.    In 2013, a total of 4,335 cases were reported in the state, which means average of cases of rape has risen by two incidents a day in 2014.    Also, Madhya Pradesh is just behind Uttar Pradesh in abduction cases. At least 7,833 incidents of kidnapping were reported in the state, which was second highest in country after UP which registered 12,361 cases in 2014. Delhi stands third with 7143 cases.    The shocking statistics comes just days after a Class V student of Sagar Public School in Bhopal was kidnapped on August 14.    Also, at least two women die of dowry harassment in the state every day. A total of 733 dowry deaths were reported in Madhya Pradesh, making it third in the category after Uttar Pradesh with 2,469 and Bihar with 1,373 cases.    A total of 2,274 people were murdered in Madhya Pradesh in 2014. This is the only bracket in which the state is not hugging the top rung. At least 203 murders were a fallout of love affairs and illicit relationships, stated NCRB data.    Rogue's gallery:    Rape    Madhya Pradesh: 5,076    Rajasthan: 3,759    Uttar Pradesh: 3,467    Sexual Offences    Madhya Pradesh: 15,170    Maharashtra: 15,029    Uttar Pradesh: 12,425  ||BHOPAL
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Madhya-Pradesh-retains-rape-capital-tag/articleshow/48555413.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:40 IST 2015||BHOPAL: Madhya Pradesh once again retained the shameful tag of India's rape capital with 13 women being raped on an average every day, according to 2014 National Crime Records Bureau (NCRB) data. The state recorded 5,076 rape cases, of which close to half — 2,358 survivors were minors. Accused in 4,700 rape cases were known to survivors.     The next rungs in the rogue's gallery are occupied by Rajasthan and Uttar Pradesh respectively with 3,759 and 3,467 rape cases, states NCRB report released on Tuesday. A total of 36,735 rape cases were recorded in the country in 2014.     In another first in the shame league, Madhya Pradesh tops in sexual offences registered under Indian Penal Code with 15,170 cases, including attempt to rape, assault on women with intent to outrage her modesty, insult to modesty of women. The state is followed by Maharashtra and Uttar Pradesh with 15,029 and 12,425 cases of crime against women.     In 2013, a total of 4,335 cases were reported in the state, which means average of cases of rape has risen by two incidents a day in 2014.     Also, Madhya Pradesh is just behind Uttar Pradesh in abduction cases. At least 7,833 incidents of kidnapping were reported in the state, which was second highest in country after UP which registered 12,361 cases in 2014. Delhi stands third with 7143 cases.     The shocking statistics comes just days after a Class V student of Sagar Public School in Bhopal was kidnapped on August 14.     Also, at least two women die of dowry harassment in the state every day. A total of 733 dowry deaths were reported in Madhya Pradesh, making it third in the category after Uttar Pradesh with 2,469 and Bihar with 1,373 cases.     A total of 2,274 people were murdered in Madhya Pradesh in 2014. This is the only bracket in which the state is not hugging the top rung. At least 203 murders were a fallout of love affairs and illicit relationships, stated NCRB data.||BHOPAL
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/madurai/Madurai-college-students-murder-Madras-HC-stays-trial-in-Tirunelveli-court/articleshow/48554743.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:40 IST 2015||MADURAI: The Madurai bench of the Madras high court on Thursday stayed the trial in the murder of a college student here as there were flaws in the police investigations into the case.     Sasikumar, son of Sethuraman and S Padmini (55) of Madurai, and his friends visited the Agasthiyar Falls at Papanasam in Tirunelveli district on March 30, 2012. Sasikumar suffered injuries when a gang attacked him, and he died a few days later.     The Vickramasingapuram police investigated the case and filed a chargesheet in the additional district and sessions court in Tirunelveli. The matter in pending in the court.     Meanwhile, Padmini moved the high court for a CBI inquiry into her son's murder as there were flaws in the investigations by the police.     The high court stayed the proceedings in the case saying sufficient materials had not been collected by the police, except the confession given by the accused to the police which was not admissible. The police had not conducted an identification parade, and medical records pertaining to the treatment given to the youth had not been recovered. Doctor who treated the deceased had not been examined, the court observed.     "The court, going by the materials available on record, has every reason to find that the investigation has not been done thoroughly and there are lots of flaws. It will amount to doing injustice if the trial is allowed to go on with the present materials," said Justice S Nagamuthu.     ||MADURAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Madurai-college-students-murder-Madras-HC-stays-trial-in-Tirunelveli-court/articleshow/48554703.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:40 IST 2015||MADURAI: The Madurai bench of the Madras high court on Thursday stayed the trial in the murder of a college student here as there were flaws in the police investigations into the case.     Sasikumar, son of Sethuraman and S Padmini (55) of Madurai, and his friends visited the Agasthiyar Falls at Papanasam in Tirunelveli district on March 30, 2012. Sasikumar suffered injuries when a gang attacked him, and he died a few days later.     The Vickramasingapuram police investigated the case and filed a chargesheet in the additional district and sessions court in Tirunelveli. The matter in pending in the court.     Meanwhile, Padmini moved the high court for a CBI inquiry into her son's murder as there were flaws in the investigations by the police.     The high court stayed the proceedings in the case saying sufficient materials had not been collected by the police, except the confession given by the accused to the police which was not admissible. The police had not conducted an identification parade, and medical records pertaining to the treatment given to the youth had not been recovered. Doctor who treated the deceased had not been examined, the court observed.     "The court, going by the materials available on record, has every reason to find that the investigation has not been done thoroughly and there are lots of flaws. It will amount to doing injustice if the trial is allowed to go on with the present materials," said Justice S Nagamuthu.     ||MADURAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bhubaneswar/Sundargarh-girl-killed-by-live-in-partner/articleshow/48554462.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:40 IST 2015||ROURKELA: Sundargarh police on Wednesday recovered the body of an 18-year old tribal girl, suspected to have been murdered by her live-in partner, a constable working with Odisha state armed police at Koraput.    Police seized the body from Beheradih Square at Saguanbani. A vanity bag, containing a train ticket, and some cosmetics were recovered from the spot. The girl is suspected to have been strangulated to death.    An FIR was later lodged by the deceased's father Bhimsen Bahala.    Preliminary inquiry revealed that the girl had eloped with Sihansan Mukut Ekka, 25, also a resident of Beheradish, a year ago. The constable's family had opposed their marriage.    In his complaint, Bahala said he had spoken to Ekka over phone on Tuesday afternoon and was informed that both would reach Sundargarh the following day by Koraput Express. Bhimsen said Ekka asked him to keep his daughter's birth certificate ready for court marriage.    "We have registered a murder case and are on the lookout for Ekka," said IIC of Kinjirikela police station Bidesi Bag.  ||ROURKELA
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/jaipur/Unable-to-pay-medical-bills-woman-throws-baby-in-well/articleshow/48552959.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:40 IST 2015||JAIPUR: Poverty and ignorance about medical facilities allegedly led a 22-year-old woman to throw her infant girl in a well in the outskirts of Mansarovar locality. Since the act of woman resulted in the death of the infant, the police has arrested the woman and were awaiting the post mortem report to decide if it was a murder.     According to the police, the infant was a pre-mature baby born in seven-and-a-halfmonths and weighed just 2kg. On Wednesday, the cops were informed by Rajesh (24) that his missing infant daughter was found dead in a well.     "Preliminary investigations suggested that the infant had a kidney ailment since birth. The parents had taken her to various doctors in private nursing homes and had spent more than Rs 20,000 in the past two months since she was born," said a senior police officer at Mansarovar police station.     Police said that Rajesh is a daily labourer who earns Rs 200 to Rs 300 per day. "The circumstances guided us to suspect the infant's mother Seema," said Bala Ram, station house officer, Mansarovar police station. "When she was questioned, she told us that the family had not been able to even feed themselves and the infant properly due to the medical expenses. Frustrated by the situation, the woman threw her into the well late on Tuesday night," Bala Ram added.     Asked if the parents had any idea that they could avail free medical facilities in government hospitals, a senior officer, said, "They told us that they had no idea that medical facilities for infants at govern ment hospitals like J K Lon hospital are free. Whatever are the circumstances, the woman would be treated as per law and a case would be registered against her for murder after the post mortem report."     "We have checked the records of the nursing home which showed that the girl was terminally ill. Ignorance towards medical facilities in government hospitals and extreme pov erty led her to take this step. Despite all that, she has to be booked under section 302(murder) of IPC," said an officer.||JAIPUR
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/surat/Software-engineer-burnt-alive-in-Dumas-hotel/articleshow/48552906.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:40 IST 2015||SURAT: Shockwaves ran through Dumas, a favourite hangout place for Surtis, on Wednesday when a 24-year-old software engineer was allegedly charred to death in a hotel.     The victim, Bhavna Maurya, a resident of Valsad, was murdered by her boyfriend Shiv Kiran Kishore Shasan in the bathroom of their hotel room. Preliminary investigation revealed that Shasan first strangulated Maurya and then doused her with kerosene and torched her in the bathroom.     The staff at Raviraj Hotel noticed smoke emanating from the window of a room. They broke open the door and found Maurya in a half burnt condition. Seeing the hotel staff, Shasan tried to escape but was caught and locked in the adjacent room.     Paramedics of 108 emergency ambulance, who rushed to the hotel, declared her dead.     He had also poured some water on her to show that he had tried to save her.     Shasan told police during preliminary questioning that he suspected Maurya of having an affair with another man. He also admitted to bringing two litres petrol from a petrol pump in a plastic bottle which he used to burn her.     Maurya was employed in Surat and used to come in morning from Valsad while Shasan runs a tuition class in Valsad.     "Maurya and Shasan were in relationship for eight to 10 years. However, their relations were soured after Shasan doubted her loyalty and accused her of seeing another man," said S K Dave, deputy commissioner of police, zone II.     Shasan and Maurya were together in Valsad on Tuesday evening and went to Tithal beach, police sources said. Shasan offered to drop Maurya to Surat on Wednesday morning. They came on his motorcycle and checked into the hotel around 9am.     ||SURAT
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/US-mother-admits-to-killing-three-sons-in-past-13-months/articleshow/48551904.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:40 IST 2015||CHICAGO: A US mother in Ohio admitted killing her three young sons in separate incidents over the past 13 months because her husband paid more attention to the boys than a daughter, police said.     Brittany Pilkington called 911 shortly after 3:00 am Tuesday to report that her three-month-old baby, Noah, wasn't breathing.     Police said they immediately began a "tedious investigation" because it was "the third such incidence at this same residence involving similar circumstances."     Another three-month-old son, Niall, was found dead by father Joseph Pilkington when he came home from work in July last year. The cause of death was not determined.     Then on April 6, the father came home to find their four-year-old son, Gavin, was also dead.     Brittany Pilkington was charged with murder after she confessed "she intentionally killed all three of her sons," police said in a statement.     She reportedly killed them by putting a blanket over their heads and suffocating them because her husband paid more attention to the boys than he did their daughter, who will turn four later this month.     "In her mind, she was protecting her daughter from being not as loved as the boys were by their father," Logan County Prosecutor William Goslee told the Columbus Dispatch.     Noah and his sister Hailey had been removed from the home because the police were investigating Gavin's death. But a judge sent them back earlier this week after a coroner determined that neither Gavin nor Niall had died of suspicious causes, the paper said.     Brittany Pilkington's uncle was appalled that the children were returned to the family.     "Why would you give them back after a little boy just died and when you're in the middle of an investigation?" Joe Skaggs told the Dispatch.     Goslee said child protective services typically try to keep families together, but added, "I've been aware, and concerned about, this family since this first child died."     The Bellefontaine, Ohio police department said the deaths "leave a pit in our stomachs."     "Our condolences go out to the remaining family members and friends who have supported this family through this very difficult thirteen months."     ||CHICAGO
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/sports/more-sports/athletics/South-Africa-unexpectedly-suspends-release-of-Oscar-Pistorius/articleshow/48551199.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:40 IST 2015||JOHANNESBURG: South Africa has put the release of Paralympian Oscar Pistorius on hold, saying a decision to free him on Friday after serving only 10 months in prison for killing his girlfriend had been premature.Justice Minister Michael Masutha said in a surprise statement Wednesday that the June decision to allow Pistorius to serve out the remainder of his five-year sentence under house arrest had "no legal basis" and was suspended pending a parole board review.The 28-year-old athlete was convicted in October of culpable homicide -- a charge equivalent to manslaughter -- over the killing of his girlfriend Reeva Steenkamp on Valentine's Day in 2013, but prosecutors have appealed, seeking a murder conviction instead.Wednesday's announcement comes on the very day Steenkamp, a model and law graduate, would have celebrated her 32nd birthday."It is apparent... that the decision to release him on 21 August 2015 was made prematurely on 5 June 2015, when the offender was not eligible to be considered at all," Masutha said in a statement."The earlier decision of the CSPB (the Correctional Supervision and Parole Board) to place the offender under correctional supervision is suspended until the Parole Review Board has decided on the matter," the statement said.Pistorius will have served a sixth of his five-year sentence by Friday, making him eligible for early release under South African law.But the justice minister said the early release decision should not have been taken before he had actually served out that 10-month period.The minister suggested to local radio 702 that the parole board may have "misinterpreted the law and been in haste in taking a decision prematurely."It was not immediately clear when the review board would meet and justice ministry officials remained tight-lipped on the matter."It will depend on how and when the review board is going to hear the matter," ministry spokesman Mthunzi Mhaga told ENCA news channel, refusing to speculate about the possible date of the athlete's release.Pistorius's family said they were mulling their options."We accept the decision made by the minister of justice, and are considering our options," said Pistorius family spokesman Anneliese Burgess told AFP.But puzzled legal experts speculated that Pistorius's lawyers may go to court as early as Thursday to have the minister's decision set aside."What we have here may be a case of political interference," said Johannesburg-based lawyer Martin Hood.Even if Pistorius launches an urgent court bid, he could remain behind bars for several days to come as the parole review board has 14 to reconsider his case, according to a Pretoria criminal attorney, Llewellyn Curlewis.Steenkamp's parents June and Barry had been outraged by the idea of Pistorius getting out of jail after just 10 months.During his high-profile and often emotional trial, Pistorius did not dispute that he shot Steenkamp four times through a locked toilet door in his upmarket Pretoria home in the early hours of February 14, 2013.But he says he mistook her for an intruder.Prosecutors however insist that he deliberately killed her after an argument, and this week appealed the culpable homicide verdict.If they win their case, which is to be heard in November, Pistorius could face at least 15 years in jail for murder.The athlete -- nicknamed the "Blade Runner" for the prosthetic legs he wears on the track -- won international fame after racing against able-bodied competitors in the 2012 London Olympics.Once a poster boy for sport, Pistorius -- whose legs were amputated below the knee when he was 11 months old -- has lost his lucrative contracts and has no immediate hope of salvaging his athletic career whatever the outcome of the appeal.His trial had exposed his darker side, offering glimpses of a dangerously volatile man with a penchant for guns, beautiful women and fast cars.The initial parole board decision would have meant Pistorius serving the rest of his under house arrest.While there had been speculation he would spend this time at the home of his wealthy uncle Arnold -- a mansion in a posh Pretoria suburb -- there was a possibility the athlete would have asked to stay in a different location, away from the glare of the media.Correctional services head Zach Modise said Pistorius, who is behind bars in Pretoria's Kgosi Mampuru II prison, initially wrestled with his sentence."At the beginning he could not understand that you get locked up in a cell," Modise told South Africa's Sunday Times earlier this month."I think he's getting to understand you have to control your anger and temper," said Modise. "I hope when he gets released on probation he will be able to conduct himself well."On Wednesday, the Steenkamp family visited a beach in their home town of Port Elizabeth and threw roses into the sea at an intimate ceremony to mark Reeva's birthday.||JOHANNESBURG
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/delhi/Delhi-most-dangerous-for-senior-citizens-shows-NCRB-data/articleshow/48550628.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:40 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: In an indication of the vulnerability of elderly people to violent crimes, the latest data from National Crime Records Bureau (NCRB) shows that more than 1,100 senior citizens were murdered while just as many were robbed. The number of such crimes came second only to cheating which claimed over 1,500 elderly victims.     NCRB has for the first time tabulated data on crimes against senior citizens. According to the data for 2014, most number of elderly were killed in UP (174), Tamil Nadu (173) and Maharashtra (170). Among large states Bihar and Odisha, turned out to be safest for senior citizens with elderly murder rates per one lakh of population in these states being recorded at 0.2 each.     As many as 58 rapes were committed on elderly women across the country last year. Of these nine were committed in Maharashtra, six in Kerala and five each in Madhya Pradesh and Rajasthan.     As far as robberies are concerned, most elderly victims turned out to be from Maharashtra (627). Its closest competitor, Tamil Nadu, was almost 500 victims behind with figures of 129. Compared with population in respective states, elderly were most likely to be robbed in Maharashtra with a rate of 5.6 robberies per one lakh of elderly population. Its neighbour Goa took the second spot with a rate of 2.4.     As far as overall crimes against senior citizens is concerned, the data shows Delhi as the most unsafe city. With a rate of 89 crimes per one lakh elderly population, senior citizens in the national capital are almost five times more likely to become victims of a crime than the rest of the country. The national rate for such crimes stands at 18.3.     In this category, Delhi is followed by Madhya Pradesh (60.2) and Andaman and Nicobar Islands (47.2).     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:40 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:40 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/SC-acquits-Romesh-Sharma-in-Budhiraja-murder-case/articleshow/48704930.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:40 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Thursday upheld the Delhi High Court order acquitting former Congress leader Romesh Sharma in the case relating to the killing of fashion designer Kunjum Budhiraja.     A bench of Justices Pinaki Chandra Ghose and R K Agrawal dismissed an appeal filed by the Delhi government challenging HC order.     The Delhi government contended that the HC had erred in acquitting Sharma but it was strongly opposed by his counsel and senior advocate Siddharth Luthra who submitted that his client was in love with Kunjum and there was no evidence to prove his involvement in the case.     Sharma, who was alleged to be a frontman of underworld don Dawood Ibrahim, was convicted by a trial court on February 15, 2008. Kunjum was killed on March 20, 1999 at Sharma's South Delhi-based 'Jai Mata Di' farm house by a group of hired gangsters from Uttar Pradesh.     The trial court had convicted Sharma and five other accused in the case and had awarded life term to all. The HC, however, acquitted Sharma and co-accused Tejendir Verdi but upheld conviction and sentence of other four accused— Sharma's nephew Surinder Mishra, Hemchand, Santram and Ramesh alias Bobby.     While acquitting Sharma, the HC had said "Romesh Sharma and Kunjum were in love, and desired the company of each other. It does not establish that Sharma had got fed up with her". It had turned down Delhi police's contention that Sharma wanted to get rid of Kunjum as she knew about his alleged illegal activities.     "A grieving lover falling over the body of his mate and performing the rituals of a marriage can well be an expression of lasting love, and need not necessarily be a drama," the HC had said.     Sharma was in judicial custody at the time of the Kunjum's murder.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Raid-on-Bengaluru-centre-reveals-horror-tales/articleshow/48704718.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:40 IST 2015||BENGALURU: A State Human Rights Commission raid on a de-addiction centre in Jnanabharati Layout, near Kengeri, southwest Bengaluru, found 90 inmates living in pathetic conditions and subjected to inhuman treatment.     Thursday's raid followed the murder of an inmate of another de-addiction centre in Kothanur recently.     The SHRC raid on Sri Santhosh Social Service Society, also known as 4S Society, followed a tipoff. According to SHRC officials, the centre has been in existence for seven years at least, but the society couldn't produce documents of having obtained permission from the social welfare department. Commission officials said the centre had the permission from the DC and the DHO.     "Most inmates are between 20 and 35 years. They showed us signs of being physically abused. The centre has violated other norms too. Although it's supposed to have one nurse for every 15 patients and at least one in-house doctor and a psychiatrist, it didn't have any," said an SHRC spokesperson.     4 arrested for killing inmate:     Kothanur police arrested a de-addiction centre staffer and three inmates for allegedly beating to death a 28-year-old inmate. Dinesh was admitted to the centre by his family as he was an alcoholic. He was later found dead in a hospital. Family members noticed several bruises on his body. Narayana, an inmate-turned-staffer, gave some medicines to Dinesh, who later turned aggressive. Narayana sought the help of inmates Suresh, Subhan and Simon, to subdue Dinesh.     When Dinesh retaliated, the quartet overpowered him till he became unconscious. He died in hospital.||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/A-jolly-good-fellow-say-Khannas-friends/articleshow/48704630.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:40 IST 2015||Sanjeev Khanna, Indrani Mukerjea's second husband and suspected ally in Sheena Bora's killing, may be the most surprising element in this macabre drama, but his friends and associates in Kolkata refused to cast aspersions on "Sanju" just yet.     From being the biggest dart enthusiast at one of Kolkata's poshest clubs (the CC&FC) to having a finger in every pie, Sanjeev was everyone's "best mate" and go-to guy who friends described as: "A doer... someone who could get things done."     The morning after Khanna's arrest, TOI spoke to Ajay Rawla, the man who Khanna worked for as a consultant and whose house he was picked up from on Wednesday afternoon. "It wasn't like he was hiding like a desperate fugitive in my house. We had a meeting in the morning after which he drove me home and that's when news broke on television. We were sitting, watching, wondering what steps to take when the police arrived," explained Rawla.     Seven years his senior, Khanna's association with Rawla dates back to the time they went to Mayo College in Ajmer. Later, Khanna went on to become an aide for Rawla's pet projects. Besides running his own business in wireless communications, Khanna was there setting up chef Shaun Kenworthy and Rawla's restaurant 1658 or immersed in the heritage project of converting the Bawali Rajbari into a hotel. "He was getting all the construction work and labourers in place. He was very good in helping out with permissions through his connections with excise and contractors," remembers Kenworthy.     Khanna, who seldom missed his outings at the club, motor rallies and horse racing as a prominent face in the social circuit, was not the same man before he met Indrani, recounts Bull Banthia, a close friend. "Well-read and well-versed, Sanju had a great mechanical mind with a solution for everything," is how Bull chose to describe his "jolly good friend who loved meeting new people, hung out at the club but wasn't a social climber". "It was Indrani who emerged as this socialite and drove him to consciously build contacts with those higher up in the social rung after marriage," said the Kolkata-based entrepreneur. "That's the reason why I distanced myself from them until overnight she left Kolkata with their daughter and Sanju's wallet."     While Indrani never surfaces in conversations, his daughter Vidhie, who stayed with Indrani, is a fond subject with his friends. "He would miss his daughter but was resigned to fate, hoping that someday she would find him," said Rawla, adding, "It was Vidhie who called Sanjeev on Wednesday to give him the news."     No one seems to know about any recent interaction between Khanna and Indrani. G M Kapur, a known name in Kolkata who was Intach's state convener and happens to be Khanna's "mama", seemed disturbed with "all the theorizing" of Khanna's role in the crime. He declined to look back on Indrani and Khanna's relationship but added, "The last that there was any contact with Indrani or her family was when Vidhie visited Calcutta last year to celebrate the 75th birthday of her grandmother (Khanna's mother who lives with him)."     Khanna's Facebook posts on "karma" in the weeks and months following Sheena's alleged murder on April 24, 2012, make for interesting reading. On April 30, Khanna shared photo messages: "Say whatever, whenever the f*** you want to"; "Sometimes I get so weird, I even freak myself out".     On May 24, exactly a month after the alleged killing, he wrote: "You can never tell what people are thinking and feeling unless they tell you, and usually they lie. you ask them, 'Whats wrong?' and they say 'Nothing'. You accept this because it's easier than digging for the truth. People smile when they want to cry, they laugh when they want to scream and shout. They pretend like nothing is wrong because they don't want to face the truth. Things aren't always rainbows and butterflies, sometimes you gotta scream and cry your anger and sadness to the world, because you can only hold it in for so long before something in you snaps. so when you want to cry, cry. When you want to scream, scream. Don't hide behind fake smiles, it's ok to not be alright."     ||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Sheena-docu-Michail-add-to-mystery/articleshow/48701752.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:40 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Michail, Sheena's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered have raised a number of unanswered questions.    Two days after his mother, Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Michail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai Police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed that what he gave to police was enough to prove that Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora (who are actually parents of Indrani) as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. Some questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukherjea.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Michail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43 as mentioned in reports after her arrest.    Adding more to the suspense, Michail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Michail studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board examination, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that knew that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard that her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard that she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband who she introduced as Peter Mukherjea."    The two-member Mumbai Police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Michail, who on Wednesday, was the first one to reveal that Sheena was Indrani's daughter, twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Michail's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Michail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukherjae is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Michail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."  ||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Grandparents-are-Sheenas-mom-dad-on-birth-certificate/articleshow/48704559.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:40 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Mikhail, Sheena Bora's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered led to some unanswered questions on Thursday.    Two days after his mother Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Mikhail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed what he gave the police was enough to prove Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora, who are actually Indrani's parents, as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. However, many questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter. In many cases in India involving single mothers, grandparents are known to put in their names as father and mother.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukerjea, that is, 13 years after Sheena was born.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Mikhail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43.    Mikhail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Mikhail     studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board exam, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband, who she introduced as Peter Mukerjea."    The two-member Mumbai police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Mikhail twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Mikhail 's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time, he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Mikhail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukerjea is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Mikhail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Sheena-bowled-us-over-Rahuls-uncle/articleshow/48704552.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:40 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: Had things worked out as desired for Peter Mukherjea's first wife Shabnam and her family in Dehradun, Rahul Mukherjea and Sheena Bora would have been married for over three years now.     Shabnam's brother Shaleen Singh told TOI on Thursday that in 2011 Rahul brought Sheena to their sprawling home in Dehradun to seek approval from the family for their marriage.     The entire family-Shabnam, her younger brother Shaleen, father Anand Singh and mother Seema-were reportedly bowled over by Sheena's jovial nature and affection towards the elderly people. Impressed, the family gave its "unqualified and unanimous approval" for the wedding, which was supposed to take place within a few months, said Shaleen.     Stunned by the recent development, Shaleen said, "Sheena was among those rare persons who left a deep and lifelong impact on people. She was good-looking, a sweet person, clean of heart and good to talk to. None of us objected to the wedding."     Shaleen learnt of Sheena's murder through news channels. "It would have been great if she had become a part of the family. I don't know what was the cause and motive behind the heinous crime, but all those behind the killing of the jovial-natured girl should not be spared at any cost," he said.     A former model and tele-actor, 49-year-old Shaleen today owns the Sanskar International school in Jogiwala here. He recalled the last meeting with Shabnam and Rahul in April this year. "My father Anand Singh passed away in April. They had come to pay their respects but we did not interact much."     However, Shaleen said of late the interaction between him and his sister Shabnam was limited. Although Shabnam's farm Gul-e-Shabnam and Shaleen's residence Shankar Sadan are barely 200 metres away in Badripur, meetings between them were rare. While Shaleen and his mother stay on different floors of Shankar Sadan, Shabnam stays alone at her residence and is frequently visited by Rahul.     "There are matters in each family which we do not want to disclose. We are not against each other but do not interact much. She comes to meet our mother occasionally," said Shaleen, adding that Shabnam was passionate about painting and had a studio in her residence.     Shaleen denied having any details about the presence of Mumbai police in Dehradun. "Neither Doon police nor Mumbai police have contacted me over the issue."     Staff at Shabnam's residence said she was out-of-station but they were not aware of her whereabouts.||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Kilpauk-doctor-murder-Hubby-to-approach-court/articleshow/48704411.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:40 IST 2015||CHENNAI: It's been four days since police claimed to have solved the murder of S Sathya, 24, a PG medical student. However, her husband has put forth questions that police have failed to answer. Though investigating officers confirmed Sathya was not sexually assaulted before she was killed, they leaked to some section of media saying that they changed their stance on Wednesday and said there were indications of attempt to rape on the deceased.     Police personnel revealed the details soon after Sathya's husband Dr P Sesu, also employed at a primary health centre in Perambalur, expressed certain doubts.     He alleged the police hastily solved the case citing the state assembly, which is in motion. Sathya was found dead at her house in Kilpauk on August 20.     On August 23, police arrested Harintham Depnath, a BTech graduate, who lived at the second floor on the same apartment. Neither was there any mention about sexual assault or attempt on Sathya when the body was recovered from the house. The nor did the doctors. Police didn't tell this during the arrest of Depnath on August 23. "What forced the police to reveal about the sexual harassment attempt on my wife now?" asked Sesu.     "I want to live a peaceful life with my two sons - Tamil Nesan, 6, and Karmugilan, 4. The studies and the future of my children is important for me. I do respect the police personnel who spent sleepless nights to solve the murder, but there are questions that need to be answered," he said.     "I live in Perambalur with my children, but we speak through live video calls. I have told my sons that Sathya has gone to the God, as the Almighty likes her more. "Hereafter, we cannot speak or meet her. I don't know how far my children will admit it?" said Sesu. "I will approach the court seeking a fair probe into the murder of my wife. I want to find out the real cause behind her death. I want the real accused to get punished for his deed," said Sesu.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Woman-strangles-husbands-lover/articleshow/48704388.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:40 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A woman beat up and strangled her husband's partner, an assistant professor at a polytechnic in Choolaimedu, in their Thiruverkadu home on Thursday, police said. A court later remanded the accused, 32-year-old Shruti, in judicial custody.     Police said Sambasivam, a professor at Panimalar Engineering College in Poonamallee, used to bring Rajalakshmi, home frequently and introduced her to his wife Shruti as a colleague. He even dropped her home at night. The polytechnic where Rajalakshmi worked was part of the Panimalar group of educational institutions. Shruti initially believed the two were just colleagues until Sambasivam came home with Rajalakshmi on Tuesday and said the woman was moving in with them permanently.     On Wednesday morning, Sambasivam allegedly tied a 'mangalsutra' to Rajalakshmi in front of his wife, police said, based on Shruti's confession. A shocked Shruti picked up a fight with Sambasivam who asked her to maintain a cordial relationship and take care of Rajalakshmi. On Thursday morning, after he left for college a fight broke out between the two women.     Police said Rajalakshmi allegedly abused Sruthi and went into the bathroom. Sruthi followed her in and strangled her with the 'mangalsutra'. She then tried to make it appear that the woman had fainted in the bathroom. She took her in an autorickshaw to a nearby hospital where she was declared 'brought dead'. Doctors who noticed a few marks around her neck informed the Thiruverkadu police who registered a case of suspicious death under CrPC section 176.     The body was sent for postmortem to Kilpauk Medical College and Hospital.     After finding that the two women were at home at the time of the death, police interrogated Sruthi for more than an hour but she continued to maintain that Rajyalakshmi had died of injuries sustained when she fell down in the bathroom.     "She confessed to the murder when we told her that her fingerprints had been lifted from the scene of crime," said an investigating officer. "She said she had smashed the woman's head against the wall and later strangled her with the 'thali'." Police altered the case to murder and arrested Sruthi.     Initial inquiries revealed that Rajalakshmi had been married to a man named Rajasekhar for a while and they had separated. She then got married to Suresh, a relative who worked in a private firm, a few years ago and the couple moved into a house in Mogappair.     They allegedly had frequent quarrels as he tortured her and she left him too, police found.     Rajalakshmi then got a job with Panimalar Engineering College where she met Sambasivam. The two became friends and began seeing each other. Rajalakshmi recently moved to the polytechnic in Choolaimedu, police said.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/US-journalists-killer-annoyed-colleagues-Ex-boss/articleshow/48704167.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:40 IST 2015||ROANOKE, United States: The disgruntled former US television station employee who murdered two journalists had "annoyed" colleagues but showed no signs at work of any mental health issues, his former boss said Thursday.     Vester Lee Flanagan, 41, worked as a reporter for WDBJ in Roanoke, Virginia from March 2012 to February 2013, but was dismissed for poor performance and angry behavior, general manager Jeffrey Marks said.     On Wednesday, Flanagan shot and killed two of the CBS affiliate's journalists while they were conducting an on-air interview. He later fatally shot himself.     "We are still at a loss to figure out what happened to him in those two and a half years" since he was fired, Marks told a news conference flanked by dozens of staff, many of them holding hands.     "I don't think we identified that he had mental health issues. We certainly identified that he had performance issues."     Marks defended the station's hiring record and said its parent company had "a very elaborate program to screen employees."     Flanagan passed background checks and came with only positive references, Marks said.     It was only after he was hired, Marks said, that things went downhill.     "Vester's behavior annoyed a lot of people in the news station," Marks said.     Flanagan, who went by the on-screen name Bryce Williams, alleged in a manifesto faxed to ABC News that he was discriminated against as a gay, black journalist.     Marks said accusations in 2013 that he was treated unfairly were "immediately investigated and found to be without merit."     During his employment, Flanagan complied with demands that he seek medical help, but he was ultimately dismissed.     He was escorted from the building by police and made an ominous aside to the news director -- handing him a wooden cross and saying "'you'll need this'," Marks said.     As he left, he also made a "derogatory comment" to Adam Ward, the cameraman he shot dead on Wednesday.     Flanagan filed a complaint with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and a civil action suit, which were dismissed, he said.     "All of these investigations determined that no reasonable person would have taken any of the cited incidents as discrimination or harassment."     After killing Ward and reporter Alison Parker live on the air, Flanagan posted a video of the attack on social media.||ROANOKE, UNITED STATES
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:40 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/SC-acquits-Romesh-Sharma-in-Budhiraja-murder-case/articleshow/48704930.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:40 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Thursday upheld the Delhi High Court order acquitting former Congress leader Romesh Sharma in the case relating to the killing of fashion designer Kunjum Budhiraja.     A bench of Justices Pinaki Chandra Ghose and R K Agrawal dismissed an appeal filed by the Delhi government challenging HC order.     The Delhi government contended that the HC had erred in acquitting Sharma but it was strongly opposed by his counsel and senior advocate Siddharth Luthra who submitted that his client was in love with Kunjum and there was no evidence to prove his involvement in the case.     Sharma, who was alleged to be a frontman of underworld don Dawood Ibrahim, was convicted by a trial court on February 15, 2008. Kunjum was killed on March 20, 1999 at Sharma's South Delhi-based 'Jai Mata Di' farm house by a group of hired gangsters from Uttar Pradesh.     The trial court had convicted Sharma and five other accused in the case and had awarded life term to all. The HC, however, acquitted Sharma and co-accused Tejendir Verdi but upheld conviction and sentence of other four accused— Sharma's nephew Surinder Mishra, Hemchand, Santram and Ramesh alias Bobby.     While acquitting Sharma, the HC had said "Romesh Sharma and Kunjum were in love, and desired the company of each other. It does not establish that Sharma had got fed up with her". It had turned down Delhi police's contention that Sharma wanted to get rid of Kunjum as she knew about his alleged illegal activities.     "A grieving lover falling over the body of his mate and performing the rituals of a marriage can well be an expression of lasting love, and need not necessarily be a drama," the HC had said.     Sharma was in judicial custody at the time of the Kunjum's murder.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Raid-on-Bengaluru-centre-reveals-horror-tales/articleshow/48704718.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:40 IST 2015||BENGALURU: A State Human Rights Commission raid on a de-addiction centre in Jnanabharati Layout, near Kengeri, southwest Bengaluru, found 90 inmates living in pathetic conditions and subjected to inhuman treatment.     Thursday's raid followed the murder of an inmate of another de-addiction centre in Kothanur recently.     The SHRC raid on Sri Santhosh Social Service Society, also known as 4S Society, followed a tipoff. According to SHRC officials, the centre has been in existence for seven years at least, but the society couldn't produce documents of having obtained permission from the social welfare department. Commission officials said the centre had the permission from the DC and the DHO.     "Most inmates are between 20 and 35 years. They showed us signs of being physically abused. The centre has violated other norms too. Although it's supposed to have one nurse for every 15 patients and at least one in-house doctor and a psychiatrist, it didn't have any," said an SHRC spokesperson.     4 arrested for killing inmate:     Kothanur police arrested a de-addiction centre staffer and three inmates for allegedly beating to death a 28-year-old inmate. Dinesh was admitted to the centre by his family as he was an alcoholic. He was later found dead in a hospital. Family members noticed several bruises on his body. Narayana, an inmate-turned-staffer, gave some medicines to Dinesh, who later turned aggressive. Narayana sought the help of inmates Suresh, Subhan and Simon, to subdue Dinesh.     When Dinesh retaliated, the quartet overpowered him till he became unconscious. He died in hospital.||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/A-jolly-good-fellow-say-Khannas-friends/articleshow/48704630.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:40 IST 2015||Sanjeev Khanna, Indrani Mukerjea's second husband and suspected ally in Sheena Bora's killing, may be the most surprising element in this macabre drama, but his friends and associates in Kolkata refused to cast aspersions on "Sanju" just yet.     From being the biggest dart enthusiast at one of Kolkata's poshest clubs (the CC&FC) to having a finger in every pie, Sanjeev was everyone's "best mate" and go-to guy who friends described as: "A doer... someone who could get things done."     The morning after Khanna's arrest, TOI spoke to Ajay Rawla, the man who Khanna worked for as a consultant and whose house he was picked up from on Wednesday afternoon. "It wasn't like he was hiding like a desperate fugitive in my house. We had a meeting in the morning after which he drove me home and that's when news broke on television. We were sitting, watching, wondering what steps to take when the police arrived," explained Rawla.     Seven years his senior, Khanna's association with Rawla dates back to the time they went to Mayo College in Ajmer. Later, Khanna went on to become an aide for Rawla's pet projects. Besides running his own business in wireless communications, Khanna was there setting up chef Shaun Kenworthy and Rawla's restaurant 1658 or immersed in the heritage project of converting the Bawali Rajbari into a hotel. "He was getting all the construction work and labourers in place. He was very good in helping out with permissions through his connections with excise and contractors," remembers Kenworthy.     Khanna, who seldom missed his outings at the club, motor rallies and horse racing as a prominent face in the social circuit, was not the same man before he met Indrani, recounts Bull Banthia, a close friend. "Well-read and well-versed, Sanju had a great mechanical mind with a solution for everything," is how Bull chose to describe his "jolly good friend who loved meeting new people, hung out at the club but wasn't a social climber". "It was Indrani who emerged as this socialite and drove him to consciously build contacts with those higher up in the social rung after marriage," said the Kolkata-based entrepreneur. "That's the reason why I distanced myself from them until overnight she left Kolkata with their daughter and Sanju's wallet."     While Indrani never surfaces in conversations, his daughter Vidhie, who stayed with Indrani, is a fond subject with his friends. "He would miss his daughter but was resigned to fate, hoping that someday she would find him," said Rawla, adding, "It was Vidhie who called Sanjeev on Wednesday to give him the news."     No one seems to know about any recent interaction between Khanna and Indrani. G M Kapur, a known name in Kolkata who was Intach's state convener and happens to be Khanna's "mama", seemed disturbed with "all the theorizing" of Khanna's role in the crime. He declined to look back on Indrani and Khanna's relationship but added, "The last that there was any contact with Indrani or her family was when Vidhie visited Calcutta last year to celebrate the 75th birthday of her grandmother (Khanna's mother who lives with him)."     Khanna's Facebook posts on "karma" in the weeks and months following Sheena's alleged murder on April 24, 2012, make for interesting reading. On April 30, Khanna shared photo messages: "Say whatever, whenever the f*** you want to"; "Sometimes I get so weird, I even freak myself out".     On May 24, exactly a month after the alleged killing, he wrote: "You can never tell what people are thinking and feeling unless they tell you, and usually they lie. you ask them, 'Whats wrong?' and they say 'Nothing'. You accept this because it's easier than digging for the truth. People smile when they want to cry, they laugh when they want to scream and shout. They pretend like nothing is wrong because they don't want to face the truth. Things aren't always rainbows and butterflies, sometimes you gotta scream and cry your anger and sadness to the world, because you can only hold it in for so long before something in you snaps. so when you want to cry, cry. When you want to scream, scream. Don't hide behind fake smiles, it's ok to not be alright."     ||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Sheena-docu-Michail-add-to-mystery/articleshow/48701752.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:40 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Michail, Sheena's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered have raised a number of unanswered questions.    Two days after his mother, Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Michail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai Police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed that what he gave to police was enough to prove that Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora (who are actually parents of Indrani) as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. Some questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukherjea.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Michail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43 as mentioned in reports after her arrest.    Adding more to the suspense, Michail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Michail studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board examination, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that knew that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard that her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard that she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband who she introduced as Peter Mukherjea."    The two-member Mumbai Police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Michail, who on Wednesday, was the first one to reveal that Sheena was Indrani's daughter, twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Michail's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Michail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukherjae is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Michail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."  ||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Grandparents-are-Sheenas-mom-dad-on-birth-certificate/articleshow/48704559.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:40 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Mikhail, Sheena Bora's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered led to some unanswered questions on Thursday.    Two days after his mother Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Mikhail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed what he gave the police was enough to prove Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora, who are actually Indrani's parents, as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. However, many questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter. In many cases in India involving single mothers, grandparents are known to put in their names as father and mother.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukerjea, that is, 13 years after Sheena was born.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Mikhail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43.    Mikhail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Mikhail     studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board exam, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband, who she introduced as Peter Mukerjea."    The two-member Mumbai police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Mikhail twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Mikhail 's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time, he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Mikhail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukerjea is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Mikhail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Sheena-bowled-us-over-Rahuls-uncle/articleshow/48704552.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:40 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: Had things worked out as desired for Peter Mukherjea's first wife Shabnam and her family in Dehradun, Rahul Mukherjea and Sheena Bora would have been married for over three years now.     Shabnam's brother Shaleen Singh told TOI on Thursday that in 2011 Rahul brought Sheena to their sprawling home in Dehradun to seek approval from the family for their marriage.     The entire family-Shabnam, her younger brother Shaleen, father Anand Singh and mother Seema-were reportedly bowled over by Sheena's jovial nature and affection towards the elderly people. Impressed, the family gave its "unqualified and unanimous approval" for the wedding, which was supposed to take place within a few months, said Shaleen.     Stunned by the recent development, Shaleen said, "Sheena was among those rare persons who left a deep and lifelong impact on people. She was good-looking, a sweet person, clean of heart and good to talk to. None of us objected to the wedding."     Shaleen learnt of Sheena's murder through news channels. "It would have been great if she had become a part of the family. I don't know what was the cause and motive behind the heinous crime, but all those behind the killing of the jovial-natured girl should not be spared at any cost," he said.     A former model and tele-actor, 49-year-old Shaleen today owns the Sanskar International school in Jogiwala here. He recalled the last meeting with Shabnam and Rahul in April this year. "My father Anand Singh passed away in April. They had come to pay their respects but we did not interact much."     However, Shaleen said of late the interaction between him and his sister Shabnam was limited. Although Shabnam's farm Gul-e-Shabnam and Shaleen's residence Shankar Sadan are barely 200 metres away in Badripur, meetings between them were rare. While Shaleen and his mother stay on different floors of Shankar Sadan, Shabnam stays alone at her residence and is frequently visited by Rahul.     "There are matters in each family which we do not want to disclose. We are not against each other but do not interact much. She comes to meet our mother occasionally," said Shaleen, adding that Shabnam was passionate about painting and had a studio in her residence.     Shaleen denied having any details about the presence of Mumbai police in Dehradun. "Neither Doon police nor Mumbai police have contacted me over the issue."     Staff at Shabnam's residence said she was out-of-station but they were not aware of her whereabouts.||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Kilpauk-doctor-murder-Hubby-to-approach-court/articleshow/48704411.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:40 IST 2015||CHENNAI: It's been four days since police claimed to have solved the murder of S Sathya, 24, a PG medical student. However, her husband has put forth questions that police have failed to answer. Though investigating officers confirmed Sathya was not sexually assaulted before she was killed, they leaked to some section of media saying that they changed their stance on Wednesday and said there were indications of attempt to rape on the deceased.     Police personnel revealed the details soon after Sathya's husband Dr P Sesu, also employed at a primary health centre in Perambalur, expressed certain doubts.     He alleged the police hastily solved the case citing the state assembly, which is in motion. Sathya was found dead at her house in Kilpauk on August 20.     On August 23, police arrested Harintham Depnath, a BTech graduate, who lived at the second floor on the same apartment. Neither was there any mention about sexual assault or attempt on Sathya when the body was recovered from the house. The nor did the doctors. Police didn't tell this during the arrest of Depnath on August 23. "What forced the police to reveal about the sexual harassment attempt on my wife now?" asked Sesu.     "I want to live a peaceful life with my two sons - Tamil Nesan, 6, and Karmugilan, 4. The studies and the future of my children is important for me. I do respect the police personnel who spent sleepless nights to solve the murder, but there are questions that need to be answered," he said.     "I live in Perambalur with my children, but we speak through live video calls. I have told my sons that Sathya has gone to the God, as the Almighty likes her more. "Hereafter, we cannot speak or meet her. I don't know how far my children will admit it?" said Sesu. "I will approach the court seeking a fair probe into the murder of my wife. I want to find out the real cause behind her death. I want the real accused to get punished for his deed," said Sesu.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Woman-strangles-husbands-lover/articleshow/48704388.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:40 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A woman beat up and strangled her husband's partner, an assistant professor at a polytechnic in Choolaimedu, in their Thiruverkadu home on Thursday, police said. A court later remanded the accused, 32-year-old Shruti, in judicial custody.     Police said Sambasivam, a professor at Panimalar Engineering College in Poonamallee, used to bring Rajalakshmi, home frequently and introduced her to his wife Shruti as a colleague. He even dropped her home at night. The polytechnic where Rajalakshmi worked was part of the Panimalar group of educational institutions. Shruti initially believed the two were just colleagues until Sambasivam came home with Rajalakshmi on Tuesday and said the woman was moving in with them permanently.     On Wednesday morning, Sambasivam allegedly tied a 'mangalsutra' to Rajalakshmi in front of his wife, police said, based on Shruti's confession. A shocked Shruti picked up a fight with Sambasivam who asked her to maintain a cordial relationship and take care of Rajalakshmi. On Thursday morning, after he left for college a fight broke out between the two women.     Police said Rajalakshmi allegedly abused Sruthi and went into the bathroom. Sruthi followed her in and strangled her with the 'mangalsutra'. She then tried to make it appear that the woman had fainted in the bathroom. She took her in an autorickshaw to a nearby hospital where she was declared 'brought dead'. Doctors who noticed a few marks around her neck informed the Thiruverkadu police who registered a case of suspicious death under CrPC section 176.     The body was sent for postmortem to Kilpauk Medical College and Hospital.     After finding that the two women were at home at the time of the death, police interrogated Sruthi for more than an hour but she continued to maintain that Rajyalakshmi had died of injuries sustained when she fell down in the bathroom.     "She confessed to the murder when we told her that her fingerprints had been lifted from the scene of crime," said an investigating officer. "She said she had smashed the woman's head against the wall and later strangled her with the 'thali'." Police altered the case to murder and arrested Sruthi.     Initial inquiries revealed that Rajalakshmi had been married to a man named Rajasekhar for a while and they had separated. She then got married to Suresh, a relative who worked in a private firm, a few years ago and the couple moved into a house in Mogappair.     They allegedly had frequent quarrels as he tortured her and she left him too, police found.     Rajalakshmi then got a job with Panimalar Engineering College where she met Sambasivam. The two became friends and began seeing each other. Rajalakshmi recently moved to the polytechnic in Choolaimedu, police said.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/US-journalists-killer-annoyed-colleagues-Ex-boss/articleshow/48704167.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:40 IST 2015||ROANOKE, United States: The disgruntled former US television station employee who murdered two journalists had "annoyed" colleagues but showed no signs at work of any mental health issues, his former boss said Thursday.     Vester Lee Flanagan, 41, worked as a reporter for WDBJ in Roanoke, Virginia from March 2012 to February 2013, but was dismissed for poor performance and angry behavior, general manager Jeffrey Marks said.     On Wednesday, Flanagan shot and killed two of the CBS affiliate's journalists while they were conducting an on-air interview. He later fatally shot himself.     "We are still at a loss to figure out what happened to him in those two and a half years" since he was fired, Marks told a news conference flanked by dozens of staff, many of them holding hands.     "I don't think we identified that he had mental health issues. We certainly identified that he had performance issues."     Marks defended the station's hiring record and said its parent company had "a very elaborate program to screen employees."     Flanagan passed background checks and came with only positive references, Marks said.     It was only after he was hired, Marks said, that things went downhill.     "Vester's behavior annoyed a lot of people in the news station," Marks said.     Flanagan, who went by the on-screen name Bryce Williams, alleged in a manifesto faxed to ABC News that he was discriminated against as a gay, black journalist.     Marks said accusations in 2013 that he was treated unfairly were "immediately investigated and found to be without merit."     During his employment, Flanagan complied with demands that he seek medical help, but he was ultimately dismissed.     He was escorted from the building by police and made an ominous aside to the news director -- handing him a wooden cross and saying "'you'll need this'," Marks said.     As he left, he also made a "derogatory comment" to Adam Ward, the cameraman he shot dead on Wednesday.     Flanagan filed a complaint with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and a civil action suit, which were dismissed, he said.     "All of these investigations determined that no reasonable person would have taken any of the cited incidents as discrimination or harassment."     After killing Ward and reporter Alison Parker live on the air, Flanagan posted a video of the attack on social media.||ROANOKE, UNITED STATES
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/State-tops-in-vandalism-cases/articleshow/48550596.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:45 IST 2015||When it comes to damaging public property , Tamil Nadu has seen more than its fair share of mind less action. The state holds the dubious record of having the highest number of vandalism cases. According to the latest NCRB data, which was released on Tuesday , the police in 2014 registered 1,607 cases under the Prevention of Damage to Public Property Act in Tamil Nadu. Police say most of these incidents happen during protest by political parties and other groups, and government buses are often the target.     The infamous Dharmapuri case that took place on February 2, 2002, is a pertinent example of how this destructive behaviour could lead to tragic results. Three students from Tamil Nadu Agriculture University were burned to death onboard a bus when a petrol bomb was hurled at it by AIADMK cadres protesting against the conviction of J Jayalalithaa in the `Kodaikanal Pleasant Stay Hotel case'. Some 70 students were on the bus when the tragic incident took place. This was perhaps one of the most gruesome incidents in public memory in which lives were lost when protests turned violent.     "Most of these are stone-pelting cases that take place during protests But, we also invoke this Act for murder if the accused tried to break in a house or for other acts of vandalism on streets," said a police officer.     In Tamil Nadu, when it comes to dissent against the government, buses are the usual targets. Whether they are caste clashes, arrests of politicians or rivalry with neighbouring states, they bear the brunt of public ire: They are pelted with stones, their windshields broken and tyres punctured.     And in this state where vandalism is the standard path that protesters take, Dharmapuri has a historic place. It has been the epicentre of such incidents. In July 2014, on the first death anniversary of E Elavarasan (a dalit who committed suicide after his marriage to an upper caste woman caused ripples), three buses were damaged. Section 144 of CrPC had to be imposed. "Things have remained peaceful in the recent past," said J Loganathan superintendent of police for Dharmapuri.     Private bus owners are also at the receiving end of such disruptions in law and order. "Unless the government comes forward and strictly punishes the accused, nothing will change. The police should investigate these matters without being influenced by politicians," said A Afzal, president of Tamil Nadu Omni Bus Owners' Association.     ||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Rail-travel-has-got-even-more-unsafe/articleshow/48550583.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:45 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: Even as railways tries to get control over maintenance of law and order in trains and station premises from state government, the latest government data could bolster its case as it shows security for travelers getting worse over the years.Crime in railways has now touched a new high as 392 cases of murder, 122 of rape, 440 of kidnapping and abduction, 1,128 of robbery, 80 of dacoity and 22,477 cases of theft has been reported across India in 2014, according to a National Crime Record Bureau (NCRB) report.In 2013, 270 cases of murder, 54 of rape, 1,096 of robbery and 48 of dacoity were reported. The number of thefts and robberies of passengers' belongings has reached 23,605 in 2014 as against 19,133 in 2013 in trains and railway premises.In 2014, maximum cases of murder (120) in trains or railway premises were reported from West Bengal, followed by Bihar (60) and Uttar Pradesh (30). West Bengal tops the chart when it comes to cases of rape in rail premises (85), followed by Madhya Pradesh (11) and Maharashtra (6).Interestingly, maximum cases of robbery were reported in Maharashtra (709), followed by Karnataka (96) and Delhi (62). Many in railways were surprised with only 27 case of robbery being reported from UP and 22 from Bihar. Maharashtra also reported maximum number of theft cases (4,321), followed by UP (4,061) and Madhya Pradesh (3,013). Bihar reported only 1,496 such cases.The new dispensation in railways led by minister Suresh Prabhu is pushing for installing integrated security system aimed at improving security on railway premises, ensuring safety of the people and averting terror attacks. With law and order being a state subject, the security of passengers is dealt by state-controlled General Reserve Police (GRP) half of whose pay bill is paid by the transporter, but the blame of any untoward incident lands squarely on the railways.Not satisfied with GRP's functioning, railways has been pushing for more powers to its own Railway Protection Force (RPF) for seamless policing at rail premises. Prabhu has said that the existing system of managing security by the GRP was causing glitches in seamless policing."The GRP is under various state govts, causing glitch in seamless policing, resulting in several complaints. Pursuing with states for change (sic)," he had tweeted.The RPF is meant for protecting railway properties, passenger areas and passengers though it has limited police powers which are mainly vested with the GRP for which railways bears half the cost. However, the dual responsibility system involving the GRP and the RPF has created many glitches for railways in providing seamless security to passengers.There are several cases of passengers not being able to lodge complaints of theft or other crime incidents because of state boundary issues. The minister has written letters to all chief ministers seeking their consent for amending the RPF Act, 1957 to empower the RPF and reduce the role of the GRP.||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/156-killed-in-2014-for-witchcraft-most-honour-killings-reported-from-MP/articleshow/48550575.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:45 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: As many as 156 women were killed across India for allegedly practicing witchcraft, while 28 people became victims of honour killing in 2014. The year also saw 68 political murders, and 44 died in caste conflict. Curiously, only 12 people were murdered for communal reasons in the year. Love affairs led to over 1,300 murders.    These are part of the annual crime report published by National Crime Records Bureau (NCRB) which for the first time has recorded motives behind murders under various new categories.    According to the data, personal vendetta is the biggest reason for committing murder resulting in over 2900 killings in 2014. It is followed by property dispute as being the reason for over 2,700 killings. Love affairs are the third biggest killers followed by dowry and illicit relationships.    The data show that states with significant tribal population or general backwardness have more killings of women accused of witchcraft. Most number of women killed with this motive were in Jharkhand (47), Odisha (32), Madhya Pradesh (24) and Chhattisgarh (16). Along with Gujarat (10), these states account for close to 90% of all such murders.    The most curious data is with regard to honour killings. Contrary to popular perception, most honour killings in 2014 were reported from Madhya Pradesh (7), followed by Punjab (5) and Maharashtra (5). The usual suspects, Haryana and UP have recorded just one case each. Jammu Kashmir has reported three such cases while Gujarat and Puducherry each have witnessed two such killings.    Most murders for love affairs were reported from UP (300) followed by Tamil Nadu (239). Odisha reported the maximum dowry deaths at 413 followed by West Bengal (290).    The data also show that as many 201 women were killed after rape. UP reported most number of such cases (54) followed by Maharashtra (21) and Jharkhand (19).    Most political murders were reported from Andhra Pradesh (11) followed by West Bengal (10).||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/rest-of-world/El-Salvador-125-killings-in-3-days-as-gang-violence-soars/articleshow/48550497.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:45 IST 2015||SAN SALVADOR, El Salvador: At least 125 people have been killed in El Salvador in the last three days, authorities said Wednesday as a wave of violence continues to plague the Central American nation.    National Police deputy director Howard Cotto reported that 40 people were slain on Sunday, 42 on Monday and 43 on Tuesday.    An anti-crime crackdown has led gangs to ramp up violence and many of the killings are related to internal purges or turf wars between rivals, Justice and Public Security Minister Benito Lara said.    Cotto said most of the victims are believed to be " gang members who in some way have betrayed the gangs and are murdered by those same groups."    Authorities say gangs are trying to pressure the government into negotiating a truce like a previous one in 2012, during which homicide rates fell notably. The truce has since fallen apart.    The government has said it will not negotiate with criminals or give in to gang demands that their leaders be transferred out of a maximum-security prison.    Lara said the country of 6 million people is confronting " a very complicated situation."||SAN SALVADOR, EL SALVADOR
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chandigarh/Mistaken-for-goon-brothers-chased-shot-at-by-Punjab-cops/articleshow/48550432.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:45 IST 2015||SANGRUR: In a second case of "mistaken identity" in two months, six Punjab cops, allegedly in an inebriated condition, chased a Ford Figo car and indiscriminately fired at two photographer brothers, seriously injuring both, near Dhuri town in Sangrur district on Tuesday night.     According to officials, the cops mistook the duo for gangsters. An Akali leader was shot dead in Amritsar on June 17 after cops suspected him of being a notorious goon.     A case has been registered under Section 307 (attempt to murder) of the IPC against six "unidentified" cops, who are deputed in CIA wing of Sangrur police.     Satinder Kumar alias Honey, who is undergoing treatment at Dayanand Medical College and Hospital (DMCH), Ludhiana, along with his brother Sunil alias Happy, told TOI on phone that the incident occurred between Farwahi and Katron villages near Dhuri. The brothers, who run a studio in Sherpur town, were returning from Malerkotla after attending a function when the incident occurred.     "We had reached Farwahi around 10pm when a Martui Swift approached us and someone from that car fired at us, breaking the windowpane in front of me. I was hit in the arm and thought we had been attacked by robbers. I immediately stepped on the gas," he said.     "The Swift chased us for around three kilometres and they repeatedly fired at our car. I lost control of the car near Katron village and it veered off the road before coming to a halt right in front of the Swift. Even after our vehicle halted, the firing continued and we saved ourselves by crouching behind the seats. When we tried to get down, they fired at my brother's shoulder and started beating us with rifle butts," he added. Once they got out of the car, the duo realized that the attackers were not robbers but cops.     Satinder claimed a few villagers, who were attending a religious function nearby, reached the spot after hearing the gunfire and helped them.     An FIR registered on a complaint by Prem Chand, a resident of Katron, states that he saw six persons, of whom four were in police uniform, near the village and all of them were in an inebriated condition. "They were not even able to walk and they fled in a vehicle when the villagers started gathering there," the complaint said.     Sangrur SSP Pritpal Singh did not respond to repeated calls. SP (D) Paramjit Singh Goraya, who is investigating the case, said, "Police had information that a wanted gangster, Ghudu, and his aides were moving around in the area. When he was spotted, he fired at a police party near Faridpur Kalan village and injured a head constable before fleeing. Like the injured brothers, he was also travelling in a white Figo car. The police party mistakenly chased the brothers' car as it was also of the same make and colour. Cops mistook the two as gangsters and fired at them. Two separate FIRs have been registered." The SP refused to identify the cops involved in the incident. He said medical examination of the six cops was conducted.     On June 17, Mukhjeet Singh Mukha, a Youth Akali Dal leader in-charge of ward number 16 of Amritsar Municipal Corporation, was shot in his car by an Amritsar police team in civil clothes. Senior police officials had later claimed that Mukha was killed in retaliatory firing by police, who suspected him to be notorious gangster Jagdeep Singh Jaggu.     Following a terror alert from the Centre last week, security had been beefed up across Punjab. On July 27, three terrorists had stormed a police station at Dinanagar in Gurdaspur district, killing seven people.     ||SANGRUR
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/CBI-to-grill-doctors-who-gave-contradictory-reports-after-Damor-autopsy/articleshow/48550361.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:45 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Central Bureau of Investigation will soon examine senior doctors who conducted the post-mortem of Namrata Damor, an alleged beneficiary of MBBS admission, in the Vyapam scam. The doctors, sources say, are under the scanner as they gave contradictory investigation reports. Meanwhile, the agency has also registered seven more FIRs in Vyapam on Wednesday.     CBI sources said the agency will soon call Dr B B Purohit, who did the first post- mortem on Damor, whose body was found on the railway tracks at Bherupura crossing in Ujjain, suggesting her death was a result of "violent asphyxia as a result of smothering" suggesting murder.     The agency is now focusing on the contradictory report given by D S Barkhur, director of medico-legal institute, Bhopal, who had rubbished the post-mortem report finalized by a three-doctor panel led by Purohit, a post-graduate in forensic medicine, the sources said.     Barkhur suggested that Damor might have committed suicide and was alive before she jumped on the tracks to end her life. Barkhur's findings were based on the visit to the crime scene and snaps taken by him besides calculation of speed of train and place where the body was first found.     Barkhur's findings were relied on by the police investigation team which closed the case saying it was a suicide.     Now CBI has decided to call both the experts to know the reasons behind their contradictory reports besides verifying the findings again with the help of CFSL experts, the sources said. They said statements and reports given by both set of experts will be verified as there are a lot of loopholes in the theories built around their reports.     Sources said the agency will also examine the police team which chose to overrule the post-mortem report suggestive of homicide.     Meanwhile, the agency registered 10 more FIRs in connection with the Vyapam scam.     The first case is against five persons relating to allegations of cheating by impersonation in Constable Recruitment Examination, 2013, while the second case is against three persons relating to allegations of cheating by impersonation in the examination, third against 20 persons relating to allegations of cheating by impersonation/forgery in the exam, CBI spokesperson said.     The fourth case is against 17 persons relating to allegations of cheating by impersonation in PMT, 2010, fifth against 60 persons relating to allegations of cheating by impersonation in PMT 2008/2009/2011, the spokesperson said.     She said the sixth case is against 10 accused persons relating to allegations of cheating by impersonation/forgery in Vanrakshak Recruitment Examination 2013 and seventh against three persons in the same examination.     The probe of irregularities in the Madhya Pradesh Professional Examination Board was handed over to CBI by the Supreme Court which has sought a report from the agency on August 24.     Allegations of rampant corruption surfaced in the professional examinations conducted by Vyapam after RTI queries showed alleged involvement of top functionaries of state government offices.     Former state education minister Laxmikant Sharma and several top bureaucrats are currently in jail in connection with the scam.||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/kolkata/Bengal-stands-tall-on-unsafe-list/articleshow/48550348.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:45 IST 2015||KOLKATA: It was in 2004 that Bengal had perched itself on the top half of the list of crimes against women. Ten years have passed in between but the state has failed to shed its 'unsafe' tag.     The latest National Crime Records Bureau (NCRB) data shows Bengal is still among the worst five performers as far as molestation, domestic violence, kidnapping of girls and human trafficking are concerned. Rape cases have declined, but the state still poses a threat to women, and is safer only than Uttar Pradesh.     Police brass claimed awareness has increased and they are focused on their 'commitment' towards women safety, but women organizations have a different story to tell. They attribute the rise in attack to political ineptitude and the general sense of lawlessness.     The findings show Kolkata has emerged a better performer — doing well as far as violent crimes are concerned — but there are still certain specific crimes, like voyeurism and stalking, where the city continues to register cases on a par with Delhi.     In total, Bengal registered 38,467 cases of crime against women in 2014. This is the second highest in the country. UP has bagged the top slot with 38,467 cases. Madhya Pradesh came a distant third with 28,678 cases. In 2013, when Bengal stood third, it had reported 29, 826 cases.     While Bengal has reported 1466 rape cases in 2014 (down from 1685 in 2013), there are still grey areas that remain bother the state. For example, the number of cases of cruelty by husband or relatives stood at 23, 278, the highest in the country. Also, the state has the highest importation of girls from foreign countries.     The NCRB data claims that out of 1466 rapes in Bengal, the victims knew the rapists in just 602 cases, or just 41%. Compare this with other states — in Tamil Nadu it was 99.9%. " This suggests that a lot of outsiders were involved in such attacks. Obviously, many of them were directed for political vendetta," claimed a lawyer.     When it comes to kidnapping and abduction of women, Bengal has reported 5062 cases, the third highest in the country (up from 3830 cases in 2013). There have been 687 attempts to disrobe women.     Police, however, claimed the figures were misleading. " We have neither under-reported incidents nor denied registering any case. Two, out of the 38,000 plus cases, 23,000 and more are of 498A cases that are always high in the state due to high awareness of it. Three, we always slap the stringent sections in cases even when a straightforward molestation case cannot be made out," claimed an officer.     But then, the NCRB data is used by NGOs to point out flaws in the claims. According to them, the total number of IPC cases registered through written complaints in Kolkata is 2,13,024. Add another 10,566 suo motu cases registered by cops. However, states like Maharashtra and UP have registered over 6 lakh cases. The total number of IPC cases in Bengal (1,85,672) is less than that of Maharashtra and Madhya Pradesh.     " In addition, look at other grievous crimes in Bengal. It has highest cases of attempt to murder (7248), attempt to rape (1656) and immoral trafficking (205) cases. The state is second highest as far as culpable homicide not amounting to murder is concerned and third highest in abduction. So crime against women is not operating in vacuum. It is a reflection of what is taking place on the ground," said Rishi Kant, a trafficking activist.     Amidst all the bad news, Kolkata finds solace in the fact that the city contributes just 4.2% to all crimes committed in cities in India. For Delhi, the percentage stands at 22.2.     The NCRB data has handed ammunition to the Left Front and the BJP. " Delayed legal actions and frequent character assassinations of a victim by investigators and politicians have emboldened the trend," concluded a senior MHA officer.||KOLKATA
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/After-shirtless-stunt-murder-attempt-case-against-Adhir/articleshow/48550194.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:45 IST 2015||BERHAMPORE: The Mamata Banerjee government has slapped an attempt to murder charge on West Bengal Pradesh Congress president and MP Adhir Chowdhury for what he did at Behrampore in support of the Congress bandh call on Tuesday.The district administration wasted no time in booking Chowdhury in as many as 10 penal charges, a day after the chief minister drew a difference between Chowdhury's taking off his shirt in defiance and Sourav Ganguly's doing it at Lords.The FIR against Chowdhury, Murshidabad zilla sabhadipati Shiladitya Haldar, MLA Firoza Begum and others have been forwarded to a Berhampore court, nothing stops the police to round up these leaders given the gravity of the charges. A plea for anticipatory bail is likely to be filed on Thursday.The trigger for Sub-Inspector Subrata Indra filing an FIR (no 452) under no less than 10 penal charges was the bandh-day jostling in Berhampore District Land and Land Reforms' Office (DLLRO) at 8:45 am. Bandh enforcers (read Congress supporters) had been picketing near the office trying to stop ADM Arvind Kumar Meena from stepping in his office. ASP Sukhendu Heera was escorting Meena. As the protestors, armed with flagpoles, tried to stop Meena from entering Heera called up the Berhampore police station for forces. Inspector-in-Charge Arnab Das rushed in with police and RAF. They moved out the protestors to make way for Meena to step in his office. This prompted Adhir to reach there.In his much-photographed shot, Adhir pulled out his shirt and draped in his white inners was daring the police to shoot him. With a sense of defiance writ large on his face, Adhir was also trying to push back his supporters, television images showed.While it triggered a war-of-words between Adhir and chief minister Mamata Banerjee, police too didn't sit idle. They slapped the MP and 500 others with charges ranging from attempt-to-murder to rioting (sections 148, 149, 186, 188, 307, 333, 353 & 427 IPC, along with section 7 & 9 of Maintenance of Public Oder Act, 1972 and sections 3 & 4 of Prevention of Damage to Public Property Act, 1984). Among the charges slapped section 307 IPC (attempt to murder) and section 333 IPC (Voluntarily causing grievous hurt to deter public servant from his duty), which can lead to a decade-long prison term makes police action imminent. Murshidabad police superintendent C.Sudhakar said, " A specific case has been started." DM Murshidabad Ratnakar Rao said, " There are CCTV images of the incident."Senior criminal lawyer Milon Mukherjee said, " Legally this is an investigation stage and the police have wide ranging powers. The charges, whether they weigh against the evidence or not, is deliberated at a much later stage - the pre-trial stage. To me nothing stops the police from arresting anyone implicated in the FIR, given the charges." The only legal redresal at this stage is either filing for an anticipatory bail or moving the Calcutta high court to quash the FIR itself.Adhir, however, chose to look at the politics behind the move. " By arresting me they want to stop all voices of dissent. This has been the hallmark of this Trinamool Congress government. But Congress has never been, and never will be, reduced to a mere sign post in Bengal. Arrest has never bothered me in the past, neither will it now. Let them arrest me," he said.This isn't the first time Adhir is facing criminal charges in the Mamata Banerjee regime. In April 2014, Adhir and 27 others were slapped with murder charges. Police had claimed the sole-witness to Trinamool Congress supporter Badal Sk's murder in Jalangi, Imtiaz Sk had named Adhir. Even before, in February, 2013, Adhir was booked by police after Congress workers vandalised the Murshidabad district magistrate's office in his presence.In the Left Front regime, things had been no different either. In his 2014 Lok Sabha affidavit, Adhir had mentioned that there were 16 criminal charges against him -- charges in six cases have been framed, the court has taken cognisance of in 10 other cases. The Buddhadeb Bhattacharjee government had even packed him in prison in December, 2005. This, however, hasn' t stopped Berhampore from electing Adhir as its MP on a trot since 1999, the last polls by a record margin in Bengal.||BERHAMPORE
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chandigarh/Cancel-murder-bid-case-against-5-Congmen-Capt/articleshow/48550146.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:45 IST 2015||BATHINDA: Former chief minister Captain Amarinder Singh has demanded cancellation of an attempt to murder case registered against five Congress workers, including Maluka village sarpanch, for clashing with police. Amarinder accused Punjab rural development minister Sikandar Singh Maluka, who represents Rampura Phool assembly constituency, to be behind the registration of the case.    Five persons were booked on August 17, after a clash had taken place with police at Dialpura Bhaika village near Rampura on August 16. Five persons from Dialpura and Maluka and three policemen were injured in the clash.    In a press release issued on Wednesday, Amarinder warned Maluka and police officers responsible for the FIR that they must desist from indulging in highhandedness and falsely implicating people in cases.    Amarinder said, "The villagers were simply protesting against the police inaction in the case of an abetment to suicide. However, Maluka got an FIR registered against them for attempt to murder."    Maluka village sarpanch Jagsir Singh Jagga said, "I have been named in the case even though I was not even present during the protest as I had gone for pilgrimage to Anandpur Sahib."    Rampura deputy superintendent of police Gurjit Singh Romana said police would look into the matter. Meanwhile, minister Maluka denied that he had any role in the registration of an FIR against the Congress workers.  ||BATHINDA
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/delhi/18-rise-in-crime-by-juveniles/articleshow/48549882.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:45 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The increasing involvement of juveniles in crime has been a major cause of concern for Delhi Police for the past few years. According to the NCRB data, cases involving juvenile offenders have gone up by 18%—2,876 minors were tracked down in 1,946 criminal cases registered in 2014. In 2013, the figure was 2,140 against 1,590 cases.     Last year, 585 juveniles were charged with theft. Like 2013, they were found to be involved in more rape cases than murders.     Of the 2,876 juveniles apprehended, 2,547 were found to be involved in cognizable offences; 1,001 were sent home after admonition and advice, while 474 were released on probation. As many as 382 juveniles were sent to special homes, 40 faced fines and 146 were acquitted. The number pending cases stood at 648.     Among those apprehended, 771 had dropped out of school at the higher secondary level; 122 were primary school dropouts, and 767 were illiterate. As many as 2,118 were found to be living with their parents, while 84 were homeless. A total of 1,252 children came from families with an annual income below Rs 25,000, while 687 belonged to the income group of Rs 25,001-Rs 50,000 per annum.     In 2014, juveniles were involved in 1,007 cases of theft, burglary or snatching, followed by 134 cases of rape and 70 murder. Of the total number of apprehended juveniles, 1,500 were in the age-group of 16-18 years.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:45 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:45 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/SC-acquits-Romesh-Sharma-in-Budhiraja-murder-case/articleshow/48704930.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:45 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Thursday upheld the Delhi High Court order acquitting former Congress leader Romesh Sharma in the case relating to the killing of fashion designer Kunjum Budhiraja.     A bench of Justices Pinaki Chandra Ghose and R K Agrawal dismissed an appeal filed by the Delhi government challenging HC order.     The Delhi government contended that the HC had erred in acquitting Sharma but it was strongly opposed by his counsel and senior advocate Siddharth Luthra who submitted that his client was in love with Kunjum and there was no evidence to prove his involvement in the case.     Sharma, who was alleged to be a frontman of underworld don Dawood Ibrahim, was convicted by a trial court on February 15, 2008. Kunjum was killed on March 20, 1999 at Sharma's South Delhi-based 'Jai Mata Di' farm house by a group of hired gangsters from Uttar Pradesh.     The trial court had convicted Sharma and five other accused in the case and had awarded life term to all. The HC, however, acquitted Sharma and co-accused Tejendir Verdi but upheld conviction and sentence of other four accused— Sharma's nephew Surinder Mishra, Hemchand, Santram and Ramesh alias Bobby.     While acquitting Sharma, the HC had said "Romesh Sharma and Kunjum were in love, and desired the company of each other. It does not establish that Sharma had got fed up with her". It had turned down Delhi police's contention that Sharma wanted to get rid of Kunjum as she knew about his alleged illegal activities.     "A grieving lover falling over the body of his mate and performing the rituals of a marriage can well be an expression of lasting love, and need not necessarily be a drama," the HC had said.     Sharma was in judicial custody at the time of the Kunjum's murder.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Raid-on-Bengaluru-centre-reveals-horror-tales/articleshow/48704718.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:45 IST 2015||BENGALURU: A State Human Rights Commission raid on a de-addiction centre in Jnanabharati Layout, near Kengeri, southwest Bengaluru, found 90 inmates living in pathetic conditions and subjected to inhuman treatment.     Thursday's raid followed the murder of an inmate of another de-addiction centre in Kothanur recently.     The SHRC raid on Sri Santhosh Social Service Society, also known as 4S Society, followed a tipoff. According to SHRC officials, the centre has been in existence for seven years at least, but the society couldn't produce documents of having obtained permission from the social welfare department. Commission officials said the centre had the permission from the DC and the DHO.     "Most inmates are between 20 and 35 years. They showed us signs of being physically abused. The centre has violated other norms too. Although it's supposed to have one nurse for every 15 patients and at least one in-house doctor and a psychiatrist, it didn't have any," said an SHRC spokesperson.     4 arrested for killing inmate:     Kothanur police arrested a de-addiction centre staffer and three inmates for allegedly beating to death a 28-year-old inmate. Dinesh was admitted to the centre by his family as he was an alcoholic. He was later found dead in a hospital. Family members noticed several bruises on his body. Narayana, an inmate-turned-staffer, gave some medicines to Dinesh, who later turned aggressive. Narayana sought the help of inmates Suresh, Subhan and Simon, to subdue Dinesh.     When Dinesh retaliated, the quartet overpowered him till he became unconscious. He died in hospital.||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/A-jolly-good-fellow-say-Khannas-friends/articleshow/48704630.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:45 IST 2015||Sanjeev Khanna, Indrani Mukerjea's second husband and suspected ally in Sheena Bora's killing, may be the most surprising element in this macabre drama, but his friends and associates in Kolkata refused to cast aspersions on "Sanju" just yet.     From being the biggest dart enthusiast at one of Kolkata's poshest clubs (the CC&FC) to having a finger in every pie, Sanjeev was everyone's "best mate" and go-to guy who friends described as: "A doer... someone who could get things done."     The morning after Khanna's arrest, TOI spoke to Ajay Rawla, the man who Khanna worked for as a consultant and whose house he was picked up from on Wednesday afternoon. "It wasn't like he was hiding like a desperate fugitive in my house. We had a meeting in the morning after which he drove me home and that's when news broke on television. We were sitting, watching, wondering what steps to take when the police arrived," explained Rawla.     Seven years his senior, Khanna's association with Rawla dates back to the time they went to Mayo College in Ajmer. Later, Khanna went on to become an aide for Rawla's pet projects. Besides running his own business in wireless communications, Khanna was there setting up chef Shaun Kenworthy and Rawla's restaurant 1658 or immersed in the heritage project of converting the Bawali Rajbari into a hotel. "He was getting all the construction work and labourers in place. He was very good in helping out with permissions through his connections with excise and contractors," remembers Kenworthy.     Khanna, who seldom missed his outings at the club, motor rallies and horse racing as a prominent face in the social circuit, was not the same man before he met Indrani, recounts Bull Banthia, a close friend. "Well-read and well-versed, Sanju had a great mechanical mind with a solution for everything," is how Bull chose to describe his "jolly good friend who loved meeting new people, hung out at the club but wasn't a social climber". "It was Indrani who emerged as this socialite and drove him to consciously build contacts with those higher up in the social rung after marriage," said the Kolkata-based entrepreneur. "That's the reason why I distanced myself from them until overnight she left Kolkata with their daughter and Sanju's wallet."     While Indrani never surfaces in conversations, his daughter Vidhie, who stayed with Indrani, is a fond subject with his friends. "He would miss his daughter but was resigned to fate, hoping that someday she would find him," said Rawla, adding, "It was Vidhie who called Sanjeev on Wednesday to give him the news."     No one seems to know about any recent interaction between Khanna and Indrani. G M Kapur, a known name in Kolkata who was Intach's state convener and happens to be Khanna's "mama", seemed disturbed with "all the theorizing" of Khanna's role in the crime. He declined to look back on Indrani and Khanna's relationship but added, "The last that there was any contact with Indrani or her family was when Vidhie visited Calcutta last year to celebrate the 75th birthday of her grandmother (Khanna's mother who lives with him)."     Khanna's Facebook posts on "karma" in the weeks and months following Sheena's alleged murder on April 24, 2012, make for interesting reading. On April 30, Khanna shared photo messages: "Say whatever, whenever the f*** you want to"; "Sometimes I get so weird, I even freak myself out".     On May 24, exactly a month after the alleged killing, he wrote: "You can never tell what people are thinking and feeling unless they tell you, and usually they lie. you ask them, 'Whats wrong?' and they say 'Nothing'. You accept this because it's easier than digging for the truth. People smile when they want to cry, they laugh when they want to scream and shout. They pretend like nothing is wrong because they don't want to face the truth. Things aren't always rainbows and butterflies, sometimes you gotta scream and cry your anger and sadness to the world, because you can only hold it in for so long before something in you snaps. so when you want to cry, cry. When you want to scream, scream. Don't hide behind fake smiles, it's ok to not be alright."     ||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Sheena-docu-Michail-add-to-mystery/articleshow/48701752.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:45 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Michail, Sheena's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered have raised a number of unanswered questions.    Two days after his mother, Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Michail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai Police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed that what he gave to police was enough to prove that Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora (who are actually parents of Indrani) as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. Some questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukherjea.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Michail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43 as mentioned in reports after her arrest.    Adding more to the suspense, Michail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Michail studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board examination, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that knew that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard that her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard that she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband who she introduced as Peter Mukherjea."    The two-member Mumbai Police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Michail, who on Wednesday, was the first one to reveal that Sheena was Indrani's daughter, twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Michail's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Michail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukherjae is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Michail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."  ||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Grandparents-are-Sheenas-mom-dad-on-birth-certificate/articleshow/48704559.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:45 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Mikhail, Sheena Bora's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered led to some unanswered questions on Thursday.    Two days after his mother Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Mikhail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed what he gave the police was enough to prove Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora, who are actually Indrani's parents, as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. However, many questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter. In many cases in India involving single mothers, grandparents are known to put in their names as father and mother.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukerjea, that is, 13 years after Sheena was born.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Mikhail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43.    Mikhail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Mikhail     studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board exam, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband, who she introduced as Peter Mukerjea."    The two-member Mumbai police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Mikhail twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Mikhail 's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time, he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Mikhail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukerjea is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Mikhail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Sheena-bowled-us-over-Rahuls-uncle/articleshow/48704552.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:45 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: Had things worked out as desired for Peter Mukherjea's first wife Shabnam and her family in Dehradun, Rahul Mukherjea and Sheena Bora would have been married for over three years now.     Shabnam's brother Shaleen Singh told TOI on Thursday that in 2011 Rahul brought Sheena to their sprawling home in Dehradun to seek approval from the family for their marriage.     The entire family-Shabnam, her younger brother Shaleen, father Anand Singh and mother Seema-were reportedly bowled over by Sheena's jovial nature and affection towards the elderly people. Impressed, the family gave its "unqualified and unanimous approval" for the wedding, which was supposed to take place within a few months, said Shaleen.     Stunned by the recent development, Shaleen said, "Sheena was among those rare persons who left a deep and lifelong impact on people. She was good-looking, a sweet person, clean of heart and good to talk to. None of us objected to the wedding."     Shaleen learnt of Sheena's murder through news channels. "It would have been great if she had become a part of the family. I don't know what was the cause and motive behind the heinous crime, but all those behind the killing of the jovial-natured girl should not be spared at any cost," he said.     A former model and tele-actor, 49-year-old Shaleen today owns the Sanskar International school in Jogiwala here. He recalled the last meeting with Shabnam and Rahul in April this year. "My father Anand Singh passed away in April. They had come to pay their respects but we did not interact much."     However, Shaleen said of late the interaction between him and his sister Shabnam was limited. Although Shabnam's farm Gul-e-Shabnam and Shaleen's residence Shankar Sadan are barely 200 metres away in Badripur, meetings between them were rare. While Shaleen and his mother stay on different floors of Shankar Sadan, Shabnam stays alone at her residence and is frequently visited by Rahul.     "There are matters in each family which we do not want to disclose. We are not against each other but do not interact much. She comes to meet our mother occasionally," said Shaleen, adding that Shabnam was passionate about painting and had a studio in her residence.     Shaleen denied having any details about the presence of Mumbai police in Dehradun. "Neither Doon police nor Mumbai police have contacted me over the issue."     Staff at Shabnam's residence said she was out-of-station but they were not aware of her whereabouts.||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Kilpauk-doctor-murder-Hubby-to-approach-court/articleshow/48704411.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:45 IST 2015||CHENNAI: It's been four days since police claimed to have solved the murder of S Sathya, 24, a PG medical student. However, her husband has put forth questions that police have failed to answer. Though investigating officers confirmed Sathya was not sexually assaulted before she was killed, they leaked to some section of media saying that they changed their stance on Wednesday and said there were indications of attempt to rape on the deceased.     Police personnel revealed the details soon after Sathya's husband Dr P Sesu, also employed at a primary health centre in Perambalur, expressed certain doubts.     He alleged the police hastily solved the case citing the state assembly, which is in motion. Sathya was found dead at her house in Kilpauk on August 20.     On August 23, police arrested Harintham Depnath, a BTech graduate, who lived at the second floor on the same apartment. Neither was there any mention about sexual assault or attempt on Sathya when the body was recovered from the house. The nor did the doctors. Police didn't tell this during the arrest of Depnath on August 23. "What forced the police to reveal about the sexual harassment attempt on my wife now?" asked Sesu.     "I want to live a peaceful life with my two sons - Tamil Nesan, 6, and Karmugilan, 4. The studies and the future of my children is important for me. I do respect the police personnel who spent sleepless nights to solve the murder, but there are questions that need to be answered," he said.     "I live in Perambalur with my children, but we speak through live video calls. I have told my sons that Sathya has gone to the God, as the Almighty likes her more. "Hereafter, we cannot speak or meet her. I don't know how far my children will admit it?" said Sesu. "I will approach the court seeking a fair probe into the murder of my wife. I want to find out the real cause behind her death. I want the real accused to get punished for his deed," said Sesu.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Woman-strangles-husbands-lover/articleshow/48704388.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:45 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A woman beat up and strangled her husband's partner, an assistant professor at a polytechnic in Choolaimedu, in their Thiruverkadu home on Thursday, police said. A court later remanded the accused, 32-year-old Shruti, in judicial custody.     Police said Sambasivam, a professor at Panimalar Engineering College in Poonamallee, used to bring Rajalakshmi, home frequently and introduced her to his wife Shruti as a colleague. He even dropped her home at night. The polytechnic where Rajalakshmi worked was part of the Panimalar group of educational institutions. Shruti initially believed the two were just colleagues until Sambasivam came home with Rajalakshmi on Tuesday and said the woman was moving in with them permanently.     On Wednesday morning, Sambasivam allegedly tied a 'mangalsutra' to Rajalakshmi in front of his wife, police said, based on Shruti's confession. A shocked Shruti picked up a fight with Sambasivam who asked her to maintain a cordial relationship and take care of Rajalakshmi. On Thursday morning, after he left for college a fight broke out between the two women.     Police said Rajalakshmi allegedly abused Sruthi and went into the bathroom. Sruthi followed her in and strangled her with the 'mangalsutra'. She then tried to make it appear that the woman had fainted in the bathroom. She took her in an autorickshaw to a nearby hospital where she was declared 'brought dead'. Doctors who noticed a few marks around her neck informed the Thiruverkadu police who registered a case of suspicious death under CrPC section 176.     The body was sent for postmortem to Kilpauk Medical College and Hospital.     After finding that the two women were at home at the time of the death, police interrogated Sruthi for more than an hour but she continued to maintain that Rajyalakshmi had died of injuries sustained when she fell down in the bathroom.     "She confessed to the murder when we told her that her fingerprints had been lifted from the scene of crime," said an investigating officer. "She said she had smashed the woman's head against the wall and later strangled her with the 'thali'." Police altered the case to murder and arrested Sruthi.     Initial inquiries revealed that Rajalakshmi had been married to a man named Rajasekhar for a while and they had separated. She then got married to Suresh, a relative who worked in a private firm, a few years ago and the couple moved into a house in Mogappair.     They allegedly had frequent quarrels as he tortured her and she left him too, police found.     Rajalakshmi then got a job with Panimalar Engineering College where she met Sambasivam. The two became friends and began seeing each other. Rajalakshmi recently moved to the polytechnic in Choolaimedu, police said.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/US-journalists-killer-annoyed-colleagues-Ex-boss/articleshow/48704167.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:45 IST 2015||ROANOKE, United States: The disgruntled former US television station employee who murdered two journalists had "annoyed" colleagues but showed no signs at work of any mental health issues, his former boss said Thursday.     Vester Lee Flanagan, 41, worked as a reporter for WDBJ in Roanoke, Virginia from March 2012 to February 2013, but was dismissed for poor performance and angry behavior, general manager Jeffrey Marks said.     On Wednesday, Flanagan shot and killed two of the CBS affiliate's journalists while they were conducting an on-air interview. He later fatally shot himself.     "We are still at a loss to figure out what happened to him in those two and a half years" since he was fired, Marks told a news conference flanked by dozens of staff, many of them holding hands.     "I don't think we identified that he had mental health issues. We certainly identified that he had performance issues."     Marks defended the station's hiring record and said its parent company had "a very elaborate program to screen employees."     Flanagan passed background checks and came with only positive references, Marks said.     It was only after he was hired, Marks said, that things went downhill.     "Vester's behavior annoyed a lot of people in the news station," Marks said.     Flanagan, who went by the on-screen name Bryce Williams, alleged in a manifesto faxed to ABC News that he was discriminated against as a gay, black journalist.     Marks said accusations in 2013 that he was treated unfairly were "immediately investigated and found to be without merit."     During his employment, Flanagan complied with demands that he seek medical help, but he was ultimately dismissed.     He was escorted from the building by police and made an ominous aside to the news director -- handing him a wooden cross and saying "'you'll need this'," Marks said.     As he left, he also made a "derogatory comment" to Adam Ward, the cameraman he shot dead on Wednesday.     Flanagan filed a complaint with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and a civil action suit, which were dismissed, he said.     "All of these investigations determined that no reasonable person would have taken any of the cited incidents as discrimination or harassment."     After killing Ward and reporter Alison Parker live on the air, Flanagan posted a video of the attack on social media.||ROANOKE, UNITED STATES
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:45 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/SC-acquits-Romesh-Sharma-in-Budhiraja-murder-case/articleshow/48704930.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:45 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Thursday upheld the Delhi High Court order acquitting former Congress leader Romesh Sharma in the case relating to the killing of fashion designer Kunjum Budhiraja.     A bench of Justices Pinaki Chandra Ghose and R K Agrawal dismissed an appeal filed by the Delhi government challenging HC order.     The Delhi government contended that the HC had erred in acquitting Sharma but it was strongly opposed by his counsel and senior advocate Siddharth Luthra who submitted that his client was in love with Kunjum and there was no evidence to prove his involvement in the case.     Sharma, who was alleged to be a frontman of underworld don Dawood Ibrahim, was convicted by a trial court on February 15, 2008. Kunjum was killed on March 20, 1999 at Sharma's South Delhi-based 'Jai Mata Di' farm house by a group of hired gangsters from Uttar Pradesh.     The trial court had convicted Sharma and five other accused in the case and had awarded life term to all. The HC, however, acquitted Sharma and co-accused Tejendir Verdi but upheld conviction and sentence of other four accused— Sharma's nephew Surinder Mishra, Hemchand, Santram and Ramesh alias Bobby.     While acquitting Sharma, the HC had said "Romesh Sharma and Kunjum were in love, and desired the company of each other. It does not establish that Sharma had got fed up with her". It had turned down Delhi police's contention that Sharma wanted to get rid of Kunjum as she knew about his alleged illegal activities.     "A grieving lover falling over the body of his mate and performing the rituals of a marriage can well be an expression of lasting love, and need not necessarily be a drama," the HC had said.     Sharma was in judicial custody at the time of the Kunjum's murder.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Raid-on-Bengaluru-centre-reveals-horror-tales/articleshow/48704718.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:45 IST 2015||BENGALURU: A State Human Rights Commission raid on a de-addiction centre in Jnanabharati Layout, near Kengeri, southwest Bengaluru, found 90 inmates living in pathetic conditions and subjected to inhuman treatment.     Thursday's raid followed the murder of an inmate of another de-addiction centre in Kothanur recently.     The SHRC raid on Sri Santhosh Social Service Society, also known as 4S Society, followed a tipoff. According to SHRC officials, the centre has been in existence for seven years at least, but the society couldn't produce documents of having obtained permission from the social welfare department. Commission officials said the centre had the permission from the DC and the DHO.     "Most inmates are between 20 and 35 years. They showed us signs of being physically abused. The centre has violated other norms too. Although it's supposed to have one nurse for every 15 patients and at least one in-house doctor and a psychiatrist, it didn't have any," said an SHRC spokesperson.     4 arrested for killing inmate:     Kothanur police arrested a de-addiction centre staffer and three inmates for allegedly beating to death a 28-year-old inmate. Dinesh was admitted to the centre by his family as he was an alcoholic. He was later found dead in a hospital. Family members noticed several bruises on his body. Narayana, an inmate-turned-staffer, gave some medicines to Dinesh, who later turned aggressive. Narayana sought the help of inmates Suresh, Subhan and Simon, to subdue Dinesh.     When Dinesh retaliated, the quartet overpowered him till he became unconscious. He died in hospital.||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/A-jolly-good-fellow-say-Khannas-friends/articleshow/48704630.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:45 IST 2015||Sanjeev Khanna, Indrani Mukerjea's second husband and suspected ally in Sheena Bora's killing, may be the most surprising element in this macabre drama, but his friends and associates in Kolkata refused to cast aspersions on "Sanju" just yet.     From being the biggest dart enthusiast at one of Kolkata's poshest clubs (the CC&FC) to having a finger in every pie, Sanjeev was everyone's "best mate" and go-to guy who friends described as: "A doer... someone who could get things done."     The morning after Khanna's arrest, TOI spoke to Ajay Rawla, the man who Khanna worked for as a consultant and whose house he was picked up from on Wednesday afternoon. "It wasn't like he was hiding like a desperate fugitive in my house. We had a meeting in the morning after which he drove me home and that's when news broke on television. We were sitting, watching, wondering what steps to take when the police arrived," explained Rawla.     Seven years his senior, Khanna's association with Rawla dates back to the time they went to Mayo College in Ajmer. Later, Khanna went on to become an aide for Rawla's pet projects. Besides running his own business in wireless communications, Khanna was there setting up chef Shaun Kenworthy and Rawla's restaurant 1658 or immersed in the heritage project of converting the Bawali Rajbari into a hotel. "He was getting all the construction work and labourers in place. He was very good in helping out with permissions through his connections with excise and contractors," remembers Kenworthy.     Khanna, who seldom missed his outings at the club, motor rallies and horse racing as a prominent face in the social circuit, was not the same man before he met Indrani, recounts Bull Banthia, a close friend. "Well-read and well-versed, Sanju had a great mechanical mind with a solution for everything," is how Bull chose to describe his "jolly good friend who loved meeting new people, hung out at the club but wasn't a social climber". "It was Indrani who emerged as this socialite and drove him to consciously build contacts with those higher up in the social rung after marriage," said the Kolkata-based entrepreneur. "That's the reason why I distanced myself from them until overnight she left Kolkata with their daughter and Sanju's wallet."     While Indrani never surfaces in conversations, his daughter Vidhie, who stayed with Indrani, is a fond subject with his friends. "He would miss his daughter but was resigned to fate, hoping that someday she would find him," said Rawla, adding, "It was Vidhie who called Sanjeev on Wednesday to give him the news."     No one seems to know about any recent interaction between Khanna and Indrani. G M Kapur, a known name in Kolkata who was Intach's state convener and happens to be Khanna's "mama", seemed disturbed with "all the theorizing" of Khanna's role in the crime. He declined to look back on Indrani and Khanna's relationship but added, "The last that there was any contact with Indrani or her family was when Vidhie visited Calcutta last year to celebrate the 75th birthday of her grandmother (Khanna's mother who lives with him)."     Khanna's Facebook posts on "karma" in the weeks and months following Sheena's alleged murder on April 24, 2012, make for interesting reading. On April 30, Khanna shared photo messages: "Say whatever, whenever the f*** you want to"; "Sometimes I get so weird, I even freak myself out".     On May 24, exactly a month after the alleged killing, he wrote: "You can never tell what people are thinking and feeling unless they tell you, and usually they lie. you ask them, 'Whats wrong?' and they say 'Nothing'. You accept this because it's easier than digging for the truth. People smile when they want to cry, they laugh when they want to scream and shout. They pretend like nothing is wrong because they don't want to face the truth. Things aren't always rainbows and butterflies, sometimes you gotta scream and cry your anger and sadness to the world, because you can only hold it in for so long before something in you snaps. so when you want to cry, cry. When you want to scream, scream. Don't hide behind fake smiles, it's ok to not be alright."     ||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Sheena-docu-Michail-add-to-mystery/articleshow/48701752.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:45 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Michail, Sheena's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered have raised a number of unanswered questions.    Two days after his mother, Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Michail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai Police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed that what he gave to police was enough to prove that Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora (who are actually parents of Indrani) as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. Some questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukherjea.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Michail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43 as mentioned in reports after her arrest.    Adding more to the suspense, Michail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Michail studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board examination, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that knew that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard that her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard that she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband who she introduced as Peter Mukherjea."    The two-member Mumbai Police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Michail, who on Wednesday, was the first one to reveal that Sheena was Indrani's daughter, twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Michail's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Michail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukherjae is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Michail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."  ||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Grandparents-are-Sheenas-mom-dad-on-birth-certificate/articleshow/48704559.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:45 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Mikhail, Sheena Bora's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered led to some unanswered questions on Thursday.    Two days after his mother Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Mikhail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed what he gave the police was enough to prove Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora, who are actually Indrani's parents, as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. However, many questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter. In many cases in India involving single mothers, grandparents are known to put in their names as father and mother.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukerjea, that is, 13 years after Sheena was born.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Mikhail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43.    Mikhail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Mikhail     studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board exam, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband, who she introduced as Peter Mukerjea."    The two-member Mumbai police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Mikhail twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Mikhail 's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time, he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Mikhail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukerjea is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Mikhail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Sheena-bowled-us-over-Rahuls-uncle/articleshow/48704552.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:45 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: Had things worked out as desired for Peter Mukherjea's first wife Shabnam and her family in Dehradun, Rahul Mukherjea and Sheena Bora would have been married for over three years now.     Shabnam's brother Shaleen Singh told TOI on Thursday that in 2011 Rahul brought Sheena to their sprawling home in Dehradun to seek approval from the family for their marriage.     The entire family-Shabnam, her younger brother Shaleen, father Anand Singh and mother Seema-were reportedly bowled over by Sheena's jovial nature and affection towards the elderly people. Impressed, the family gave its "unqualified and unanimous approval" for the wedding, which was supposed to take place within a few months, said Shaleen.     Stunned by the recent development, Shaleen said, "Sheena was among those rare persons who left a deep and lifelong impact on people. She was good-looking, a sweet person, clean of heart and good to talk to. None of us objected to the wedding."     Shaleen learnt of Sheena's murder through news channels. "It would have been great if she had become a part of the family. I don't know what was the cause and motive behind the heinous crime, but all those behind the killing of the jovial-natured girl should not be spared at any cost," he said.     A former model and tele-actor, 49-year-old Shaleen today owns the Sanskar International school in Jogiwala here. He recalled the last meeting with Shabnam and Rahul in April this year. "My father Anand Singh passed away in April. They had come to pay their respects but we did not interact much."     However, Shaleen said of late the interaction between him and his sister Shabnam was limited. Although Shabnam's farm Gul-e-Shabnam and Shaleen's residence Shankar Sadan are barely 200 metres away in Badripur, meetings between them were rare. While Shaleen and his mother stay on different floors of Shankar Sadan, Shabnam stays alone at her residence and is frequently visited by Rahul.     "There are matters in each family which we do not want to disclose. We are not against each other but do not interact much. She comes to meet our mother occasionally," said Shaleen, adding that Shabnam was passionate about painting and had a studio in her residence.     Shaleen denied having any details about the presence of Mumbai police in Dehradun. "Neither Doon police nor Mumbai police have contacted me over the issue."     Staff at Shabnam's residence said she was out-of-station but they were not aware of her whereabouts.||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Kilpauk-doctor-murder-Hubby-to-approach-court/articleshow/48704411.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:45 IST 2015||CHENNAI: It's been four days since police claimed to have solved the murder of S Sathya, 24, a PG medical student. However, her husband has put forth questions that police have failed to answer. Though investigating officers confirmed Sathya was not sexually assaulted before she was killed, they leaked to some section of media saying that they changed their stance on Wednesday and said there were indications of attempt to rape on the deceased.     Police personnel revealed the details soon after Sathya's husband Dr P Sesu, also employed at a primary health centre in Perambalur, expressed certain doubts.     He alleged the police hastily solved the case citing the state assembly, which is in motion. Sathya was found dead at her house in Kilpauk on August 20.     On August 23, police arrested Harintham Depnath, a BTech graduate, who lived at the second floor on the same apartment. Neither was there any mention about sexual assault or attempt on Sathya when the body was recovered from the house. The nor did the doctors. Police didn't tell this during the arrest of Depnath on August 23. "What forced the police to reveal about the sexual harassment attempt on my wife now?" asked Sesu.     "I want to live a peaceful life with my two sons - Tamil Nesan, 6, and Karmugilan, 4. The studies and the future of my children is important for me. I do respect the police personnel who spent sleepless nights to solve the murder, but there are questions that need to be answered," he said.     "I live in Perambalur with my children, but we speak through live video calls. I have told my sons that Sathya has gone to the God, as the Almighty likes her more. "Hereafter, we cannot speak or meet her. I don't know how far my children will admit it?" said Sesu. "I will approach the court seeking a fair probe into the murder of my wife. I want to find out the real cause behind her death. I want the real accused to get punished for his deed," said Sesu.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Woman-strangles-husbands-lover/articleshow/48704388.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:45 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A woman beat up and strangled her husband's partner, an assistant professor at a polytechnic in Choolaimedu, in their Thiruverkadu home on Thursday, police said. A court later remanded the accused, 32-year-old Shruti, in judicial custody.     Police said Sambasivam, a professor at Panimalar Engineering College in Poonamallee, used to bring Rajalakshmi, home frequently and introduced her to his wife Shruti as a colleague. He even dropped her home at night. The polytechnic where Rajalakshmi worked was part of the Panimalar group of educational institutions. Shruti initially believed the two were just colleagues until Sambasivam came home with Rajalakshmi on Tuesday and said the woman was moving in with them permanently.     On Wednesday morning, Sambasivam allegedly tied a 'mangalsutra' to Rajalakshmi in front of his wife, police said, based on Shruti's confession. A shocked Shruti picked up a fight with Sambasivam who asked her to maintain a cordial relationship and take care of Rajalakshmi. On Thursday morning, after he left for college a fight broke out between the two women.     Police said Rajalakshmi allegedly abused Sruthi and went into the bathroom. Sruthi followed her in and strangled her with the 'mangalsutra'. She then tried to make it appear that the woman had fainted in the bathroom. She took her in an autorickshaw to a nearby hospital where she was declared 'brought dead'. Doctors who noticed a few marks around her neck informed the Thiruverkadu police who registered a case of suspicious death under CrPC section 176.     The body was sent for postmortem to Kilpauk Medical College and Hospital.     After finding that the two women were at home at the time of the death, police interrogated Sruthi for more than an hour but she continued to maintain that Rajyalakshmi had died of injuries sustained when she fell down in the bathroom.     "She confessed to the murder when we told her that her fingerprints had been lifted from the scene of crime," said an investigating officer. "She said she had smashed the woman's head against the wall and later strangled her with the 'thali'." Police altered the case to murder and arrested Sruthi.     Initial inquiries revealed that Rajalakshmi had been married to a man named Rajasekhar for a while and they had separated. She then got married to Suresh, a relative who worked in a private firm, a few years ago and the couple moved into a house in Mogappair.     They allegedly had frequent quarrels as he tortured her and she left him too, police found.     Rajalakshmi then got a job with Panimalar Engineering College where she met Sambasivam. The two became friends and began seeing each other. Rajalakshmi recently moved to the polytechnic in Choolaimedu, police said.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/US-journalists-killer-annoyed-colleagues-Ex-boss/articleshow/48704167.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:45 IST 2015||ROANOKE, United States: The disgruntled former US television station employee who murdered two journalists had "annoyed" colleagues but showed no signs at work of any mental health issues, his former boss said Thursday.     Vester Lee Flanagan, 41, worked as a reporter for WDBJ in Roanoke, Virginia from March 2012 to February 2013, but was dismissed for poor performance and angry behavior, general manager Jeffrey Marks said.     On Wednesday, Flanagan shot and killed two of the CBS affiliate's journalists while they were conducting an on-air interview. He later fatally shot himself.     "We are still at a loss to figure out what happened to him in those two and a half years" since he was fired, Marks told a news conference flanked by dozens of staff, many of them holding hands.     "I don't think we identified that he had mental health issues. We certainly identified that he had performance issues."     Marks defended the station's hiring record and said its parent company had "a very elaborate program to screen employees."     Flanagan passed background checks and came with only positive references, Marks said.     It was only after he was hired, Marks said, that things went downhill.     "Vester's behavior annoyed a lot of people in the news station," Marks said.     Flanagan, who went by the on-screen name Bryce Williams, alleged in a manifesto faxed to ABC News that he was discriminated against as a gay, black journalist.     Marks said accusations in 2013 that he was treated unfairly were "immediately investigated and found to be without merit."     During his employment, Flanagan complied with demands that he seek medical help, but he was ultimately dismissed.     He was escorted from the building by police and made an ominous aside to the news director -- handing him a wooden cross and saying "'you'll need this'," Marks said.     As he left, he also made a "derogatory comment" to Adam Ward, the cameraman he shot dead on Wednesday.     Flanagan filed a complaint with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and a civil action suit, which were dismissed, he said.     "All of these investigations determined that no reasonable person would have taken any of the cited incidents as discrimination or harassment."     After killing Ward and reporter Alison Parker live on the air, Flanagan posted a video of the attack on social media.||ROANOKE, UNITED STATES
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/delhi/Cops-claim-registration-of-cases-up-not-crime/articleshow/48549845.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:50 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The number of cases registered for serious offences like rape, murder and theft nearly doubled in the city from 2013 to 2014, but police attribute this to liberal registration of cases rather than a sudden spurt in crime.    Data released by National Crime Records Bureau (NCRB) shows police stations in Delhi recorded 1.65 lakh cases of "cognizable" crime in 2014, up from only 86,800 in 2013.    Police stations have been directed to register a case on every complaint that merits it. Police chief B S Bassi says "freer" registration of cases has revealed a true picture of the crime situation in the capital. In his annual press conference, Bassi had mentioned how police's reluctance to file FIRs distorted the crime graph earlier. For instance, 64,882 crimes were reported in 1998 but the number came down to 54,287 in 2012 despite a significant increase in population over the 14-year period.     NCRB data also shows that more cases are being solved now. In 2014, Delhi Police solved 43,431 cases as against 36,134 in 2013. As per the national index, Delhi accounts for 0.7% of the total number of cognizable crimes reported in cities across India. In 2014, the number of heinous crimes increased sharply because the number of robberies reported increased by more than five times, from 1,245 to 6,464.     Of the 586 murders reported in 2014, about 90% were for personal vendetta, and 76 were committed using illegal firearms. Most of the victims were aged 18-60 years. But 2014 turned out to be a safer year for senior citizens as there were 22 murders in the over-60 age group, down from 45 in 2013.     The NCRB figures make a case for lowering the age of maturity from 18 years to 16 years, as 51 juveniles were found to be involved in cases of murder and 55 in cases of attempt to murder. However, fewer minors were accused in murder cases in 2014 as compared to 2013 when 76 juveniles were named. Most of the murders were committed for petty reasons or on sudden pro-vocation.     Among other serious crimes reported in 2014, there were 7,143 cases of kidnapping. More girls (1,608) aged 12-16 years were abducted than boys (1,380) of the same age group. Police managed to rescue 1,283 of the abducted girls and 1,165 of the boys within a few days.||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/jaipur/Unable-to-pay-medical-bills-woman-throws-baby-in-well/articleshow/48549389.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:50 IST 2015||JAIPUR: Poverty and ignorance about medical facilities allegedly led a 22-year-old woman to throw her infant girl in a well in the outskirts of Mansarovar locality . Since the act of woman resulted in the death of the infant, the police has arrested the woman and were awaiting the post mortem report to decide if it was a murder.According to the police, the infant was a pre-mature baby born in seven-and-a-half-months and weighed just 2 kg. On Wednesday, the cops were informed by Rajesh (24) that his missing infant daughter was found dead in a well."Preliminary investigations suggested that the infant had a kidney ailment since birth. The parents had taken her to various doctors in private nursing homes and had spent more than Rs 20,000 in the past two months since she was born," said a senior police officer at Mansarovar police station.Police said that Rajesh is a daily labourer who earns Rs 200 to Rs 300 per day. "The circumstances guided us to suspect the infant's mother Seema. When she was questioned, she told us that the family had not been able to even feed themselves and the infant properly due to the medical expenses. Frustrated by the situation, the woman threw her into the well late on Tuesday night," said Bala Ram, station house officer, Mansarovar police station.The cops were awaiting the post mortem report to find out if the infant was also strangulated before being thrown into the well.Asked if the parents had any idea that they could avail free medical facilities in government hospitals, a senior officer, said, "They told us that they had no idea that medical facilities for infants at government hospitals like J K Lon hospital are free. Whatever are the circumstances, the woman would be treated as per law and a case would be registered against her for murder after the post mortem report.""We have checked the records of the nursing home which showed that the girl was terminally ill. Ignorance towards medical facilities in government hospitals and extreme poverty led her to take this step. Despite all that, she has to be booked under section 302(murder) of IPC," said an officer.||JAIPUR
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/madurai/Two-hacked-by-gang-for-helping-couple-in-illicit-affair/articleshow/48549362.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:50 IST 2015||TUTICORIN: Two people, who were running a roadside juice stall in the district, were hacked by a gang on Wednesday resulting in the death of one person and severe injuries on the other. According to police, the two people hailed from Uttar Pradesh and were hacked for reportedly helping their landlord's son and his lover, who was the wife of the gang leader.     A roommate who was witnessing the attack locked himself inside the house fearing attack on him.     The deceased was identified as Anuj Kumar Soni, 25 while the injured was Akash, 15, both from Shravasthi district in Uttar Pradesh. Police said that three people were sharing a room in K V K Nagar in Tuticorin city. They were hacked by a four-member gang led by one Michael. Tuticorin town police registered a case and searching for Michael, who escaped after the incident.     Michael, a driver by profession was staying right in front of the house where the trio was staying on rent. Police said that the gang actually had actually come to murder Vinoth, the son of the house owner, where the three were staying. Michael's wife and Vinoth had allegedly developed an extramarital relationship recently. The three used to help the couple by providing their room for their meeting. The youths used to go out for sales in the morning . During that time, Vinoth and the woman used the room.     Recently, Michael came to know about the affair. Angered over this he connived along with his friends to murder Vinoth. But, Vinoth learnt about it and went underground. The gang turned their anger towards the trio. On Wednesday morning, Anuj and Soni were loading the fruits as usual to start their business when the gang came and hacked them.     Anuj's body was taken to the hospital for postmortem. Akash was also rushed to the same hospital.     ||TUTICORIN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/jaipur/Six-chargesheeted-in-Dangawas-violence-case/articleshow/48549360.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:50 IST 2015||JAIPUR: Almost three months after taking up the investigations in the Dangawas violence case, the Central Bureau of Investigation (CBI) has filed chargesheet against six arrested accused. All the accused are of Jat community and were charged for murder, ransacking, voluntarily causing hurt and also outraging modesty of woman.     The chargesheet was filed by the CBI in the court of Additional Chief Judicial Magistrate Merta city, Nagaur a few days ago relating to the alleged violent clashes between Meghwal and Jat community over a piece of land in May.     "We had taken up the investigations of the case on May 30 after Rajasthan police had lodged an FIR on May 14. In the FIR, it was alleged that a clash broke out between two communities of Dangawas village situated in Nagaur over a piece of land," said a senior officer of CBI on Wednesday.     Officials said the land was allotted to one person of Dangawas by state government in 1961. Subsequently, the ownership of the land was transferred in the name of his adopted son. However, the people of other community claimed that the said person had sold the land to another person of their community for Rs 1,500 in 1964. In this regard, the various suits filed by both the sides are still pending in civil court.     Kanchan Prasad, CBI spokeperson, said, "We had arrested six persons in this connection, including Kanaram, Gogaram, Omprakash Omaram, Ramdev, Kaluram, Pancharam, Premaram and Premsukh. All of them were already in judicial custody."     It may be recalled that in a violent confrontation between two communities in Dangawas six people were killed and 11 people, including five men and sixwomen got injured.     All the accused were charged under Sections like 302(Murder), 307(Attempt to murder), 436(Mischief by fire or explosive substance with intent to destroy house, etc), 323(punishment for voluntary causing hurt), .     ||JAIPUR
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/madurai/Crime-rates-marginally-up-in-city/articleshow/48549313.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:50 IST 2015||MADURAI: The number of crime incidents in Madurai has increased marginally in 2014 compared to its previous year, according to a data released by National Crime Records Bureau (NCRB). As many as 3,226 crimes were registered under the Indian Penal Code (IPC) in 2014, an increase of 195 cases from 2013. While cities like Chennai and Coimbatore managed to bring down the crime rate, it has gone up in Madurai and Trichy cities. Only four cities - Chennai, Coimbatore, Madurai and Trichy are featured in the NCRB.     While the total crime has gone up marginally, there was a decrease in the number of murders in 2014 compared to 2013. Only 35 murder cases in 2014 were registered compared to 39 in the previous year. However, attempt to murder cases increased to 51 compared to 49 the previous year. Although Madurai is stereotyped as the murder capital in the state, it is far from realty. Murder rates in both Madurai and Trichy were level at 3.5 in 2014Crime rate in Madurai increased to 220.70 in 2014, whereas it was only 207.3 in its preceding year. Similarly, crime rate in Trichy also went up to 300 from 272 in 2013. However, cities like Chennai and Coimbatore have demonstrated reduction in crime rate. The crime rate of Chennai was 193.9 in 2014 compared to 204.1 in 2013. Similarly, crime rate of Coimbatore was 199.0 in 2014 a drastic reduction from 834.3 in 2013.     Few days back, while talking to TOI, police commissioner said that crimes in city limits are gradually decreasing after he assumed office.     ||MADURAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/kolhapur/Kolhapur-woman-held-for-killing-husband-misleading-probe/articleshow/48549263.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:50 IST 2015||KOLHAPUR: The local crime branch on Wednesday arrested a 50-year old woman for allegedly murdering her husband. The man was found murdered at their residence located in a forest area in the Gaganbawada taluka. The woman has admitted to murdering her husband and stated that she took the extreme step as he was allegedly forcing their 16-year-old daughter into a relationship.     According to police, on Tuesday night, Sahdev Kamble, a former sarpanch of the Kode Khurd village, told the Gaganbawada police that the man was found murdered at his residence. The police immediately reached the spot and found that his throat was slit with a sharp weapon.     During investigations, the woman told the police that a group of unidentified men wearing masks had entered their house, demanding money and gold jewellery. When they refused to part with the money, the men slit her husbands throat with a knife and fled the scene. She later called the former sarpanch and informed him about the incident, following which Kamble got in touch with the police.     D N Mohite, the police inspector in-charge of the LCB, said, "We reached the spot immediately after being told about the murder. We believed the information we received about the murder and suspected that the robbers had committed the crime. We launched the search operation in the neighbouring villages and talukas and passed on the information to increase patrolling during the night to nab the suspects."     "When we asked the woman about the chronology of events during the murder, she could not explain the details about them and the information seemed confused. Following her behavior, we suspected that she had conspired with the attackers and detained her for enquiry. During interrogation, she admitted to have committed the crime," he said.     "According to the woman, her husband would consume liquor every night, after which he would beat her and their daughter up. Since the last four months, he was forcing her daughter into a relationship. The woman said she had called her relatives and neighbours and informed them about his misbehavior. They told him not to do so, however, the man did not heed them," he said.     On Tuesday night, when the man went to sleep after his meal, his wife allegedly took slit his throat. She later hid the weapon far away from her home. She told neighbours that robbers had murdered her husband.     "We have seized the weapon and arrested her for the crime. We are investigating the case further," he said.     ||KOLHAPUR
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/kolhapur/Pansare-murder-case-continues-to-be-a-riddle-for-cops/articleshow/48549257.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:50 IST 2015||KOLHAPUR: Four murders, including the high-profile case of veteran CPI leader Govind Pansare that shook the entire nation, remain unsolved even after considerable time has elapsed. Police officials from Kolhapur said they were trying to search for clues to trace the criminals behind the murders but have not been successful yet.     Police inspector in-charge of the local crime branch D N Mohite said, "Besides the investigation of the Pansare murder case, three murder cases were reported in the district this year which are yet to be solved. We are investigating them all but have not got sufficient evidence to reach out to the culprits involved in these crimes. The respective police stations are busy hunting for clues to trace the murderers."     According to the police officials, a total of 23 murders have been reported in the district in the last six months till June-end; and while the police have been able to solve 19 of the murder cases, they remain clueless about the four murders.     In the first murder mystery, the body of 35-year-old man was found near a reservoir in Kaneriwadi in Karveer taluka recently. It was cut into small pieces and wrapped in a gunny sack. The police are still to find a substantial clue into the case.     In another case, the body of a woman was found in an agricultural field in the Kodoli area in Panhala taluka. The police continue to investigate the case in a bid to get more information about the woman and trace the criminal responsible for the act.     In the third case, the body of a labourer was found in the Gavghag area of Ichlkaranji. Police have not yet received any clue regarding the murderer. The common link tying all the three murders together is that all the victims were attacked with sharp weapons and the police have not been able to identify the bodies and their relatives. The police officials said that once they identify the persons, it would be easy for them to trace the culprits.     "We are gathering information regarding all the unsolved murder cases and are investigating to trace the culprits behind the crimes," Mohite said.     ||KOLHAPUR
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/noida/Woman-hounded-by-biker-gang-shot-at-for-protesting/articleshow/48549053.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:50 IST 2015||GHAZIABAD: Lawlessness plumbed new depths in Ghaziabad on Tuesday evening when a 21-year-old woman was chased and harassed by a dozen men on a crowded street in Loni and shot at when she objected. Passersby stood in shock and watched but none came forward to help.    The woman, who works for a private firm in Delhi, sustained a gunshot injury on her right thigh and is being treated at GTB Hospital. She said the men started chasing her after she got off an auto at Indrapuri Chowk and kept following her through Buddh Bazar market.    She told a TOI team, which visited her at GTB Hospital on Wednesday, that a group of men began jeering at her as she walked into a lane. "One of the men put his hand on my shoulder," she said. "I objected and shouted at them and began walking towards my home. But around a dozen men then accosted me. Some of the men were on bikes and passed lewd comments. Most of them are local youths who drink and regularly misbehave with women in the area. I dialled the police for help," she said.    But before the police arrived, one of the men, who she identified as Riyaz, opened fire. "The bullet pierced the knob of my handbag and entered my right thigh. Bleeding, I sat on the edge of the road asking for help. But none came forward. People gathered only after the attackers disappeared. I was taken to a nearby private hospital by my sister with the help of a biker passing by," she added.    The woman's brother said it was Riyaz who orchestrated the attack, though he had never misbehaved with her earlier and there was no history of animosity between them. "Riyaz, along with two other guys, was following my sister on a motorcycle. He was seated last on a bike that had two pillion riders. He got off to open fire at her," the brother said.    This correspondent spoke to several locals and hawkers in the Indrapuri area, all of whom corroborated the woman's version. But each of them also denied they had "witnessed" the attack and claimed to have heard about it from others.    The woman's family told TOI a police team arrived only when she had been shifted to a private hospital. The police took her to GTB Hospital in Delhi, where she underwent a surgery on Wednesday morning. The bullet was extracted and she was shifted to a ward.    An FIR was filed at Loni Border police station against unknown persons under section 307 (attempt to murder) of the IPC. Two of the suspects were arrested later on Wedneday evening, but Riyaz was absconding. "We visited the Indrapuri area and spoke to eyewitnesses and local people. We have also taken the statements of the woman and her family at the hospital. We have got certain leads and expect to nab the culprits soon," said Anil Kumar, DSP, Ghaziabad.  ||GHAZIABAD
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/noida/12-yr-old-hurt-in-celebratory-firing-in-Masuri/articleshow/48549002.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:50 IST 2015||GHAZIABAD: A 12-year-old girl was critically injured by a gunshot wound in her head during a celebratory firing in Masuri on Wednesday evening. Police said people fired guns to mark the birth of a child in the girl's neighbourhood in Gaaland village.    The girl was rushed to GTB Hospital in Delhi where her condition is said to be critical. Police said the girl was on her terrace with other kids in the neighbourhood, when a bullet hit her. It was allegedly fired by a youth, identified as Sandeep by villagers.    "The function was being held in the house of a person identified as Sripal. A DJ was also playing music during the function and several inebriated young men were dancing to the tunes. Eyewitnesses in the village told us that Sandeep suddenly whipped out a country-made pistol from his pocket and began firing randomly into the air. One of the bullets hit the girl in her head. Sandeep fled from the spot immediately after the incident," Ghaziabad ASP Vipin Tada told TOI.    The incident took place a little after 6 pm. The girl's family members, who accompanied her to the hospital in Delhi, were not available to describe their version of the event.    A complaint was filed at the Masuri police station by Laxman Singh, a relative of the girl. An FIR has been lodged against Sandeep under Section 307 (attempt to murder) of the IPC.  ||GHAZIABAD
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Maharashtra-records-maximum-cases-of-crimes-against-senior-citizens/articleshow/48548106.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:50 IST 2015||Mumbai: Maharashtra is no state for the old. With 3,981 cases of crimes against senior citizens registered in 2014, it is the worst state for the elderly, according to the latest available National Crime Records Bureau numbers.     In all, 18,714 cases ranging from murder, rape, robbery to extortion and cheating were registered in India's 36 states in 2014. It means Maharashtra recorded 21.2% of the country's total cases. It was followed by Madhya Pradesh with 3,438 cases, Tamil Nadu with 2,121, Andhra Pradesh with 1,852 and Delhi with 1,021 cases.     Except cases of murder and attempt to murder — Tamil Nadu proved the deadliest for senior citizens — Maharashtra was the blackest zone for the greying in all other crimes like rape, robbery, dacoity with murder, cheating and extortion.     Though city-wise numbers were not available, Mumbai has seen a string of serious offences against the elderly over the past years, which is in resonance with the state's record. This July, a 19-year-old restaurant delivery boy was arrested for robbing and killing 72-year-old Chanda Raheja, who was wheelchair-bound, in her Santacruz flat. He had served Raheja as a house help earlier and targeted the helpless woman when he was out of a job.     Security experts said a majority of offences against senior citizens are committed by persons known to victims, like house help. Many people when hiring help do not register them with the local police for fear of losing them. "Even the local police are least bothered and senior citizen details are not updated regularly. The cops assigned to visit registered senior citizens too are lackadaisical and skip houses," said an official.     At Mumbai police commissioner Rakesh Maria's instructions police presence on roads has been beefed up to keep a check on crimes against women, children and senior citizens. "Robbery cases include chain snatchings when senior citizens go for morning walk at isolated places," said a police official, advising that they would do better to keep to areas and hours when people are about.     Sion hospital dean Dr Suleman Merchant said the elderly are the softest targets for people eyeing easy money. Physically frail and emotionally vulnerable in the absence of an adequate support system, they often live alone. "The few that rely on house help are as much at risk of being targeted by them as they are of counting on them for assistance," said Merchant.     "To tackle crime against them, cops, ALMs and NGOs should put in extra efforts to sensitize them. Many senior citizens stay alone as their children work elsewhere. There should be awareness programmes for them to register with police or NGOs as well as interaction programmes so that they do not remain isolated. Most senior citizens fallen victim to crime when they stay in isolation," said Milind Muske, project director or Praja, a non-partisan organization working with senior citizens.             ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:50 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:50 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/SC-acquits-Romesh-Sharma-in-Budhiraja-murder-case/articleshow/48704930.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:50 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Thursday upheld the Delhi High Court order acquitting former Congress leader Romesh Sharma in the case relating to the killing of fashion designer Kunjum Budhiraja.     A bench of Justices Pinaki Chandra Ghose and R K Agrawal dismissed an appeal filed by the Delhi government challenging HC order.     The Delhi government contended that the HC had erred in acquitting Sharma but it was strongly opposed by his counsel and senior advocate Siddharth Luthra who submitted that his client was in love with Kunjum and there was no evidence to prove his involvement in the case.     Sharma, who was alleged to be a frontman of underworld don Dawood Ibrahim, was convicted by a trial court on February 15, 2008. Kunjum was killed on March 20, 1999 at Sharma's South Delhi-based 'Jai Mata Di' farm house by a group of hired gangsters from Uttar Pradesh.     The trial court had convicted Sharma and five other accused in the case and had awarded life term to all. The HC, however, acquitted Sharma and co-accused Tejendir Verdi but upheld conviction and sentence of other four accused— Sharma's nephew Surinder Mishra, Hemchand, Santram and Ramesh alias Bobby.     While acquitting Sharma, the HC had said "Romesh Sharma and Kunjum were in love, and desired the company of each other. It does not establish that Sharma had got fed up with her". It had turned down Delhi police's contention that Sharma wanted to get rid of Kunjum as she knew about his alleged illegal activities.     "A grieving lover falling over the body of his mate and performing the rituals of a marriage can well be an expression of lasting love, and need not necessarily be a drama," the HC had said.     Sharma was in judicial custody at the time of the Kunjum's murder.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Raid-on-Bengaluru-centre-reveals-horror-tales/articleshow/48704718.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:50 IST 2015||BENGALURU: A State Human Rights Commission raid on a de-addiction centre in Jnanabharati Layout, near Kengeri, southwest Bengaluru, found 90 inmates living in pathetic conditions and subjected to inhuman treatment.     Thursday's raid followed the murder of an inmate of another de-addiction centre in Kothanur recently.     The SHRC raid on Sri Santhosh Social Service Society, also known as 4S Society, followed a tipoff. According to SHRC officials, the centre has been in existence for seven years at least, but the society couldn't produce documents of having obtained permission from the social welfare department. Commission officials said the centre had the permission from the DC and the DHO.     "Most inmates are between 20 and 35 years. They showed us signs of being physically abused. The centre has violated other norms too. Although it's supposed to have one nurse for every 15 patients and at least one in-house doctor and a psychiatrist, it didn't have any," said an SHRC spokesperson.     4 arrested for killing inmate:     Kothanur police arrested a de-addiction centre staffer and three inmates for allegedly beating to death a 28-year-old inmate. Dinesh was admitted to the centre by his family as he was an alcoholic. He was later found dead in a hospital. Family members noticed several bruises on his body. Narayana, an inmate-turned-staffer, gave some medicines to Dinesh, who later turned aggressive. Narayana sought the help of inmates Suresh, Subhan and Simon, to subdue Dinesh.     When Dinesh retaliated, the quartet overpowered him till he became unconscious. He died in hospital.||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/A-jolly-good-fellow-say-Khannas-friends/articleshow/48704630.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:50 IST 2015||Sanjeev Khanna, Indrani Mukerjea's second husband and suspected ally in Sheena Bora's killing, may be the most surprising element in this macabre drama, but his friends and associates in Kolkata refused to cast aspersions on "Sanju" just yet.     From being the biggest dart enthusiast at one of Kolkata's poshest clubs (the CC&FC) to having a finger in every pie, Sanjeev was everyone's "best mate" and go-to guy who friends described as: "A doer... someone who could get things done."     The morning after Khanna's arrest, TOI spoke to Ajay Rawla, the man who Khanna worked for as a consultant and whose house he was picked up from on Wednesday afternoon. "It wasn't like he was hiding like a desperate fugitive in my house. We had a meeting in the morning after which he drove me home and that's when news broke on television. We were sitting, watching, wondering what steps to take when the police arrived," explained Rawla.     Seven years his senior, Khanna's association with Rawla dates back to the time they went to Mayo College in Ajmer. Later, Khanna went on to become an aide for Rawla's pet projects. Besides running his own business in wireless communications, Khanna was there setting up chef Shaun Kenworthy and Rawla's restaurant 1658 or immersed in the heritage project of converting the Bawali Rajbari into a hotel. "He was getting all the construction work and labourers in place. He was very good in helping out with permissions through his connections with excise and contractors," remembers Kenworthy.     Khanna, who seldom missed his outings at the club, motor rallies and horse racing as a prominent face in the social circuit, was not the same man before he met Indrani, recounts Bull Banthia, a close friend. "Well-read and well-versed, Sanju had a great mechanical mind with a solution for everything," is how Bull chose to describe his "jolly good friend who loved meeting new people, hung out at the club but wasn't a social climber". "It was Indrani who emerged as this socialite and drove him to consciously build contacts with those higher up in the social rung after marriage," said the Kolkata-based entrepreneur. "That's the reason why I distanced myself from them until overnight she left Kolkata with their daughter and Sanju's wallet."     While Indrani never surfaces in conversations, his daughter Vidhie, who stayed with Indrani, is a fond subject with his friends. "He would miss his daughter but was resigned to fate, hoping that someday she would find him," said Rawla, adding, "It was Vidhie who called Sanjeev on Wednesday to give him the news."     No one seems to know about any recent interaction between Khanna and Indrani. G M Kapur, a known name in Kolkata who was Intach's state convener and happens to be Khanna's "mama", seemed disturbed with "all the theorizing" of Khanna's role in the crime. He declined to look back on Indrani and Khanna's relationship but added, "The last that there was any contact with Indrani or her family was when Vidhie visited Calcutta last year to celebrate the 75th birthday of her grandmother (Khanna's mother who lives with him)."     Khanna's Facebook posts on "karma" in the weeks and months following Sheena's alleged murder on April 24, 2012, make for interesting reading. On April 30, Khanna shared photo messages: "Say whatever, whenever the f*** you want to"; "Sometimes I get so weird, I even freak myself out".     On May 24, exactly a month after the alleged killing, he wrote: "You can never tell what people are thinking and feeling unless they tell you, and usually they lie. you ask them, 'Whats wrong?' and they say 'Nothing'. You accept this because it's easier than digging for the truth. People smile when they want to cry, they laugh when they want to scream and shout. They pretend like nothing is wrong because they don't want to face the truth. Things aren't always rainbows and butterflies, sometimes you gotta scream and cry your anger and sadness to the world, because you can only hold it in for so long before something in you snaps. so when you want to cry, cry. When you want to scream, scream. Don't hide behind fake smiles, it's ok to not be alright."     ||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Sheena-docu-Michail-add-to-mystery/articleshow/48701752.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:50 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Michail, Sheena's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered have raised a number of unanswered questions.    Two days after his mother, Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Michail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai Police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed that what he gave to police was enough to prove that Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora (who are actually parents of Indrani) as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. Some questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukherjea.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Michail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43 as mentioned in reports after her arrest.    Adding more to the suspense, Michail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Michail studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board examination, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that knew that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard that her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard that she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband who she introduced as Peter Mukherjea."    The two-member Mumbai Police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Michail, who on Wednesday, was the first one to reveal that Sheena was Indrani's daughter, twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Michail's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Michail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukherjae is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Michail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."  ||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Grandparents-are-Sheenas-mom-dad-on-birth-certificate/articleshow/48704559.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:50 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Mikhail, Sheena Bora's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered led to some unanswered questions on Thursday.    Two days after his mother Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Mikhail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed what he gave the police was enough to prove Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora, who are actually Indrani's parents, as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. However, many questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter. In many cases in India involving single mothers, grandparents are known to put in their names as father and mother.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukerjea, that is, 13 years after Sheena was born.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Mikhail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43.    Mikhail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Mikhail     studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board exam, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband, who she introduced as Peter Mukerjea."    The two-member Mumbai police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Mikhail twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Mikhail 's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time, he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Mikhail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukerjea is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Mikhail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Sheena-bowled-us-over-Rahuls-uncle/articleshow/48704552.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:50 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: Had things worked out as desired for Peter Mukherjea's first wife Shabnam and her family in Dehradun, Rahul Mukherjea and Sheena Bora would have been married for over three years now.     Shabnam's brother Shaleen Singh told TOI on Thursday that in 2011 Rahul brought Sheena to their sprawling home in Dehradun to seek approval from the family for their marriage.     The entire family-Shabnam, her younger brother Shaleen, father Anand Singh and mother Seema-were reportedly bowled over by Sheena's jovial nature and affection towards the elderly people. Impressed, the family gave its "unqualified and unanimous approval" for the wedding, which was supposed to take place within a few months, said Shaleen.     Stunned by the recent development, Shaleen said, "Sheena was among those rare persons who left a deep and lifelong impact on people. She was good-looking, a sweet person, clean of heart and good to talk to. None of us objected to the wedding."     Shaleen learnt of Sheena's murder through news channels. "It would have been great if she had become a part of the family. I don't know what was the cause and motive behind the heinous crime, but all those behind the killing of the jovial-natured girl should not be spared at any cost," he said.     A former model and tele-actor, 49-year-old Shaleen today owns the Sanskar International school in Jogiwala here. He recalled the last meeting with Shabnam and Rahul in April this year. "My father Anand Singh passed away in April. They had come to pay their respects but we did not interact much."     However, Shaleen said of late the interaction between him and his sister Shabnam was limited. Although Shabnam's farm Gul-e-Shabnam and Shaleen's residence Shankar Sadan are barely 200 metres away in Badripur, meetings between them were rare. While Shaleen and his mother stay on different floors of Shankar Sadan, Shabnam stays alone at her residence and is frequently visited by Rahul.     "There are matters in each family which we do not want to disclose. We are not against each other but do not interact much. She comes to meet our mother occasionally," said Shaleen, adding that Shabnam was passionate about painting and had a studio in her residence.     Shaleen denied having any details about the presence of Mumbai police in Dehradun. "Neither Doon police nor Mumbai police have contacted me over the issue."     Staff at Shabnam's residence said she was out-of-station but they were not aware of her whereabouts.||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Kilpauk-doctor-murder-Hubby-to-approach-court/articleshow/48704411.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:50 IST 2015||CHENNAI: It's been four days since police claimed to have solved the murder of S Sathya, 24, a PG medical student. However, her husband has put forth questions that police have failed to answer. Though investigating officers confirmed Sathya was not sexually assaulted before she was killed, they leaked to some section of media saying that they changed their stance on Wednesday and said there were indications of attempt to rape on the deceased.     Police personnel revealed the details soon after Sathya's husband Dr P Sesu, also employed at a primary health centre in Perambalur, expressed certain doubts.     He alleged the police hastily solved the case citing the state assembly, which is in motion. Sathya was found dead at her house in Kilpauk on August 20.     On August 23, police arrested Harintham Depnath, a BTech graduate, who lived at the second floor on the same apartment. Neither was there any mention about sexual assault or attempt on Sathya when the body was recovered from the house. The nor did the doctors. Police didn't tell this during the arrest of Depnath on August 23. "What forced the police to reveal about the sexual harassment attempt on my wife now?" asked Sesu.     "I want to live a peaceful life with my two sons - Tamil Nesan, 6, and Karmugilan, 4. The studies and the future of my children is important for me. I do respect the police personnel who spent sleepless nights to solve the murder, but there are questions that need to be answered," he said.     "I live in Perambalur with my children, but we speak through live video calls. I have told my sons that Sathya has gone to the God, as the Almighty likes her more. "Hereafter, we cannot speak or meet her. I don't know how far my children will admit it?" said Sesu. "I will approach the court seeking a fair probe into the murder of my wife. I want to find out the real cause behind her death. I want the real accused to get punished for his deed," said Sesu.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Woman-strangles-husbands-lover/articleshow/48704388.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:50 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A woman beat up and strangled her husband's partner, an assistant professor at a polytechnic in Choolaimedu, in their Thiruverkadu home on Thursday, police said. A court later remanded the accused, 32-year-old Shruti, in judicial custody.     Police said Sambasivam, a professor at Panimalar Engineering College in Poonamallee, used to bring Rajalakshmi, home frequently and introduced her to his wife Shruti as a colleague. He even dropped her home at night. The polytechnic where Rajalakshmi worked was part of the Panimalar group of educational institutions. Shruti initially believed the two were just colleagues until Sambasivam came home with Rajalakshmi on Tuesday and said the woman was moving in with them permanently.     On Wednesday morning, Sambasivam allegedly tied a 'mangalsutra' to Rajalakshmi in front of his wife, police said, based on Shruti's confession. A shocked Shruti picked up a fight with Sambasivam who asked her to maintain a cordial relationship and take care of Rajalakshmi. On Thursday morning, after he left for college a fight broke out between the two women.     Police said Rajalakshmi allegedly abused Sruthi and went into the bathroom. Sruthi followed her in and strangled her with the 'mangalsutra'. She then tried to make it appear that the woman had fainted in the bathroom. She took her in an autorickshaw to a nearby hospital where she was declared 'brought dead'. Doctors who noticed a few marks around her neck informed the Thiruverkadu police who registered a case of suspicious death under CrPC section 176.     The body was sent for postmortem to Kilpauk Medical College and Hospital.     After finding that the two women were at home at the time of the death, police interrogated Sruthi for more than an hour but she continued to maintain that Rajyalakshmi had died of injuries sustained when she fell down in the bathroom.     "She confessed to the murder when we told her that her fingerprints had been lifted from the scene of crime," said an investigating officer. "She said she had smashed the woman's head against the wall and later strangled her with the 'thali'." Police altered the case to murder and arrested Sruthi.     Initial inquiries revealed that Rajalakshmi had been married to a man named Rajasekhar for a while and they had separated. She then got married to Suresh, a relative who worked in a private firm, a few years ago and the couple moved into a house in Mogappair.     They allegedly had frequent quarrels as he tortured her and she left him too, police found.     Rajalakshmi then got a job with Panimalar Engineering College where she met Sambasivam. The two became friends and began seeing each other. Rajalakshmi recently moved to the polytechnic in Choolaimedu, police said.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/US-journalists-killer-annoyed-colleagues-Ex-boss/articleshow/48704167.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:50 IST 2015||ROANOKE, United States: The disgruntled former US television station employee who murdered two journalists had "annoyed" colleagues but showed no signs at work of any mental health issues, his former boss said Thursday.     Vester Lee Flanagan, 41, worked as a reporter for WDBJ in Roanoke, Virginia from March 2012 to February 2013, but was dismissed for poor performance and angry behavior, general manager Jeffrey Marks said.     On Wednesday, Flanagan shot and killed two of the CBS affiliate's journalists while they were conducting an on-air interview. He later fatally shot himself.     "We are still at a loss to figure out what happened to him in those two and a half years" since he was fired, Marks told a news conference flanked by dozens of staff, many of them holding hands.     "I don't think we identified that he had mental health issues. We certainly identified that he had performance issues."     Marks defended the station's hiring record and said its parent company had "a very elaborate program to screen employees."     Flanagan passed background checks and came with only positive references, Marks said.     It was only after he was hired, Marks said, that things went downhill.     "Vester's behavior annoyed a lot of people in the news station," Marks said.     Flanagan, who went by the on-screen name Bryce Williams, alleged in a manifesto faxed to ABC News that he was discriminated against as a gay, black journalist.     Marks said accusations in 2013 that he was treated unfairly were "immediately investigated and found to be without merit."     During his employment, Flanagan complied with demands that he seek medical help, but he was ultimately dismissed.     He was escorted from the building by police and made an ominous aside to the news director -- handing him a wooden cross and saying "'you'll need this'," Marks said.     As he left, he also made a "derogatory comment" to Adam Ward, the cameraman he shot dead on Wednesday.     Flanagan filed a complaint with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and a civil action suit, which were dismissed, he said.     "All of these investigations determined that no reasonable person would have taken any of the cited incidents as discrimination or harassment."     After killing Ward and reporter Alison Parker live on the air, Flanagan posted a video of the attack on social media.||ROANOKE, UNITED STATES
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:50 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/SC-acquits-Romesh-Sharma-in-Budhiraja-murder-case/articleshow/48704930.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:50 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Thursday upheld the Delhi High Court order acquitting former Congress leader Romesh Sharma in the case relating to the killing of fashion designer Kunjum Budhiraja.     A bench of Justices Pinaki Chandra Ghose and R K Agrawal dismissed an appeal filed by the Delhi government challenging HC order.     The Delhi government contended that the HC had erred in acquitting Sharma but it was strongly opposed by his counsel and senior advocate Siddharth Luthra who submitted that his client was in love with Kunjum and there was no evidence to prove his involvement in the case.     Sharma, who was alleged to be a frontman of underworld don Dawood Ibrahim, was convicted by a trial court on February 15, 2008. Kunjum was killed on March 20, 1999 at Sharma's South Delhi-based 'Jai Mata Di' farm house by a group of hired gangsters from Uttar Pradesh.     The trial court had convicted Sharma and five other accused in the case and had awarded life term to all. The HC, however, acquitted Sharma and co-accused Tejendir Verdi but upheld conviction and sentence of other four accused— Sharma's nephew Surinder Mishra, Hemchand, Santram and Ramesh alias Bobby.     While acquitting Sharma, the HC had said "Romesh Sharma and Kunjum were in love, and desired the company of each other. It does not establish that Sharma had got fed up with her". It had turned down Delhi police's contention that Sharma wanted to get rid of Kunjum as she knew about his alleged illegal activities.     "A grieving lover falling over the body of his mate and performing the rituals of a marriage can well be an expression of lasting love, and need not necessarily be a drama," the HC had said.     Sharma was in judicial custody at the time of the Kunjum's murder.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Raid-on-Bengaluru-centre-reveals-horror-tales/articleshow/48704718.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:50 IST 2015||BENGALURU: A State Human Rights Commission raid on a de-addiction centre in Jnanabharati Layout, near Kengeri, southwest Bengaluru, found 90 inmates living in pathetic conditions and subjected to inhuman treatment.     Thursday's raid followed the murder of an inmate of another de-addiction centre in Kothanur recently.     The SHRC raid on Sri Santhosh Social Service Society, also known as 4S Society, followed a tipoff. According to SHRC officials, the centre has been in existence for seven years at least, but the society couldn't produce documents of having obtained permission from the social welfare department. Commission officials said the centre had the permission from the DC and the DHO.     "Most inmates are between 20 and 35 years. They showed us signs of being physically abused. The centre has violated other norms too. Although it's supposed to have one nurse for every 15 patients and at least one in-house doctor and a psychiatrist, it didn't have any," said an SHRC spokesperson.     4 arrested for killing inmate:     Kothanur police arrested a de-addiction centre staffer and three inmates for allegedly beating to death a 28-year-old inmate. Dinesh was admitted to the centre by his family as he was an alcoholic. He was later found dead in a hospital. Family members noticed several bruises on his body. Narayana, an inmate-turned-staffer, gave some medicines to Dinesh, who later turned aggressive. Narayana sought the help of inmates Suresh, Subhan and Simon, to subdue Dinesh.     When Dinesh retaliated, the quartet overpowered him till he became unconscious. He died in hospital.||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/A-jolly-good-fellow-say-Khannas-friends/articleshow/48704630.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:50 IST 2015||Sanjeev Khanna, Indrani Mukerjea's second husband and suspected ally in Sheena Bora's killing, may be the most surprising element in this macabre drama, but his friends and associates in Kolkata refused to cast aspersions on "Sanju" just yet.     From being the biggest dart enthusiast at one of Kolkata's poshest clubs (the CC&FC) to having a finger in every pie, Sanjeev was everyone's "best mate" and go-to guy who friends described as: "A doer... someone who could get things done."     The morning after Khanna's arrest, TOI spoke to Ajay Rawla, the man who Khanna worked for as a consultant and whose house he was picked up from on Wednesday afternoon. "It wasn't like he was hiding like a desperate fugitive in my house. We had a meeting in the morning after which he drove me home and that's when news broke on television. We were sitting, watching, wondering what steps to take when the police arrived," explained Rawla.     Seven years his senior, Khanna's association with Rawla dates back to the time they went to Mayo College in Ajmer. Later, Khanna went on to become an aide for Rawla's pet projects. Besides running his own business in wireless communications, Khanna was there setting up chef Shaun Kenworthy and Rawla's restaurant 1658 or immersed in the heritage project of converting the Bawali Rajbari into a hotel. "He was getting all the construction work and labourers in place. He was very good in helping out with permissions through his connections with excise and contractors," remembers Kenworthy.     Khanna, who seldom missed his outings at the club, motor rallies and horse racing as a prominent face in the social circuit, was not the same man before he met Indrani, recounts Bull Banthia, a close friend. "Well-read and well-versed, Sanju had a great mechanical mind with a solution for everything," is how Bull chose to describe his "jolly good friend who loved meeting new people, hung out at the club but wasn't a social climber". "It was Indrani who emerged as this socialite and drove him to consciously build contacts with those higher up in the social rung after marriage," said the Kolkata-based entrepreneur. "That's the reason why I distanced myself from them until overnight she left Kolkata with their daughter and Sanju's wallet."     While Indrani never surfaces in conversations, his daughter Vidhie, who stayed with Indrani, is a fond subject with his friends. "He would miss his daughter but was resigned to fate, hoping that someday she would find him," said Rawla, adding, "It was Vidhie who called Sanjeev on Wednesday to give him the news."     No one seems to know about any recent interaction between Khanna and Indrani. G M Kapur, a known name in Kolkata who was Intach's state convener and happens to be Khanna's "mama", seemed disturbed with "all the theorizing" of Khanna's role in the crime. He declined to look back on Indrani and Khanna's relationship but added, "The last that there was any contact with Indrani or her family was when Vidhie visited Calcutta last year to celebrate the 75th birthday of her grandmother (Khanna's mother who lives with him)."     Khanna's Facebook posts on "karma" in the weeks and months following Sheena's alleged murder on April 24, 2012, make for interesting reading. On April 30, Khanna shared photo messages: "Say whatever, whenever the f*** you want to"; "Sometimes I get so weird, I even freak myself out".     On May 24, exactly a month after the alleged killing, he wrote: "You can never tell what people are thinking and feeling unless they tell you, and usually they lie. you ask them, 'Whats wrong?' and they say 'Nothing'. You accept this because it's easier than digging for the truth. People smile when they want to cry, they laugh when they want to scream and shout. They pretend like nothing is wrong because they don't want to face the truth. Things aren't always rainbows and butterflies, sometimes you gotta scream and cry your anger and sadness to the world, because you can only hold it in for so long before something in you snaps. so when you want to cry, cry. When you want to scream, scream. Don't hide behind fake smiles, it's ok to not be alright."     ||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Sheena-docu-Michail-add-to-mystery/articleshow/48701752.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:50 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Michail, Sheena's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered have raised a number of unanswered questions.    Two days after his mother, Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Michail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai Police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed that what he gave to police was enough to prove that Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora (who are actually parents of Indrani) as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. Some questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukherjea.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Michail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43 as mentioned in reports after her arrest.    Adding more to the suspense, Michail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Michail studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board examination, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that knew that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard that her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard that she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband who she introduced as Peter Mukherjea."    The two-member Mumbai Police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Michail, who on Wednesday, was the first one to reveal that Sheena was Indrani's daughter, twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Michail's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Michail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukherjae is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Michail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."  ||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Grandparents-are-Sheenas-mom-dad-on-birth-certificate/articleshow/48704559.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:50 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Mikhail, Sheena Bora's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered led to some unanswered questions on Thursday.    Two days after his mother Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Mikhail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed what he gave the police was enough to prove Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora, who are actually Indrani's parents, as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. However, many questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter. In many cases in India involving single mothers, grandparents are known to put in their names as father and mother.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukerjea, that is, 13 years after Sheena was born.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Mikhail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43.    Mikhail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Mikhail     studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board exam, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband, who she introduced as Peter Mukerjea."    The two-member Mumbai police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Mikhail twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Mikhail 's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time, he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Mikhail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukerjea is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Mikhail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Sheena-bowled-us-over-Rahuls-uncle/articleshow/48704552.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:50 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: Had things worked out as desired for Peter Mukherjea's first wife Shabnam and her family in Dehradun, Rahul Mukherjea and Sheena Bora would have been married for over three years now.     Shabnam's brother Shaleen Singh told TOI on Thursday that in 2011 Rahul brought Sheena to their sprawling home in Dehradun to seek approval from the family for their marriage.     The entire family-Shabnam, her younger brother Shaleen, father Anand Singh and mother Seema-were reportedly bowled over by Sheena's jovial nature and affection towards the elderly people. Impressed, the family gave its "unqualified and unanimous approval" for the wedding, which was supposed to take place within a few months, said Shaleen.     Stunned by the recent development, Shaleen said, "Sheena was among those rare persons who left a deep and lifelong impact on people. She was good-looking, a sweet person, clean of heart and good to talk to. None of us objected to the wedding."     Shaleen learnt of Sheena's murder through news channels. "It would have been great if she had become a part of the family. I don't know what was the cause and motive behind the heinous crime, but all those behind the killing of the jovial-natured girl should not be spared at any cost," he said.     A former model and tele-actor, 49-year-old Shaleen today owns the Sanskar International school in Jogiwala here. He recalled the last meeting with Shabnam and Rahul in April this year. "My father Anand Singh passed away in April. They had come to pay their respects but we did not interact much."     However, Shaleen said of late the interaction between him and his sister Shabnam was limited. Although Shabnam's farm Gul-e-Shabnam and Shaleen's residence Shankar Sadan are barely 200 metres away in Badripur, meetings between them were rare. While Shaleen and his mother stay on different floors of Shankar Sadan, Shabnam stays alone at her residence and is frequently visited by Rahul.     "There are matters in each family which we do not want to disclose. We are not against each other but do not interact much. She comes to meet our mother occasionally," said Shaleen, adding that Shabnam was passionate about painting and had a studio in her residence.     Shaleen denied having any details about the presence of Mumbai police in Dehradun. "Neither Doon police nor Mumbai police have contacted me over the issue."     Staff at Shabnam's residence said she was out-of-station but they were not aware of her whereabouts.||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Kilpauk-doctor-murder-Hubby-to-approach-court/articleshow/48704411.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:50 IST 2015||CHENNAI: It's been four days since police claimed to have solved the murder of S Sathya, 24, a PG medical student. However, her husband has put forth questions that police have failed to answer. Though investigating officers confirmed Sathya was not sexually assaulted before she was killed, they leaked to some section of media saying that they changed their stance on Wednesday and said there were indications of attempt to rape on the deceased.     Police personnel revealed the details soon after Sathya's husband Dr P Sesu, also employed at a primary health centre in Perambalur, expressed certain doubts.     He alleged the police hastily solved the case citing the state assembly, which is in motion. Sathya was found dead at her house in Kilpauk on August 20.     On August 23, police arrested Harintham Depnath, a BTech graduate, who lived at the second floor on the same apartment. Neither was there any mention about sexual assault or attempt on Sathya when the body was recovered from the house. The nor did the doctors. Police didn't tell this during the arrest of Depnath on August 23. "What forced the police to reveal about the sexual harassment attempt on my wife now?" asked Sesu.     "I want to live a peaceful life with my two sons - Tamil Nesan, 6, and Karmugilan, 4. The studies and the future of my children is important for me. I do respect the police personnel who spent sleepless nights to solve the murder, but there are questions that need to be answered," he said.     "I live in Perambalur with my children, but we speak through live video calls. I have told my sons that Sathya has gone to the God, as the Almighty likes her more. "Hereafter, we cannot speak or meet her. I don't know how far my children will admit it?" said Sesu. "I will approach the court seeking a fair probe into the murder of my wife. I want to find out the real cause behind her death. I want the real accused to get punished for his deed," said Sesu.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Woman-strangles-husbands-lover/articleshow/48704388.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:50 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A woman beat up and strangled her husband's partner, an assistant professor at a polytechnic in Choolaimedu, in their Thiruverkadu home on Thursday, police said. A court later remanded the accused, 32-year-old Shruti, in judicial custody.     Police said Sambasivam, a professor at Panimalar Engineering College in Poonamallee, used to bring Rajalakshmi, home frequently and introduced her to his wife Shruti as a colleague. He even dropped her home at night. The polytechnic where Rajalakshmi worked was part of the Panimalar group of educational institutions. Shruti initially believed the two were just colleagues until Sambasivam came home with Rajalakshmi on Tuesday and said the woman was moving in with them permanently.     On Wednesday morning, Sambasivam allegedly tied a 'mangalsutra' to Rajalakshmi in front of his wife, police said, based on Shruti's confession. A shocked Shruti picked up a fight with Sambasivam who asked her to maintain a cordial relationship and take care of Rajalakshmi. On Thursday morning, after he left for college a fight broke out between the two women.     Police said Rajalakshmi allegedly abused Sruthi and went into the bathroom. Sruthi followed her in and strangled her with the 'mangalsutra'. She then tried to make it appear that the woman had fainted in the bathroom. She took her in an autorickshaw to a nearby hospital where she was declared 'brought dead'. Doctors who noticed a few marks around her neck informed the Thiruverkadu police who registered a case of suspicious death under CrPC section 176.     The body was sent for postmortem to Kilpauk Medical College and Hospital.     After finding that the two women were at home at the time of the death, police interrogated Sruthi for more than an hour but she continued to maintain that Rajyalakshmi had died of injuries sustained when she fell down in the bathroom.     "She confessed to the murder when we told her that her fingerprints had been lifted from the scene of crime," said an investigating officer. "She said she had smashed the woman's head against the wall and later strangled her with the 'thali'." Police altered the case to murder and arrested Sruthi.     Initial inquiries revealed that Rajalakshmi had been married to a man named Rajasekhar for a while and they had separated. She then got married to Suresh, a relative who worked in a private firm, a few years ago and the couple moved into a house in Mogappair.     They allegedly had frequent quarrels as he tortured her and she left him too, police found.     Rajalakshmi then got a job with Panimalar Engineering College where she met Sambasivam. The two became friends and began seeing each other. Rajalakshmi recently moved to the polytechnic in Choolaimedu, police said.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/US-journalists-killer-annoyed-colleagues-Ex-boss/articleshow/48704167.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:50 IST 2015||ROANOKE, United States: The disgruntled former US television station employee who murdered two journalists had "annoyed" colleagues but showed no signs at work of any mental health issues, his former boss said Thursday.     Vester Lee Flanagan, 41, worked as a reporter for WDBJ in Roanoke, Virginia from March 2012 to February 2013, but was dismissed for poor performance and angry behavior, general manager Jeffrey Marks said.     On Wednesday, Flanagan shot and killed two of the CBS affiliate's journalists while they were conducting an on-air interview. He later fatally shot himself.     "We are still at a loss to figure out what happened to him in those two and a half years" since he was fired, Marks told a news conference flanked by dozens of staff, many of them holding hands.     "I don't think we identified that he had mental health issues. We certainly identified that he had performance issues."     Marks defended the station's hiring record and said its parent company had "a very elaborate program to screen employees."     Flanagan passed background checks and came with only positive references, Marks said.     It was only after he was hired, Marks said, that things went downhill.     "Vester's behavior annoyed a lot of people in the news station," Marks said.     Flanagan, who went by the on-screen name Bryce Williams, alleged in a manifesto faxed to ABC News that he was discriminated against as a gay, black journalist.     Marks said accusations in 2013 that he was treated unfairly were "immediately investigated and found to be without merit."     During his employment, Flanagan complied with demands that he seek medical help, but he was ultimately dismissed.     He was escorted from the building by police and made an ominous aside to the news director -- handing him a wooden cross and saying "'you'll need this'," Marks said.     As he left, he also made a "derogatory comment" to Adam Ward, the cameraman he shot dead on Wednesday.     Flanagan filed a complaint with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and a civil action suit, which were dismissed, he said.     "All of these investigations determined that no reasonable person would have taken any of the cited incidents as discrimination or harassment."     After killing Ward and reporter Alison Parker live on the air, Flanagan posted a video of the attack on social media.||ROANOKE, UNITED STATES
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/lucknow/HC-grants-bail-to-Sanjay-Sinhs-son/articleshow/48548893.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:55 IST 2015||AMETHI: Nearly two months after being arrested in connection with the murder of a constable in Amethi, Anant Vikram Sinh, son of Congress MP Sanjay Sinh, was granted bail by the Lucknow bench of the high court on Wednesday.    The newly-minted BJP leader had been languishing in Sultanpur jail since July 4, when he was arrested following riots outside the Sinh's family home, Bhupati Bhawan. A constable was shot dead in the clashes. After his bail plea was rejected by the lower courts, Anant's family had moved the high court. The family had alleged the involvement of Congress leader Ameeta Mody Sinh in "framing" Anant in the murder case to settle personal scores, related to the possession of Bhupati Bhawan.  ||AMETHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/pune/President-rejects-mercy-plea-of-two-convicts/articleshow/48548826.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:55 IST 2015||PUNE: President Pranab Mukherjee has rejected the mercy petitions of Jeetu alias Jitya Nayansingh Gehlot and Narayan Chaudhary, who had brutally murdered seven members of the Rathi family in Kothrud 21 years back.     The President's decision clears the way for hanging the two murder convicts who were sentenced to death by a Pune trial court in 1998.     Gehlot, Chaudhary and their third accomplice, Raju Rajpurohit, who later turned approver, had barged into Keshrimal Rathi's flat in Kothrud on August 26, 1994. They wanted to burgle the house but ended up killing seven people, including a pregnant woman, two toddlers and the family's maidservant.     The two were lodged in the Yerawada central jail, but a few years back they were shifted to the Nagpur jail. Rajpurohit was released.     Gehlot and Chaudhary hail from Rajasthan and were in their early 20s when they committed the crime. Rajpurohit was employed at Sagar Sweet Mart, which is owned by Keshrimal Rathi and his son Sanjay Rathi, who eventually lodged a complaint against the trio.     The death sentence was confirmed by the Bombay high court and later by the Supreme Court in September 2000. But their mercy petitions were pending with the President's office for several years. The Union home ministry had on July 27, 2015, filed its report recommending rejection of the petition, sources said.     The victims of the crime included Meera Rathi, aged 45, her daughter-in-law Babita alias Nita Rathi, 24, her daughter Preeti, 19, Meera's married daughter Hemlata, 27, Chirag, Babita's two-and-a-half-year-old son, Pratik, Hemlata's one-and-a-half-year-old son and family's maid servant Satyabhamabai Sutar. The Rathi family lived in flat number 6 of Himanshu Apartments at Sheela Vihar Colony, Kothrud.     ||PUNE
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/pune/Dabholkars-mission-draws-unlikely-followers/articleshow/48548791.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:55 IST 2015||PUNE: Rationalist Narendra Dabholkar's thoughts continue to reach out and influence people.     His ideas have reached innumerable places and a sea of people. From the pious to atheist, from business women to actors, the man and his mission against superstition have more takers today than ever before.     Reverend Chitralekha James of Convent of St Mary, while addressing a congregation, refers to Dabholkar's work and wants her community to be part of his mission. Make-up artist Nandini Jadhav joined Dabholkar's Maharashtra Andhashraddha Nirmulan Samiti (MANS) as a full-time worker. Octogenarian Kaumudi Deshpande used to be a religious person who believed in rituals, but has changed her perception.     The support for MANS is pouring in from all parts of the state. College youths are contributing to the movement and retired professionals like Sadashiv Dalvi and his wife Vanita are now full-time campaigners against superstition.     "Dabholkar has become a role model. He was preaching true religion — the religion of humanity. He stood up against exploitation in the name of religion. If I am not supporting his movement, then I am with those who killed him. It is natural for me as a human being to support rationalism," says Reverend Chitralekha James, who says that Jesus prompted her to join MANS. James now is actively working with the organisation. "True religion is not against rationality. At congregations, I speak about this and appeal people that they should be a part of Dabholkar's mission," she added.     In the last two years, life has turned upside down for Nandini Jadhav. "I was a make up artist and earned anything between Rs 1 lakh and Rs 1.5 lakh. Dabholkar's murder came as a shock to me. It changed the way I think. I decided to join MANS as a full-time worker and take Dabholkar's work forward. Till date, I have organized over 400 meetings to expose fake babas and sadhus. I also traveled to various parts of the state to explain the Anti-Superstition Act to people," said Nandini, who is now Pune district executive president of MANS. "It gives me immense satisfaction to be a part of the movement started by Dabholkar. Hundreds of those who have firm belief in religion have shown interest in understanding our work," she added.     Kaumudi Deshpande, who is in her mid 80s, was a religious person who believed in rituals. But after Dabholkar's murder, she started questioning her own belief. "Why do we perform certain rituals? What is the science behind it? I am searching for a rational behind religious practices. I think Dabholkar taught me to think about it," she said.     Jitendra Joshi, a Marathi theatre and film actor, says that he was unaware of Dabholkar's work. But after the daylight murder, he started reading 'Sadhana' — the weekly that Dabholkar edited for many years.     Krishnath Ratnakar, who is studying mass communication, is curious about Dabholkar's ideology. "I have brought all his books. I am trying to understand the basic problems he fought for during his lifetime. I think every person with a scientific temperament will agree with what he was fighting for," said Krishnath.     "My wife and I have fulfilled our family responsibilities. I was abroad for many years and when I came back to India, I started reading about MANS. I met Dabholkar only once. But the day he was killed, the two of us decided to take up the task of propagating his thoughts. As long as we are alive, we want to work for MANS. This mission is for humanity," said Sadashiv Phalke.     Dabholkar's son Hamid said that those who killed his father definitely know that the man lives in people's hearts. "One can kill a person, but not his thoughts. Today, thousands are getting connected with MANS. Our family is growing every day and we all will continue to fight for a cause," he said.     ||PUNE
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/pune/CBI-needs-more-teeth-to-catch-rationalists-killers/articleshow/48548783.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:55 IST 2015||PUNE: The CBI has sought more manpower from the state home department to expedite probe into the Narendra Dabholkar murder case.     The CBI had appointed an additional superintendent of police and two constables to conduct investigations after the Bombay High Court took the probe away from Pune police on May 8, 2014 for failing to find the killers.     Recently, the CBI's Navi Mumbai unit sent a proposal to the home department requesting for additional manpower, precisely an assistant commissioner of police, a police inspector and sub-inspector from the Pune police.     The additional chief secretary of the home department has sought views of the Pune police commissioner on CBI's demand. The home department will take a call after receiving a report from the Pune police.     A CBI official said, "We are using manpower from our other units in Mumbai and other cities. Therefore, a proposal for more manpower has been put up with the state home department. Dabholkar's family has also appealed to us to expedite investigations."     In response to an email sent by TOI, CBI's New Delhi-based chief information officer Kanchan Prasad sent an SMS on Wednesday: "Dabholkar murder case is under active investigation despite shortage of officers. However, at this stage, it will not be appropriate to share details of the probe."     Dabholkar (65), the founder president of the Maharashtra Andhashraddha Nirmulan Samiti (MANS), had launched a sustained crusade for enactment of a law to curb black magic and superstition. He was shot dead by unknown assailants while he was on his walk on the Balgandharva bridge at 7.15am on August 20, 2013.     Dabholkar's murder had created a furore across the state and the country, bringing immense public pressure on police to nab the killers. However, despite numerous Pune police teams being put on the job and their claims of getting close to cracking the case, no headway was made. Eventually, the murder probe was transferred to the CBI on May 8, 2014, following a Bombay high court directive, which gave a verdict on a petition filed by activist Kiran Tirodkar.     On January 20, 2014, police arrested arms dealer Manish Nagori (24) and his aide, Vikas Khandelwal (22), on the basis of a ballistic expert report that suggested that a firearm used by the assailants matched one seized from Nagori and Khandelwal. The duo was charged with criminal conspiracy in Dabholkar's murder.     Nagori and Khandelwal, however, denied their involvement in the murder, saying they were in the custody of various police agencies since August 20, the day Dabholkar was shot dead in Pune. The duo was eventually let off on bail as the crime branch failed to file a chargesheet against them within the stipulated 90-day period.     On April 4, police formed a special investigation team (SIT) comprising officials from Pune, Sangli, Satara, Kolhapur and Ratnagiri to probe the murder. The SIT too had failed to make any headway in the case.     The CBI later released fresh sketches of the two suspects, who had gunned down Dabholkar, based on the description given by eye witnesses. But it has failed to identity them.     ||PUNE
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/delhi/Delhi-Police-claims-registration-of-cases-up-not-crime/articleshow/48548506.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:55 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The number of cases registered for serious offences like rape, murder and theft nearly doubled in the city from 2013 to 2014, but police attribute this to liberal registration of cases rather than a sudden spurt in crime. Data released by National Crime Records Bureau (NCRB) shows police stations in Delhi recorded 1.65 lakh cases of "cognizable" crime in 2014, up from only 86,800 in 2013.    Police stations have been directed to register a case on every complaint that merits it. Police chief B S Bassi says "freer" registration of cases has revealed a true picture of the crime situation in the capital. In his annual press conference, Bassi had mentioned how police's reluctance to file FIRs distorted the crime graph earlier. For instance, 64,882 crimes were reported in 1998 but the number came down to 54,287 in 2012 despite a significant increase in population over the 14-year period.    NCRB data also shows that more cases are being solved now. In 2014, Delhi Police solved 43,431 cases as against 36,134 in 2013. As per the national index, Delhi accounts for 0.7% of the total number of cognizable crimes reported in cities across India. In 2014, the number of heinous crimes increased sharply because the number of robberies reported increased by more than five times, from 1,245 to 6,464.    Of the 586 murders reported in 2014, about 90% were for personal vendetta, and 76 were committed using illegal firearms. Most of the victims were aged 18-60 years. But 2014 turned out to be a safer year for senior citizens as there were 22 murders in the over-60 age group, down from 45 in 2013.    The NCRB figures make a case for lowering the age of maturity from 18 years to 16 years, as 51 juveniles were found to be involved in cases of murder and 55 in cases of attempt to murder. However, fewer minors were accused in murder cases in 2014 as compared to 2013 when 76 juveniles were named. Most of the murders were committed for petty reasons or on sudden pro-vocation.    Among other serious crimes reported in 2014, there were 7,143 cases of kidnapping. More girls (1,608) aged 12-16 years were abducted than boys (1,380) of the same age group. Police managed to rescue 1,283 of the abducted girls and 1,165 of the boys within a few days.  ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/delhi/18-rise-in-crime-by-juveniles-in-capital/articleshow/48548484.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:55 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The increasing involvement of juveniles in crime has been a major cause of concern for Delhi Police for the past few years. According to the NCRB data, cases involving juvenile offenders have gone up by 18%-2,876 minors were tracked down in 1,946 criminal cases registered in 2014. In 2013, the figure was 2,140 against 1,590 cases.    Last year, 585 juveniles were charged with theft. Like 2013, they were found to be involved in more rape cases than murders.    Of the 2,876 juveniles apprehended, 2,547 were found to be involved in cognizable offences; 1,001 were sent home after admonition and advice, while 474 were released on probation. As many as 382 juveniles were sent to special homes, 40 faced fines and 146 were acquitted. The number pending cases stood at 648.    Among those apprehended, 771 had dropped out of school at the higher secondary level; 122 were primary school dropouts, and 767 were illiterate. As many as 2,118 were found to be living with their parents, while 84 were homeless. A total of 1,252 children came from families with an annual income below Rs 25,000, while 687 belonged to the income group of Rs 25,001-Rs 50,000 per annum.    In 2014, juveniles were involved in 1,007 cases of theft, burglary or snatching, followed by 134 cases of rape and 70 murder.    Of the total number of apprehended juveniles, 1,500 were in the age-group of 16-18 years. The cops also apprehended girls of different ages for various crimes. In 2014 and 2013, juveniles were found to be involved in rapes, gruesome murders of elderly people and robberies. Around a dozen offenders escaped from correctional homes were reported in the past two years.    Delhi Police has requested juvenile justice boards and child welfare committees to put in place stronger rehabilitation programmes at correctional homes so that minors can be weaned off criminal activities.    Senior police officers made this request to Child Welfare Committee officials during a sensitization programme.  ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/patna/Patna-Police-set-to-book-17-criminals-under-CCA/articleshow/48548181.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:55 IST 2015||Patna: As part of measures to ensure security during the assembly polls, Patna Police are set to book 17 notorious criminals under the Crime Control Act (CCA). These criminals are facing charges of murder, kidnapping, dacoity, rape and extortion.    "This step is taken to ensure free, fair and peaceful environment. Crime Control Act is imposed as a preventive measure by police. However the list of criminals has been returned to police by the DM to find out if the listed criminals are already on bail," said Patna SSP Vikas Vaibhav.    The SSP added, "It is tough to convince the authorities concerned to invoke CCA against any criminal. As permission is sought to book a criminal in anticipation of his criminal activities, due to which he will have to be lodged in jail for one year, we have to provide a strong report on the criminal while appealing before the court. The proposal is first made to the DM and the district administration appeals before the high court for permission."    ||PATNA
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/patna/BJP-mans-shooters-in-police-net/articleshow/48548075.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:55 IST 2015||Patna: Patna Police on Wednesday arrested Raja, one of the three youths who allegedly shot BJP's Patna unit general secretary Avinash Kumar on Daldali Road near the Gandhi Maidan in Patna on August 6, from Hyderabad.    Two other alleged shooters, Anjum Iqbal and Allaudin Iqbal, surrendered before the chief judicial magistrate in Patna the same day. They are residents of Patna City area, Patna SSP Vikas Vaibhav said.    Two of them are in judicial custody while police have got transit remand of Raja and are bringing him to Patna. "We will move the court on Thursday to seek police custody of Anjum and Allauddin for further investigation," the SSP said.    Sources said five teams of Patna Police were conducting raids in five cities — Kolkata, Kanchipuram, Mumbai, Delhi and Hyderabad.    "We had collected the call history of the three shooters and identified the cities where their relatives reside. Raja had talked to people in the five cities. The trio fled from Mumbai when a police team reached there," a police officer said and added police were told Anjum and Allauddin had taken Kurla-Patna Express to surrender before a court in Patna while Raja had left for Hyderabad.    A police team travelled to Hyderabad and the tenanted accommodation of Raja's relatives in Jubilee Hills area of Hyderabad and arrested Raja.    The SSP said the contract for killing Avinash was given to two jailed gangsters — Pankaj Singh and Pintoo alias Ashok.    Pankaj and Pintoo are lodged in the Beur central jail in connection with the murder of Saket Kumar Gupta, retired DG Ashok Kumar Gupta's cousin, in May 2012.    The contract was given to the duo by a close relative of former ward councillor Pannalal Gupta, Vaibhav added.    The Guptas had allegedly threatened Avinash to teach him a lesson for the defeat of Jyoti Gupta in the polls.    "The animosity between the two families was an open secret," the SSP said.    He further said the deceased's brother Sushil had also hinted at the old enmity with the Guptas in the FIR lodged in the Kadamkuan police station.    Six named accused in the case are Pannalal Gupta, Darshan alias Guddu, Purohit Lal Gupta, Prakash Lal Gupta, Ravi Gupta and Jyoti Gupta while eight accused were not identified in the FIR.    While Pannalal, Darshan and Jyoti have been arrested, three named accused are absconding.      ||PATNA
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/3-get-life-for-killing-Dawood-kins-guard-4-others-let-off/articleshow/48547160.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:55 IST 2015||MUMBAI: The special MCOCA court on Wednesday sentenced three accused of the murder of Arif Bael, the driver and guard of Dawood Ibrahim's brother Iqbal Kaskar, to life imprisonment. City crime branch officials said they are likely to file an appeal before the high court seeking capital punishment.    Special MCOCA court judge A L Pansare, while acquitting four others for lack of evidence, sentenced Indira Khatri, Sayyed Bilal and Rashad Khan to life imprisonment. The four acquitted are Chhota Rajan's henchmen D K Rao, Umaid Ur Rahman, Rahman's stepfather Asif Jaan and Sayyid Adnan. The court had dropped the MCOCA charges stating that there is no evidence to prove the gang's involvement. The crime branch had claimed that the attack on Bael was the fallout of a gang war between Rajan and Dawood's men.    On May 17, 2011, Bael, who was waiting for Kaskar outside the Dambarwala building at Pakmodia Street, was shot dead by two shooters later identified as Sayyed Bilal and Indira Khatri. Members of the public caught them and handed them over to the police. Their interrogations led to the arrest of five others, including D K Rao and Rahman. The killing of Bael in broad daylight in Dawood's fortress had shaken the Dawood gang.    The court, while acquitting the four, said there is no direct evidence against them and set aside the evidence of a media report which stated that Rajan, in a telephonic interview, claimed it was he who had ordered Bael's killing. The defence argued that the third party statement has no evidential value as the call was not recorded. Police also failed to prove that D K Rao had paid Rs 5 lakh to Umaid Ur Rahman to kill Bael. "Rahman was not present at the scene of crime and had used a SIM card registered in someone else's name, which is why the court acquitted Rao and Rahman," said an officer    The acquittal of Rao, Rahman, Asif Jaan and Sayyid Adnan assumes significance as arch rival Chhota Shakeel had plans to eliminate them as part of the rivalry between the Dawood and Rajan gangs.  ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/rest-of-world/Pistorius-to-be-moved-to-house-arrest-still-faces-appeal/articleshow/48544901.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:55 IST 2015||JOHANNESBURG: After being locked up for 10 months for killing his girlfriend, double-amputee runner Oscar Pistorius is scheduled to be released from prison and go into house arrest on Friday, unless the Department of Justice intervenes.What his steps after that will be are less clear. The first amputee to run at the Olympics might race again. Or he might wind up behind bars again if he is found guilty of murder. Prosecutors are seeking that verdict, saying his manslaughter conviction was insufficient. They appealed to the Supreme Court, which is to consider the case in November.For killing girlfriend Reeva Steenkamp on Valentine's Day in 2013, Pistorius got a five-year sentence.Steenkamp's parents and several other people gathered on a beach in Port Elizabeth for a ceremony on Wednesday, their daughter's 32nd birthday. Footage from South African broadcaster eNCA showed them throwing red and pink roses into the Indian Ocean and embracing. The family asked journalists to keep a respectful distance and would not comment."We are still struggling with coming to terms with losing our precious daughter Reeva and her loss is felt even more this week," parents Barry and June Steenkamp said in an earlier statement.With a big chunk of his prison time suspended for good behavior, he is set to spend four years and two months under house arrest — some media reports have called it "mansion arrest" — at his uncle's luxurious home. It boasts a large, cross-shaped swimming pool and is located in an upmarket suburb of Pretoria, the capital.The Department of Justice on Wednesday cast doubt on an early release, saying it is checking to see if a parole board decision was correct and "in compliance with the law."Justice Minister Michael Masutha is receiving legal advice on whether he has the authority to "intervene" to prevent Pistorius' release if proper procedure was not followed. His decision will be announced before Friday, the department said.If put under house arrest, the Department of Correctional Services will consider allowing him to train on the track, but international and South African sports bodies have already said Pistorius will not be allowed to compete during the remaining period of his sentence. Pistorius will be nearly 33 when that sentence is over.At the Supreme Court, the second-highest in South Africa, a panel of judges will review Pistorius' trial and decide whether Judge Thokozile Masipa made an error in acquitting him of murder in September last year. If the panel finds Pistorius guilty on appeal, he will face a minimum sentence of 15 years in jail. South Africa doesn't have the death penalty.Prosecutors argue that he should have been found guilty of murder for shooting Steenkamp multiple times through a toilet door in his home. Pistorius said he mistook her for an intruder and fired in self-defense. Prosecutors, in appeal papers filed Monday, said Pistorius intended to kill whoever was behind the door. During his trial, the prosecution accused the runner of shooting Steenkamp during an argument.The family of Steenkamp, a 29-year-old model and reality TV personality, has said "incarceration of 10 months for taking a life is simply not enough." Family lawyer Tania Koen told The Associated Press that Steenkamp's parents, Barry and June, are concentrating this week onPistorius family spokeswoman Anneliese Burgess confirmed Pistorius would live with his uncle, Arnold. Pistorius will have to live under "strict conditions," according to the corrections department. He won't have to wear an electronic device, department spokesman Logan Maistry said, but will be monitored by a probation officer.The department would not provide other details of Pistorius' probation conditions, but they would likely include periods of compulsory community service, being allowed to leave the house only at specific times, and a ban on consuming alcohol. Pistorius will have surprise spot-checks to ensure he is not breaking the terms. If it's found he is, he could be sent back to prison.Pistorius' track career will also become a focus again now.Peet van Zyl, who manages Pistorius' track career, has not conceded that it is over, saying it's up to Pistorius if he wants to pursue running again.Van Zyl said they will discuss his future when he is out.||JOHANNESBURG
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:55 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:55 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/SC-acquits-Romesh-Sharma-in-Budhiraja-murder-case/articleshow/48704930.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:55 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Thursday upheld the Delhi High Court order acquitting former Congress leader Romesh Sharma in the case relating to the killing of fashion designer Kunjum Budhiraja.     A bench of Justices Pinaki Chandra Ghose and R K Agrawal dismissed an appeal filed by the Delhi government challenging HC order.     The Delhi government contended that the HC had erred in acquitting Sharma but it was strongly opposed by his counsel and senior advocate Siddharth Luthra who submitted that his client was in love with Kunjum and there was no evidence to prove his involvement in the case.     Sharma, who was alleged to be a frontman of underworld don Dawood Ibrahim, was convicted by a trial court on February 15, 2008. Kunjum was killed on March 20, 1999 at Sharma's South Delhi-based 'Jai Mata Di' farm house by a group of hired gangsters from Uttar Pradesh.     The trial court had convicted Sharma and five other accused in the case and had awarded life term to all. The HC, however, acquitted Sharma and co-accused Tejendir Verdi but upheld conviction and sentence of other four accused— Sharma's nephew Surinder Mishra, Hemchand, Santram and Ramesh alias Bobby.     While acquitting Sharma, the HC had said "Romesh Sharma and Kunjum were in love, and desired the company of each other. It does not establish that Sharma had got fed up with her". It had turned down Delhi police's contention that Sharma wanted to get rid of Kunjum as she knew about his alleged illegal activities.     "A grieving lover falling over the body of his mate and performing the rituals of a marriage can well be an expression of lasting love, and need not necessarily be a drama," the HC had said.     Sharma was in judicial custody at the time of the Kunjum's murder.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Raid-on-Bengaluru-centre-reveals-horror-tales/articleshow/48704718.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:55 IST 2015||BENGALURU: A State Human Rights Commission raid on a de-addiction centre in Jnanabharati Layout, near Kengeri, southwest Bengaluru, found 90 inmates living in pathetic conditions and subjected to inhuman treatment.     Thursday's raid followed the murder of an inmate of another de-addiction centre in Kothanur recently.     The SHRC raid on Sri Santhosh Social Service Society, also known as 4S Society, followed a tipoff. According to SHRC officials, the centre has been in existence for seven years at least, but the society couldn't produce documents of having obtained permission from the social welfare department. Commission officials said the centre had the permission from the DC and the DHO.     "Most inmates are between 20 and 35 years. They showed us signs of being physically abused. The centre has violated other norms too. Although it's supposed to have one nurse for every 15 patients and at least one in-house doctor and a psychiatrist, it didn't have any," said an SHRC spokesperson.     4 arrested for killing inmate:     Kothanur police arrested a de-addiction centre staffer and three inmates for allegedly beating to death a 28-year-old inmate. Dinesh was admitted to the centre by his family as he was an alcoholic. He was later found dead in a hospital. Family members noticed several bruises on his body. Narayana, an inmate-turned-staffer, gave some medicines to Dinesh, who later turned aggressive. Narayana sought the help of inmates Suresh, Subhan and Simon, to subdue Dinesh.     When Dinesh retaliated, the quartet overpowered him till he became unconscious. He died in hospital.||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/A-jolly-good-fellow-say-Khannas-friends/articleshow/48704630.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:55 IST 2015||Sanjeev Khanna, Indrani Mukerjea's second husband and suspected ally in Sheena Bora's killing, may be the most surprising element in this macabre drama, but his friends and associates in Kolkata refused to cast aspersions on "Sanju" just yet.     From being the biggest dart enthusiast at one of Kolkata's poshest clubs (the CC&FC) to having a finger in every pie, Sanjeev was everyone's "best mate" and go-to guy who friends described as: "A doer... someone who could get things done."     The morning after Khanna's arrest, TOI spoke to Ajay Rawla, the man who Khanna worked for as a consultant and whose house he was picked up from on Wednesday afternoon. "It wasn't like he was hiding like a desperate fugitive in my house. We had a meeting in the morning after which he drove me home and that's when news broke on television. We were sitting, watching, wondering what steps to take when the police arrived," explained Rawla.     Seven years his senior, Khanna's association with Rawla dates back to the time they went to Mayo College in Ajmer. Later, Khanna went on to become an aide for Rawla's pet projects. Besides running his own business in wireless communications, Khanna was there setting up chef Shaun Kenworthy and Rawla's restaurant 1658 or immersed in the heritage project of converting the Bawali Rajbari into a hotel. "He was getting all the construction work and labourers in place. He was very good in helping out with permissions through his connections with excise and contractors," remembers Kenworthy.     Khanna, who seldom missed his outings at the club, motor rallies and horse racing as a prominent face in the social circuit, was not the same man before he met Indrani, recounts Bull Banthia, a close friend. "Well-read and well-versed, Sanju had a great mechanical mind with a solution for everything," is how Bull chose to describe his "jolly good friend who loved meeting new people, hung out at the club but wasn't a social climber". "It was Indrani who emerged as this socialite and drove him to consciously build contacts with those higher up in the social rung after marriage," said the Kolkata-based entrepreneur. "That's the reason why I distanced myself from them until overnight she left Kolkata with their daughter and Sanju's wallet."     While Indrani never surfaces in conversations, his daughter Vidhie, who stayed with Indrani, is a fond subject with his friends. "He would miss his daughter but was resigned to fate, hoping that someday she would find him," said Rawla, adding, "It was Vidhie who called Sanjeev on Wednesday to give him the news."     No one seems to know about any recent interaction between Khanna and Indrani. G M Kapur, a known name in Kolkata who was Intach's state convener and happens to be Khanna's "mama", seemed disturbed with "all the theorizing" of Khanna's role in the crime. He declined to look back on Indrani and Khanna's relationship but added, "The last that there was any contact with Indrani or her family was when Vidhie visited Calcutta last year to celebrate the 75th birthday of her grandmother (Khanna's mother who lives with him)."     Khanna's Facebook posts on "karma" in the weeks and months following Sheena's alleged murder on April 24, 2012, make for interesting reading. On April 30, Khanna shared photo messages: "Say whatever, whenever the f*** you want to"; "Sometimes I get so weird, I even freak myself out".     On May 24, exactly a month after the alleged killing, he wrote: "You can never tell what people are thinking and feeling unless they tell you, and usually they lie. you ask them, 'Whats wrong?' and they say 'Nothing'. You accept this because it's easier than digging for the truth. People smile when they want to cry, they laugh when they want to scream and shout. They pretend like nothing is wrong because they don't want to face the truth. Things aren't always rainbows and butterflies, sometimes you gotta scream and cry your anger and sadness to the world, because you can only hold it in for so long before something in you snaps. so when you want to cry, cry. When you want to scream, scream. Don't hide behind fake smiles, it's ok to not be alright."     ||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Sheena-docu-Michail-add-to-mystery/articleshow/48701752.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:55 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Michail, Sheena's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered have raised a number of unanswered questions.    Two days after his mother, Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Michail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai Police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed that what he gave to police was enough to prove that Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora (who are actually parents of Indrani) as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. Some questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukherjea.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Michail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43 as mentioned in reports after her arrest.    Adding more to the suspense, Michail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Michail studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board examination, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that knew that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard that her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard that she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband who she introduced as Peter Mukherjea."    The two-member Mumbai Police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Michail, who on Wednesday, was the first one to reveal that Sheena was Indrani's daughter, twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Michail's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Michail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukherjae is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Michail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."  ||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Grandparents-are-Sheenas-mom-dad-on-birth-certificate/articleshow/48704559.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:55 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Mikhail, Sheena Bora's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered led to some unanswered questions on Thursday.    Two days after his mother Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Mikhail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed what he gave the police was enough to prove Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora, who are actually Indrani's parents, as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. However, many questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter. In many cases in India involving single mothers, grandparents are known to put in their names as father and mother.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukerjea, that is, 13 years after Sheena was born.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Mikhail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43.    Mikhail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Mikhail     studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board exam, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband, who she introduced as Peter Mukerjea."    The two-member Mumbai police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Mikhail twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Mikhail 's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time, he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Mikhail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukerjea is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Mikhail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Sheena-bowled-us-over-Rahuls-uncle/articleshow/48704552.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:55 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: Had things worked out as desired for Peter Mukherjea's first wife Shabnam and her family in Dehradun, Rahul Mukherjea and Sheena Bora would have been married for over three years now.     Shabnam's brother Shaleen Singh told TOI on Thursday that in 2011 Rahul brought Sheena to their sprawling home in Dehradun to seek approval from the family for their marriage.     The entire family-Shabnam, her younger brother Shaleen, father Anand Singh and mother Seema-were reportedly bowled over by Sheena's jovial nature and affection towards the elderly people. Impressed, the family gave its "unqualified and unanimous approval" for the wedding, which was supposed to take place within a few months, said Shaleen.     Stunned by the recent development, Shaleen said, "Sheena was among those rare persons who left a deep and lifelong impact on people. She was good-looking, a sweet person, clean of heart and good to talk to. None of us objected to the wedding."     Shaleen learnt of Sheena's murder through news channels. "It would have been great if she had become a part of the family. I don't know what was the cause and motive behind the heinous crime, but all those behind the killing of the jovial-natured girl should not be spared at any cost," he said.     A former model and tele-actor, 49-year-old Shaleen today owns the Sanskar International school in Jogiwala here. He recalled the last meeting with Shabnam and Rahul in April this year. "My father Anand Singh passed away in April. They had come to pay their respects but we did not interact much."     However, Shaleen said of late the interaction between him and his sister Shabnam was limited. Although Shabnam's farm Gul-e-Shabnam and Shaleen's residence Shankar Sadan are barely 200 metres away in Badripur, meetings between them were rare. While Shaleen and his mother stay on different floors of Shankar Sadan, Shabnam stays alone at her residence and is frequently visited by Rahul.     "There are matters in each family which we do not want to disclose. We are not against each other but do not interact much. She comes to meet our mother occasionally," said Shaleen, adding that Shabnam was passionate about painting and had a studio in her residence.     Shaleen denied having any details about the presence of Mumbai police in Dehradun. "Neither Doon police nor Mumbai police have contacted me over the issue."     Staff at Shabnam's residence said she was out-of-station but they were not aware of her whereabouts.||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Kilpauk-doctor-murder-Hubby-to-approach-court/articleshow/48704411.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:55 IST 2015||CHENNAI: It's been four days since police claimed to have solved the murder of S Sathya, 24, a PG medical student. However, her husband has put forth questions that police have failed to answer. Though investigating officers confirmed Sathya was not sexually assaulted before she was killed, they leaked to some section of media saying that they changed their stance on Wednesday and said there were indications of attempt to rape on the deceased.     Police personnel revealed the details soon after Sathya's husband Dr P Sesu, also employed at a primary health centre in Perambalur, expressed certain doubts.     He alleged the police hastily solved the case citing the state assembly, which is in motion. Sathya was found dead at her house in Kilpauk on August 20.     On August 23, police arrested Harintham Depnath, a BTech graduate, who lived at the second floor on the same apartment. Neither was there any mention about sexual assault or attempt on Sathya when the body was recovered from the house. The nor did the doctors. Police didn't tell this during the arrest of Depnath on August 23. "What forced the police to reveal about the sexual harassment attempt on my wife now?" asked Sesu.     "I want to live a peaceful life with my two sons - Tamil Nesan, 6, and Karmugilan, 4. The studies and the future of my children is important for me. I do respect the police personnel who spent sleepless nights to solve the murder, but there are questions that need to be answered," he said.     "I live in Perambalur with my children, but we speak through live video calls. I have told my sons that Sathya has gone to the God, as the Almighty likes her more. "Hereafter, we cannot speak or meet her. I don't know how far my children will admit it?" said Sesu. "I will approach the court seeking a fair probe into the murder of my wife. I want to find out the real cause behind her death. I want the real accused to get punished for his deed," said Sesu.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Woman-strangles-husbands-lover/articleshow/48704388.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:55 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A woman beat up and strangled her husband's partner, an assistant professor at a polytechnic in Choolaimedu, in their Thiruverkadu home on Thursday, police said. A court later remanded the accused, 32-year-old Shruti, in judicial custody.     Police said Sambasivam, a professor at Panimalar Engineering College in Poonamallee, used to bring Rajalakshmi, home frequently and introduced her to his wife Shruti as a colleague. He even dropped her home at night. The polytechnic where Rajalakshmi worked was part of the Panimalar group of educational institutions. Shruti initially believed the two were just colleagues until Sambasivam came home with Rajalakshmi on Tuesday and said the woman was moving in with them permanently.     On Wednesday morning, Sambasivam allegedly tied a 'mangalsutra' to Rajalakshmi in front of his wife, police said, based on Shruti's confession. A shocked Shruti picked up a fight with Sambasivam who asked her to maintain a cordial relationship and take care of Rajalakshmi. On Thursday morning, after he left for college a fight broke out between the two women.     Police said Rajalakshmi allegedly abused Sruthi and went into the bathroom. Sruthi followed her in and strangled her with the 'mangalsutra'. She then tried to make it appear that the woman had fainted in the bathroom. She took her in an autorickshaw to a nearby hospital where she was declared 'brought dead'. Doctors who noticed a few marks around her neck informed the Thiruverkadu police who registered a case of suspicious death under CrPC section 176.     The body was sent for postmortem to Kilpauk Medical College and Hospital.     After finding that the two women were at home at the time of the death, police interrogated Sruthi for more than an hour but she continued to maintain that Rajyalakshmi had died of injuries sustained when she fell down in the bathroom.     "She confessed to the murder when we told her that her fingerprints had been lifted from the scene of crime," said an investigating officer. "She said she had smashed the woman's head against the wall and later strangled her with the 'thali'." Police altered the case to murder and arrested Sruthi.     Initial inquiries revealed that Rajalakshmi had been married to a man named Rajasekhar for a while and they had separated. She then got married to Suresh, a relative who worked in a private firm, a few years ago and the couple moved into a house in Mogappair.     They allegedly had frequent quarrels as he tortured her and she left him too, police found.     Rajalakshmi then got a job with Panimalar Engineering College where she met Sambasivam. The two became friends and began seeing each other. Rajalakshmi recently moved to the polytechnic in Choolaimedu, police said.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/US-journalists-killer-annoyed-colleagues-Ex-boss/articleshow/48704167.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:55 IST 2015||ROANOKE, United States: The disgruntled former US television station employee who murdered two journalists had "annoyed" colleagues but showed no signs at work of any mental health issues, his former boss said Thursday.     Vester Lee Flanagan, 41, worked as a reporter for WDBJ in Roanoke, Virginia from March 2012 to February 2013, but was dismissed for poor performance and angry behavior, general manager Jeffrey Marks said.     On Wednesday, Flanagan shot and killed two of the CBS affiliate's journalists while they were conducting an on-air interview. He later fatally shot himself.     "We are still at a loss to figure out what happened to him in those two and a half years" since he was fired, Marks told a news conference flanked by dozens of staff, many of them holding hands.     "I don't think we identified that he had mental health issues. We certainly identified that he had performance issues."     Marks defended the station's hiring record and said its parent company had "a very elaborate program to screen employees."     Flanagan passed background checks and came with only positive references, Marks said.     It was only after he was hired, Marks said, that things went downhill.     "Vester's behavior annoyed a lot of people in the news station," Marks said.     Flanagan, who went by the on-screen name Bryce Williams, alleged in a manifesto faxed to ABC News that he was discriminated against as a gay, black journalist.     Marks said accusations in 2013 that he was treated unfairly were "immediately investigated and found to be without merit."     During his employment, Flanagan complied with demands that he seek medical help, but he was ultimately dismissed.     He was escorted from the building by police and made an ominous aside to the news director -- handing him a wooden cross and saying "'you'll need this'," Marks said.     As he left, he also made a "derogatory comment" to Adam Ward, the cameraman he shot dead on Wednesday.     Flanagan filed a complaint with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and a civil action suit, which were dismissed, he said.     "All of these investigations determined that no reasonable person would have taken any of the cited incidents as discrimination or harassment."     After killing Ward and reporter Alison Parker live on the air, Flanagan posted a video of the attack on social media.||ROANOKE, UNITED STATES
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:55 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/SC-acquits-Romesh-Sharma-in-Budhiraja-murder-case/articleshow/48704930.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:55 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Thursday upheld the Delhi High Court order acquitting former Congress leader Romesh Sharma in the case relating to the killing of fashion designer Kunjum Budhiraja.     A bench of Justices Pinaki Chandra Ghose and R K Agrawal dismissed an appeal filed by the Delhi government challenging HC order.     The Delhi government contended that the HC had erred in acquitting Sharma but it was strongly opposed by his counsel and senior advocate Siddharth Luthra who submitted that his client was in love with Kunjum and there was no evidence to prove his involvement in the case.     Sharma, who was alleged to be a frontman of underworld don Dawood Ibrahim, was convicted by a trial court on February 15, 2008. Kunjum was killed on March 20, 1999 at Sharma's South Delhi-based 'Jai Mata Di' farm house by a group of hired gangsters from Uttar Pradesh.     The trial court had convicted Sharma and five other accused in the case and had awarded life term to all. The HC, however, acquitted Sharma and co-accused Tejendir Verdi but upheld conviction and sentence of other four accused— Sharma's nephew Surinder Mishra, Hemchand, Santram and Ramesh alias Bobby.     While acquitting Sharma, the HC had said "Romesh Sharma and Kunjum were in love, and desired the company of each other. It does not establish that Sharma had got fed up with her". It had turned down Delhi police's contention that Sharma wanted to get rid of Kunjum as she knew about his alleged illegal activities.     "A grieving lover falling over the body of his mate and performing the rituals of a marriage can well be an expression of lasting love, and need not necessarily be a drama," the HC had said.     Sharma was in judicial custody at the time of the Kunjum's murder.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Raid-on-Bengaluru-centre-reveals-horror-tales/articleshow/48704718.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:55 IST 2015||BENGALURU: A State Human Rights Commission raid on a de-addiction centre in Jnanabharati Layout, near Kengeri, southwest Bengaluru, found 90 inmates living in pathetic conditions and subjected to inhuman treatment.     Thursday's raid followed the murder of an inmate of another de-addiction centre in Kothanur recently.     The SHRC raid on Sri Santhosh Social Service Society, also known as 4S Society, followed a tipoff. According to SHRC officials, the centre has been in existence for seven years at least, but the society couldn't produce documents of having obtained permission from the social welfare department. Commission officials said the centre had the permission from the DC and the DHO.     "Most inmates are between 20 and 35 years. They showed us signs of being physically abused. The centre has violated other norms too. Although it's supposed to have one nurse for every 15 patients and at least one in-house doctor and a psychiatrist, it didn't have any," said an SHRC spokesperson.     4 arrested for killing inmate:     Kothanur police arrested a de-addiction centre staffer and three inmates for allegedly beating to death a 28-year-old inmate. Dinesh was admitted to the centre by his family as he was an alcoholic. He was later found dead in a hospital. Family members noticed several bruises on his body. Narayana, an inmate-turned-staffer, gave some medicines to Dinesh, who later turned aggressive. Narayana sought the help of inmates Suresh, Subhan and Simon, to subdue Dinesh.     When Dinesh retaliated, the quartet overpowered him till he became unconscious. He died in hospital.||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/A-jolly-good-fellow-say-Khannas-friends/articleshow/48704630.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:55 IST 2015||Sanjeev Khanna, Indrani Mukerjea's second husband and suspected ally in Sheena Bora's killing, may be the most surprising element in this macabre drama, but his friends and associates in Kolkata refused to cast aspersions on "Sanju" just yet.     From being the biggest dart enthusiast at one of Kolkata's poshest clubs (the CC&FC) to having a finger in every pie, Sanjeev was everyone's "best mate" and go-to guy who friends described as: "A doer... someone who could get things done."     The morning after Khanna's arrest, TOI spoke to Ajay Rawla, the man who Khanna worked for as a consultant and whose house he was picked up from on Wednesday afternoon. "It wasn't like he was hiding like a desperate fugitive in my house. We had a meeting in the morning after which he drove me home and that's when news broke on television. We were sitting, watching, wondering what steps to take when the police arrived," explained Rawla.     Seven years his senior, Khanna's association with Rawla dates back to the time they went to Mayo College in Ajmer. Later, Khanna went on to become an aide for Rawla's pet projects. Besides running his own business in wireless communications, Khanna was there setting up chef Shaun Kenworthy and Rawla's restaurant 1658 or immersed in the heritage project of converting the Bawali Rajbari into a hotel. "He was getting all the construction work and labourers in place. He was very good in helping out with permissions through his connections with excise and contractors," remembers Kenworthy.     Khanna, who seldom missed his outings at the club, motor rallies and horse racing as a prominent face in the social circuit, was not the same man before he met Indrani, recounts Bull Banthia, a close friend. "Well-read and well-versed, Sanju had a great mechanical mind with a solution for everything," is how Bull chose to describe his "jolly good friend who loved meeting new people, hung out at the club but wasn't a social climber". "It was Indrani who emerged as this socialite and drove him to consciously build contacts with those higher up in the social rung after marriage," said the Kolkata-based entrepreneur. "That's the reason why I distanced myself from them until overnight she left Kolkata with their daughter and Sanju's wallet."     While Indrani never surfaces in conversations, his daughter Vidhie, who stayed with Indrani, is a fond subject with his friends. "He would miss his daughter but was resigned to fate, hoping that someday she would find him," said Rawla, adding, "It was Vidhie who called Sanjeev on Wednesday to give him the news."     No one seems to know about any recent interaction between Khanna and Indrani. G M Kapur, a known name in Kolkata who was Intach's state convener and happens to be Khanna's "mama", seemed disturbed with "all the theorizing" of Khanna's role in the crime. He declined to look back on Indrani and Khanna's relationship but added, "The last that there was any contact with Indrani or her family was when Vidhie visited Calcutta last year to celebrate the 75th birthday of her grandmother (Khanna's mother who lives with him)."     Khanna's Facebook posts on "karma" in the weeks and months following Sheena's alleged murder on April 24, 2012, make for interesting reading. On April 30, Khanna shared photo messages: "Say whatever, whenever the f*** you want to"; "Sometimes I get so weird, I even freak myself out".     On May 24, exactly a month after the alleged killing, he wrote: "You can never tell what people are thinking and feeling unless they tell you, and usually they lie. you ask them, 'Whats wrong?' and they say 'Nothing'. You accept this because it's easier than digging for the truth. People smile when they want to cry, they laugh when they want to scream and shout. They pretend like nothing is wrong because they don't want to face the truth. Things aren't always rainbows and butterflies, sometimes you gotta scream and cry your anger and sadness to the world, because you can only hold it in for so long before something in you snaps. so when you want to cry, cry. When you want to scream, scream. Don't hide behind fake smiles, it's ok to not be alright."     ||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Sheena-docu-Michail-add-to-mystery/articleshow/48701752.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:55 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Michail, Sheena's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered have raised a number of unanswered questions.    Two days after his mother, Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Michail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai Police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed that what he gave to police was enough to prove that Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora (who are actually parents of Indrani) as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. Some questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukherjea.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Michail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43 as mentioned in reports after her arrest.    Adding more to the suspense, Michail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Michail studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board examination, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that knew that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard that her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard that she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband who she introduced as Peter Mukherjea."    The two-member Mumbai Police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Michail, who on Wednesday, was the first one to reveal that Sheena was Indrani's daughter, twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Michail's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Michail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukherjae is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Michail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."  ||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Grandparents-are-Sheenas-mom-dad-on-birth-certificate/articleshow/48704559.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:55 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Mikhail, Sheena Bora's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered led to some unanswered questions on Thursday.    Two days after his mother Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Mikhail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed what he gave the police was enough to prove Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora, who are actually Indrani's parents, as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. However, many questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter. In many cases in India involving single mothers, grandparents are known to put in their names as father and mother.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukerjea, that is, 13 years after Sheena was born.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Mikhail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43.    Mikhail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Mikhail     studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board exam, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband, who she introduced as Peter Mukerjea."    The two-member Mumbai police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Mikhail twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Mikhail 's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time, he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Mikhail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukerjea is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Mikhail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Sheena-bowled-us-over-Rahuls-uncle/articleshow/48704552.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:55 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: Had things worked out as desired for Peter Mukherjea's first wife Shabnam and her family in Dehradun, Rahul Mukherjea and Sheena Bora would have been married for over three years now.     Shabnam's brother Shaleen Singh told TOI on Thursday that in 2011 Rahul brought Sheena to their sprawling home in Dehradun to seek approval from the family for their marriage.     The entire family-Shabnam, her younger brother Shaleen, father Anand Singh and mother Seema-were reportedly bowled over by Sheena's jovial nature and affection towards the elderly people. Impressed, the family gave its "unqualified and unanimous approval" for the wedding, which was supposed to take place within a few months, said Shaleen.     Stunned by the recent development, Shaleen said, "Sheena was among those rare persons who left a deep and lifelong impact on people. She was good-looking, a sweet person, clean of heart and good to talk to. None of us objected to the wedding."     Shaleen learnt of Sheena's murder through news channels. "It would have been great if she had become a part of the family. I don't know what was the cause and motive behind the heinous crime, but all those behind the killing of the jovial-natured girl should not be spared at any cost," he said.     A former model and tele-actor, 49-year-old Shaleen today owns the Sanskar International school in Jogiwala here. He recalled the last meeting with Shabnam and Rahul in April this year. "My father Anand Singh passed away in April. They had come to pay their respects but we did not interact much."     However, Shaleen said of late the interaction between him and his sister Shabnam was limited. Although Shabnam's farm Gul-e-Shabnam and Shaleen's residence Shankar Sadan are barely 200 metres away in Badripur, meetings between them were rare. While Shaleen and his mother stay on different floors of Shankar Sadan, Shabnam stays alone at her residence and is frequently visited by Rahul.     "There are matters in each family which we do not want to disclose. We are not against each other but do not interact much. She comes to meet our mother occasionally," said Shaleen, adding that Shabnam was passionate about painting and had a studio in her residence.     Shaleen denied having any details about the presence of Mumbai police in Dehradun. "Neither Doon police nor Mumbai police have contacted me over the issue."     Staff at Shabnam's residence said she was out-of-station but they were not aware of her whereabouts.||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Kilpauk-doctor-murder-Hubby-to-approach-court/articleshow/48704411.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:55 IST 2015||CHENNAI: It's been four days since police claimed to have solved the murder of S Sathya, 24, a PG medical student. However, her husband has put forth questions that police have failed to answer. Though investigating officers confirmed Sathya was not sexually assaulted before she was killed, they leaked to some section of media saying that they changed their stance on Wednesday and said there were indications of attempt to rape on the deceased.     Police personnel revealed the details soon after Sathya's husband Dr P Sesu, also employed at a primary health centre in Perambalur, expressed certain doubts.     He alleged the police hastily solved the case citing the state assembly, which is in motion. Sathya was found dead at her house in Kilpauk on August 20.     On August 23, police arrested Harintham Depnath, a BTech graduate, who lived at the second floor on the same apartment. Neither was there any mention about sexual assault or attempt on Sathya when the body was recovered from the house. The nor did the doctors. Police didn't tell this during the arrest of Depnath on August 23. "What forced the police to reveal about the sexual harassment attempt on my wife now?" asked Sesu.     "I want to live a peaceful life with my two sons - Tamil Nesan, 6, and Karmugilan, 4. The studies and the future of my children is important for me. I do respect the police personnel who spent sleepless nights to solve the murder, but there are questions that need to be answered," he said.     "I live in Perambalur with my children, but we speak through live video calls. I have told my sons that Sathya has gone to the God, as the Almighty likes her more. "Hereafter, we cannot speak or meet her. I don't know how far my children will admit it?" said Sesu. "I will approach the court seeking a fair probe into the murder of my wife. I want to find out the real cause behind her death. I want the real accused to get punished for his deed," said Sesu.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Woman-strangles-husbands-lover/articleshow/48704388.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:55 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A woman beat up and strangled her husband's partner, an assistant professor at a polytechnic in Choolaimedu, in their Thiruverkadu home on Thursday, police said. A court later remanded the accused, 32-year-old Shruti, in judicial custody.     Police said Sambasivam, a professor at Panimalar Engineering College in Poonamallee, used to bring Rajalakshmi, home frequently and introduced her to his wife Shruti as a colleague. He even dropped her home at night. The polytechnic where Rajalakshmi worked was part of the Panimalar group of educational institutions. Shruti initially believed the two were just colleagues until Sambasivam came home with Rajalakshmi on Tuesday and said the woman was moving in with them permanently.     On Wednesday morning, Sambasivam allegedly tied a 'mangalsutra' to Rajalakshmi in front of his wife, police said, based on Shruti's confession. A shocked Shruti picked up a fight with Sambasivam who asked her to maintain a cordial relationship and take care of Rajalakshmi. On Thursday morning, after he left for college a fight broke out between the two women.     Police said Rajalakshmi allegedly abused Sruthi and went into the bathroom. Sruthi followed her in and strangled her with the 'mangalsutra'. She then tried to make it appear that the woman had fainted in the bathroom. She took her in an autorickshaw to a nearby hospital where she was declared 'brought dead'. Doctors who noticed a few marks around her neck informed the Thiruverkadu police who registered a case of suspicious death under CrPC section 176.     The body was sent for postmortem to Kilpauk Medical College and Hospital.     After finding that the two women were at home at the time of the death, police interrogated Sruthi for more than an hour but she continued to maintain that Rajyalakshmi had died of injuries sustained when she fell down in the bathroom.     "She confessed to the murder when we told her that her fingerprints had been lifted from the scene of crime," said an investigating officer. "She said she had smashed the woman's head against the wall and later strangled her with the 'thali'." Police altered the case to murder and arrested Sruthi.     Initial inquiries revealed that Rajalakshmi had been married to a man named Rajasekhar for a while and they had separated. She then got married to Suresh, a relative who worked in a private firm, a few years ago and the couple moved into a house in Mogappair.     They allegedly had frequent quarrels as he tortured her and she left him too, police found.     Rajalakshmi then got a job with Panimalar Engineering College where she met Sambasivam. The two became friends and began seeing each other. Rajalakshmi recently moved to the polytechnic in Choolaimedu, police said.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/US-journalists-killer-annoyed-colleagues-Ex-boss/articleshow/48704167.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:18:55 IST 2015||ROANOKE, United States: The disgruntled former US television station employee who murdered two journalists had "annoyed" colleagues but showed no signs at work of any mental health issues, his former boss said Thursday.     Vester Lee Flanagan, 41, worked as a reporter for WDBJ in Roanoke, Virginia from March 2012 to February 2013, but was dismissed for poor performance and angry behavior, general manager Jeffrey Marks said.     On Wednesday, Flanagan shot and killed two of the CBS affiliate's journalists while they were conducting an on-air interview. He later fatally shot himself.     "We are still at a loss to figure out what happened to him in those two and a half years" since he was fired, Marks told a news conference flanked by dozens of staff, many of them holding hands.     "I don't think we identified that he had mental health issues. We certainly identified that he had performance issues."     Marks defended the station's hiring record and said its parent company had "a very elaborate program to screen employees."     Flanagan passed background checks and came with only positive references, Marks said.     It was only after he was hired, Marks said, that things went downhill.     "Vester's behavior annoyed a lot of people in the news station," Marks said.     Flanagan, who went by the on-screen name Bryce Williams, alleged in a manifesto faxed to ABC News that he was discriminated against as a gay, black journalist.     Marks said accusations in 2013 that he was treated unfairly were "immediately investigated and found to be without merit."     During his employment, Flanagan complied with demands that he seek medical help, but he was ultimately dismissed.     He was escorted from the building by police and made an ominous aside to the news director -- handing him a wooden cross and saying "'you'll need this'," Marks said.     As he left, he also made a "derogatory comment" to Adam Ward, the cameraman he shot dead on Wednesday.     Flanagan filed a complaint with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and a civil action suit, which were dismissed, he said.     "All of these investigations determined that no reasonable person would have taken any of the cited incidents as discrimination or harassment."     After killing Ward and reporter Alison Parker live on the air, Flanagan posted a video of the attack on social media.||ROANOKE, UNITED STATES
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Juvenile-offenders-find-voice-in-body-art/articleshow/48543804.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:00 IST 2015||CHENNAI: From far away, the images look like tattoos engraved on their adolescent bodies; one shows a woman and another a marijuana leaf. It takes a sharp eye to see that the marks don't contain ink -the patterns are wounds caused by repeatedly cutting the skin.     Juveniles in government observation homes seem to be using their bodies as canvases to vent their ire and channel their frustration. Leaked photos of teenage boys with images carved out of their bare skin has sent shock waves, catching juveniles justice authorities on the back-foot.     Officials, however, denied that the boys had inflicted the wounds inside the homes. "Some of them had marks on their palms, hands, stomach and legs, even while being brought here," said a juvenile home officer.     A child protection officer, on condition of anonymity , however, admitted that some of the boys have been caught trying to use dried mid ribs of coconut tree leaves and rusted iron nails to draw pictures on each other's backs. "They first use a pen to draw a pattern. After that they repeatedly cut their skin using a stick or a piece of iron," he said.     "A juvenile, who was arrested on murder charges, has the pattern of a woman drawn on his back. Many of them cut various words into their skin, while others simply have deep slashes," said the officer. Sources in observation homes say many juveniles inflict injuries on themselves to gain attention. Some of them find it hard to sleep on their backs for days.     Girija Kumar Babu, one of the members of the juvenile justice board (JJB), Chennai, said such acts reveal disturbed minds.     "We provide these children with regular counseling to bring them to normalcy. But, often, we find that it isn't easy to break the ice with them," she said.     Even as these children take to hurting themselves, the JJB is struggling with shortage of staff, especially counsellors. There is only one government-appointed psychologist for around 1,000 juveniles in correctional facilities in the state. The homes are failing not only in this front, but also struggling with poor infrastructure and abysmal A child's mind often reflects his or her environment, say counsellors.     "The atmosphere these children live in often does not allow them to express themselves. So they inflict injuries on themselves as a means to vent their anger," said psychologist Preethi Manohar of Sooriya Hospital.     "People often think that these children are deranged, but all they want is to tell their story," she said.||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Activists-leaders-slam-Mulayam-Singh-for-saying-gang-rape-is-impractical/articleshow/48540988.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:00 IST 2015||NEW DELHI:"Every now and then, we come across these incidents. He (Mulayam Singh) does not know how to escape from it. This is one of the waste parts that he wants to say," said women activist Pramila Nesargi.She insisted that unless a gang rape takes place, no women in the world would come out with a story that such an incident took place with her.Another women activist Kavita Srivastava said the Samajwadi Party chief, who is the leader of the male dominant and patriarchal society and culture, always thinks that women are liars."He is assuming that sexual violence against women doesn't take place and they (women) are always lying. He thinks that rapes can take place but gang-rapes are impractical," Srivastava said in Jaipur."I want to advise Mulayam Singh to have an honest conversation with the female members of his family to understand the plight of women. The problem is that he is far away from the point of view of women and from her experiences," she added.BJP and Congress Party leaders also condemned the Samajwadi Party chief's statement, saying that a senior leader like Mulayam should refrain from making such remarks."Mulayam Singh has earlier made such humiliating remarks on the issue of rape. These kinds of remarks shelter the goons from consequences and boost their confidence. Senior leaders of such status should refrain from making such kind of remarks," Congress leader Shobha Oza said.BJP said that Mulayam's remarks were an "insult" to the fair sex and raise questions over the decisions given by courts in gang rape cases.BJP spokesman Vijay Bahadur Pathak said, "There is nothing new in it. In the past also on the issue of rape, the SP supremo had said that youths tend to make mistakes.By giving this logic, Mulayam had showed insensitivity towards half of the population of the country."Such a statement is a gross insult to the fair sex and will ultimately lead to anarchy. It also raises question mark over decisions given by the courts in gangrape cases," Pathak said.He alleged that it was an outburst of a leader, whose own party government, was "failing" to control law and order situation in the state."You can imagine the situation of a state where workers of the ruling party are acting like goons and rouges," he charged.Congress said it would have been better if Mulayam had advised his son Akhilesh Yadav's government to take stern action against anti-social elements, instead of making such a statement."The biggest thing is that such a statement reflects SP supremo's disrespect towards women. Such a statement would embolden elements involved in crime against women specially rape cases," Congress spokesman Diwjendra Tripathi said."It would have been better, if he would have advised the government being run by his son to act tough against such elements," he said.Senior RLD leader Anil Dubey said the comment was only an attempt to mislead the people."If the government is failing to check rumours, then it menas that it has also failed to check crime," he said.With the UP government facing criticism over law and order situation, the SP supremo had yesterday hit out at the opposition saying an effort was being made to "defame" it and smear campaign was being run against it due to "political enmity"."Effort to defame the government is made due to political enmity," Yadav had charged.The SP supremo had earlier claimed that when it comes to the number of rape incidents taking place across in India, Uttar Pradesh features at the bottom of the list.Speaking on the law and order situation in the state at a function in Lucknow, Yadav had said considering UP's population, the crime rate was "very low".The SP supremo said that there were instances where only one person committed rape but the victim named four people merely to "settle scores"."Innocent persons must not be implicated and harassed. There are cases, where a victim has accused four brothers of raping her. It is not practical," he said.To stress his point, Yadav cited the alleged rape and murder case of two cousin sisters in Badaun stating that it was "blown out of proportion"."The CBI probed the case and found out that rape was not committed at all. They were cold-blooded murders by the victim's cousins for property," he said."But even senior leaders like Congress president Sonia Gandhi's son Rahul rushed to Badaun and attacked the state government on the law and order front," he said.(With inputs from agencies)||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/entertainment/bengali/movies/news/Murder-suicide-or-accident-Natoker-Moto-revisits-actress-death/articleshow/48666375.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:00 IST 2015||The mysterious death of Keya Chakraborty , who dominated the Bengali stage of the '60s-'70s triggered several theories. That's what theatre veteran Debesh Chattopadhyay's debut directorial Natoker Moto delves into."I've not maligned anyone, why should I be worried?" he asks a day ahead of the film's release. At the heart of the film is Kheya, who blazes a trail on stage. "Keya fell to her death while shooting for Swadesh Sarkar's Jibon Jerokom, where she was essaying the role of a blind mother. My film too begins with the death of Kheya. It's not a biopic, but a work of fiction.Through interactions with her associates, investigating officer Bhobodulal Roy tries to piece together facts about Kheya. Extensive research has gone into the film and though the end is open to interpretation, the movie does arrive at a conclusion. Now it's up to the audience on how they see the truth," says Debesh.Paoli, excited about the role of a lifetime, says what comes to the fore through a series of interactions is a life less ordinary . "Kheya might be the torchbearer of Bengali theatre, but she is also a woman of substance. She believes in a certain philosophy and doesn't mind pawning her jewels for the love of stage. Despite resistance from the homefront, she shows the courage to live life on her own terms. Kheya is also a hard core feminist, though the coinage was not in vogue in those days. The film tries to dig out facts without forcing it down the audience," says the actress.Rajatava Dutta, who plays Bhobodulal, says what comes out of the investigation is no less baffling. "There are several perspectives on Kheya's death as shared by the director. The film is neither black nor white and even the investigating officer is far from perfect. He is removed from the cultural revolution and tries to fathom truth by interacting with Kheya's director, producer, friend, mother... I find Kheya very similar to Neeta of Meghe Dhaka Tara. While she fights for her family , Kheya takes on the world for her love of theatre. The film is a throwback to the times when moral values had not started degenerating.Also, I had a great time shooting with Saswata Chatterjee, Bratya Basu, Sujan Mukherjee and the rest. Though its Debesh Chattopadhyay's first film, he has shown tremendous maturity in handling the subject. About a conclusive ending, I'm sure the audience will get it once the film draws to a close," he says.Produced by Friends Communication and presented by Firdausal Hasan, Natoker Moto releases on August 21.|| 
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/kanpur/Life-term-to-three-for-murdering-neighbour-in-Kanpur/articleshow/48540034.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:00 IST 2015||KANPUR: A court of Mainpuri had sentenced three people, including a woman to life imprisonment and imposed a fine of Rs 10,000 on each of them for murder.     On August 20, 2012 at around 8 pm, Pravin Kumar, younger brother of the complainant was gunned down by his neighbour Ramvir Singh, his wife Kusuma Devi and son Amit in Husainpur village. Pravin's sister-in-law Somwati also suffered serious injuries in the attack.     Anil Kumar lodged an FIR against Ramvir Singh, Kusuma Devi and son Amit. The police filed chargesheet in the court against the three. Relying on the evidence produced in court and after hearing defence counsel and the prosecutor, additional district and session's judge Bachchu Singh held Ramvir Singh, Kusuma Devi and Amit guilty of murdering Pravin Kumar and sentenced them to undergo rigorous imprisonment for life.     For the attempt to murder Somwati, the judge separately convicted Ramvir Singh, Kusma Devi and Amit and sentenced them to undergo rigorous imprisonment for 10 years. They were ordered to pay a fine of Rs 5,000 to be paid by each convict. Both the sentences will run concurrently.||KANPUR
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bhopal/Two-women-gang-raped-in-Bhopal-one-set-ablaze-second-killed/articleshow/48539139.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:00 IST 2015||BHOPAL: Two women, one of them a dalit, were allegedly gang-raped in Morena district on Monday night. One of them was murdered while the other is battling for life after being set ablaze by the accused.    Accused Paan Singh and Rajesh Singh sexually assaulted a 24-year-old dalit woman in Sabalgarh tehsil of the district. The duo was friends of her husband, who was high on liquor when the crime was committed. The accused poured country-made liquor on the woman and then set her ablaze.    She was rushed to Morena district headquarters where she confirmed rape in her statement before an executive magistrate. The survivor suffered more than 50 per cent burns, police said.    Superintendent of police Vineet Khanna said "smell of kerosene at the crime scene also suggests the rape survivor was doused with the oil". While Paan Singh has been arrested, efforts are on to nab Rajesh Singh, police said.    In another incident, four persons allegedly abducted a woman when she went out for defecation in Kharagpur village of Morena. Her family said a police complaint was lodged when she did not return. They charged villagers, Akash Gurjar and his three accomplices, with rape and murder. SDOP Banmor, Atmaram Sharma said, "We have registered a case and investigations are on. Autopsy will confirm whether it was murder".  ||BHOPAL
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Civic-poll-win-no-Vyapam-clean-chit-Digvijaya/articleshow/48539064.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:00 IST 2015||BHOPAL: AICC general secretary Digvijaya Singh on Tuesday asserted that winning the recent urban civic polls does not mean BJP has got a clean-chit on Vyapam scam.    "The ruling BJP is celebrating last week's urban civic poll victory as if it has been given a clean-chit for Vyapam. Civic polls are always won by the party in power. So there is no reason to be so triumphant and over analyse the situation," Digvijaya Singh said while speaking to reporters here on Tuesday evening.    Launching a scathing attack on the Shivraj Singh Chouhan government, the senior Congress leader accused that crores of amassed corruption wealth is being revealed from raids at residences of government peons, clerks and storekeepers.    "It explains BJP's governance that each successive raid reveals more and more ill-gotten wealth. Since 2006, fraud recruitments and appointments were being made through Vyapam under the nose of chief minister Chouhan and he says he did not know," Digvijaya said.    Singh admitted that during his regime, the Congress too made appointments but no money transactions took place. "I admit that during my tenure, there were appointments made and duly approved by the cabinet. But there was no money trail involved," he said.    The senior Congress leader also claimed that Sashi Ranjan Akela, one of the six accused in the 2006 professor HS Sabharwal case has been made deputy director by the government in the Kalidas Sanskrit Academy, Ujjain.    "Sashi Ranjan Akela was an accused in the Sabharwal murder case. He was exonerated by the lower court and the state government has appealed to a higher court against this verdict. Hence, the government that is appealing against Akela's exoneration has actually given him a job. He has no knowledge of Sanskrit and is a post-graduate in mathematics. His only eligibility for appointment has been that he is an ABVP activist," Digvijay Singh argued.  ||BHOPAL
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/kochi/Haneefa-murder-Two-more-arrested/articleshow/48536330.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:00 IST 2015||THRISSUR: Two more persons -- Aabhit (25) and Siddique (32) -- were arrested on Tuesday for the murder of Congress 'A' group activist Haneefa at Chavakkad, allegedly by rival 'I' group members in the party. Police have also arrested another person involved in an earlier Congress group clashe in the area.    Aabhit and Siddique, arrested from Shoranur railway station, had allegedly helped the main culprits escape. Police had earlier arrested Thondanpiri Veettil Ansar, Rimshad, Shamzeer, Shameer and Afsal for the murder while two accused are at large.    One Muhammed Shafi was arrested from a Pattambi lodge for his alleged involvement in the attack on another 'A' group activist Muhammed Farooq two months ago. There are reports that Shafi was involved in Haneefa's murder too.    Meanwhile, Haneefa's mother Aishabi has sent a complaint to the DGP, alleging that police were trying to weaken the case and protecting the conspirators. She alleged that the accused were reportedly close to minister C N Balakrishnan and ousted Congress block president Gopaprathapan.    In another development, Haneefa's wife Shabna appealed to CPM leaders to remove the photographs of their children from flex boards displayed in the area.    Home minister Ramesh Chennithala, who visited Haneefa's family on Tuesday, has said that all accused in the murder case would be booked irrespective of their group loyalties.    ||THRISSUR
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/home/science/Evidence-of-mass-murder-during-Stone-Age-found/articleshow/48536099.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:00 IST 2015||BERLIN: Archaeologists have discovered evidence of a brutal mass murder that took place outside Frankfurt some 7,000 years ago during the Stone Age. The massacre also includes what could be one of the earliest records of torture.     Archaeologists dug up 26 bodies in a mass grave and said the horror of their deaths marked them out. The remains were dug up in 2006 in Schoneck-Kilianstadten, about 15 kilometres outside Frankfurt, and now researchers have closely examined the bones.     The legs of the victims seem to have been broken -either just before or after death."Many have injuries, skull fractures caused by typical weapons from the time," said Christian Meyer, who was a PhD student at the University of Mainz when he conducted the research. The injuries are often on the left of the skull, indicating that they were facing the attacker when they were hit with an adze," `The Times' reported. P     ||BERLIN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/PCI-for-two-minute-silence-in-newsrooms-on-November-2/articleshow/48536066.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:00 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: To protest against states' failure to bring to book perpetrators of violence against journalists, the Press Council of India (PCI) wants media to protest symbolically by blacking out news for two minutes on November 2 every year.     "The PCI may proclaim November 2 as the National Day to End Impunity for Crimes Against Journalists and ask all newsrooms across the country to observe two-minute silence in newsrooms," it said in an affidavit filed before the Supreme Court in the case of UP journalist Jagendra Singh's murder.     Requesting the SC to lay down guidelines on safety of journalists, the PCI said, "Journalists reporting sensitive stories are in the position of whistleblowers who are entitled to protection. Safety of journalists requires the highest priority to protect the freedom of speech as also the freedom of information available to every citizen under article 19(1)(a) of the Constitution."     The print media regulatory body said around 80 journalists were killed in the last two decades but almost all cases were pending trial. "In states like Assam, Andhra Pradesh, Manipur, Jammu and Kashmir, Chhattisgarh and Jharkhand, not a single person was convicted for killing or attacking journalists. In these states, more than 60 journalists were killed in the last two decades," it said.     The PCI said it has recommended to the government for enacting a law to deal with crimes against journalists. It said in the absence of a specific law, cases relating to such offences keep pending in trial courts, which are already inundated under an avalanche of pending cases.     After a four-year study, the PCI said, "Most of the journalists felt that whenever a journalist was killed, the state government concerned, including chief minister and political leaders, react and promise stringent action. After the din and noise die down, no further action is taken. Most state governments never come forward to compensate the families of the slain journalists."     Apart from using violence to silence the media, the PCI appeared worried by the recent trend of journalists threatened with character assassination using names of women. "Incidents of using names of women for character assassination of journalists and to pressurize them are increasing each day," it said.     The council said similar tactics was used by UP police in Jagendra Singh murder case. "Police repeatedly mentioned the presence of Anganwadi worker Shalini in Jagendra's house but they did not care to find her and record her statement," it said.     It said the Shahjahanpur district administration has not shown seriousness to investigate the murder of the journalist. "In view of the seriousness of the case and the delay in conducting inquiry, the UP government should get this case thoroughly investigated by an impartial agency," the PCI said.||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/kolhapur/MANS-to-launch-series-of-agitations-from-tomorrow/articleshow/48535520.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:00 IST 2015||KOLHAPUR: The Maharashtra Andhashraddha Nirmulan Samiti (MANS) has decided to launch a series of programmes from August 20 to protest against the failure of the investigating agency in solving the murder cases of rationalist Narendra Dabholkar and veteran communist leader Govind Pansare.     Narendra Dabholkar was assassinated in Pune two years ago. However, the investigating agency concerned has not got a single clue regarding the murderers so far. Besides, Pansare was also murdered by unidentified men in a similar fashion in Kolhapur six months ago.     Sunil Swami, district executive president of MANS (Kolhapur), said, " Two years have passed since unidentified men assassinated Dabholkar, but the government has been unable to find the culprits. Same is the situation with Pansare" s case. Unidentified men shot the leader near his residence six months ago while he was returning home from morning walk. However, the police have failed to nab the culprits. We have decided to start agitations in a different way on August 20 in the district to show our resentment towards the government. We will demand the government to speed up the investigations and find the culprits."     " We will organise shows of the play 'Socrates to Dabholkar-Pansare via Tukaram" in Kolhapur and Ichalkaranji. We have staged more than 150 shows of the play in all the parts of Maharashtra and outside. The play is in the form of ringan natya devised to reach out to the people to spread Dabholkar" s message," he said.     " Besides, we will also send one lakh letters from the state to President Pranab Mukherjee questioning him over the delay in the investigation of these cases. We will send 10,000 letters to the president from Kolhapur," he said.                     ||KOLHAPUR
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:00 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:00 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/SC-acquits-Romesh-Sharma-in-Budhiraja-murder-case/articleshow/48704930.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:00 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Thursday upheld the Delhi High Court order acquitting former Congress leader Romesh Sharma in the case relating to the killing of fashion designer Kunjum Budhiraja.     A bench of Justices Pinaki Chandra Ghose and R K Agrawal dismissed an appeal filed by the Delhi government challenging HC order.     The Delhi government contended that the HC had erred in acquitting Sharma but it was strongly opposed by his counsel and senior advocate Siddharth Luthra who submitted that his client was in love with Kunjum and there was no evidence to prove his involvement in the case.     Sharma, who was alleged to be a frontman of underworld don Dawood Ibrahim, was convicted by a trial court on February 15, 2008. Kunjum was killed on March 20, 1999 at Sharma's South Delhi-based 'Jai Mata Di' farm house by a group of hired gangsters from Uttar Pradesh.     The trial court had convicted Sharma and five other accused in the case and had awarded life term to all. The HC, however, acquitted Sharma and co-accused Tejendir Verdi but upheld conviction and sentence of other four accused— Sharma's nephew Surinder Mishra, Hemchand, Santram and Ramesh alias Bobby.     While acquitting Sharma, the HC had said "Romesh Sharma and Kunjum were in love, and desired the company of each other. It does not establish that Sharma had got fed up with her". It had turned down Delhi police's contention that Sharma wanted to get rid of Kunjum as she knew about his alleged illegal activities.     "A grieving lover falling over the body of his mate and performing the rituals of a marriage can well be an expression of lasting love, and need not necessarily be a drama," the HC had said.     Sharma was in judicial custody at the time of the Kunjum's murder.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Raid-on-Bengaluru-centre-reveals-horror-tales/articleshow/48704718.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:00 IST 2015||BENGALURU: A State Human Rights Commission raid on a de-addiction centre in Jnanabharati Layout, near Kengeri, southwest Bengaluru, found 90 inmates living in pathetic conditions and subjected to inhuman treatment.     Thursday's raid followed the murder of an inmate of another de-addiction centre in Kothanur recently.     The SHRC raid on Sri Santhosh Social Service Society, also known as 4S Society, followed a tipoff. According to SHRC officials, the centre has been in existence for seven years at least, but the society couldn't produce documents of having obtained permission from the social welfare department. Commission officials said the centre had the permission from the DC and the DHO.     "Most inmates are between 20 and 35 years. They showed us signs of being physically abused. The centre has violated other norms too. Although it's supposed to have one nurse for every 15 patients and at least one in-house doctor and a psychiatrist, it didn't have any," said an SHRC spokesperson.     4 arrested for killing inmate:     Kothanur police arrested a de-addiction centre staffer and three inmates for allegedly beating to death a 28-year-old inmate. Dinesh was admitted to the centre by his family as he was an alcoholic. He was later found dead in a hospital. Family members noticed several bruises on his body. Narayana, an inmate-turned-staffer, gave some medicines to Dinesh, who later turned aggressive. Narayana sought the help of inmates Suresh, Subhan and Simon, to subdue Dinesh.     When Dinesh retaliated, the quartet overpowered him till he became unconscious. He died in hospital.||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/A-jolly-good-fellow-say-Khannas-friends/articleshow/48704630.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:00 IST 2015||Sanjeev Khanna, Indrani Mukerjea's second husband and suspected ally in Sheena Bora's killing, may be the most surprising element in this macabre drama, but his friends and associates in Kolkata refused to cast aspersions on "Sanju" just yet.     From being the biggest dart enthusiast at one of Kolkata's poshest clubs (the CC&FC) to having a finger in every pie, Sanjeev was everyone's "best mate" and go-to guy who friends described as: "A doer... someone who could get things done."     The morning after Khanna's arrest, TOI spoke to Ajay Rawla, the man who Khanna worked for as a consultant and whose house he was picked up from on Wednesday afternoon. "It wasn't like he was hiding like a desperate fugitive in my house. We had a meeting in the morning after which he drove me home and that's when news broke on television. We were sitting, watching, wondering what steps to take when the police arrived," explained Rawla.     Seven years his senior, Khanna's association with Rawla dates back to the time they went to Mayo College in Ajmer. Later, Khanna went on to become an aide for Rawla's pet projects. Besides running his own business in wireless communications, Khanna was there setting up chef Shaun Kenworthy and Rawla's restaurant 1658 or immersed in the heritage project of converting the Bawali Rajbari into a hotel. "He was getting all the construction work and labourers in place. He was very good in helping out with permissions through his connections with excise and contractors," remembers Kenworthy.     Khanna, who seldom missed his outings at the club, motor rallies and horse racing as a prominent face in the social circuit, was not the same man before he met Indrani, recounts Bull Banthia, a close friend. "Well-read and well-versed, Sanju had a great mechanical mind with a solution for everything," is how Bull chose to describe his "jolly good friend who loved meeting new people, hung out at the club but wasn't a social climber". "It was Indrani who emerged as this socialite and drove him to consciously build contacts with those higher up in the social rung after marriage," said the Kolkata-based entrepreneur. "That's the reason why I distanced myself from them until overnight she left Kolkata with their daughter and Sanju's wallet."     While Indrani never surfaces in conversations, his daughter Vidhie, who stayed with Indrani, is a fond subject with his friends. "He would miss his daughter but was resigned to fate, hoping that someday she would find him," said Rawla, adding, "It was Vidhie who called Sanjeev on Wednesday to give him the news."     No one seems to know about any recent interaction between Khanna and Indrani. G M Kapur, a known name in Kolkata who was Intach's state convener and happens to be Khanna's "mama", seemed disturbed with "all the theorizing" of Khanna's role in the crime. He declined to look back on Indrani and Khanna's relationship but added, "The last that there was any contact with Indrani or her family was when Vidhie visited Calcutta last year to celebrate the 75th birthday of her grandmother (Khanna's mother who lives with him)."     Khanna's Facebook posts on "karma" in the weeks and months following Sheena's alleged murder on April 24, 2012, make for interesting reading. On April 30, Khanna shared photo messages: "Say whatever, whenever the f*** you want to"; "Sometimes I get so weird, I even freak myself out".     On May 24, exactly a month after the alleged killing, he wrote: "You can never tell what people are thinking and feeling unless they tell you, and usually they lie. you ask them, 'Whats wrong?' and they say 'Nothing'. You accept this because it's easier than digging for the truth. People smile when they want to cry, they laugh when they want to scream and shout. They pretend like nothing is wrong because they don't want to face the truth. Things aren't always rainbows and butterflies, sometimes you gotta scream and cry your anger and sadness to the world, because you can only hold it in for so long before something in you snaps. so when you want to cry, cry. When you want to scream, scream. Don't hide behind fake smiles, it's ok to not be alright."     ||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Sheena-docu-Michail-add-to-mystery/articleshow/48701752.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:00 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Michail, Sheena's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered have raised a number of unanswered questions.    Two days after his mother, Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Michail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai Police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed that what he gave to police was enough to prove that Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora (who are actually parents of Indrani) as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. Some questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukherjea.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Michail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43 as mentioned in reports after her arrest.    Adding more to the suspense, Michail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Michail studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board examination, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that knew that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard that her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard that she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband who she introduced as Peter Mukherjea."    The two-member Mumbai Police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Michail, who on Wednesday, was the first one to reveal that Sheena was Indrani's daughter, twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Michail's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Michail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukherjae is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Michail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."  ||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Grandparents-are-Sheenas-mom-dad-on-birth-certificate/articleshow/48704559.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:00 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Mikhail, Sheena Bora's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered led to some unanswered questions on Thursday.    Two days after his mother Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Mikhail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed what he gave the police was enough to prove Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora, who are actually Indrani's parents, as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. However, many questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter. In many cases in India involving single mothers, grandparents are known to put in their names as father and mother.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukerjea, that is, 13 years after Sheena was born.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Mikhail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43.    Mikhail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Mikhail     studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board exam, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband, who she introduced as Peter Mukerjea."    The two-member Mumbai police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Mikhail twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Mikhail 's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time, he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Mikhail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukerjea is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Mikhail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Sheena-bowled-us-over-Rahuls-uncle/articleshow/48704552.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:00 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: Had things worked out as desired for Peter Mukherjea's first wife Shabnam and her family in Dehradun, Rahul Mukherjea and Sheena Bora would have been married for over three years now.     Shabnam's brother Shaleen Singh told TOI on Thursday that in 2011 Rahul brought Sheena to their sprawling home in Dehradun to seek approval from the family for their marriage.     The entire family-Shabnam, her younger brother Shaleen, father Anand Singh and mother Seema-were reportedly bowled over by Sheena's jovial nature and affection towards the elderly people. Impressed, the family gave its "unqualified and unanimous approval" for the wedding, which was supposed to take place within a few months, said Shaleen.     Stunned by the recent development, Shaleen said, "Sheena was among those rare persons who left a deep and lifelong impact on people. She was good-looking, a sweet person, clean of heart and good to talk to. None of us objected to the wedding."     Shaleen learnt of Sheena's murder through news channels. "It would have been great if she had become a part of the family. I don't know what was the cause and motive behind the heinous crime, but all those behind the killing of the jovial-natured girl should not be spared at any cost," he said.     A former model and tele-actor, 49-year-old Shaleen today owns the Sanskar International school in Jogiwala here. He recalled the last meeting with Shabnam and Rahul in April this year. "My father Anand Singh passed away in April. They had come to pay their respects but we did not interact much."     However, Shaleen said of late the interaction between him and his sister Shabnam was limited. Although Shabnam's farm Gul-e-Shabnam and Shaleen's residence Shankar Sadan are barely 200 metres away in Badripur, meetings between them were rare. While Shaleen and his mother stay on different floors of Shankar Sadan, Shabnam stays alone at her residence and is frequently visited by Rahul.     "There are matters in each family which we do not want to disclose. We are not against each other but do not interact much. She comes to meet our mother occasionally," said Shaleen, adding that Shabnam was passionate about painting and had a studio in her residence.     Shaleen denied having any details about the presence of Mumbai police in Dehradun. "Neither Doon police nor Mumbai police have contacted me over the issue."     Staff at Shabnam's residence said she was out-of-station but they were not aware of her whereabouts.||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Kilpauk-doctor-murder-Hubby-to-approach-court/articleshow/48704411.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:00 IST 2015||CHENNAI: It's been four days since police claimed to have solved the murder of S Sathya, 24, a PG medical student. However, her husband has put forth questions that police have failed to answer. Though investigating officers confirmed Sathya was not sexually assaulted before she was killed, they leaked to some section of media saying that they changed their stance on Wednesday and said there were indications of attempt to rape on the deceased.     Police personnel revealed the details soon after Sathya's husband Dr P Sesu, also employed at a primary health centre in Perambalur, expressed certain doubts.     He alleged the police hastily solved the case citing the state assembly, which is in motion. Sathya was found dead at her house in Kilpauk on August 20.     On August 23, police arrested Harintham Depnath, a BTech graduate, who lived at the second floor on the same apartment. Neither was there any mention about sexual assault or attempt on Sathya when the body was recovered from the house. The nor did the doctors. Police didn't tell this during the arrest of Depnath on August 23. "What forced the police to reveal about the sexual harassment attempt on my wife now?" asked Sesu.     "I want to live a peaceful life with my two sons - Tamil Nesan, 6, and Karmugilan, 4. The studies and the future of my children is important for me. I do respect the police personnel who spent sleepless nights to solve the murder, but there are questions that need to be answered," he said.     "I live in Perambalur with my children, but we speak through live video calls. I have told my sons that Sathya has gone to the God, as the Almighty likes her more. "Hereafter, we cannot speak or meet her. I don't know how far my children will admit it?" said Sesu. "I will approach the court seeking a fair probe into the murder of my wife. I want to find out the real cause behind her death. I want the real accused to get punished for his deed," said Sesu.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Woman-strangles-husbands-lover/articleshow/48704388.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:00 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A woman beat up and strangled her husband's partner, an assistant professor at a polytechnic in Choolaimedu, in their Thiruverkadu home on Thursday, police said. A court later remanded the accused, 32-year-old Shruti, in judicial custody.     Police said Sambasivam, a professor at Panimalar Engineering College in Poonamallee, used to bring Rajalakshmi, home frequently and introduced her to his wife Shruti as a colleague. He even dropped her home at night. The polytechnic where Rajalakshmi worked was part of the Panimalar group of educational institutions. Shruti initially believed the two were just colleagues until Sambasivam came home with Rajalakshmi on Tuesday and said the woman was moving in with them permanently.     On Wednesday morning, Sambasivam allegedly tied a 'mangalsutra' to Rajalakshmi in front of his wife, police said, based on Shruti's confession. A shocked Shruti picked up a fight with Sambasivam who asked her to maintain a cordial relationship and take care of Rajalakshmi. On Thursday morning, after he left for college a fight broke out between the two women.     Police said Rajalakshmi allegedly abused Sruthi and went into the bathroom. Sruthi followed her in and strangled her with the 'mangalsutra'. She then tried to make it appear that the woman had fainted in the bathroom. She took her in an autorickshaw to a nearby hospital where she was declared 'brought dead'. Doctors who noticed a few marks around her neck informed the Thiruverkadu police who registered a case of suspicious death under CrPC section 176.     The body was sent for postmortem to Kilpauk Medical College and Hospital.     After finding that the two women were at home at the time of the death, police interrogated Sruthi for more than an hour but she continued to maintain that Rajyalakshmi had died of injuries sustained when she fell down in the bathroom.     "She confessed to the murder when we told her that her fingerprints had been lifted from the scene of crime," said an investigating officer. "She said she had smashed the woman's head against the wall and later strangled her with the 'thali'." Police altered the case to murder and arrested Sruthi.     Initial inquiries revealed that Rajalakshmi had been married to a man named Rajasekhar for a while and they had separated. She then got married to Suresh, a relative who worked in a private firm, a few years ago and the couple moved into a house in Mogappair.     They allegedly had frequent quarrels as he tortured her and she left him too, police found.     Rajalakshmi then got a job with Panimalar Engineering College where she met Sambasivam. The two became friends and began seeing each other. Rajalakshmi recently moved to the polytechnic in Choolaimedu, police said.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/US-journalists-killer-annoyed-colleagues-Ex-boss/articleshow/48704167.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:00 IST 2015||ROANOKE, United States: The disgruntled former US television station employee who murdered two journalists had "annoyed" colleagues but showed no signs at work of any mental health issues, his former boss said Thursday.     Vester Lee Flanagan, 41, worked as a reporter for WDBJ in Roanoke, Virginia from March 2012 to February 2013, but was dismissed for poor performance and angry behavior, general manager Jeffrey Marks said.     On Wednesday, Flanagan shot and killed two of the CBS affiliate's journalists while they were conducting an on-air interview. He later fatally shot himself.     "We are still at a loss to figure out what happened to him in those two and a half years" since he was fired, Marks told a news conference flanked by dozens of staff, many of them holding hands.     "I don't think we identified that he had mental health issues. We certainly identified that he had performance issues."     Marks defended the station's hiring record and said its parent company had "a very elaborate program to screen employees."     Flanagan passed background checks and came with only positive references, Marks said.     It was only after he was hired, Marks said, that things went downhill.     "Vester's behavior annoyed a lot of people in the news station," Marks said.     Flanagan, who went by the on-screen name Bryce Williams, alleged in a manifesto faxed to ABC News that he was discriminated against as a gay, black journalist.     Marks said accusations in 2013 that he was treated unfairly were "immediately investigated and found to be without merit."     During his employment, Flanagan complied with demands that he seek medical help, but he was ultimately dismissed.     He was escorted from the building by police and made an ominous aside to the news director -- handing him a wooden cross and saying "'you'll need this'," Marks said.     As he left, he also made a "derogatory comment" to Adam Ward, the cameraman he shot dead on Wednesday.     Flanagan filed a complaint with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and a civil action suit, which were dismissed, he said.     "All of these investigations determined that no reasonable person would have taken any of the cited incidents as discrimination or harassment."     After killing Ward and reporter Alison Parker live on the air, Flanagan posted a video of the attack on social media.||ROANOKE, UNITED STATES
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:00 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/SC-acquits-Romesh-Sharma-in-Budhiraja-murder-case/articleshow/48704930.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:00 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Thursday upheld the Delhi High Court order acquitting former Congress leader Romesh Sharma in the case relating to the killing of fashion designer Kunjum Budhiraja.     A bench of Justices Pinaki Chandra Ghose and R K Agrawal dismissed an appeal filed by the Delhi government challenging HC order.     The Delhi government contended that the HC had erred in acquitting Sharma but it was strongly opposed by his counsel and senior advocate Siddharth Luthra who submitted that his client was in love with Kunjum and there was no evidence to prove his involvement in the case.     Sharma, who was alleged to be a frontman of underworld don Dawood Ibrahim, was convicted by a trial court on February 15, 2008. Kunjum was killed on March 20, 1999 at Sharma's South Delhi-based 'Jai Mata Di' farm house by a group of hired gangsters from Uttar Pradesh.     The trial court had convicted Sharma and five other accused in the case and had awarded life term to all. The HC, however, acquitted Sharma and co-accused Tejendir Verdi but upheld conviction and sentence of other four accused— Sharma's nephew Surinder Mishra, Hemchand, Santram and Ramesh alias Bobby.     While acquitting Sharma, the HC had said "Romesh Sharma and Kunjum were in love, and desired the company of each other. It does not establish that Sharma had got fed up with her". It had turned down Delhi police's contention that Sharma wanted to get rid of Kunjum as she knew about his alleged illegal activities.     "A grieving lover falling over the body of his mate and performing the rituals of a marriage can well be an expression of lasting love, and need not necessarily be a drama," the HC had said.     Sharma was in judicial custody at the time of the Kunjum's murder.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Raid-on-Bengaluru-centre-reveals-horror-tales/articleshow/48704718.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:00 IST 2015||BENGALURU: A State Human Rights Commission raid on a de-addiction centre in Jnanabharati Layout, near Kengeri, southwest Bengaluru, found 90 inmates living in pathetic conditions and subjected to inhuman treatment.     Thursday's raid followed the murder of an inmate of another de-addiction centre in Kothanur recently.     The SHRC raid on Sri Santhosh Social Service Society, also known as 4S Society, followed a tipoff. According to SHRC officials, the centre has been in existence for seven years at least, but the society couldn't produce documents of having obtained permission from the social welfare department. Commission officials said the centre had the permission from the DC and the DHO.     "Most inmates are between 20 and 35 years. They showed us signs of being physically abused. The centre has violated other norms too. Although it's supposed to have one nurse for every 15 patients and at least one in-house doctor and a psychiatrist, it didn't have any," said an SHRC spokesperson.     4 arrested for killing inmate:     Kothanur police arrested a de-addiction centre staffer and three inmates for allegedly beating to death a 28-year-old inmate. Dinesh was admitted to the centre by his family as he was an alcoholic. He was later found dead in a hospital. Family members noticed several bruises on his body. Narayana, an inmate-turned-staffer, gave some medicines to Dinesh, who later turned aggressive. Narayana sought the help of inmates Suresh, Subhan and Simon, to subdue Dinesh.     When Dinesh retaliated, the quartet overpowered him till he became unconscious. He died in hospital.||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/A-jolly-good-fellow-say-Khannas-friends/articleshow/48704630.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:00 IST 2015||Sanjeev Khanna, Indrani Mukerjea's second husband and suspected ally in Sheena Bora's killing, may be the most surprising element in this macabre drama, but his friends and associates in Kolkata refused to cast aspersions on "Sanju" just yet.     From being the biggest dart enthusiast at one of Kolkata's poshest clubs (the CC&FC) to having a finger in every pie, Sanjeev was everyone's "best mate" and go-to guy who friends described as: "A doer... someone who could get things done."     The morning after Khanna's arrest, TOI spoke to Ajay Rawla, the man who Khanna worked for as a consultant and whose house he was picked up from on Wednesday afternoon. "It wasn't like he was hiding like a desperate fugitive in my house. We had a meeting in the morning after which he drove me home and that's when news broke on television. We were sitting, watching, wondering what steps to take when the police arrived," explained Rawla.     Seven years his senior, Khanna's association with Rawla dates back to the time they went to Mayo College in Ajmer. Later, Khanna went on to become an aide for Rawla's pet projects. Besides running his own business in wireless communications, Khanna was there setting up chef Shaun Kenworthy and Rawla's restaurant 1658 or immersed in the heritage project of converting the Bawali Rajbari into a hotel. "He was getting all the construction work and labourers in place. He was very good in helping out with permissions through his connections with excise and contractors," remembers Kenworthy.     Khanna, who seldom missed his outings at the club, motor rallies and horse racing as a prominent face in the social circuit, was not the same man before he met Indrani, recounts Bull Banthia, a close friend. "Well-read and well-versed, Sanju had a great mechanical mind with a solution for everything," is how Bull chose to describe his "jolly good friend who loved meeting new people, hung out at the club but wasn't a social climber". "It was Indrani who emerged as this socialite and drove him to consciously build contacts with those higher up in the social rung after marriage," said the Kolkata-based entrepreneur. "That's the reason why I distanced myself from them until overnight she left Kolkata with their daughter and Sanju's wallet."     While Indrani never surfaces in conversations, his daughter Vidhie, who stayed with Indrani, is a fond subject with his friends. "He would miss his daughter but was resigned to fate, hoping that someday she would find him," said Rawla, adding, "It was Vidhie who called Sanjeev on Wednesday to give him the news."     No one seems to know about any recent interaction between Khanna and Indrani. G M Kapur, a known name in Kolkata who was Intach's state convener and happens to be Khanna's "mama", seemed disturbed with "all the theorizing" of Khanna's role in the crime. He declined to look back on Indrani and Khanna's relationship but added, "The last that there was any contact with Indrani or her family was when Vidhie visited Calcutta last year to celebrate the 75th birthday of her grandmother (Khanna's mother who lives with him)."     Khanna's Facebook posts on "karma" in the weeks and months following Sheena's alleged murder on April 24, 2012, make for interesting reading. On April 30, Khanna shared photo messages: "Say whatever, whenever the f*** you want to"; "Sometimes I get so weird, I even freak myself out".     On May 24, exactly a month after the alleged killing, he wrote: "You can never tell what people are thinking and feeling unless they tell you, and usually they lie. you ask them, 'Whats wrong?' and they say 'Nothing'. You accept this because it's easier than digging for the truth. People smile when they want to cry, they laugh when they want to scream and shout. They pretend like nothing is wrong because they don't want to face the truth. Things aren't always rainbows and butterflies, sometimes you gotta scream and cry your anger and sadness to the world, because you can only hold it in for so long before something in you snaps. so when you want to cry, cry. When you want to scream, scream. Don't hide behind fake smiles, it's ok to not be alright."     ||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Sheena-docu-Michail-add-to-mystery/articleshow/48701752.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:00 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Michail, Sheena's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered have raised a number of unanswered questions.    Two days after his mother, Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Michail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai Police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed that what he gave to police was enough to prove that Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora (who are actually parents of Indrani) as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. Some questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukherjea.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Michail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43 as mentioned in reports after her arrest.    Adding more to the suspense, Michail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Michail studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board examination, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that knew that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard that her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard that she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband who she introduced as Peter Mukherjea."    The two-member Mumbai Police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Michail, who on Wednesday, was the first one to reveal that Sheena was Indrani's daughter, twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Michail's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Michail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukherjae is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Michail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."  ||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Grandparents-are-Sheenas-mom-dad-on-birth-certificate/articleshow/48704559.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:00 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Mikhail, Sheena Bora's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered led to some unanswered questions on Thursday.    Two days after his mother Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Mikhail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed what he gave the police was enough to prove Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora, who are actually Indrani's parents, as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. However, many questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter. In many cases in India involving single mothers, grandparents are known to put in their names as father and mother.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukerjea, that is, 13 years after Sheena was born.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Mikhail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43.    Mikhail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Mikhail     studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board exam, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband, who she introduced as Peter Mukerjea."    The two-member Mumbai police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Mikhail twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Mikhail 's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time, he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Mikhail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukerjea is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Mikhail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Sheena-bowled-us-over-Rahuls-uncle/articleshow/48704552.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:00 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: Had things worked out as desired for Peter Mukherjea's first wife Shabnam and her family in Dehradun, Rahul Mukherjea and Sheena Bora would have been married for over three years now.     Shabnam's brother Shaleen Singh told TOI on Thursday that in 2011 Rahul brought Sheena to their sprawling home in Dehradun to seek approval from the family for their marriage.     The entire family-Shabnam, her younger brother Shaleen, father Anand Singh and mother Seema-were reportedly bowled over by Sheena's jovial nature and affection towards the elderly people. Impressed, the family gave its "unqualified and unanimous approval" for the wedding, which was supposed to take place within a few months, said Shaleen.     Stunned by the recent development, Shaleen said, "Sheena was among those rare persons who left a deep and lifelong impact on people. She was good-looking, a sweet person, clean of heart and good to talk to. None of us objected to the wedding."     Shaleen learnt of Sheena's murder through news channels. "It would have been great if she had become a part of the family. I don't know what was the cause and motive behind the heinous crime, but all those behind the killing of the jovial-natured girl should not be spared at any cost," he said.     A former model and tele-actor, 49-year-old Shaleen today owns the Sanskar International school in Jogiwala here. He recalled the last meeting with Shabnam and Rahul in April this year. "My father Anand Singh passed away in April. They had come to pay their respects but we did not interact much."     However, Shaleen said of late the interaction between him and his sister Shabnam was limited. Although Shabnam's farm Gul-e-Shabnam and Shaleen's residence Shankar Sadan are barely 200 metres away in Badripur, meetings between them were rare. While Shaleen and his mother stay on different floors of Shankar Sadan, Shabnam stays alone at her residence and is frequently visited by Rahul.     "There are matters in each family which we do not want to disclose. We are not against each other but do not interact much. She comes to meet our mother occasionally," said Shaleen, adding that Shabnam was passionate about painting and had a studio in her residence.     Shaleen denied having any details about the presence of Mumbai police in Dehradun. "Neither Doon police nor Mumbai police have contacted me over the issue."     Staff at Shabnam's residence said she was out-of-station but they were not aware of her whereabouts.||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Kilpauk-doctor-murder-Hubby-to-approach-court/articleshow/48704411.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:00 IST 2015||CHENNAI: It's been four days since police claimed to have solved the murder of S Sathya, 24, a PG medical student. However, her husband has put forth questions that police have failed to answer. Though investigating officers confirmed Sathya was not sexually assaulted before she was killed, they leaked to some section of media saying that they changed their stance on Wednesday and said there were indications of attempt to rape on the deceased.     Police personnel revealed the details soon after Sathya's husband Dr P Sesu, also employed at a primary health centre in Perambalur, expressed certain doubts.     He alleged the police hastily solved the case citing the state assembly, which is in motion. Sathya was found dead at her house in Kilpauk on August 20.     On August 23, police arrested Harintham Depnath, a BTech graduate, who lived at the second floor on the same apartment. Neither was there any mention about sexual assault or attempt on Sathya when the body was recovered from the house. The nor did the doctors. Police didn't tell this during the arrest of Depnath on August 23. "What forced the police to reveal about the sexual harassment attempt on my wife now?" asked Sesu.     "I want to live a peaceful life with my two sons - Tamil Nesan, 6, and Karmugilan, 4. The studies and the future of my children is important for me. I do respect the police personnel who spent sleepless nights to solve the murder, but there are questions that need to be answered," he said.     "I live in Perambalur with my children, but we speak through live video calls. I have told my sons that Sathya has gone to the God, as the Almighty likes her more. "Hereafter, we cannot speak or meet her. I don't know how far my children will admit it?" said Sesu. "I will approach the court seeking a fair probe into the murder of my wife. I want to find out the real cause behind her death. I want the real accused to get punished for his deed," said Sesu.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Woman-strangles-husbands-lover/articleshow/48704388.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:00 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A woman beat up and strangled her husband's partner, an assistant professor at a polytechnic in Choolaimedu, in their Thiruverkadu home on Thursday, police said. A court later remanded the accused, 32-year-old Shruti, in judicial custody.     Police said Sambasivam, a professor at Panimalar Engineering College in Poonamallee, used to bring Rajalakshmi, home frequently and introduced her to his wife Shruti as a colleague. He even dropped her home at night. The polytechnic where Rajalakshmi worked was part of the Panimalar group of educational institutions. Shruti initially believed the two were just colleagues until Sambasivam came home with Rajalakshmi on Tuesday and said the woman was moving in with them permanently.     On Wednesday morning, Sambasivam allegedly tied a 'mangalsutra' to Rajalakshmi in front of his wife, police said, based on Shruti's confession. A shocked Shruti picked up a fight with Sambasivam who asked her to maintain a cordial relationship and take care of Rajalakshmi. On Thursday morning, after he left for college a fight broke out between the two women.     Police said Rajalakshmi allegedly abused Sruthi and went into the bathroom. Sruthi followed her in and strangled her with the 'mangalsutra'. She then tried to make it appear that the woman had fainted in the bathroom. She took her in an autorickshaw to a nearby hospital where she was declared 'brought dead'. Doctors who noticed a few marks around her neck informed the Thiruverkadu police who registered a case of suspicious death under CrPC section 176.     The body was sent for postmortem to Kilpauk Medical College and Hospital.     After finding that the two women were at home at the time of the death, police interrogated Sruthi for more than an hour but she continued to maintain that Rajyalakshmi had died of injuries sustained when she fell down in the bathroom.     "She confessed to the murder when we told her that her fingerprints had been lifted from the scene of crime," said an investigating officer. "She said she had smashed the woman's head against the wall and later strangled her with the 'thali'." Police altered the case to murder and arrested Sruthi.     Initial inquiries revealed that Rajalakshmi had been married to a man named Rajasekhar for a while and they had separated. She then got married to Suresh, a relative who worked in a private firm, a few years ago and the couple moved into a house in Mogappair.     They allegedly had frequent quarrels as he tortured her and she left him too, police found.     Rajalakshmi then got a job with Panimalar Engineering College where she met Sambasivam. The two became friends and began seeing each other. Rajalakshmi recently moved to the polytechnic in Choolaimedu, police said.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/US-journalists-killer-annoyed-colleagues-Ex-boss/articleshow/48704167.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:00 IST 2015||ROANOKE, United States: The disgruntled former US television station employee who murdered two journalists had "annoyed" colleagues but showed no signs at work of any mental health issues, his former boss said Thursday.     Vester Lee Flanagan, 41, worked as a reporter for WDBJ in Roanoke, Virginia from March 2012 to February 2013, but was dismissed for poor performance and angry behavior, general manager Jeffrey Marks said.     On Wednesday, Flanagan shot and killed two of the CBS affiliate's journalists while they were conducting an on-air interview. He later fatally shot himself.     "We are still at a loss to figure out what happened to him in those two and a half years" since he was fired, Marks told a news conference flanked by dozens of staff, many of them holding hands.     "I don't think we identified that he had mental health issues. We certainly identified that he had performance issues."     Marks defended the station's hiring record and said its parent company had "a very elaborate program to screen employees."     Flanagan passed background checks and came with only positive references, Marks said.     It was only after he was hired, Marks said, that things went downhill.     "Vester's behavior annoyed a lot of people in the news station," Marks said.     Flanagan, who went by the on-screen name Bryce Williams, alleged in a manifesto faxed to ABC News that he was discriminated against as a gay, black journalist.     Marks said accusations in 2013 that he was treated unfairly were "immediately investigated and found to be without merit."     During his employment, Flanagan complied with demands that he seek medical help, but he was ultimately dismissed.     He was escorted from the building by police and made an ominous aside to the news director -- handing him a wooden cross and saying "'you'll need this'," Marks said.     As he left, he also made a "derogatory comment" to Adam Ward, the cameraman he shot dead on Wednesday.     Flanagan filed a complaint with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and a civil action suit, which were dismissed, he said.     "All of these investigations determined that no reasonable person would have taken any of the cited incidents as discrimination or harassment."     After killing Ward and reporter Alison Parker live on the air, Flanagan posted a video of the attack on social media.||ROANOKE, UNITED STATES
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/kolkata/Bedabratas-next-to-focus-on-medical-loopholes/articleshow/48535483.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:05 IST 2015||KOLKATA: If all goes as per plan, Dr Anirban Bose may soon join the league of authors, including Ruskin Bond, Jhumpa Lahiri and Chetan Bhagat, whose works have inspired Bollywood time and again. Helming the project, director Bedabrata Pain will adapt Bose's crime thriller 'The Death of Mitali Dotto', which exposes realities of India's new hospitals.     A former NASA scientist, Pain's directorial debut 'Chittagong' had won him a National Award. Earlier this month, he also won the Distinguished Alumnus Award at IIT Kharagpur.     While the Hindi working title is 'Agar Dil Bhi Hota', the English title is 'No Loose Ends'. "It is a tight 110-minute movie with a lovely twist at the end," says the Los Angeles-based director during his visit to the city. Though the screenplay will highlight some existing medical malpractices in India, what gives it an extra edge is the father-son story that also finds resonances in the director's personal relationship with his father.     Bose's book begins with the incident of a stab victim being brought bleeding to a Delhi hospital where Dr Neel Dev-Roy resuscitates her. Neel, who has just relocated from the US, is shocked to learn that hospital authorities will let the woman die. As he struggles to keep the woman alive, Neel unearths sinister motives that go beyond negligence issue.     In an interview to TOI from New York, the transplant nephrologist at the University of Rochester says, "The book has a strong Bengali element to it with references to the Naxalbari movement and Communist-capitalist ideology. That's why I thought of approaching Bedabrata. Our initial proposal was for a TV adaptation. But he wanted to make a movie. Bedabrata is an imaginative, intelligent and detail-oriented director and I'm glad that he agreed."     Bose says Pain honed in on the underlying theme of the book like a 'laser-guided bomb'. "Despite all the thrills, medical drama and East-vs-West ideology, the book's foundation is a simple problem of human relationships," Bose adds.     Pain's screenplay, however, has deviated from the book. "It is a journey of a flawed protagonist. Harboring a psychosis of abandonment, Neel believes that he is doomed for failure. He can't solve the murder without sorting out his past," Pain adds.     If the transition from NASA to making a film wasn't surprising enough, following it up with a mainstream Bollywood thriller is sure to raise eyebrows. Shrugging off the arthouse director tag, Pain says he is here to tell stories that excite him. "Film is a mass medium. But that doesn't mean we need to dumb it down." he says.     Pain wants mainstream Bollywood stars for the movie. "In Hollywood, it's possible to make a film succeed without 'stars'. I like big canvases for my films. In fact, the very first scene would require expensive computer-generated imagery and drones," he explains.     Can't he recover the investments without stars? "A script can ascertain whether an actor will remain a star or become a character. With so much talent around, I'm sure they'll do justice to the vulnerable characters," he insists.     Shooting will happen in Delhi and North Bengal. Pain plans to capture Delhi during monsoons and winter. He will return to the forests of North Bengal that had earlier seen him go behind the lens for 'Chittagong'.     ||KOLKATA
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/pune/Elderly-couple-murdered-in-Junnar/articleshow/48535410.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:05 IST 2015||PUNE: A 68-year-old man and his wife were found murdered at Savargaon village, Junnar, around 90 km from here, during the early hours on Monday. The reason behind the murder is as yet unknown.     Police said the deceased are Gopal Kisan Surgude and his 60-year-old wife Shalan. Inspector Kailas Pingle, in-charge of Junnar police station, told TOI, " Surgude has a previous criminal record. We are investigating the double murder," Pingle said.     The officer added that Surgude and his wife were living in a shack at Savargaon near Mina river. " Surgude would guard the villager's farms. On Sunday, around 8.30 pm, a villager heard loud noises from Surgude's home however he ignored it suspecting a quarrel between husband and wife," he said.     During the early hours, when the same person went to water his crop, he saw Surgude' s body lying along the road near his farm, said the official. " Suspecting a leopard attack, the person alerted other villagers. When the villagers went to Surgude' s shack, they found Shalan' s body and immediately alerted the police," he said.     The suspects had hacked Surgude and his wife to death with a sharp weapon. " At present we do not have any clues about the suspects involved in the murder," Pingle said.     Prima facie investigations have revealed that Surgude' s son Prakash, who was also a criminal on the police records, died recently. Prakash was thrashed to death during a robbery attempt. " Prakash' s wife got Rs 3.75 lakh as aid from the state government," Pingle said.     Investigations have revealed that the Surgude family shared the compensation amount among themselves Surgude was given Rs 1 lakh. " Shalan' s son, from her first marriage, was demanding the money from Surgude. We are probing whether he was involved in the double murder," the officer said.         ||PUNE
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Some-rapes-given-gang-rape-twist-Mulayam-Singh-Yadav/articleshow/48535207.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:05 IST 2015||SP chief Mulayam Singh Yadav on Tuesday said that a smear campaign was being run against the party's government in UP. Citing the example of Badaun rape case, he said it was blown out of proportion "The CBI probed the case and found out that rape was not committed at all. They were cold-blooded murders by the victim's cousins for property," Mulayam said. "But even senior leaders like Congress president Sonia Gandhi's son Rahul rushed to Badaun and attacked the state government at the law and order front," he said.Speaking at a function to distribute free e-rickshaws, the SP boss said that there were instances where only one person committed rape but the victim named four people merely to settle scores."Innocents must not be implicated and harassed. There are cases, where a victim has accused four brothers of raping her. It is not practical," he added. Mulayam said the rate of rape cases was lowest in UP as compared to other BJP-ruled states."Here the rate of rape cases is only 2% while in Madhya Pradesh it is 9 and in Rajasthan it is 7. In Delhi the situation is worse," he said.He also targeted his party leaders for their failure to counter campaigns to malign SP government. "Our own MLAs said they were helpless as the media was running a campaign. I will see to it how such MLAs get a ticket this time," he said. He called upon the party workers to inform the people about the schemes of the government. "You have only three months in hand. If you will talk about it later then people will not listen to you as they will see it as an election campaign," he said.Taking on the BJP-led NDA government at the Centre, he said the disturbance at the borders was a part of a conspiracy to shift the attention of the people from other issues.|| 
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Close-to-40-of-all-abductions-are-of-women-for-marriage-NCRB/articleshow/48535179.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:05 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: Close to 40% of all 'kidnappings' in the country are of women who are abducted for marriage . Latest data from the National Crime Records Bureau (NCRB), which has for the first time tabulated data on reasons for abduction, also suggests that ransom is no more a major motivation for kidnapping.The NCRB data for 2014 shows that of over 77,000 kidnappings that took place last year, only 676 had ransom as motivation. Close to 31,000 women were kidnapped last year with the intent to compel them for marriage. Over 1,500 people were kidnapped with an intent to murder them.The data shows that UP, Bihar and Assam accounted for almost 50% of all kidnappings for marriage. Among these states, UP recorded the highest such offences with 7,338 cases of kidnapping of women. Such offences also made up almost 60% of all kidnappings in UP.Bihar followed with 4,641 such cases. Marriage-related abductions accounted for 70% of all abductions in Bihar. Assam, which clocked 3,883 such cases, had the highest rate of such offences at 25 per one lakh of population.Explaining the data, police sources said whenever a boy and a girl eloped for marriage, the girl's parents registered a complaint of kidnapping against the boy. This was the reason, they said, for such abnormally high number of kidnappings for marriage.The highest number of ransom-motivated kidnappings were reported from West Bengal (101), followed by UP (83) and Bihar (62).READ ALSO:The highest number of kidnappings that ended up in murder were reported from Assam (632) followed by UP (539).UP led the chart in the category of total kidnappings with 12,361. Madhya Pradesh took second spot with 7,833 such cases followed by Bihar (6,570) and West Bengal (6,110).||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chandigarh/Power-battle-wounds-Mohali/articleshow/48534997.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:05 IST 2015||MOHALI: Barbs were exchanged, chairs flung, tables broken and councillors jostled with each other as bedlam marred the first Mohali municipal corporation (MC) mayoral elections that were postponed till August 28 owing to the pandemonium which was accompanied with violence outside the venue of civic body building in Sector 68 on Tuesday.    It all started when SAD-BJP councillors allegedly started creating ruckus after they became aware that 12 independent councillors, including their leader Kulwant Singh, were backing the Congress that has 14 councillors plus the vote of MLA Balbir Singh Sidhu, the ex-officio member, in the 50-member house. Facing an unavoidable defeat, they resorted to ruckus as the proceedings began in the house when MC commissioner Uma Shankar Gupta took his seat around 11am, the Congress alleged.    The SAD-BJP started complaining they could not approach the independent councillors for support as most had gone "underground". Bharat Bhushan Maini, a BJP councillor from ward number 5, said, "Kulwant Singh and Congress took away all the councillors to an undisclosed location. This is a violation of human rights. We were not able to approach them."    A heated argument broke out. Some SAD-BJP councillors allegedly broke a glass table and pushed Gupta around when he tried to pacify the tempers. Gupta stormed out of the building after five minutes. Outside, the scene was more violent.    Supporters of SAD-BJP and Congress and Kulwant Singh, who was ousted from SAD, fought pitched battles. Bricks stacked at a ground were picked and hurled. Glass bottles too were thrown. Vehicles parked nearby were damaged. That of Sidhu too was not spared. A score of people were injured. The police swung into action, resorting to lathicharge. The situation was brought under control after 30 minutes.    Later, Sidhu, while talking to TOI, alleged that the SAD-BJP acted in a planned manner so that elections could be postponed and they could buy some more time. "It is a murder of democracy. Mohali SAD in-charge Balwant Singh Ramuwalia is a goon. He disrupted a democratic process because he feared SAD-BJP will not be able to elect its own mayor. It was a well-planned conspiracy," he added.    According to Kulwant Singh, Ramoowalia hatched the conspiracy after failing to indulge in horse-trading. "Ramoowalia is responsible for the ruckus. We were sitting peacefully inside the MC house when Parwinder Singh Sohana of ward number 42 started to shout and throw chairs. SAD-BJP councillors broke the table glass and also pushed the commissioner," Singh alleged.    Ramoowalia, however, denied all the charges.    "Our councillors did nothing. The ruckus was created by the independent and Congress councillors. Moreover, we were not allowed to approach the independent councillors for support," said Ramoowalia.    While SAD-BJP councillors left the MC building around 11.35 am, those from the Congress and independents stayed till the decision to postpone the elections was announced around 1.30 pm.    HOW IT ALL UNFOLDS    11 am | MC house meeting starts. SAD-BJP councillors allegedly start creating ruckus    11.05 am | SAD-BJP councillors raise slogans, allegedly throw chairs, break a glass table and shove MC commissioner Uma Shankar Gupta    11.06 am | Gupta leaves the house as councillors squabble    11.10 am | Some SAD-BJP councillors allegedly manhandle independent and Congress compatriots as police are sent inside to intervene    11.20 am | As news spreads of chaos inside the house, SAD-BJP members allegedly pelt stones at Congress and Kulwant supporters, who too retaliate    11.22 am | Police resort to lathicharge    11:35 am | SAD-BJP councillors walk out of MC building, others stay put    1:30 pm | Returning officer announces postponement of polls; Congress and independent councillors leave MC building.    7 MONTHS & COUNTING    February 23 | First municipal corporation elections held in Mohali    February 26 | Result of elections announced with no party securing a clear majority    March 5 | Punjab government reserves mayor's post for a woman candidate    March 7 | Manjeet Sing Sethi and Harpal Singh Channa file petition in Punjab and Haryana high court against reservation of mayor's post.    March 9 | Congress councillor Kuljeet Singh Bedi files petition in HC challenging open ballot process of electing mayor    March 10 | High court stays mayor election    August 4 | High court dismisses Punjab government's decision of reserving Mohali mayor's post, orders local bodies department to hold polls within 15 days    August 14 | Local bodies department announces mayor elections to be held on August 18    WINNER MATH    With Kulwant Singh extending support to Congress, it was certain the SAD-BJP would not have its way in electing the first mayor of Mohali. In the 50-member MC House, 26 seats were needed for majority. While Congress and independents had jointly 26 seats plus one vote of MLA Balbir Singh Sidhu, SAD-BJP had lagged behind with 23 seats. One seat had fallen vacant following the death of a sitting councillor.    THE BREAK-UP    Congress 14    Independent 12    SAD-BJP 23    FIR Lodged    DSP Navreet Singh Virk said they have lodged an FIR against unknown person for damaging three vehicles under sections 337, 341, 342, 148 and 141 of the IPC. The case was lodged on the statement of Phase VIII SHO. He said no case was registered against any councillors as only glass was damaged and not furniture.    15-min Violence    When all the councillors were sitting inside the municipal corporation house, stone pelting erupted outside. The car of Congress MLA Balbir Singh Sidhu and other councillors were damaged. The violence continued for over 15 minutes.    It is a murder of democracy. Mohali SAD in-charge Balwant Singh Ramuwalia is a goon. He disrupted a democratic process because he feared SAD-BJP will not be able to elect its own mayor. It was a well-planned conspiracy    Balbir Singh Sidhu, Congress MLA, Mohali    When SAD-BJP could not indulge in horse-trading and buy my councillors, they resorted to this trick. They will try again but I won't let them succeed.    Kulwant Singh, Independent councillor    Kulwant Singh forcibly took away our three candidates and then took all of them to undisclosed location. We could not approach any of them to seek their support. The chaos inside the MC house was triggered by them, not us    Balwant Singh Ramoowalia, SAD in-charge, Mohali    The elections have been postponed following the intolerable behaviour of councilors. I have not filed any complaint against any councillor    Uma Shankar Gupta, MC commissioner  ||MOHALI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chandigarh/Looking-forward-to-Teej-celebrations-victims-families-in-mourning/articleshow/48534962.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:05 IST 2015||CHANDIGARH: Simply put, luck was not on the side of 23-year-old road tragedy victim Jagdish Ram. He was all set to return to his native town of Rattangarh in Rajasthan to cast his vote in the local municipal elections, but dropped the idea on the insistence of his relatives and was, along with them, killed by a truck driver in a fit of rage on the intervening night of Sunday and Monday. The elections were held on August 17.    Hanuman Ram, a relative of all the four deceased from Rajasthan, said, "Jagdish was regularly in contact with his family and was to leave for Rattangarh, but on the morning of August 16, he conveyed to his family that he won't be coming."    Jagdish was son-in-law of deceased Jassu Ram, 55, who was supervising all of them in the fenugreek trade in Chandigarh. Hanuman says a pall of bloom has descended over the family that was preparing for Teej celebrations on August 17.    Bhawan Lal, Jassu's elder brother, said, "We were only told that they have met with an accident. When coming to Chandigarh, we got to know that they had died. Jassa was five years younger to me and four of his children are still unmarried. His son Natha Ram, who died, was on his second trip to Chandigarh."    Talking to TOI, Natha's cousin Ajari said, "He was married last year and is survived by his wife and a child. We kept calling on his number on Monday morning, but there was no response." A phone call made by the police informed them about the tragedy.    Besides, Jassu's cousin Sardara Ram, 36, too was crushed under the wheels of the driver. The fifth dead in the accident was Harinder Yadav, from UP.    Family members of deceased arrived in Chandigarh on Monday evening and identified the bodies.    Boxes    Long wait for bodies    More than 10 relatives of the four deceased persons hailing from Rajasthan had to wait outside the mortuary of Government Multispecialty Hospital, Sector 16, for about six hours for the postmortem examination to be completed. The proceedings, including paper work, taking of samples, etc. started around 9.30 am and autopsy of the last body was performed around 2 pm. Kin of the deceased said they will cremate the bodies on August 19. About Rs 40,000 and some jewellery was recovered from the clothes and bodies and handed over to the victims' kin    Local workers demand murder case registered    Around 100 local workers from Chandigarh Transport Area, Sector 26, and activists from a political party staged a protest demanding registration of a murder case against truck driver Sarma Chaudhary at transport chowk light point on Tuesday. The protesters, who were accompanied by some injured, criticized the police for having failed to arrest the accused driver. The protest that lasted for about an hour and a half triggered massive traffic chaos. The protesters dispersed only after assurances from senior officials about valid legal action against Chaudhary. He and cleaner Ajay have been booked under Section 304 (culpable homicide not amounting to murder) of the IPC    Cleaner in 6-day police custody    A local court remanded Ajay, the cleaner who accompanied driver Sarma Chaudhary, to six-day police custody on Tuesday. Police said Ajay will have to be taken to his native place and other suspected hideouts of absconding Chaudhary in Bihar  ||CHANDIGARH
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/hyderabad/Cops-find-lead-in-girls-murder-case/articleshow/48534774.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:05 IST 2015||HYDERABAD: The South Zone police on Tuesday found a major lead which could lead them to cracking the murder case of Huda Begum, a 12-year old girl from Talabkatta.     According to the Bhavani Nagar police, footage from a CCTV camera near the victim's house was obtained in which a man in his early twenties is seen accompanying the girl in Aman Nagar area. The suspect is a wearing brown shirt and was reportedly was spotted on August 12, the day Huda Begum went missing.     "The clarity of the CCTV footage is very grainy and we are trying to improve its quality with the help of forensic experts" said Santosh Nagar assistant commissioner of police Srinivas. Huda Begum was found murdered in a water sump in at a construction site. She had strangulation marks on her neck. Cops said that she went to a grocery store near her house but did not return home. The girl's mother Naseem Begum later lodged a complaint with the police.     The Bhavani Nagar police registered a kidnap and murder case against and formed six special teams to trace the culprits. The police suspect that some relatives of the girl or local youths might have resorted to heinous crime.     ||HYDERABAD
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/lucknow/Corporator-kin-supporters-riot-with-lethal-weapons/articleshow/48534773.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:05 IST 2015||LUCKNOW: An incident of road rage snowballed into a bloody battle as corporator and his supporters allegedly ran riot in Gomtinagar on Tuesday morning. The violent mob also attacked five to six employees of a media house when they tried to broker peace. Two FIRs were lodged against the group and four persons were arrested from the spot.    Owner of a computer institute Pritam Gaur was heading towards Virat Khand on a two-wheeler. He collided head-on with Sonu Yadav who was riding a motorcycle at a turn. Sonu is brother of Dinesh Yadav, corporator from Chinhat ward supported by the Bharatiya Janata Party. The Yadavs stay at Ghulam Husain Purwa, an old village located opposite Ram Manohar Lohia hospital in Vibhuti Khand, Gomtinagar.    Along with an aide, Yadav hit Gaur with helmet till he collapsed on the road in front of the office of the daily newspaper. Security guard along with two employees tried to broker peace and separated the warring groups. Sonu even had a scuffle with the employees. He left the spot but came back with a group of around 25.    The group pelted stones at the office of the newspaper to target its employees and some of them sustained injuries. The injured employees reached Lohia hospital for medical aid now knowing that worst was yet to come.    Led by Dinesh Yadav, armed mob of over 100 allegedly charged at the injured employees of the media house. Two employees, including head of human resources department were hit severely. Police were informed and reached the spot. The mob had dispersed by then and four persons were nabbed. The injured employees were shifted to a private hospital in Vikas Khand locality. As heavy blunt objects were used in the attack, one of the injured needed more than 10 stitches and was recuperating till late Tuesday.    Both Gaur and staff member of the media house lodged a complaint at Vibhuti Khand police station. Officer-in-charge of Vibhuti Khand police station, sub-inspector Vinod Kumar Mishra said Dinesh, his brother Sonu and relatives Mahendra and Deepak have been booked apart from unidentified 150 persons. IPC sections charging attempt to murder, rioting with deadly weapons, causing hurt among others were pressed against the group. The four arrested included cousin brother of the corporator Mahendra Yadav and Deepak Yadav, Vijay Prakash and Dhirendra.    ||LUCKNOW
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/lucknow/Minor-raped-by-seven-in-Lucknow-stabbed/articleshow/48534756.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:05 IST 2015||LUCKNOW: She lived to tell her tale of horror after surviving gang-rape by seven men who even stabbed her and put her on a train thinking she was dead.    Government Railway Police on Tuesday arrested four out of seven men accused of gang-raping a 16-year-old girl on the terrace of Charbagh railway station on August 16. The miscreants allegedly stabbed her several times before finally dumping her into a train. GRP team rescued the girl admitted her to a hospital when the train reached Patna.    On August 17, when the survivor gained conscious she told police she is a native of Khalilabad and had come to Lucknow after a fight with her father for a job in the city. She lived in a rented apartment along with Aarti, suspected involved in flesh trade.    Aarti introduced her to Sonu Yadav, who proposed marriage, but the girl declined. On August 16, Sonu called the girl to the railway station and took her to the terrace and once again proposed marriage. When she refused, Sonu threatened called in six of his friends. All seven took turns to rape her, as Aarti looked on.    After raping her, the men stabbed her several times and believing she was dead dumped her into a train compartment.    After she narrated the whole incident to Patna GRP, the latter coordinated with the Lucknow team and laid a trap to nab the accused men. On Tuesday, acting on a tip-off, the team arrested prime accused Sonu, Puttul, Saddam and Manoj near platform number 1 at Charbagh. Three accused are at large.    During interrogation all four accepted their crime and were booked under various serious sections including attempt to murder, rape and charges under POCSO Act.  ||LUCKNOW
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/lucknow/Father-son-shot-dead-in-property-dispute/articleshow/48534745.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:05 IST 2015||LUCKNOW: Panic struck Bijnaur area of Sarojninagar on Monday late night when a property dealer and his two sons were shot at by three men over a prolonged dispute over land mining and battle of supremacy. Kishanchand (56) and his son Babloo (25) succumbed to their injuries at the trauma centre, while condition of his other son Sandeep (21) remained critical.    According to senior superintendent of police Rajesh Pandey, the murder took place over an ongoing dispute over land mining. Kishanchand and his sons were called by another villager citing an emergency to a spot near a temple where they were shot."    Kishanchand's brother Vinod told police that his brother received a call after which he left home along with his two sons. After the attack the three were rushed to Lokbandhu hospital where doctors referred them to Trauma Centre. Kishanchand died on the way to trauma centre, while Babloo who was hit in the head by a bullet died during treatment.    As soon the three reached the trauma center more than 100 people gathered and demanded arrest of history sheeter Kundan Yadav, a property dealer from the village and his aide for the murder.    Krishnanagar circle officer Babita Singh said, "The father and sons were shot by at least three men. Some villagers claimed they saw the assailants running away after the incident. We are working on all aspects, and raiding all possible hideouts of the assailants.    Babloo managed his fathers property business while his younger brother Sandeep is pursuing B Tech at a private college in Lucknow.  ||LUCKNOW
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:05 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:05 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/SC-acquits-Romesh-Sharma-in-Budhiraja-murder-case/articleshow/48704930.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:05 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Thursday upheld the Delhi High Court order acquitting former Congress leader Romesh Sharma in the case relating to the killing of fashion designer Kunjum Budhiraja.     A bench of Justices Pinaki Chandra Ghose and R K Agrawal dismissed an appeal filed by the Delhi government challenging HC order.     The Delhi government contended that the HC had erred in acquitting Sharma but it was strongly opposed by his counsel and senior advocate Siddharth Luthra who submitted that his client was in love with Kunjum and there was no evidence to prove his involvement in the case.     Sharma, who was alleged to be a frontman of underworld don Dawood Ibrahim, was convicted by a trial court on February 15, 2008. Kunjum was killed on March 20, 1999 at Sharma's South Delhi-based 'Jai Mata Di' farm house by a group of hired gangsters from Uttar Pradesh.     The trial court had convicted Sharma and five other accused in the case and had awarded life term to all. The HC, however, acquitted Sharma and co-accused Tejendir Verdi but upheld conviction and sentence of other four accused— Sharma's nephew Surinder Mishra, Hemchand, Santram and Ramesh alias Bobby.     While acquitting Sharma, the HC had said "Romesh Sharma and Kunjum were in love, and desired the company of each other. It does not establish that Sharma had got fed up with her". It had turned down Delhi police's contention that Sharma wanted to get rid of Kunjum as she knew about his alleged illegal activities.     "A grieving lover falling over the body of his mate and performing the rituals of a marriage can well be an expression of lasting love, and need not necessarily be a drama," the HC had said.     Sharma was in judicial custody at the time of the Kunjum's murder.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Raid-on-Bengaluru-centre-reveals-horror-tales/articleshow/48704718.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:05 IST 2015||BENGALURU: A State Human Rights Commission raid on a de-addiction centre in Jnanabharati Layout, near Kengeri, southwest Bengaluru, found 90 inmates living in pathetic conditions and subjected to inhuman treatment.     Thursday's raid followed the murder of an inmate of another de-addiction centre in Kothanur recently.     The SHRC raid on Sri Santhosh Social Service Society, also known as 4S Society, followed a tipoff. According to SHRC officials, the centre has been in existence for seven years at least, but the society couldn't produce documents of having obtained permission from the social welfare department. Commission officials said the centre had the permission from the DC and the DHO.     "Most inmates are between 20 and 35 years. They showed us signs of being physically abused. The centre has violated other norms too. Although it's supposed to have one nurse for every 15 patients and at least one in-house doctor and a psychiatrist, it didn't have any," said an SHRC spokesperson.     4 arrested for killing inmate:     Kothanur police arrested a de-addiction centre staffer and three inmates for allegedly beating to death a 28-year-old inmate. Dinesh was admitted to the centre by his family as he was an alcoholic. He was later found dead in a hospital. Family members noticed several bruises on his body. Narayana, an inmate-turned-staffer, gave some medicines to Dinesh, who later turned aggressive. Narayana sought the help of inmates Suresh, Subhan and Simon, to subdue Dinesh.     When Dinesh retaliated, the quartet overpowered him till he became unconscious. He died in hospital.||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/A-jolly-good-fellow-say-Khannas-friends/articleshow/48704630.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:05 IST 2015||Sanjeev Khanna, Indrani Mukerjea's second husband and suspected ally in Sheena Bora's killing, may be the most surprising element in this macabre drama, but his friends and associates in Kolkata refused to cast aspersions on "Sanju" just yet.     From being the biggest dart enthusiast at one of Kolkata's poshest clubs (the CC&FC) to having a finger in every pie, Sanjeev was everyone's "best mate" and go-to guy who friends described as: "A doer... someone who could get things done."     The morning after Khanna's arrest, TOI spoke to Ajay Rawla, the man who Khanna worked for as a consultant and whose house he was picked up from on Wednesday afternoon. "It wasn't like he was hiding like a desperate fugitive in my house. We had a meeting in the morning after which he drove me home and that's when news broke on television. We were sitting, watching, wondering what steps to take when the police arrived," explained Rawla.     Seven years his senior, Khanna's association with Rawla dates back to the time they went to Mayo College in Ajmer. Later, Khanna went on to become an aide for Rawla's pet projects. Besides running his own business in wireless communications, Khanna was there setting up chef Shaun Kenworthy and Rawla's restaurant 1658 or immersed in the heritage project of converting the Bawali Rajbari into a hotel. "He was getting all the construction work and labourers in place. He was very good in helping out with permissions through his connections with excise and contractors," remembers Kenworthy.     Khanna, who seldom missed his outings at the club, motor rallies and horse racing as a prominent face in the social circuit, was not the same man before he met Indrani, recounts Bull Banthia, a close friend. "Well-read and well-versed, Sanju had a great mechanical mind with a solution for everything," is how Bull chose to describe his "jolly good friend who loved meeting new people, hung out at the club but wasn't a social climber". "It was Indrani who emerged as this socialite and drove him to consciously build contacts with those higher up in the social rung after marriage," said the Kolkata-based entrepreneur. "That's the reason why I distanced myself from them until overnight she left Kolkata with their daughter and Sanju's wallet."     While Indrani never surfaces in conversations, his daughter Vidhie, who stayed with Indrani, is a fond subject with his friends. "He would miss his daughter but was resigned to fate, hoping that someday she would find him," said Rawla, adding, "It was Vidhie who called Sanjeev on Wednesday to give him the news."     No one seems to know about any recent interaction between Khanna and Indrani. G M Kapur, a known name in Kolkata who was Intach's state convener and happens to be Khanna's "mama", seemed disturbed with "all the theorizing" of Khanna's role in the crime. He declined to look back on Indrani and Khanna's relationship but added, "The last that there was any contact with Indrani or her family was when Vidhie visited Calcutta last year to celebrate the 75th birthday of her grandmother (Khanna's mother who lives with him)."     Khanna's Facebook posts on "karma" in the weeks and months following Sheena's alleged murder on April 24, 2012, make for interesting reading. On April 30, Khanna shared photo messages: "Say whatever, whenever the f*** you want to"; "Sometimes I get so weird, I even freak myself out".     On May 24, exactly a month after the alleged killing, he wrote: "You can never tell what people are thinking and feeling unless they tell you, and usually they lie. you ask them, 'Whats wrong?' and they say 'Nothing'. You accept this because it's easier than digging for the truth. People smile when they want to cry, they laugh when they want to scream and shout. They pretend like nothing is wrong because they don't want to face the truth. Things aren't always rainbows and butterflies, sometimes you gotta scream and cry your anger and sadness to the world, because you can only hold it in for so long before something in you snaps. so when you want to cry, cry. When you want to scream, scream. Don't hide behind fake smiles, it's ok to not be alright."     ||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Sheena-docu-Michail-add-to-mystery/articleshow/48701752.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:05 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Michail, Sheena's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered have raised a number of unanswered questions.    Two days after his mother, Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Michail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai Police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed that what he gave to police was enough to prove that Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora (who are actually parents of Indrani) as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. Some questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukherjea.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Michail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43 as mentioned in reports after her arrest.    Adding more to the suspense, Michail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Michail studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board examination, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that knew that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard that her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard that she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband who she introduced as Peter Mukherjea."    The two-member Mumbai Police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Michail, who on Wednesday, was the first one to reveal that Sheena was Indrani's daughter, twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Michail's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Michail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukherjae is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Michail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."  ||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Grandparents-are-Sheenas-mom-dad-on-birth-certificate/articleshow/48704559.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:05 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Mikhail, Sheena Bora's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered led to some unanswered questions on Thursday.    Two days after his mother Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Mikhail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed what he gave the police was enough to prove Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora, who are actually Indrani's parents, as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. However, many questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter. In many cases in India involving single mothers, grandparents are known to put in their names as father and mother.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukerjea, that is, 13 years after Sheena was born.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Mikhail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43.    Mikhail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Mikhail     studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board exam, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband, who she introduced as Peter Mukerjea."    The two-member Mumbai police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Mikhail twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Mikhail 's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time, he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Mikhail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukerjea is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Mikhail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Sheena-bowled-us-over-Rahuls-uncle/articleshow/48704552.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:05 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: Had things worked out as desired for Peter Mukherjea's first wife Shabnam and her family in Dehradun, Rahul Mukherjea and Sheena Bora would have been married for over three years now.     Shabnam's brother Shaleen Singh told TOI on Thursday that in 2011 Rahul brought Sheena to their sprawling home in Dehradun to seek approval from the family for their marriage.     The entire family-Shabnam, her younger brother Shaleen, father Anand Singh and mother Seema-were reportedly bowled over by Sheena's jovial nature and affection towards the elderly people. Impressed, the family gave its "unqualified and unanimous approval" for the wedding, which was supposed to take place within a few months, said Shaleen.     Stunned by the recent development, Shaleen said, "Sheena was among those rare persons who left a deep and lifelong impact on people. She was good-looking, a sweet person, clean of heart and good to talk to. None of us objected to the wedding."     Shaleen learnt of Sheena's murder through news channels. "It would have been great if she had become a part of the family. I don't know what was the cause and motive behind the heinous crime, but all those behind the killing of the jovial-natured girl should not be spared at any cost," he said.     A former model and tele-actor, 49-year-old Shaleen today owns the Sanskar International school in Jogiwala here. He recalled the last meeting with Shabnam and Rahul in April this year. "My father Anand Singh passed away in April. They had come to pay their respects but we did not interact much."     However, Shaleen said of late the interaction between him and his sister Shabnam was limited. Although Shabnam's farm Gul-e-Shabnam and Shaleen's residence Shankar Sadan are barely 200 metres away in Badripur, meetings between them were rare. While Shaleen and his mother stay on different floors of Shankar Sadan, Shabnam stays alone at her residence and is frequently visited by Rahul.     "There are matters in each family which we do not want to disclose. We are not against each other but do not interact much. She comes to meet our mother occasionally," said Shaleen, adding that Shabnam was passionate about painting and had a studio in her residence.     Shaleen denied having any details about the presence of Mumbai police in Dehradun. "Neither Doon police nor Mumbai police have contacted me over the issue."     Staff at Shabnam's residence said she was out-of-station but they were not aware of her whereabouts.||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Kilpauk-doctor-murder-Hubby-to-approach-court/articleshow/48704411.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:05 IST 2015||CHENNAI: It's been four days since police claimed to have solved the murder of S Sathya, 24, a PG medical student. However, her husband has put forth questions that police have failed to answer. Though investigating officers confirmed Sathya was not sexually assaulted before she was killed, they leaked to some section of media saying that they changed their stance on Wednesday and said there were indications of attempt to rape on the deceased.     Police personnel revealed the details soon after Sathya's husband Dr P Sesu, also employed at a primary health centre in Perambalur, expressed certain doubts.     He alleged the police hastily solved the case citing the state assembly, which is in motion. Sathya was found dead at her house in Kilpauk on August 20.     On August 23, police arrested Harintham Depnath, a BTech graduate, who lived at the second floor on the same apartment. Neither was there any mention about sexual assault or attempt on Sathya when the body was recovered from the house. The nor did the doctors. Police didn't tell this during the arrest of Depnath on August 23. "What forced the police to reveal about the sexual harassment attempt on my wife now?" asked Sesu.     "I want to live a peaceful life with my two sons - Tamil Nesan, 6, and Karmugilan, 4. The studies and the future of my children is important for me. I do respect the police personnel who spent sleepless nights to solve the murder, but there are questions that need to be answered," he said.     "I live in Perambalur with my children, but we speak through live video calls. I have told my sons that Sathya has gone to the God, as the Almighty likes her more. "Hereafter, we cannot speak or meet her. I don't know how far my children will admit it?" said Sesu. "I will approach the court seeking a fair probe into the murder of my wife. I want to find out the real cause behind her death. I want the real accused to get punished for his deed," said Sesu.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Woman-strangles-husbands-lover/articleshow/48704388.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:05 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A woman beat up and strangled her husband's partner, an assistant professor at a polytechnic in Choolaimedu, in their Thiruverkadu home on Thursday, police said. A court later remanded the accused, 32-year-old Shruti, in judicial custody.     Police said Sambasivam, a professor at Panimalar Engineering College in Poonamallee, used to bring Rajalakshmi, home frequently and introduced her to his wife Shruti as a colleague. He even dropped her home at night. The polytechnic where Rajalakshmi worked was part of the Panimalar group of educational institutions. Shruti initially believed the two were just colleagues until Sambasivam came home with Rajalakshmi on Tuesday and said the woman was moving in with them permanently.     On Wednesday morning, Sambasivam allegedly tied a 'mangalsutra' to Rajalakshmi in front of his wife, police said, based on Shruti's confession. A shocked Shruti picked up a fight with Sambasivam who asked her to maintain a cordial relationship and take care of Rajalakshmi. On Thursday morning, after he left for college a fight broke out between the two women.     Police said Rajalakshmi allegedly abused Sruthi and went into the bathroom. Sruthi followed her in and strangled her with the 'mangalsutra'. She then tried to make it appear that the woman had fainted in the bathroom. She took her in an autorickshaw to a nearby hospital where she was declared 'brought dead'. Doctors who noticed a few marks around her neck informed the Thiruverkadu police who registered a case of suspicious death under CrPC section 176.     The body was sent for postmortem to Kilpauk Medical College and Hospital.     After finding that the two women were at home at the time of the death, police interrogated Sruthi for more than an hour but she continued to maintain that Rajyalakshmi had died of injuries sustained when she fell down in the bathroom.     "She confessed to the murder when we told her that her fingerprints had been lifted from the scene of crime," said an investigating officer. "She said she had smashed the woman's head against the wall and later strangled her with the 'thali'." Police altered the case to murder and arrested Sruthi.     Initial inquiries revealed that Rajalakshmi had been married to a man named Rajasekhar for a while and they had separated. She then got married to Suresh, a relative who worked in a private firm, a few years ago and the couple moved into a house in Mogappair.     They allegedly had frequent quarrels as he tortured her and she left him too, police found.     Rajalakshmi then got a job with Panimalar Engineering College where she met Sambasivam. The two became friends and began seeing each other. Rajalakshmi recently moved to the polytechnic in Choolaimedu, police said.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/US-journalists-killer-annoyed-colleagues-Ex-boss/articleshow/48704167.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:05 IST 2015||ROANOKE, United States: The disgruntled former US television station employee who murdered two journalists had "annoyed" colleagues but showed no signs at work of any mental health issues, his former boss said Thursday.     Vester Lee Flanagan, 41, worked as a reporter for WDBJ in Roanoke, Virginia from March 2012 to February 2013, but was dismissed for poor performance and angry behavior, general manager Jeffrey Marks said.     On Wednesday, Flanagan shot and killed two of the CBS affiliate's journalists while they were conducting an on-air interview. He later fatally shot himself.     "We are still at a loss to figure out what happened to him in those two and a half years" since he was fired, Marks told a news conference flanked by dozens of staff, many of them holding hands.     "I don't think we identified that he had mental health issues. We certainly identified that he had performance issues."     Marks defended the station's hiring record and said its parent company had "a very elaborate program to screen employees."     Flanagan passed background checks and came with only positive references, Marks said.     It was only after he was hired, Marks said, that things went downhill.     "Vester's behavior annoyed a lot of people in the news station," Marks said.     Flanagan, who went by the on-screen name Bryce Williams, alleged in a manifesto faxed to ABC News that he was discriminated against as a gay, black journalist.     Marks said accusations in 2013 that he was treated unfairly were "immediately investigated and found to be without merit."     During his employment, Flanagan complied with demands that he seek medical help, but he was ultimately dismissed.     He was escorted from the building by police and made an ominous aside to the news director -- handing him a wooden cross and saying "'you'll need this'," Marks said.     As he left, he also made a "derogatory comment" to Adam Ward, the cameraman he shot dead on Wednesday.     Flanagan filed a complaint with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and a civil action suit, which were dismissed, he said.     "All of these investigations determined that no reasonable person would have taken any of the cited incidents as discrimination or harassment."     After killing Ward and reporter Alison Parker live on the air, Flanagan posted a video of the attack on social media.||ROANOKE, UNITED STATES
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:05 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/SC-acquits-Romesh-Sharma-in-Budhiraja-murder-case/articleshow/48704930.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:05 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Thursday upheld the Delhi High Court order acquitting former Congress leader Romesh Sharma in the case relating to the killing of fashion designer Kunjum Budhiraja.     A bench of Justices Pinaki Chandra Ghose and R K Agrawal dismissed an appeal filed by the Delhi government challenging HC order.     The Delhi government contended that the HC had erred in acquitting Sharma but it was strongly opposed by his counsel and senior advocate Siddharth Luthra who submitted that his client was in love with Kunjum and there was no evidence to prove his involvement in the case.     Sharma, who was alleged to be a frontman of underworld don Dawood Ibrahim, was convicted by a trial court on February 15, 2008. Kunjum was killed on March 20, 1999 at Sharma's South Delhi-based 'Jai Mata Di' farm house by a group of hired gangsters from Uttar Pradesh.     The trial court had convicted Sharma and five other accused in the case and had awarded life term to all. The HC, however, acquitted Sharma and co-accused Tejendir Verdi but upheld conviction and sentence of other four accused— Sharma's nephew Surinder Mishra, Hemchand, Santram and Ramesh alias Bobby.     While acquitting Sharma, the HC had said "Romesh Sharma and Kunjum were in love, and desired the company of each other. It does not establish that Sharma had got fed up with her". It had turned down Delhi police's contention that Sharma wanted to get rid of Kunjum as she knew about his alleged illegal activities.     "A grieving lover falling over the body of his mate and performing the rituals of a marriage can well be an expression of lasting love, and need not necessarily be a drama," the HC had said.     Sharma was in judicial custody at the time of the Kunjum's murder.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Raid-on-Bengaluru-centre-reveals-horror-tales/articleshow/48704718.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:05 IST 2015||BENGALURU: A State Human Rights Commission raid on a de-addiction centre in Jnanabharati Layout, near Kengeri, southwest Bengaluru, found 90 inmates living in pathetic conditions and subjected to inhuman treatment.     Thursday's raid followed the murder of an inmate of another de-addiction centre in Kothanur recently.     The SHRC raid on Sri Santhosh Social Service Society, also known as 4S Society, followed a tipoff. According to SHRC officials, the centre has been in existence for seven years at least, but the society couldn't produce documents of having obtained permission from the social welfare department. Commission officials said the centre had the permission from the DC and the DHO.     "Most inmates are between 20 and 35 years. They showed us signs of being physically abused. The centre has violated other norms too. Although it's supposed to have one nurse for every 15 patients and at least one in-house doctor and a psychiatrist, it didn't have any," said an SHRC spokesperson.     4 arrested for killing inmate:     Kothanur police arrested a de-addiction centre staffer and three inmates for allegedly beating to death a 28-year-old inmate. Dinesh was admitted to the centre by his family as he was an alcoholic. He was later found dead in a hospital. Family members noticed several bruises on his body. Narayana, an inmate-turned-staffer, gave some medicines to Dinesh, who later turned aggressive. Narayana sought the help of inmates Suresh, Subhan and Simon, to subdue Dinesh.     When Dinesh retaliated, the quartet overpowered him till he became unconscious. He died in hospital.||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/A-jolly-good-fellow-say-Khannas-friends/articleshow/48704630.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:05 IST 2015||Sanjeev Khanna, Indrani Mukerjea's second husband and suspected ally in Sheena Bora's killing, may be the most surprising element in this macabre drama, but his friends and associates in Kolkata refused to cast aspersions on "Sanju" just yet.     From being the biggest dart enthusiast at one of Kolkata's poshest clubs (the CC&FC) to having a finger in every pie, Sanjeev was everyone's "best mate" and go-to guy who friends described as: "A doer... someone who could get things done."     The morning after Khanna's arrest, TOI spoke to Ajay Rawla, the man who Khanna worked for as a consultant and whose house he was picked up from on Wednesday afternoon. "It wasn't like he was hiding like a desperate fugitive in my house. We had a meeting in the morning after which he drove me home and that's when news broke on television. We were sitting, watching, wondering what steps to take when the police arrived," explained Rawla.     Seven years his senior, Khanna's association with Rawla dates back to the time they went to Mayo College in Ajmer. Later, Khanna went on to become an aide for Rawla's pet projects. Besides running his own business in wireless communications, Khanna was there setting up chef Shaun Kenworthy and Rawla's restaurant 1658 or immersed in the heritage project of converting the Bawali Rajbari into a hotel. "He was getting all the construction work and labourers in place. He was very good in helping out with permissions through his connections with excise and contractors," remembers Kenworthy.     Khanna, who seldom missed his outings at the club, motor rallies and horse racing as a prominent face in the social circuit, was not the same man before he met Indrani, recounts Bull Banthia, a close friend. "Well-read and well-versed, Sanju had a great mechanical mind with a solution for everything," is how Bull chose to describe his "jolly good friend who loved meeting new people, hung out at the club but wasn't a social climber". "It was Indrani who emerged as this socialite and drove him to consciously build contacts with those higher up in the social rung after marriage," said the Kolkata-based entrepreneur. "That's the reason why I distanced myself from them until overnight she left Kolkata with their daughter and Sanju's wallet."     While Indrani never surfaces in conversations, his daughter Vidhie, who stayed with Indrani, is a fond subject with his friends. "He would miss his daughter but was resigned to fate, hoping that someday she would find him," said Rawla, adding, "It was Vidhie who called Sanjeev on Wednesday to give him the news."     No one seems to know about any recent interaction between Khanna and Indrani. G M Kapur, a known name in Kolkata who was Intach's state convener and happens to be Khanna's "mama", seemed disturbed with "all the theorizing" of Khanna's role in the crime. He declined to look back on Indrani and Khanna's relationship but added, "The last that there was any contact with Indrani or her family was when Vidhie visited Calcutta last year to celebrate the 75th birthday of her grandmother (Khanna's mother who lives with him)."     Khanna's Facebook posts on "karma" in the weeks and months following Sheena's alleged murder on April 24, 2012, make for interesting reading. On April 30, Khanna shared photo messages: "Say whatever, whenever the f*** you want to"; "Sometimes I get so weird, I even freak myself out".     On May 24, exactly a month after the alleged killing, he wrote: "You can never tell what people are thinking and feeling unless they tell you, and usually they lie. you ask them, 'Whats wrong?' and they say 'Nothing'. You accept this because it's easier than digging for the truth. People smile when they want to cry, they laugh when they want to scream and shout. They pretend like nothing is wrong because they don't want to face the truth. Things aren't always rainbows and butterflies, sometimes you gotta scream and cry your anger and sadness to the world, because you can only hold it in for so long before something in you snaps. so when you want to cry, cry. When you want to scream, scream. Don't hide behind fake smiles, it's ok to not be alright."     ||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Sheena-docu-Michail-add-to-mystery/articleshow/48701752.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:05 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Michail, Sheena's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered have raised a number of unanswered questions.    Two days after his mother, Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Michail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai Police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed that what he gave to police was enough to prove that Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora (who are actually parents of Indrani) as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. Some questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukherjea.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Michail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43 as mentioned in reports after her arrest.    Adding more to the suspense, Michail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Michail studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board examination, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that knew that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard that her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard that she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband who she introduced as Peter Mukherjea."    The two-member Mumbai Police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Michail, who on Wednesday, was the first one to reveal that Sheena was Indrani's daughter, twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Michail's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Michail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukherjae is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Michail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."  ||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Grandparents-are-Sheenas-mom-dad-on-birth-certificate/articleshow/48704559.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:05 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Mikhail, Sheena Bora's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered led to some unanswered questions on Thursday.    Two days after his mother Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Mikhail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed what he gave the police was enough to prove Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora, who are actually Indrani's parents, as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. However, many questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter. In many cases in India involving single mothers, grandparents are known to put in their names as father and mother.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukerjea, that is, 13 years after Sheena was born.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Mikhail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43.    Mikhail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Mikhail     studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board exam, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband, who she introduced as Peter Mukerjea."    The two-member Mumbai police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Mikhail twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Mikhail 's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time, he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Mikhail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukerjea is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Mikhail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Sheena-bowled-us-over-Rahuls-uncle/articleshow/48704552.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:05 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: Had things worked out as desired for Peter Mukherjea's first wife Shabnam and her family in Dehradun, Rahul Mukherjea and Sheena Bora would have been married for over three years now.     Shabnam's brother Shaleen Singh told TOI on Thursday that in 2011 Rahul brought Sheena to their sprawling home in Dehradun to seek approval from the family for their marriage.     The entire family-Shabnam, her younger brother Shaleen, father Anand Singh and mother Seema-were reportedly bowled over by Sheena's jovial nature and affection towards the elderly people. Impressed, the family gave its "unqualified and unanimous approval" for the wedding, which was supposed to take place within a few months, said Shaleen.     Stunned by the recent development, Shaleen said, "Sheena was among those rare persons who left a deep and lifelong impact on people. She was good-looking, a sweet person, clean of heart and good to talk to. None of us objected to the wedding."     Shaleen learnt of Sheena's murder through news channels. "It would have been great if she had become a part of the family. I don't know what was the cause and motive behind the heinous crime, but all those behind the killing of the jovial-natured girl should not be spared at any cost," he said.     A former model and tele-actor, 49-year-old Shaleen today owns the Sanskar International school in Jogiwala here. He recalled the last meeting with Shabnam and Rahul in April this year. "My father Anand Singh passed away in April. They had come to pay their respects but we did not interact much."     However, Shaleen said of late the interaction between him and his sister Shabnam was limited. Although Shabnam's farm Gul-e-Shabnam and Shaleen's residence Shankar Sadan are barely 200 metres away in Badripur, meetings between them were rare. While Shaleen and his mother stay on different floors of Shankar Sadan, Shabnam stays alone at her residence and is frequently visited by Rahul.     "There are matters in each family which we do not want to disclose. We are not against each other but do not interact much. She comes to meet our mother occasionally," said Shaleen, adding that Shabnam was passionate about painting and had a studio in her residence.     Shaleen denied having any details about the presence of Mumbai police in Dehradun. "Neither Doon police nor Mumbai police have contacted me over the issue."     Staff at Shabnam's residence said she was out-of-station but they were not aware of her whereabouts.||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Kilpauk-doctor-murder-Hubby-to-approach-court/articleshow/48704411.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:05 IST 2015||CHENNAI: It's been four days since police claimed to have solved the murder of S Sathya, 24, a PG medical student. However, her husband has put forth questions that police have failed to answer. Though investigating officers confirmed Sathya was not sexually assaulted before she was killed, they leaked to some section of media saying that they changed their stance on Wednesday and said there were indications of attempt to rape on the deceased.     Police personnel revealed the details soon after Sathya's husband Dr P Sesu, also employed at a primary health centre in Perambalur, expressed certain doubts.     He alleged the police hastily solved the case citing the state assembly, which is in motion. Sathya was found dead at her house in Kilpauk on August 20.     On August 23, police arrested Harintham Depnath, a BTech graduate, who lived at the second floor on the same apartment. Neither was there any mention about sexual assault or attempt on Sathya when the body was recovered from the house. The nor did the doctors. Police didn't tell this during the arrest of Depnath on August 23. "What forced the police to reveal about the sexual harassment attempt on my wife now?" asked Sesu.     "I want to live a peaceful life with my two sons - Tamil Nesan, 6, and Karmugilan, 4. The studies and the future of my children is important for me. I do respect the police personnel who spent sleepless nights to solve the murder, but there are questions that need to be answered," he said.     "I live in Perambalur with my children, but we speak through live video calls. I have told my sons that Sathya has gone to the God, as the Almighty likes her more. "Hereafter, we cannot speak or meet her. I don't know how far my children will admit it?" said Sesu. "I will approach the court seeking a fair probe into the murder of my wife. I want to find out the real cause behind her death. I want the real accused to get punished for his deed," said Sesu.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Woman-strangles-husbands-lover/articleshow/48704388.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:05 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A woman beat up and strangled her husband's partner, an assistant professor at a polytechnic in Choolaimedu, in their Thiruverkadu home on Thursday, police said. A court later remanded the accused, 32-year-old Shruti, in judicial custody.     Police said Sambasivam, a professor at Panimalar Engineering College in Poonamallee, used to bring Rajalakshmi, home frequently and introduced her to his wife Shruti as a colleague. He even dropped her home at night. The polytechnic where Rajalakshmi worked was part of the Panimalar group of educational institutions. Shruti initially believed the two were just colleagues until Sambasivam came home with Rajalakshmi on Tuesday and said the woman was moving in with them permanently.     On Wednesday morning, Sambasivam allegedly tied a 'mangalsutra' to Rajalakshmi in front of his wife, police said, based on Shruti's confession. A shocked Shruti picked up a fight with Sambasivam who asked her to maintain a cordial relationship and take care of Rajalakshmi. On Thursday morning, after he left for college a fight broke out between the two women.     Police said Rajalakshmi allegedly abused Sruthi and went into the bathroom. Sruthi followed her in and strangled her with the 'mangalsutra'. She then tried to make it appear that the woman had fainted in the bathroom. She took her in an autorickshaw to a nearby hospital where she was declared 'brought dead'. Doctors who noticed a few marks around her neck informed the Thiruverkadu police who registered a case of suspicious death under CrPC section 176.     The body was sent for postmortem to Kilpauk Medical College and Hospital.     After finding that the two women were at home at the time of the death, police interrogated Sruthi for more than an hour but she continued to maintain that Rajyalakshmi had died of injuries sustained when she fell down in the bathroom.     "She confessed to the murder when we told her that her fingerprints had been lifted from the scene of crime," said an investigating officer. "She said she had smashed the woman's head against the wall and later strangled her with the 'thali'." Police altered the case to murder and arrested Sruthi.     Initial inquiries revealed that Rajalakshmi had been married to a man named Rajasekhar for a while and they had separated. She then got married to Suresh, a relative who worked in a private firm, a few years ago and the couple moved into a house in Mogappair.     They allegedly had frequent quarrels as he tortured her and she left him too, police found.     Rajalakshmi then got a job with Panimalar Engineering College where she met Sambasivam. The two became friends and began seeing each other. Rajalakshmi recently moved to the polytechnic in Choolaimedu, police said.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/US-journalists-killer-annoyed-colleagues-Ex-boss/articleshow/48704167.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:05 IST 2015||ROANOKE, United States: The disgruntled former US television station employee who murdered two journalists had "annoyed" colleagues but showed no signs at work of any mental health issues, his former boss said Thursday.     Vester Lee Flanagan, 41, worked as a reporter for WDBJ in Roanoke, Virginia from March 2012 to February 2013, but was dismissed for poor performance and angry behavior, general manager Jeffrey Marks said.     On Wednesday, Flanagan shot and killed two of the CBS affiliate's journalists while they were conducting an on-air interview. He later fatally shot himself.     "We are still at a loss to figure out what happened to him in those two and a half years" since he was fired, Marks told a news conference flanked by dozens of staff, many of them holding hands.     "I don't think we identified that he had mental health issues. We certainly identified that he had performance issues."     Marks defended the station's hiring record and said its parent company had "a very elaborate program to screen employees."     Flanagan passed background checks and came with only positive references, Marks said.     It was only after he was hired, Marks said, that things went downhill.     "Vester's behavior annoyed a lot of people in the news station," Marks said.     Flanagan, who went by the on-screen name Bryce Williams, alleged in a manifesto faxed to ABC News that he was discriminated against as a gay, black journalist.     Marks said accusations in 2013 that he was treated unfairly were "immediately investigated and found to be without merit."     During his employment, Flanagan complied with demands that he seek medical help, but he was ultimately dismissed.     He was escorted from the building by police and made an ominous aside to the news director -- handing him a wooden cross and saying "'you'll need this'," Marks said.     As he left, he also made a "derogatory comment" to Adam Ward, the cameraman he shot dead on Wednesday.     Flanagan filed a complaint with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and a civil action suit, which were dismissed, he said.     "All of these investigations determined that no reasonable person would have taken any of the cited incidents as discrimination or harassment."     After killing Ward and reporter Alison Parker live on the air, Flanagan posted a video of the attack on social media.||ROANOKE, UNITED STATES
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/lucknow/There-are-attempts-to-malign-SP-govt-MSY/articleshow/48534638.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:10 IST 2015||LUCKNOW: Samajwadi Party (SP) president Mulayam Singh Yadav on Tuesday said that a smear campaign was being run against the party's government in UP. Citing the example of Badaun rape case, he said it was blown out of proportion.    "The CBI probed the case and found out that rape was not committed at all. They were cold-blooded murders by the victim's cousins for property," Mulayam said. "But even senior leaders like Congress president Sonia Gandhi's son Rahul rushed to Badaun and attacked the state government at the law and order front," he said.    Speaking at a function to distribute free e-rickshaws, the SP boss said that there were instances where only one person committed rape but the victim named four people merely to settle scores. "Innocents must not be implicated and harassed. There are cases, where a victim has accused four brothers of raping her. It is not practical," he added.    Mulayam said the rate of rape cases was lowest in UP as compared to other BJP ruled states. "Here the rate of rape cases is only 2% while in Madhya Pradesh it is 9 and in Rajasthan it is 7. In Delhi the situation is worse," he said.    He also targeted his party leaders for their failure to counter campaigns to malign SP government. "Our own MLAs said they were helpless as the media was running a campaign. I will see to it how such MLAs get a ticket this time," he said. He called upon the party workers to inform the people about the schemes of the government. "You have only three months in hand. If you will talk about it later then people will not listen to you as they will see it as an election campaign," he said.    Taking on the BJP-led NDA government at the Centre, he said the disturbance at the borders was a part of a conspiracy to shift the attention of the people from other issues.  ||LUCKNOW
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Crime-spiral-Rape-cases-up-55-in-city-87-in-state/articleshow/48534518.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:10 IST 2015||MUMBAI: Mumbai recorded a 55% increase in rape cases and 67% rise in cases of outraging of women's modesty in 2014 from the year before, show the latest data released by the National Crime Records Bureau (NCRB).    The total number of criminal cases—murder, kidnap, robbery, burglary, theft, cheating, breach of trust, culpable homicide and others—recorded in the nation's financial capital also went up 16% in the same period. Crime against women overall, which includes rape, murder, kidnap, outraging modesty and insult to modesty, also went up by more than a fifth in the city    These disturbing statistics are also mirrored at the state level: While crimes against women rose 7.2%, cases of rape and outraging modesty rose by 87% and 23%, respectively; The overall crime tally went up about 7% in the state.    Experts and investigators attribute the rise to the police registering all cases that come before them, which would not happen earlier.    The NCRB's data also showed that crimes against children—murder, infanticide, rape, outraging modesty of minor girls, kidnap, foeticide, abetment of suicide, exposure and abandonment, procurement of minor girls—rose by more than a quarter (26.6%) in the same period.    Mumbai police chief Rakesh Maria said the crime graph rise was a result of the instructions issued to police stations in the city to register all cases that are brought before them. "Recording a crime is one of the ways to provide safety and confidence to the people about police action. On the other hand, we have come up with several initiatives that have resulted in a decrease in cases of chain-snatchings and motor vehicle thefts in the city." He added that several of the record cases of kidnap and rape may also be technical in nature. "Our focus is provide safety in the city, especially to women, children and senior citizens."    Psychiatrist Dr Harish Shetty said the increase in the number of cases of rape and outraging modesty by acquaintances was an indication of a greater social malaise. He said cases of rape of children were cropping up with sickening regularity, particularly in the city's slums. "This situation cannot be dealt with merely by enacting laws. Society has to take strong initiatives to deal with it," he said.    He said easily availability of sexually explicit literature and videos, especially through the internet and social media, was one of the factors fanning sexual violence in society. "This urge for immediate sexual gratification continuously sends signals to one's mind. Such persons do not hesitate in breaching the trust of the woman concerned. Also, accused do not have the fear of getting caught," he said.    Instances of cyber crime, described as the crime of future, have rose more than tripled (254.7%) in Mumbai, and more than doubled (107.2%) in Maharashtra.    Maria said the steep rise in cyber crime was a clear indication that more victims are coming forward to complain. "I have given instructions to all police stations and also posted trained cops at all police stations, which helps the victims to lodge complaints at the local police station level instead of going to a special cyber police station," he said.    Former IPS officer-turned-lawyer YP Singh agreed with Maria. "This shows that the police are performing their duty in registering the cases now. This is a positive approach by the cops in recording the cases. But there is also a need to worry if crimes such as murder, kidnaps and other violent crimes are going up. Then the cops have to take serious measures in tackling such crimes."    Praja Project Director has appreciated the Mumbai Commissioner Maria and the State Director General of Police Sanjeev Dayal's approach and the orders they have given to all police stations to lodge all the complaints that are received. "No doubt the overall crime has gone up but at the same time cops are showing positive approach in taking up the probe. Maria has ordered all police stations to lodge complaint. While the Dayal few months ago has come forward with a plan to create separate investigation cell that will have specialist to probe the case and get it to the conviction level without wasting time. The special team will ensure fast case close and get conviction which is the major deterrent for rise in crime," said Muske.  ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Tamil-Nadu-second-in-murder-of-kids-below-6-in-2014/articleshow/48534492.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:10 IST 2015||CHENNAI: This is a ranking Tamil Nadu will be not be proud of. The state accounted for the second most murders of boys and girls in the 0-6 age group in 2014 after Maharashtra, National Crime Records Bureau (NCRB) statistics on crime data have revealed.     While 62 girls and 49 boys were murdered in Maharashtra, 34 girls and 24 boys were done to death in Tamil Nadu in 2014.     A senior police officer said that the number of newborns killed had also been included in this category and that could be one of the reasons for the high number of murders in Tamil Nadu. On the whole, the cases of murder, attempt to murder and rape across the country had increased by 7%, 9.2% and 14.4% in 2014 against the number of cases registered in 2013. As per police records, the figure of 64,813 murder cases in 2013 increased to 69,320 in 2014. There were 78,877 attempt-to-murder cases and 42,115 cases of rape in 2013, while there were 86,153 attempt-to-murder cases and 48,193 rape cases in 2014.     NCRB data showed that in the overall number of murders, Tamil Nadu ranked sixth with 1,805 cases, fourth in attempt-to-murder cases with 2,922 in 2014. There were 455 rape cases in the state in 2014. Uttar Pradesh topped in the list of murders (5,150), West Bengal had the most attempt-to-murder cases (7,248), while Madhya Pradesh ranked first in the number of rapes (5,076) in 2014.         ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Tamil-Nadu-second-in-murder-of-kids-below-6-in-2014/articleshow/48534507.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:10 IST 2015||CHENNAI: This is a ranking Tamil Nadu will be not be proud of. The state accounted for the second most murders of boys and girls in the 0-6 age group in 2014 after Maharashtra, National Crime Records Bureau (NCRB) statistics on crime data have revealed.     While 62 girls and 49 boys were murdered in Maharashtra, 34 girls and 24 boys were done to death in Tamil Nadu in 2014.     A senior police officer said that the number of newborns killed had also been included in this category and that could be one of the reasons for the high number of murders in Tamil Nadu. On the whole, the cases of murder, attempt to murder and rape across the country had increased by 7%, 9.2% and 14.4% in 2014 against the number of cases registered in 2013. As per police records, the figure of 64,813 murder cases in 2013 increased to 69,320 in 2014. There were 78,877 attempt-to-murder cases and 42,115 cases of rape in 2013, while there were 86,153 attempt-to-murder cases and 48,193 rape cases in 2014.     NCRB data showed that in the overall number of murders, Tamil Nadu ranked sixth with 1,805 cases, fourth in attempt-to-murder cases with 2,922 in 2014. There were 455 rape cases in the state in 2014. Uttar Pradesh topped in the list of murders (5,150), West Bengal had the most attempt-to-murder cases (7,248), while Madhya Pradesh ranked first in the number of rapes (5,076) in 2014.         ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Crime-spiral-Rape-cases-up-55-in-city-87-in-state/articleshow/48534261.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:10 IST 2015||Mumbai: Mumbai recorded a 55% increase in rape cases and 67% rise in cases of outraging of women's modesty in 2014 from the year before, show the latest data released by the National Crime Records Bureau (NCRB).    The total number of criminal cases—murder, kidnap, robbery, burglary, theft, cheating, breach of trust, culpable homicide and others—recorded in the nation's financial capital also went up 16% in the same period. Crime against women overall, which includes rape, murder, kidnap, outraging modesty and insult to modesty, also went up by more than a fifth in the city    These disturbing statistics are also mirrored at the state level: While crimes against women rose 7.2%, cases of rape and outraging modesty rose by 87% and 23%, respectively; The overall crime tally went up about 7% in the state.    Experts and investigators attribute the rise to the police registering all cases that come before them, which would not happen earlier.    The NCRB's data also showed that crimes against children—murder, infanticide, rape, outraging modesty of minor girls, kidnap, foeticide, abetment of suicide, exposure and abandonment, procurement of minor girls—rose by more than a quarter (26.6%) in the same period.    Mumbai police chief Rakesh Maria said the crime graph rise was a result of the instructions issued to police stations in the city to register all cases that are brought before them. "Recording a crime is one of the ways to provide safety and confidence to the people about police action. On the other hand, we have come up with several initiatives that have resulted in a decrease in cases of chain-snatchings and motor vehicle thefts in the city." He added that several of the record cases of kidnap and rape may also be technical in nature. "Our focus is provide safety in the city, especially to women, children and senior citizens."    Psychiatrist Dr Harish Shetty said the increase in the number of cases of rape and outraging modesty by acquaintances was an indication of a greater social malaise. He said cases of rape of children were cropping up with sickening regularity, particularly in the city's slums. "This situation cannot be dealt with merely by enacting laws. Society has to take strong initiatives to deal with it," he said.    He said easily availability of sexually explicit literature and videos, especially through the internet and social media, was one of the factors fanning sexual violence in society. "This urge for immediate sexual gratification continuously sends signals to one's mind. Such persons do not hesitate in breaching the trust of the woman concerned. Also, accused do not have the fear of getting caught," he said.    Instances of cyber crime, described as the crime of future, have rose more than tripled (254.7%) in Mumbai, and more than doubled (107.2%) in Maharashtra.    Maria said the steep rise in cyber crime was a clear indication that more victims are coming forward to complain. "I have given instructions to all police stations and also posted trained cops at all police stations, which helps the victims to lodge complaints at the local police station level instead of going to a special cyber police station," he said.    Former IPS officer-turned-lawyer YP Singh agreed with Maria. "This shows that the police are performing their duty in registering the cases now. This is a positive approach by the cops in recording the cases. But there is also a need to worry if crimes such as murder, kidnaps and other violent crimes are going up. Then the cops have to take serious measures in tackling such crimes."    Praja Project Director has appreciated the Mumbai Commissioner Maria and the State Director General of Police Sanjeev Dayal's approach and the orders they have given to all police stations to lodge all the complaints that are received. "No doubt the overall crime has gone up but at the same time cops are showing positive approach in taking up the probe. Maria has ordered all police stations to lodge complaint. While the Dayal few months ago has come forward with a plan to create separate investigation cell that will have specialist to probe the case and get it to the conviction level without wasting time. The special team will ensure fast case close and get conviction which is the major deterrent for rise in crime," said Muske.  ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/patna/PM-says-36-rise-in-crime-in-6-mths-blames-Nitish/articleshow/48533782.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:10 IST 2015||Saharsa: PM Narendra Modi on Tuesday rattled off crime figures to reiterate that 'jungle raj' has started returning to Bihar. NaMo, who described JD (U) as 'Janata ka Daman aur Utpidan' party and RJD as 'Rojana Jungle Raj ka Darr' party, blamed Nitish for sudden spurt in crime in the state in last six months.    "It is for the people to see how jungle raj has silently started returning. The Bihar government's official website shows there has been rise in crime between January and June this year," the PM said at a 'Parivartan' rally of NDA here on Tuesday.    "There has been 34% rise in crime in last six months. Reported criminal cases in January numbered 13,808. This increased to 18,505 in June. Cases of violence increased from 866 to 1,497 in six months, a growth of 72%. The incidence of murder has increased by 46%," Modi said and added it was for the peace- loving people of Bihar to decide whether they want a crime-free, prosperous and developed state or the rule of a person who is arrogant and opportunist.    Holding the Congress responsible for the death of great socialist leader Jayaprakash Narayan after his arrest during emergency, Modi said, "Jayaprakash Narayan was arrested by a Congress government led by Indira Gandhi. Today, Nitish has joined hands with Congress party to remain in power. Will it give peace to the soul of JP?" he asked.    "Some people are making compromises for power. Will you forgive them?" Modi asked, and chants of 'nahi-nahi' rent the air.    ||SAHARSA
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bareilly/3-Pankhiya-gang-members-beaten-to-death-by-villagers-in-Bihar/articleshow/48533256.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:10 IST 2015||BAREILLY: Three out of four members of a gang of robbers from Bareilly were beaten to death by residents of Bishulganj village in Bihar, where they had reportedly looted the house of a businessman.     The fourth member was rescued by cops and is undergoing treatment, but his condition remains critical.     One of the gang members, Nisar Ansari, who died in the assault, was a history sheeter from the city's Subhash Nagar area. He led his accomplices Qader Khan, Sader Khan and Ahmad, all members of the dreaded Pankhiya gang, during the loot, said police.     According to reports, the men entered businessman Ajay Kumar's house on Sunday night and looted cash and valuables worth several lakhs on gun point. They, however, were spotted by villagers while leaving the scene of crime and thrashed up brutally.     While cops managed to reach the spot and pacify the villagers, three of the dacoits - Nisar, Qader and Sader - had died, while Ahmad was sent for treatment.     "All four are notorious criminals and gang leader Nisar Ansari was wanted in more than eight cases of murder, dacoity and loot lodged against him at Subhash Nagar police station. The bodies of the dead dacoits are in custody of Bihar police and their family members can claim them. Meanwhile, we are trying to find out if other members of this gang were also a part of the dacoity," said JP Yadav, inspector, Subhash Nagar police station.     ||BAREILLY
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/dehradun/Cops-Cong-on-mission-to-save-young-people-from-drugs/articleshow/48532741.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:10 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: As numerous instances of drug abuse among young people in the state capital have hit headlines, leaders of the ruling party in the state and Dehradun police have joined forces to keep young people off narcotic substances. Chief minister Harish Rawat and assembly Speaker Govind Singh Kunyal have attended awareness programmes in many city schools. Police have started a campaign called 'Nai Zindagi', aimed at targeting drug peddlers and bringing them to justice and launching an awareness drive among young people.     The Congress held a workshop to prevent drug use at a school in Haathibarkala on Tuesday. Students were informed of the harm narcotic drugs could do and instructed on how to stay away from them. Congress general secretary Anand Rawat, son of chief minister Harish Rawat, the brain behind this campaign, told TOI, "During these workshops, we generate awareness among students and give them pamphlets targeted at parents. We inform parents of the symptoms of drug addiction so they can take steps to prevent children from falling prey and notice tendencies toward such addiction early." He added that similar workshops have been held in over six schools and educational institutions in the state capital.     "We target students from Class 8 to Class 12 as they are most likely to fall prey to drug peddlers. We also distribute saplings and encourage kids to plant and look after them," Rawat said.     DIG Pushpak Jyoti has been spearheading the "Nai Zindagi" campaign in the state capital. The project is aimed at nabbing peddlers and informing people about the menace of drugs. In the initial phase of the project, camps, workshops and awareness sessions were organised in schools, colleges and market areas. Police officers would interact with participants during these events.     DIG Jyoti said, "I was moved by a case where a son murdered his mother after she refused to give him money for drugs. I was left shocked. That is when I took the initiative to save children and their families."     In the last few months, Dehradun police arrested about 50 peddlers and seized narcotics substances worth several crores of rupees. "We are making every effort to end the drug menace in Dehradun," the senior police officer said.     ||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/hubballi/Raibag-police-converts-murder-of-student-into-death-Vedike/articleshow/48531287.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:10 IST 2015||BELAGAVI: Demanding the CID investigation into the suspected death of a 20-year-old degree student in Nipanal village of Raibag taluk, family members of the deceased and activists of Karnataka Praja Vedike staged protest in the premises of DC's office here on Tuesday and submitted memorandum.     Hanumant Suresh Bhajantri (20), studying in B.Com 2nd year at Basavaprabhu Kore College at Chikkodi, died on November 11, 2014 in suspected manner at the house. His half-naked body found on next day morning hanging to the fan. His neck had tightened by blanket. His one leg was on the ground while another on plastic chair. Incident occurred when all the family members were out of station leaving Hanumant alone in home.     According to family members, anybody can guess prima-facie it was a murder, as there were no signs of suicide. Police came to the conclusion of suicide without any investigation to close the case in hurry. Even they didn't suspect the open roof though which killers fled, they said.     Advocate Surendra Ugare, state president of Karnataka Praja Vedike said police had told family members to continuing investigation but didn't, even after receiving complaint from family members, in which they clearly mentioned about doubtful people. They even not inquired the people mentioned in the complaint.     Family members cautioned the police department about holding indefinite strike in the premises of SP office, if the department not handed over case to CID within 15 days. Members also submitted memorandum to SP Ravikanthe Gowda. SP assured agitators about re-opening the case and continuing investigation.||BELAGAVI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bhopal/Two-women-gang-raped-in-Morena-district-one-of-them-murdered/articleshow/48531263.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:10 IST 2015||BHOPAL: Two women, one of them a dalit, were gang raped in Morena district on Monday night. One of them was murdered while the other is battling for life after she was allegedly set ablaze by two accused.     Police said Paan Singh and Rajesh Singh raped a 24 year old dalit woman in Sabalgarh tehsil of Morena. Friends of her husband, they raped the woman when her husband was intoxicated. They later poured country made liquor that they had consumed on her and set her ablaze. She was rushed to Morena district headquarter where she confirmed the incident in her statement to an executive magistrate . Police said that she sustained more than 50% burn.     Superintendent of police Vineet Khanna said that "smell of kerosene from the crime scene also suggests that it may have also been used for committing the crime. We will arrest the duo very soon," he said     In another incident, four persons allegedly abducted a woman when she had gone out for defecation in Kharagpur village of Morena. Her family said that a police complaint was lodged when she did not return for long . They alleged Akash Gurjar and his three accomplices raped her and later she was murdered by them.     Gurjar has been arrested .     SDOP Banmor, Atmaram Sharma said that, "We have registered a case and investigations are on. Only a post mortem report is awaited to confirm that it was a case of murder."||BHOPAL
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:10 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:10 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/SC-acquits-Romesh-Sharma-in-Budhiraja-murder-case/articleshow/48704930.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:10 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Thursday upheld the Delhi High Court order acquitting former Congress leader Romesh Sharma in the case relating to the killing of fashion designer Kunjum Budhiraja.     A bench of Justices Pinaki Chandra Ghose and R K Agrawal dismissed an appeal filed by the Delhi government challenging HC order.     The Delhi government contended that the HC had erred in acquitting Sharma but it was strongly opposed by his counsel and senior advocate Siddharth Luthra who submitted that his client was in love with Kunjum and there was no evidence to prove his involvement in the case.     Sharma, who was alleged to be a frontman of underworld don Dawood Ibrahim, was convicted by a trial court on February 15, 2008. Kunjum was killed on March 20, 1999 at Sharma's South Delhi-based 'Jai Mata Di' farm house by a group of hired gangsters from Uttar Pradesh.     The trial court had convicted Sharma and five other accused in the case and had awarded life term to all. The HC, however, acquitted Sharma and co-accused Tejendir Verdi but upheld conviction and sentence of other four accused— Sharma's nephew Surinder Mishra, Hemchand, Santram and Ramesh alias Bobby.     While acquitting Sharma, the HC had said "Romesh Sharma and Kunjum were in love, and desired the company of each other. It does not establish that Sharma had got fed up with her". It had turned down Delhi police's contention that Sharma wanted to get rid of Kunjum as she knew about his alleged illegal activities.     "A grieving lover falling over the body of his mate and performing the rituals of a marriage can well be an expression of lasting love, and need not necessarily be a drama," the HC had said.     Sharma was in judicial custody at the time of the Kunjum's murder.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Raid-on-Bengaluru-centre-reveals-horror-tales/articleshow/48704718.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:10 IST 2015||BENGALURU: A State Human Rights Commission raid on a de-addiction centre in Jnanabharati Layout, near Kengeri, southwest Bengaluru, found 90 inmates living in pathetic conditions and subjected to inhuman treatment.     Thursday's raid followed the murder of an inmate of another de-addiction centre in Kothanur recently.     The SHRC raid on Sri Santhosh Social Service Society, also known as 4S Society, followed a tipoff. According to SHRC officials, the centre has been in existence for seven years at least, but the society couldn't produce documents of having obtained permission from the social welfare department. Commission officials said the centre had the permission from the DC and the DHO.     "Most inmates are between 20 and 35 years. They showed us signs of being physically abused. The centre has violated other norms too. Although it's supposed to have one nurse for every 15 patients and at least one in-house doctor and a psychiatrist, it didn't have any," said an SHRC spokesperson.     4 arrested for killing inmate:     Kothanur police arrested a de-addiction centre staffer and three inmates for allegedly beating to death a 28-year-old inmate. Dinesh was admitted to the centre by his family as he was an alcoholic. He was later found dead in a hospital. Family members noticed several bruises on his body. Narayana, an inmate-turned-staffer, gave some medicines to Dinesh, who later turned aggressive. Narayana sought the help of inmates Suresh, Subhan and Simon, to subdue Dinesh.     When Dinesh retaliated, the quartet overpowered him till he became unconscious. He died in hospital.||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/A-jolly-good-fellow-say-Khannas-friends/articleshow/48704630.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:10 IST 2015||Sanjeev Khanna, Indrani Mukerjea's second husband and suspected ally in Sheena Bora's killing, may be the most surprising element in this macabre drama, but his friends and associates in Kolkata refused to cast aspersions on "Sanju" just yet.     From being the biggest dart enthusiast at one of Kolkata's poshest clubs (the CC&FC) to having a finger in every pie, Sanjeev was everyone's "best mate" and go-to guy who friends described as: "A doer... someone who could get things done."     The morning after Khanna's arrest, TOI spoke to Ajay Rawla, the man who Khanna worked for as a consultant and whose house he was picked up from on Wednesday afternoon. "It wasn't like he was hiding like a desperate fugitive in my house. We had a meeting in the morning after which he drove me home and that's when news broke on television. We were sitting, watching, wondering what steps to take when the police arrived," explained Rawla.     Seven years his senior, Khanna's association with Rawla dates back to the time they went to Mayo College in Ajmer. Later, Khanna went on to become an aide for Rawla's pet projects. Besides running his own business in wireless communications, Khanna was there setting up chef Shaun Kenworthy and Rawla's restaurant 1658 or immersed in the heritage project of converting the Bawali Rajbari into a hotel. "He was getting all the construction work and labourers in place. He was very good in helping out with permissions through his connections with excise and contractors," remembers Kenworthy.     Khanna, who seldom missed his outings at the club, motor rallies and horse racing as a prominent face in the social circuit, was not the same man before he met Indrani, recounts Bull Banthia, a close friend. "Well-read and well-versed, Sanju had a great mechanical mind with a solution for everything," is how Bull chose to describe his "jolly good friend who loved meeting new people, hung out at the club but wasn't a social climber". "It was Indrani who emerged as this socialite and drove him to consciously build contacts with those higher up in the social rung after marriage," said the Kolkata-based entrepreneur. "That's the reason why I distanced myself from them until overnight she left Kolkata with their daughter and Sanju's wallet."     While Indrani never surfaces in conversations, his daughter Vidhie, who stayed with Indrani, is a fond subject with his friends. "He would miss his daughter but was resigned to fate, hoping that someday she would find him," said Rawla, adding, "It was Vidhie who called Sanjeev on Wednesday to give him the news."     No one seems to know about any recent interaction between Khanna and Indrani. G M Kapur, a known name in Kolkata who was Intach's state convener and happens to be Khanna's "mama", seemed disturbed with "all the theorizing" of Khanna's role in the crime. He declined to look back on Indrani and Khanna's relationship but added, "The last that there was any contact with Indrani or her family was when Vidhie visited Calcutta last year to celebrate the 75th birthday of her grandmother (Khanna's mother who lives with him)."     Khanna's Facebook posts on "karma" in the weeks and months following Sheena's alleged murder on April 24, 2012, make for interesting reading. On April 30, Khanna shared photo messages: "Say whatever, whenever the f*** you want to"; "Sometimes I get so weird, I even freak myself out".     On May 24, exactly a month after the alleged killing, he wrote: "You can never tell what people are thinking and feeling unless they tell you, and usually they lie. you ask them, 'Whats wrong?' and they say 'Nothing'. You accept this because it's easier than digging for the truth. People smile when they want to cry, they laugh when they want to scream and shout. They pretend like nothing is wrong because they don't want to face the truth. Things aren't always rainbows and butterflies, sometimes you gotta scream and cry your anger and sadness to the world, because you can only hold it in for so long before something in you snaps. so when you want to cry, cry. When you want to scream, scream. Don't hide behind fake smiles, it's ok to not be alright."     ||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Sheena-docu-Michail-add-to-mystery/articleshow/48701752.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:10 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Michail, Sheena's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered have raised a number of unanswered questions.    Two days after his mother, Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Michail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai Police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed that what he gave to police was enough to prove that Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora (who are actually parents of Indrani) as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. Some questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukherjea.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Michail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43 as mentioned in reports after her arrest.    Adding more to the suspense, Michail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Michail studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board examination, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that knew that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard that her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard that she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband who she introduced as Peter Mukherjea."    The two-member Mumbai Police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Michail, who on Wednesday, was the first one to reveal that Sheena was Indrani's daughter, twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Michail's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Michail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukherjae is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Michail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."  ||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Grandparents-are-Sheenas-mom-dad-on-birth-certificate/articleshow/48704559.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:10 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Mikhail, Sheena Bora's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered led to some unanswered questions on Thursday.    Two days after his mother Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Mikhail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed what he gave the police was enough to prove Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora, who are actually Indrani's parents, as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. However, many questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter. In many cases in India involving single mothers, grandparents are known to put in their names as father and mother.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukerjea, that is, 13 years after Sheena was born.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Mikhail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43.    Mikhail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Mikhail     studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board exam, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband, who she introduced as Peter Mukerjea."    The two-member Mumbai police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Mikhail twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Mikhail 's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time, he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Mikhail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukerjea is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Mikhail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Sheena-bowled-us-over-Rahuls-uncle/articleshow/48704552.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:10 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: Had things worked out as desired for Peter Mukherjea's first wife Shabnam and her family in Dehradun, Rahul Mukherjea and Sheena Bora would have been married for over three years now.     Shabnam's brother Shaleen Singh told TOI on Thursday that in 2011 Rahul brought Sheena to their sprawling home in Dehradun to seek approval from the family for their marriage.     The entire family-Shabnam, her younger brother Shaleen, father Anand Singh and mother Seema-were reportedly bowled over by Sheena's jovial nature and affection towards the elderly people. Impressed, the family gave its "unqualified and unanimous approval" for the wedding, which was supposed to take place within a few months, said Shaleen.     Stunned by the recent development, Shaleen said, "Sheena was among those rare persons who left a deep and lifelong impact on people. She was good-looking, a sweet person, clean of heart and good to talk to. None of us objected to the wedding."     Shaleen learnt of Sheena's murder through news channels. "It would have been great if she had become a part of the family. I don't know what was the cause and motive behind the heinous crime, but all those behind the killing of the jovial-natured girl should not be spared at any cost," he said.     A former model and tele-actor, 49-year-old Shaleen today owns the Sanskar International school in Jogiwala here. He recalled the last meeting with Shabnam and Rahul in April this year. "My father Anand Singh passed away in April. They had come to pay their respects but we did not interact much."     However, Shaleen said of late the interaction between him and his sister Shabnam was limited. Although Shabnam's farm Gul-e-Shabnam and Shaleen's residence Shankar Sadan are barely 200 metres away in Badripur, meetings between them were rare. While Shaleen and his mother stay on different floors of Shankar Sadan, Shabnam stays alone at her residence and is frequently visited by Rahul.     "There are matters in each family which we do not want to disclose. We are not against each other but do not interact much. She comes to meet our mother occasionally," said Shaleen, adding that Shabnam was passionate about painting and had a studio in her residence.     Shaleen denied having any details about the presence of Mumbai police in Dehradun. "Neither Doon police nor Mumbai police have contacted me over the issue."     Staff at Shabnam's residence said she was out-of-station but they were not aware of her whereabouts.||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Kilpauk-doctor-murder-Hubby-to-approach-court/articleshow/48704411.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:10 IST 2015||CHENNAI: It's been four days since police claimed to have solved the murder of S Sathya, 24, a PG medical student. However, her husband has put forth questions that police have failed to answer. Though investigating officers confirmed Sathya was not sexually assaulted before she was killed, they leaked to some section of media saying that they changed their stance on Wednesday and said there were indications of attempt to rape on the deceased.     Police personnel revealed the details soon after Sathya's husband Dr P Sesu, also employed at a primary health centre in Perambalur, expressed certain doubts.     He alleged the police hastily solved the case citing the state assembly, which is in motion. Sathya was found dead at her house in Kilpauk on August 20.     On August 23, police arrested Harintham Depnath, a BTech graduate, who lived at the second floor on the same apartment. Neither was there any mention about sexual assault or attempt on Sathya when the body was recovered from the house. The nor did the doctors. Police didn't tell this during the arrest of Depnath on August 23. "What forced the police to reveal about the sexual harassment attempt on my wife now?" asked Sesu.     "I want to live a peaceful life with my two sons - Tamil Nesan, 6, and Karmugilan, 4. The studies and the future of my children is important for me. I do respect the police personnel who spent sleepless nights to solve the murder, but there are questions that need to be answered," he said.     "I live in Perambalur with my children, but we speak through live video calls. I have told my sons that Sathya has gone to the God, as the Almighty likes her more. "Hereafter, we cannot speak or meet her. I don't know how far my children will admit it?" said Sesu. "I will approach the court seeking a fair probe into the murder of my wife. I want to find out the real cause behind her death. I want the real accused to get punished for his deed," said Sesu.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Woman-strangles-husbands-lover/articleshow/48704388.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:10 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A woman beat up and strangled her husband's partner, an assistant professor at a polytechnic in Choolaimedu, in their Thiruverkadu home on Thursday, police said. A court later remanded the accused, 32-year-old Shruti, in judicial custody.     Police said Sambasivam, a professor at Panimalar Engineering College in Poonamallee, used to bring Rajalakshmi, home frequently and introduced her to his wife Shruti as a colleague. He even dropped her home at night. The polytechnic where Rajalakshmi worked was part of the Panimalar group of educational institutions. Shruti initially believed the two were just colleagues until Sambasivam came home with Rajalakshmi on Tuesday and said the woman was moving in with them permanently.     On Wednesday morning, Sambasivam allegedly tied a 'mangalsutra' to Rajalakshmi in front of his wife, police said, based on Shruti's confession. A shocked Shruti picked up a fight with Sambasivam who asked her to maintain a cordial relationship and take care of Rajalakshmi. On Thursday morning, after he left for college a fight broke out between the two women.     Police said Rajalakshmi allegedly abused Sruthi and went into the bathroom. Sruthi followed her in and strangled her with the 'mangalsutra'. She then tried to make it appear that the woman had fainted in the bathroom. She took her in an autorickshaw to a nearby hospital where she was declared 'brought dead'. Doctors who noticed a few marks around her neck informed the Thiruverkadu police who registered a case of suspicious death under CrPC section 176.     The body was sent for postmortem to Kilpauk Medical College and Hospital.     After finding that the two women were at home at the time of the death, police interrogated Sruthi for more than an hour but she continued to maintain that Rajyalakshmi had died of injuries sustained when she fell down in the bathroom.     "She confessed to the murder when we told her that her fingerprints had been lifted from the scene of crime," said an investigating officer. "She said she had smashed the woman's head against the wall and later strangled her with the 'thali'." Police altered the case to murder and arrested Sruthi.     Initial inquiries revealed that Rajalakshmi had been married to a man named Rajasekhar for a while and they had separated. She then got married to Suresh, a relative who worked in a private firm, a few years ago and the couple moved into a house in Mogappair.     They allegedly had frequent quarrels as he tortured her and she left him too, police found.     Rajalakshmi then got a job with Panimalar Engineering College where she met Sambasivam. The two became friends and began seeing each other. Rajalakshmi recently moved to the polytechnic in Choolaimedu, police said.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/US-journalists-killer-annoyed-colleagues-Ex-boss/articleshow/48704167.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:10 IST 2015||ROANOKE, United States: The disgruntled former US television station employee who murdered two journalists had "annoyed" colleagues but showed no signs at work of any mental health issues, his former boss said Thursday.     Vester Lee Flanagan, 41, worked as a reporter for WDBJ in Roanoke, Virginia from March 2012 to February 2013, but was dismissed for poor performance and angry behavior, general manager Jeffrey Marks said.     On Wednesday, Flanagan shot and killed two of the CBS affiliate's journalists while they were conducting an on-air interview. He later fatally shot himself.     "We are still at a loss to figure out what happened to him in those two and a half years" since he was fired, Marks told a news conference flanked by dozens of staff, many of them holding hands.     "I don't think we identified that he had mental health issues. We certainly identified that he had performance issues."     Marks defended the station's hiring record and said its parent company had "a very elaborate program to screen employees."     Flanagan passed background checks and came with only positive references, Marks said.     It was only after he was hired, Marks said, that things went downhill.     "Vester's behavior annoyed a lot of people in the news station," Marks said.     Flanagan, who went by the on-screen name Bryce Williams, alleged in a manifesto faxed to ABC News that he was discriminated against as a gay, black journalist.     Marks said accusations in 2013 that he was treated unfairly were "immediately investigated and found to be without merit."     During his employment, Flanagan complied with demands that he seek medical help, but he was ultimately dismissed.     He was escorted from the building by police and made an ominous aside to the news director -- handing him a wooden cross and saying "'you'll need this'," Marks said.     As he left, he also made a "derogatory comment" to Adam Ward, the cameraman he shot dead on Wednesday.     Flanagan filed a complaint with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and a civil action suit, which were dismissed, he said.     "All of these investigations determined that no reasonable person would have taken any of the cited incidents as discrimination or harassment."     After killing Ward and reporter Alison Parker live on the air, Flanagan posted a video of the attack on social media.||ROANOKE, UNITED STATES
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:10 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/SC-acquits-Romesh-Sharma-in-Budhiraja-murder-case/articleshow/48704930.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:10 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Thursday upheld the Delhi High Court order acquitting former Congress leader Romesh Sharma in the case relating to the killing of fashion designer Kunjum Budhiraja.     A bench of Justices Pinaki Chandra Ghose and R K Agrawal dismissed an appeal filed by the Delhi government challenging HC order.     The Delhi government contended that the HC had erred in acquitting Sharma but it was strongly opposed by his counsel and senior advocate Siddharth Luthra who submitted that his client was in love with Kunjum and there was no evidence to prove his involvement in the case.     Sharma, who was alleged to be a frontman of underworld don Dawood Ibrahim, was convicted by a trial court on February 15, 2008. Kunjum was killed on March 20, 1999 at Sharma's South Delhi-based 'Jai Mata Di' farm house by a group of hired gangsters from Uttar Pradesh.     The trial court had convicted Sharma and five other accused in the case and had awarded life term to all. The HC, however, acquitted Sharma and co-accused Tejendir Verdi but upheld conviction and sentence of other four accused— Sharma's nephew Surinder Mishra, Hemchand, Santram and Ramesh alias Bobby.     While acquitting Sharma, the HC had said "Romesh Sharma and Kunjum were in love, and desired the company of each other. It does not establish that Sharma had got fed up with her". It had turned down Delhi police's contention that Sharma wanted to get rid of Kunjum as she knew about his alleged illegal activities.     "A grieving lover falling over the body of his mate and performing the rituals of a marriage can well be an expression of lasting love, and need not necessarily be a drama," the HC had said.     Sharma was in judicial custody at the time of the Kunjum's murder.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Raid-on-Bengaluru-centre-reveals-horror-tales/articleshow/48704718.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:10 IST 2015||BENGALURU: A State Human Rights Commission raid on a de-addiction centre in Jnanabharati Layout, near Kengeri, southwest Bengaluru, found 90 inmates living in pathetic conditions and subjected to inhuman treatment.     Thursday's raid followed the murder of an inmate of another de-addiction centre in Kothanur recently.     The SHRC raid on Sri Santhosh Social Service Society, also known as 4S Society, followed a tipoff. According to SHRC officials, the centre has been in existence for seven years at least, but the society couldn't produce documents of having obtained permission from the social welfare department. Commission officials said the centre had the permission from the DC and the DHO.     "Most inmates are between 20 and 35 years. They showed us signs of being physically abused. The centre has violated other norms too. Although it's supposed to have one nurse for every 15 patients and at least one in-house doctor and a psychiatrist, it didn't have any," said an SHRC spokesperson.     4 arrested for killing inmate:     Kothanur police arrested a de-addiction centre staffer and three inmates for allegedly beating to death a 28-year-old inmate. Dinesh was admitted to the centre by his family as he was an alcoholic. He was later found dead in a hospital. Family members noticed several bruises on his body. Narayana, an inmate-turned-staffer, gave some medicines to Dinesh, who later turned aggressive. Narayana sought the help of inmates Suresh, Subhan and Simon, to subdue Dinesh.     When Dinesh retaliated, the quartet overpowered him till he became unconscious. He died in hospital.||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/A-jolly-good-fellow-say-Khannas-friends/articleshow/48704630.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:10 IST 2015||Sanjeev Khanna, Indrani Mukerjea's second husband and suspected ally in Sheena Bora's killing, may be the most surprising element in this macabre drama, but his friends and associates in Kolkata refused to cast aspersions on "Sanju" just yet.     From being the biggest dart enthusiast at one of Kolkata's poshest clubs (the CC&FC) to having a finger in every pie, Sanjeev was everyone's "best mate" and go-to guy who friends described as: "A doer... someone who could get things done."     The morning after Khanna's arrest, TOI spoke to Ajay Rawla, the man who Khanna worked for as a consultant and whose house he was picked up from on Wednesday afternoon. "It wasn't like he was hiding like a desperate fugitive in my house. We had a meeting in the morning after which he drove me home and that's when news broke on television. We were sitting, watching, wondering what steps to take when the police arrived," explained Rawla.     Seven years his senior, Khanna's association with Rawla dates back to the time they went to Mayo College in Ajmer. Later, Khanna went on to become an aide for Rawla's pet projects. Besides running his own business in wireless communications, Khanna was there setting up chef Shaun Kenworthy and Rawla's restaurant 1658 or immersed in the heritage project of converting the Bawali Rajbari into a hotel. "He was getting all the construction work and labourers in place. He was very good in helping out with permissions through his connections with excise and contractors," remembers Kenworthy.     Khanna, who seldom missed his outings at the club, motor rallies and horse racing as a prominent face in the social circuit, was not the same man before he met Indrani, recounts Bull Banthia, a close friend. "Well-read and well-versed, Sanju had a great mechanical mind with a solution for everything," is how Bull chose to describe his "jolly good friend who loved meeting new people, hung out at the club but wasn't a social climber". "It was Indrani who emerged as this socialite and drove him to consciously build contacts with those higher up in the social rung after marriage," said the Kolkata-based entrepreneur. "That's the reason why I distanced myself from them until overnight she left Kolkata with their daughter and Sanju's wallet."     While Indrani never surfaces in conversations, his daughter Vidhie, who stayed with Indrani, is a fond subject with his friends. "He would miss his daughter but was resigned to fate, hoping that someday she would find him," said Rawla, adding, "It was Vidhie who called Sanjeev on Wednesday to give him the news."     No one seems to know about any recent interaction between Khanna and Indrani. G M Kapur, a known name in Kolkata who was Intach's state convener and happens to be Khanna's "mama", seemed disturbed with "all the theorizing" of Khanna's role in the crime. He declined to look back on Indrani and Khanna's relationship but added, "The last that there was any contact with Indrani or her family was when Vidhie visited Calcutta last year to celebrate the 75th birthday of her grandmother (Khanna's mother who lives with him)."     Khanna's Facebook posts on "karma" in the weeks and months following Sheena's alleged murder on April 24, 2012, make for interesting reading. On April 30, Khanna shared photo messages: "Say whatever, whenever the f*** you want to"; "Sometimes I get so weird, I even freak myself out".     On May 24, exactly a month after the alleged killing, he wrote: "You can never tell what people are thinking and feeling unless they tell you, and usually they lie. you ask them, 'Whats wrong?' and they say 'Nothing'. You accept this because it's easier than digging for the truth. People smile when they want to cry, they laugh when they want to scream and shout. They pretend like nothing is wrong because they don't want to face the truth. Things aren't always rainbows and butterflies, sometimes you gotta scream and cry your anger and sadness to the world, because you can only hold it in for so long before something in you snaps. so when you want to cry, cry. When you want to scream, scream. Don't hide behind fake smiles, it's ok to not be alright."     ||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Sheena-docu-Michail-add-to-mystery/articleshow/48701752.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:10 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Michail, Sheena's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered have raised a number of unanswered questions.    Two days after his mother, Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Michail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai Police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed that what he gave to police was enough to prove that Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora (who are actually parents of Indrani) as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. Some questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukherjea.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Michail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43 as mentioned in reports after her arrest.    Adding more to the suspense, Michail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Michail studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board examination, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that knew that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard that her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard that she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband who she introduced as Peter Mukherjea."    The two-member Mumbai Police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Michail, who on Wednesday, was the first one to reveal that Sheena was Indrani's daughter, twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Michail's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Michail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukherjae is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Michail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."  ||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Grandparents-are-Sheenas-mom-dad-on-birth-certificate/articleshow/48704559.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:10 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Mikhail, Sheena Bora's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered led to some unanswered questions on Thursday.    Two days after his mother Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Mikhail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed what he gave the police was enough to prove Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora, who are actually Indrani's parents, as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. However, many questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter. In many cases in India involving single mothers, grandparents are known to put in their names as father and mother.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukerjea, that is, 13 years after Sheena was born.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Mikhail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43.    Mikhail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Mikhail     studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board exam, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband, who she introduced as Peter Mukerjea."    The two-member Mumbai police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Mikhail twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Mikhail 's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time, he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Mikhail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukerjea is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Mikhail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Sheena-bowled-us-over-Rahuls-uncle/articleshow/48704552.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:10 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: Had things worked out as desired for Peter Mukherjea's first wife Shabnam and her family in Dehradun, Rahul Mukherjea and Sheena Bora would have been married for over three years now.     Shabnam's brother Shaleen Singh told TOI on Thursday that in 2011 Rahul brought Sheena to their sprawling home in Dehradun to seek approval from the family for their marriage.     The entire family-Shabnam, her younger brother Shaleen, father Anand Singh and mother Seema-were reportedly bowled over by Sheena's jovial nature and affection towards the elderly people. Impressed, the family gave its "unqualified and unanimous approval" for the wedding, which was supposed to take place within a few months, said Shaleen.     Stunned by the recent development, Shaleen said, "Sheena was among those rare persons who left a deep and lifelong impact on people. She was good-looking, a sweet person, clean of heart and good to talk to. None of us objected to the wedding."     Shaleen learnt of Sheena's murder through news channels. "It would have been great if she had become a part of the family. I don't know what was the cause and motive behind the heinous crime, but all those behind the killing of the jovial-natured girl should not be spared at any cost," he said.     A former model and tele-actor, 49-year-old Shaleen today owns the Sanskar International school in Jogiwala here. He recalled the last meeting with Shabnam and Rahul in April this year. "My father Anand Singh passed away in April. They had come to pay their respects but we did not interact much."     However, Shaleen said of late the interaction between him and his sister Shabnam was limited. Although Shabnam's farm Gul-e-Shabnam and Shaleen's residence Shankar Sadan are barely 200 metres away in Badripur, meetings between them were rare. While Shaleen and his mother stay on different floors of Shankar Sadan, Shabnam stays alone at her residence and is frequently visited by Rahul.     "There are matters in each family which we do not want to disclose. We are not against each other but do not interact much. She comes to meet our mother occasionally," said Shaleen, adding that Shabnam was passionate about painting and had a studio in her residence.     Shaleen denied having any details about the presence of Mumbai police in Dehradun. "Neither Doon police nor Mumbai police have contacted me over the issue."     Staff at Shabnam's residence said she was out-of-station but they were not aware of her whereabouts.||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Kilpauk-doctor-murder-Hubby-to-approach-court/articleshow/48704411.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:10 IST 2015||CHENNAI: It's been four days since police claimed to have solved the murder of S Sathya, 24, a PG medical student. However, her husband has put forth questions that police have failed to answer. Though investigating officers confirmed Sathya was not sexually assaulted before she was killed, they leaked to some section of media saying that they changed their stance on Wednesday and said there were indications of attempt to rape on the deceased.     Police personnel revealed the details soon after Sathya's husband Dr P Sesu, also employed at a primary health centre in Perambalur, expressed certain doubts.     He alleged the police hastily solved the case citing the state assembly, which is in motion. Sathya was found dead at her house in Kilpauk on August 20.     On August 23, police arrested Harintham Depnath, a BTech graduate, who lived at the second floor on the same apartment. Neither was there any mention about sexual assault or attempt on Sathya when the body was recovered from the house. The nor did the doctors. Police didn't tell this during the arrest of Depnath on August 23. "What forced the police to reveal about the sexual harassment attempt on my wife now?" asked Sesu.     "I want to live a peaceful life with my two sons - Tamil Nesan, 6, and Karmugilan, 4. The studies and the future of my children is important for me. I do respect the police personnel who spent sleepless nights to solve the murder, but there are questions that need to be answered," he said.     "I live in Perambalur with my children, but we speak through live video calls. I have told my sons that Sathya has gone to the God, as the Almighty likes her more. "Hereafter, we cannot speak or meet her. I don't know how far my children will admit it?" said Sesu. "I will approach the court seeking a fair probe into the murder of my wife. I want to find out the real cause behind her death. I want the real accused to get punished for his deed," said Sesu.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Woman-strangles-husbands-lover/articleshow/48704388.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:10 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A woman beat up and strangled her husband's partner, an assistant professor at a polytechnic in Choolaimedu, in their Thiruverkadu home on Thursday, police said. A court later remanded the accused, 32-year-old Shruti, in judicial custody.     Police said Sambasivam, a professor at Panimalar Engineering College in Poonamallee, used to bring Rajalakshmi, home frequently and introduced her to his wife Shruti as a colleague. He even dropped her home at night. The polytechnic where Rajalakshmi worked was part of the Panimalar group of educational institutions. Shruti initially believed the two were just colleagues until Sambasivam came home with Rajalakshmi on Tuesday and said the woman was moving in with them permanently.     On Wednesday morning, Sambasivam allegedly tied a 'mangalsutra' to Rajalakshmi in front of his wife, police said, based on Shruti's confession. A shocked Shruti picked up a fight with Sambasivam who asked her to maintain a cordial relationship and take care of Rajalakshmi. On Thursday morning, after he left for college a fight broke out between the two women.     Police said Rajalakshmi allegedly abused Sruthi and went into the bathroom. Sruthi followed her in and strangled her with the 'mangalsutra'. She then tried to make it appear that the woman had fainted in the bathroom. She took her in an autorickshaw to a nearby hospital where she was declared 'brought dead'. Doctors who noticed a few marks around her neck informed the Thiruverkadu police who registered a case of suspicious death under CrPC section 176.     The body was sent for postmortem to Kilpauk Medical College and Hospital.     After finding that the two women were at home at the time of the death, police interrogated Sruthi for more than an hour but she continued to maintain that Rajyalakshmi had died of injuries sustained when she fell down in the bathroom.     "She confessed to the murder when we told her that her fingerprints had been lifted from the scene of crime," said an investigating officer. "She said she had smashed the woman's head against the wall and later strangled her with the 'thali'." Police altered the case to murder and arrested Sruthi.     Initial inquiries revealed that Rajalakshmi had been married to a man named Rajasekhar for a while and they had separated. She then got married to Suresh, a relative who worked in a private firm, a few years ago and the couple moved into a house in Mogappair.     They allegedly had frequent quarrels as he tortured her and she left him too, police found.     Rajalakshmi then got a job with Panimalar Engineering College where she met Sambasivam. The two became friends and began seeing each other. Rajalakshmi recently moved to the polytechnic in Choolaimedu, police said.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/US-journalists-killer-annoyed-colleagues-Ex-boss/articleshow/48704167.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:10 IST 2015||ROANOKE, United States: The disgruntled former US television station employee who murdered two journalists had "annoyed" colleagues but showed no signs at work of any mental health issues, his former boss said Thursday.     Vester Lee Flanagan, 41, worked as a reporter for WDBJ in Roanoke, Virginia from March 2012 to February 2013, but was dismissed for poor performance and angry behavior, general manager Jeffrey Marks said.     On Wednesday, Flanagan shot and killed two of the CBS affiliate's journalists while they were conducting an on-air interview. He later fatally shot himself.     "We are still at a loss to figure out what happened to him in those two and a half years" since he was fired, Marks told a news conference flanked by dozens of staff, many of them holding hands.     "I don't think we identified that he had mental health issues. We certainly identified that he had performance issues."     Marks defended the station's hiring record and said its parent company had "a very elaborate program to screen employees."     Flanagan passed background checks and came with only positive references, Marks said.     It was only after he was hired, Marks said, that things went downhill.     "Vester's behavior annoyed a lot of people in the news station," Marks said.     Flanagan, who went by the on-screen name Bryce Williams, alleged in a manifesto faxed to ABC News that he was discriminated against as a gay, black journalist.     Marks said accusations in 2013 that he was treated unfairly were "immediately investigated and found to be without merit."     During his employment, Flanagan complied with demands that he seek medical help, but he was ultimately dismissed.     He was escorted from the building by police and made an ominous aside to the news director -- handing him a wooden cross and saying "'you'll need this'," Marks said.     As he left, he also made a "derogatory comment" to Adam Ward, the cameraman he shot dead on Wednesday.     Flanagan filed a complaint with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and a civil action suit, which were dismissed, he said.     "All of these investigations determined that no reasonable person would have taken any of the cited incidents as discrimination or harassment."     After killing Ward and reporter Alison Parker live on the air, Flanagan posted a video of the attack on social media.||ROANOKE, UNITED STATES
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/europe/Stone-age-massacre-discovered-outside-Frankfurt/articleshow/48530884.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:15 IST 2015||BERLIN: Archaeologists have discovered evidence of a brutal mass murder that took place outside Frankfurt some 7,000 years ago during the Stone Age.     The massacre also includes what could be one of the earliest records of torture.     Archaeologists dug up 26 bodies in a mass grave and said the horror of their deaths marked them out.     The remains were first dug up in 2006 in Schoneck-Kilianstadten, about 15 kilometres outside Frankfurt, and now researchers have closely examined the bones.     The legs of the victims seem to have been broken — either just before or just after death.     "Many have injuries, skull fractures caused by typical weapons from the time," said Christian Meyer, who was a PhD student at the University of Mainz when he conducted the research.     The injuries are often on the left of the skull, indicating that they were facing the attacker when they were hit with an adze, 'The Times' reported.     "We can say these people were violently killed, at close quarters. The legs are a new thing, though. This has not been encountered before. The lower leg bones, the tibia and fibula, appear to have been smashed systematically," Meyer said.     "Basic human common sense tells you this has to be either torture or mutilation," Meyer said.     There were no young women among the dead, researchers found.     "This pattern is repeated all over the world at different times. Basically you kill everyone. If you spare someone, it is usually women of reproductive age - you take them with you," Meyer said.     Schoneck-Kilianstadten is not the only site in central Europe of a Stone Age massacre. Archaeologists have also found evidence of such violence in Talheim in Baden-Wurttemberg and in a village near Vienna, according to 'The Local'.     "These three places prove that 7,000 years ago there was already collective violence on a large scale," Meyer said.     The research is published in Proceedings of the National Academy of Sciences.||BERLIN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/entertainment/bengali/movie-reviews/Ek-Nadir-Galpo/articleshow/48528805.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:15 IST 2015||Story: It's a heartbreaking tale of a village postmaster, Darakeshwar (Mithun), who dedicates his sunset years to getting the Keleghai river named after his only daughter, Anjana (Shweta), after her sudden death.  Then, the twist that snatches happiness away not only from  death — is sudden and unexpected. Nothing can be closer to reality than that suddenness — no warning, no telltale signs, just an abrupt turn of events. It's this masterstroke that shows  A lot, trust me. For one, you get to see  in, perhaps, one of his career's best performances. His world revolves around the river, which he starts considering his daughter, and making rounds of the district magistrate's (Krishna  ) office to get it renamed from  . The way he portrays a broken man, going about life, stubbornly refusing to deal with reality, is very moving. The other actors, including, of course,  , have put in fine performances too. Right from the simple village folk to the district magistrate, his seasoned personal assistant (  death, everyone has put in balanced, studied performances.  , especially, has played her character of a bubbly, intelligent and outspoken village lass to the hilt. But it's the new perspective to the storyline that takes the cake. The second half sees the village taking a backseat and focus shifting to the investigation into  relentless struggle to get the river named after her. And suddenly an emotional tale turns into a murder mystery, of course, without a hotshot sleuth, but a homegrown cop who refuses to give up despite hitting dead end after dead end. And  has kept even this half as real as the first, never slipping when it comes to detail.  The background score, too, is subtle and understated, adding to the rustic reality of the visuals. And though there are just two songs in the film, one being a traditional number, the original song is a treat to listen to. And it takes nothing away from the visuals; rather, it adds to them.  . It will remind you why cinema is the child of art and reality.||STORY
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/hubballi/Cops-nab-23-year-old-crack-triple-murder-case-in-12-hours/articleshow/48525579.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:15 IST 2015||BELAGAVI: Acting swiftly, city police on Monday arrested a 23-year-old college student for murdering Reena Rakesh Malgatti, 37, and her children Sahitya, 5, and Aditya, 12, on Sunday.     Cops nabbed the accused in the triple murder case in Kuvempu Nagar within 12 hours of the incident. In his confession, Praveen Subramanya Bhat, 23, described the brutal killing of two kids and a woman with whom he had an affair. Bhat was studying chartered accountancy in Gogte College of Commerce here. Police took him into custody from his house.     He slit her throat with a knife and drowned Sahitya and Aditya in a bucket of water in the bathroom. Praveen told police that both children had seen him killing their mother and he had no option but to kill them too. According to police sources, neighbours Praveen and Reena had been having an affair over the past one year. Praveen used to enter Reena's house by climbing a pipe and sometimes a rope left by Reena whenever her husband Rakesh was out of station.     Rakesh, a cloth merchant, would be out of the house through the day and return late at night.     While Rakesh is from Ballari, Reena is from Gujarat. The had a love marriage 14 years ago. Bhat claimed he was against the affair but Reena had blackmailed him to continue with it. However, police said they looking into this version.     Police commissioner S Ravi, said around 11.30pm on Saturday, the accused entered Reena's house by climbing a rope. Before that, Reena had latched the room of Harsha, a 17-year-old adopted boy. After spending some time with Reena, the accused went out. He told police he requested Reena to stop calling him but she ignored it. Therefore, he went again at 3am, determined to end the affair by killing her.     A case was registered at APMC police station and Bhat was booked under sections 302 and 201 of the IPC. The commissioner said officers who worked on the case would be given a reward.     Meanwhile, Kendriya Vidyalaya School-2 in the Camp area announced a holiday on Monday following the death of Aditya, a class 5 student there.     ||BELAGAVI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/hubballi/Cops-nab-23-year-old-crack-triple-murder-case-in-12-hours/articleshow/48525390.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:15 IST 2015||BELAGAVI: Acting swiftly, city police on Monday arrested a 23-year-old college student for murdering Reena Rakesh Malgatti, 37, and her children Sahitya, 5, and Aditya, 12, on Sunday.     Cops nabbed the accused in the triple murder case in Kuvempu Nagar within 12 hours of the incident. In his confession, Praveen Subramanya Bhat, 23, described the brutal killing of two kids and a woman with whom he had an affair. Bhat was studying chartered accountancy in Gogte College of Commerce here. Police took him into custody from his house.     He slit her throat with a knife and drowned Sahitya and Aditya in a bucket of water in the bathroom. Praveen told police that both children had seen him killing their mother and he had no option but to kill them too. According to police sources, neighbours Praveen and Reena had been having an affair over the past one year. Praveen used to enter Reena's house by climbing a pipe and sometimes a rope left by Reena whenever her husband Rakesh was out of station.     Rakesh, a cloth merchant, would be out of the house through the day and return late at night.     While Rakesh is from Ballari, Reena is from Gujarat. The had a love marriage 14 years ago. Bhat claimed he was against the affair but Reena had blackmailed him to continue with it. However, police said they looking into this version.     Police commissioner S Ravi, said around 11.30pm on Saturday, the accused entered Reena's house by climbing a rope. Before that, Reena had latched the room of Harsha, a 17-year-old adopted boy. After spending some time with Reena, the accused went out. He told police he requested Reena to stop calling him but she ignored it. Therefore, he went again at 3am, determined to end the affair by killing her.     A case was registered at APMC police station and Bhat was booked under sections 302 and 201 of the IPC. The commissioner said officers who worked on the case would be given a reward.     Meanwhile, Kendriya Vidyalaya School-2 in the Camp area announced a holiday on Monday following the death of Aditya, a class 5 student there.                         ||BELAGAVI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/Former-Khalistan-leader-stabbed-to-death-in-US/articleshow/48524949.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:15 IST 2015||WASHINGTON: A former Sikh separatist leader was stabbed to death by unidentified assailants outside his apartment in the US city of Illinois.     Satwinder Singh Bhola, 52, the owner of Griswold Grocery & Liquor in Peoria, was parking his car in the parking lot of his apartment complex on Sunday when some unidentified persons attacked him with a knife.     Local police has launched a massive manhunt to nab the assailants. The police has not been able to determine the cause of his murder.     Bhola, according to the police, suffered multiple stab wounds. Preliminary indications are that he died of a stab wound in the neck.     Bhola was nominated as spokesperson of All India Sikh Student Federation at the peak of militancy in Punjab.     Following operation Blue Star in Amritsar, he served a two-year jail sentence. After being released from the jail, Bhola moved to California and from there he moved to Chicago where he was in the hotel business.     He was a son-in-law of Bapu Surat Singh Khalsa, who is on hunger strike in Punjab demanding the release of 82 Sikhs lodged in various jails of the country.     ||WASHINGTON
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/south-asia/Bangladesh-arrests-Briton-over-blogger-murders/articleshow/48524743.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:15 IST 2015||DHAKA: Bangladesh's elite security force Tuesday arrested three suspected Islamist militants including a British citizen who police said was the "main planner" of the murders of two prominent atheist bloggers.    Rapid Action Battalion (RAB) spokesmen said they had arrested Touhidur Rahman, 58, and two other "active members" of Ansarullah Bangla Team, which was banned in May over a spate of killings of bloggers.    "We've arrested them in the capital today. We can confirm that Rahman is a Bangladesh origin British citizen. He is the main planner of the attacks on Avijit Roy and Ananta Bijoy Das," Major Maksudul Alam of the RAB told AFP.||DHAKA
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/surat/Father-son-duo-stabbed-to-death/articleshow/48524315.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:15 IST 2015||SURAT: A father-son duo was stabbed to death allegedly by two brothers early on Monday in Amroli area of the city following a tussle over a petty issue. Two other of the family were also injured during the fight and have been admitted to hospital.     The deceased were identified as Shailendra Singh Rajput (50) and his son Natwar (24), both employed in diamond units. They were stabbed with knives in Shree Ram Nagar at Gujarat Housing Board in Amroli by accused Mahesh Rajput (31) and his brother Ramesh alias Mangal Rajput (28).     The deceased and the accused are distant relatives and belong to the same community, police said. They belong to Khera village of Darbhanga district in Bihar and have settled in the city for better employment.     Shailendra and Natwar were shifted to Surat Municipal Institute of Medical Education and Research (SMIMER) in critical condition where they succumbed to injuries sustained on shoulder and stomach.     Those injured were identified as Vikas (22) and Rupesh (17). Vikas, younger son of Shailendra, lodged the compliant with Amroli police.     Mahesh Rajput and his brother Ramesh alias Mangal Rajput were booked for murder. The duo were also injured injury during the fight and are admitted in hospital. "The accused are under treatment at hospital and will be arrested on being discharged," said H S Purani, police inspector, Amroli police station.||SURAT
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Make-mins-murder-report-public-HC-to-govt/articleshow/48518289.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:15 IST 2015||Agartala: A division bench of Tripura high court on Monday issued a notice to the state government for not publishing a judicial inquiry report on the assassination of former health minister Bimal Sinha for the last 15 years.    Hearing a PIL filed by Congress activist and lawyer Kalayani Roy, the bench of Chief Justice Deepak Gupta and Justice Subhashis Talapatra sought a reply from the chief secretary, home secretary and district magistrate of Dhalai and West Tripura by November 23 on why the report has been published.    The commission was constituted with Justice K M Yusuf of Calcutta high court after Sinha and his younger brother Bidyut were killed on March 31, 1998 in a mysterious terror attack in the Abhanga area of Kalampur in Dhalai district.    Though the commission had submitted its report in 2000, it has not yet been made public, Roy said.    Bimal and his brother had gone to negotiate with the banned NLFT for their cousin brother's release who had been kidnapped by the militants. The entire security force escorting the minister had been left behind.    The militants killed the minister's abducted brother and then gun down Sinha and his brother. The government had set up a judicial probe after police failed make any leads in the case. "Despite constitutional provisions and demand from a cross-section of society, the government did not table the report in the assembly, which has raised suspicions over the government's role in the case. Moreover, the government had spent a huge amountfrom the public exchequer for the probe," Roy has said in the PIL.    Former Tripura minister Bimal Sinha and his brother Bidyut were killed on March 31, 1998, in a mysterious terror attack in the Abhanga area of Dhalai district.  ||AGARTALA
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/home/science/Gang-killings-spread-like-infectious-disease-Study/articleshow/48521306.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:15 IST 2015||WASHINGTON: Gang killings move in a systematic pattern over time, spreading from one vulnerable area to the next like a disease, according to a groundbreaking US study. The study, by Michigan State University criminologists and public health researchers, could help pave the way for communities to one day anticipate and ultimately prevent gang-related homicides and other violent crimes.     "We've shown that there is a potentially systematic movement of gang-related homicides," said April Zeoli, associate professor of criminal justice and lead investigator on the study. "Not only that, but in the places gang homicides move into, we see other types of homicide - specifically, revenge and drug-related killings - also clustering. Taken together, this provides one piece of the puzzle that may allow us to start forecasting where homicide is going to be the worst - and that may be preceded in large part by changes in gang networks," Zeoli said.     Using police data from Newark, New Jersey, Zeoli and fellow MSU researchers Sue Grady, Jesenia Pizarro and Chris Melde were the first to show, in 2012, that homicide spreads like infectious disease. Similar to the flu, homicide needs a susceptible population, an infectious agent and a vector to spread.     For example, the infectious agent could be the code of the street - i.e. guarding one's respect at all cost, including by resorting to violence - while the vector could be word of mouth or other publicity.With the new study, the interdisciplinary team of researchers analysed the Newark data to gauge whether specific types of homicide cluster and spread differently.     In addition to gang-related murders, the researchers looked at homicide motives such as robbery, revenge, domestic violence and drugs.     The study found that the various homicide types do, in fact, show different patterns. Homicides stemming from domestic violence and robberies, for example, show no signs of clustering or spreading out.     Gang-related killings were the only type of homicide that spread in a systematic pattern. Specifically, there were four contiguous clusters of gang-related homicides that started in central Newark and moved roughly clockwise from July 2002 through December 2005.     Revenge and drug-motivated homicides unrelated to gang activity did not spread out, but they did cluster. They clustered in the same general area as the gang murders.     "By tracking how homicide types diffuse through communities and which places have ongoing or emerging homicide problems by type, we can better inform the deployment of prevention and intervention efforts," researchers said.     The findings are published in the American Journal of Public Health.     ||WASHINGTON
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Alleging-assault-engineering-student-writes-to-PMO/articleshow/48520877.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:15 IST 2015||BENGALURU: A student from an engineering college has written to the Prime Minister's Office, claiming she was physically assaulted and molested by a group of persons on August 12. Demanding justice, she has recou nted the experience in the letter, alleging that it happened after she met with an accident outside the college premises.     The girl is from Dayananda Sagar College of Engineering in south Bengaluru, and belongs to a north Indian state. She has posted the letter on her Facebook wall.     "INDEPEND ENCE Day is here and I am feeling as if I can't get outside on road freely and without any fear! Sir, I am a Student from one of the reputed engineering college of Bangalore #DSI#dayanandasagarcollegeofengineering., I became a victim of road accident, public assault, attempt to molest and murder outside the college campus, where I have been for four long years. The story is too long and brutal but I know you will take your valuable time to read it as i have faith on the Prime Minister o f India whose motto is 'BETI BACHAO,BETI PARHAO'," reads the post.     The student claimed she fell off her scooter after being hit by a two-wheeler rider aged 45-50. When she got up, the man allegedly abused her. As she tried to drive away, he called out to another man who pushed the scooter from behind, causing her to fall again and get injured.     Later, an autorickshaw driver, a shopkeeper and a group of men surrounded her and blame d her for the accident. They snatched her scooter key, locked the vehicle and molested her, she further alleged. "They told me you are North Indian and you can't do anything because no police authority is going to help you in South India," reads the post.     The girl claimed no one came to her rescue. When she asked onlookers if she could borrow a cellphone, they turned down her request. Finally, she dialed her friend's number from a mehendi artist's phone. When her friend arrived, even he was assaulted and his head was banged against a tree, she alleged. "Though we shouted nobody helped us, even police," she said in the post.     "Police were making fun of me just because I don't understand the local language. I want to know who is going to get me justice? I look up to you and I don't want to be a victim but a fighter. Help me like a father, treat me like a daughter! Somebody help me on how do I reach th is letter to the president," the student's post concluded.     ||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:15 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:15 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/SC-acquits-Romesh-Sharma-in-Budhiraja-murder-case/articleshow/48704930.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:15 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Thursday upheld the Delhi High Court order acquitting former Congress leader Romesh Sharma in the case relating to the killing of fashion designer Kunjum Budhiraja.     A bench of Justices Pinaki Chandra Ghose and R K Agrawal dismissed an appeal filed by the Delhi government challenging HC order.     The Delhi government contended that the HC had erred in acquitting Sharma but it was strongly opposed by his counsel and senior advocate Siddharth Luthra who submitted that his client was in love with Kunjum and there was no evidence to prove his involvement in the case.     Sharma, who was alleged to be a frontman of underworld don Dawood Ibrahim, was convicted by a trial court on February 15, 2008. Kunjum was killed on March 20, 1999 at Sharma's South Delhi-based 'Jai Mata Di' farm house by a group of hired gangsters from Uttar Pradesh.     The trial court had convicted Sharma and five other accused in the case and had awarded life term to all. The HC, however, acquitted Sharma and co-accused Tejendir Verdi but upheld conviction and sentence of other four accused— Sharma's nephew Surinder Mishra, Hemchand, Santram and Ramesh alias Bobby.     While acquitting Sharma, the HC had said "Romesh Sharma and Kunjum were in love, and desired the company of each other. It does not establish that Sharma had got fed up with her". It had turned down Delhi police's contention that Sharma wanted to get rid of Kunjum as she knew about his alleged illegal activities.     "A grieving lover falling over the body of his mate and performing the rituals of a marriage can well be an expression of lasting love, and need not necessarily be a drama," the HC had said.     Sharma was in judicial custody at the time of the Kunjum's murder.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Raid-on-Bengaluru-centre-reveals-horror-tales/articleshow/48704718.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:15 IST 2015||BENGALURU: A State Human Rights Commission raid on a de-addiction centre in Jnanabharati Layout, near Kengeri, southwest Bengaluru, found 90 inmates living in pathetic conditions and subjected to inhuman treatment.     Thursday's raid followed the murder of an inmate of another de-addiction centre in Kothanur recently.     The SHRC raid on Sri Santhosh Social Service Society, also known as 4S Society, followed a tipoff. According to SHRC officials, the centre has been in existence for seven years at least, but the society couldn't produce documents of having obtained permission from the social welfare department. Commission officials said the centre had the permission from the DC and the DHO.     "Most inmates are between 20 and 35 years. They showed us signs of being physically abused. The centre has violated other norms too. Although it's supposed to have one nurse for every 15 patients and at least one in-house doctor and a psychiatrist, it didn't have any," said an SHRC spokesperson.     4 arrested for killing inmate:     Kothanur police arrested a de-addiction centre staffer and three inmates for allegedly beating to death a 28-year-old inmate. Dinesh was admitted to the centre by his family as he was an alcoholic. He was later found dead in a hospital. Family members noticed several bruises on his body. Narayana, an inmate-turned-staffer, gave some medicines to Dinesh, who later turned aggressive. Narayana sought the help of inmates Suresh, Subhan and Simon, to subdue Dinesh.     When Dinesh retaliated, the quartet overpowered him till he became unconscious. He died in hospital.||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/A-jolly-good-fellow-say-Khannas-friends/articleshow/48704630.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:15 IST 2015||Sanjeev Khanna, Indrani Mukerjea's second husband and suspected ally in Sheena Bora's killing, may be the most surprising element in this macabre drama, but his friends and associates in Kolkata refused to cast aspersions on "Sanju" just yet.     From being the biggest dart enthusiast at one of Kolkata's poshest clubs (the CC&FC) to having a finger in every pie, Sanjeev was everyone's "best mate" and go-to guy who friends described as: "A doer... someone who could get things done."     The morning after Khanna's arrest, TOI spoke to Ajay Rawla, the man who Khanna worked for as a consultant and whose house he was picked up from on Wednesday afternoon. "It wasn't like he was hiding like a desperate fugitive in my house. We had a meeting in the morning after which he drove me home and that's when news broke on television. We were sitting, watching, wondering what steps to take when the police arrived," explained Rawla.     Seven years his senior, Khanna's association with Rawla dates back to the time they went to Mayo College in Ajmer. Later, Khanna went on to become an aide for Rawla's pet projects. Besides running his own business in wireless communications, Khanna was there setting up chef Shaun Kenworthy and Rawla's restaurant 1658 or immersed in the heritage project of converting the Bawali Rajbari into a hotel. "He was getting all the construction work and labourers in place. He was very good in helping out with permissions through his connections with excise and contractors," remembers Kenworthy.     Khanna, who seldom missed his outings at the club, motor rallies and horse racing as a prominent face in the social circuit, was not the same man before he met Indrani, recounts Bull Banthia, a close friend. "Well-read and well-versed, Sanju had a great mechanical mind with a solution for everything," is how Bull chose to describe his "jolly good friend who loved meeting new people, hung out at the club but wasn't a social climber". "It was Indrani who emerged as this socialite and drove him to consciously build contacts with those higher up in the social rung after marriage," said the Kolkata-based entrepreneur. "That's the reason why I distanced myself from them until overnight she left Kolkata with their daughter and Sanju's wallet."     While Indrani never surfaces in conversations, his daughter Vidhie, who stayed with Indrani, is a fond subject with his friends. "He would miss his daughter but was resigned to fate, hoping that someday she would find him," said Rawla, adding, "It was Vidhie who called Sanjeev on Wednesday to give him the news."     No one seems to know about any recent interaction between Khanna and Indrani. G M Kapur, a known name in Kolkata who was Intach's state convener and happens to be Khanna's "mama", seemed disturbed with "all the theorizing" of Khanna's role in the crime. He declined to look back on Indrani and Khanna's relationship but added, "The last that there was any contact with Indrani or her family was when Vidhie visited Calcutta last year to celebrate the 75th birthday of her grandmother (Khanna's mother who lives with him)."     Khanna's Facebook posts on "karma" in the weeks and months following Sheena's alleged murder on April 24, 2012, make for interesting reading. On April 30, Khanna shared photo messages: "Say whatever, whenever the f*** you want to"; "Sometimes I get so weird, I even freak myself out".     On May 24, exactly a month after the alleged killing, he wrote: "You can never tell what people are thinking and feeling unless they tell you, and usually they lie. you ask them, 'Whats wrong?' and they say 'Nothing'. You accept this because it's easier than digging for the truth. People smile when they want to cry, they laugh when they want to scream and shout. They pretend like nothing is wrong because they don't want to face the truth. Things aren't always rainbows and butterflies, sometimes you gotta scream and cry your anger and sadness to the world, because you can only hold it in for so long before something in you snaps. so when you want to cry, cry. When you want to scream, scream. Don't hide behind fake smiles, it's ok to not be alright."     ||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Sheena-docu-Michail-add-to-mystery/articleshow/48701752.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:15 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Michail, Sheena's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered have raised a number of unanswered questions.    Two days after his mother, Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Michail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai Police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed that what he gave to police was enough to prove that Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora (who are actually parents of Indrani) as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. Some questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukherjea.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Michail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43 as mentioned in reports after her arrest.    Adding more to the suspense, Michail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Michail studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board examination, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that knew that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard that her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard that she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband who she introduced as Peter Mukherjea."    The two-member Mumbai Police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Michail, who on Wednesday, was the first one to reveal that Sheena was Indrani's daughter, twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Michail's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Michail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukherjae is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Michail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."  ||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Grandparents-are-Sheenas-mom-dad-on-birth-certificate/articleshow/48704559.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:15 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Mikhail, Sheena Bora's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered led to some unanswered questions on Thursday.    Two days after his mother Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Mikhail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed what he gave the police was enough to prove Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora, who are actually Indrani's parents, as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. However, many questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter. In many cases in India involving single mothers, grandparents are known to put in their names as father and mother.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukerjea, that is, 13 years after Sheena was born.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Mikhail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43.    Mikhail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Mikhail     studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board exam, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband, who she introduced as Peter Mukerjea."    The two-member Mumbai police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Mikhail twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Mikhail 's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time, he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Mikhail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukerjea is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Mikhail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Sheena-bowled-us-over-Rahuls-uncle/articleshow/48704552.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:15 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: Had things worked out as desired for Peter Mukherjea's first wife Shabnam and her family in Dehradun, Rahul Mukherjea and Sheena Bora would have been married for over three years now.     Shabnam's brother Shaleen Singh told TOI on Thursday that in 2011 Rahul brought Sheena to their sprawling home in Dehradun to seek approval from the family for their marriage.     The entire family-Shabnam, her younger brother Shaleen, father Anand Singh and mother Seema-were reportedly bowled over by Sheena's jovial nature and affection towards the elderly people. Impressed, the family gave its "unqualified and unanimous approval" for the wedding, which was supposed to take place within a few months, said Shaleen.     Stunned by the recent development, Shaleen said, "Sheena was among those rare persons who left a deep and lifelong impact on people. She was good-looking, a sweet person, clean of heart and good to talk to. None of us objected to the wedding."     Shaleen learnt of Sheena's murder through news channels. "It would have been great if she had become a part of the family. I don't know what was the cause and motive behind the heinous crime, but all those behind the killing of the jovial-natured girl should not be spared at any cost," he said.     A former model and tele-actor, 49-year-old Shaleen today owns the Sanskar International school in Jogiwala here. He recalled the last meeting with Shabnam and Rahul in April this year. "My father Anand Singh passed away in April. They had come to pay their respects but we did not interact much."     However, Shaleen said of late the interaction between him and his sister Shabnam was limited. Although Shabnam's farm Gul-e-Shabnam and Shaleen's residence Shankar Sadan are barely 200 metres away in Badripur, meetings between them were rare. While Shaleen and his mother stay on different floors of Shankar Sadan, Shabnam stays alone at her residence and is frequently visited by Rahul.     "There are matters in each family which we do not want to disclose. We are not against each other but do not interact much. She comes to meet our mother occasionally," said Shaleen, adding that Shabnam was passionate about painting and had a studio in her residence.     Shaleen denied having any details about the presence of Mumbai police in Dehradun. "Neither Doon police nor Mumbai police have contacted me over the issue."     Staff at Shabnam's residence said she was out-of-station but they were not aware of her whereabouts.||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Kilpauk-doctor-murder-Hubby-to-approach-court/articleshow/48704411.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:15 IST 2015||CHENNAI: It's been four days since police claimed to have solved the murder of S Sathya, 24, a PG medical student. However, her husband has put forth questions that police have failed to answer. Though investigating officers confirmed Sathya was not sexually assaulted before she was killed, they leaked to some section of media saying that they changed their stance on Wednesday and said there were indications of attempt to rape on the deceased.     Police personnel revealed the details soon after Sathya's husband Dr P Sesu, also employed at a primary health centre in Perambalur, expressed certain doubts.     He alleged the police hastily solved the case citing the state assembly, which is in motion. Sathya was found dead at her house in Kilpauk on August 20.     On August 23, police arrested Harintham Depnath, a BTech graduate, who lived at the second floor on the same apartment. Neither was there any mention about sexual assault or attempt on Sathya when the body was recovered from the house. The nor did the doctors. Police didn't tell this during the arrest of Depnath on August 23. "What forced the police to reveal about the sexual harassment attempt on my wife now?" asked Sesu.     "I want to live a peaceful life with my two sons - Tamil Nesan, 6, and Karmugilan, 4. The studies and the future of my children is important for me. I do respect the police personnel who spent sleepless nights to solve the murder, but there are questions that need to be answered," he said.     "I live in Perambalur with my children, but we speak through live video calls. I have told my sons that Sathya has gone to the God, as the Almighty likes her more. "Hereafter, we cannot speak or meet her. I don't know how far my children will admit it?" said Sesu. "I will approach the court seeking a fair probe into the murder of my wife. I want to find out the real cause behind her death. I want the real accused to get punished for his deed," said Sesu.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Woman-strangles-husbands-lover/articleshow/48704388.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:15 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A woman beat up and strangled her husband's partner, an assistant professor at a polytechnic in Choolaimedu, in their Thiruverkadu home on Thursday, police said. A court later remanded the accused, 32-year-old Shruti, in judicial custody.     Police said Sambasivam, a professor at Panimalar Engineering College in Poonamallee, used to bring Rajalakshmi, home frequently and introduced her to his wife Shruti as a colleague. He even dropped her home at night. The polytechnic where Rajalakshmi worked was part of the Panimalar group of educational institutions. Shruti initially believed the two were just colleagues until Sambasivam came home with Rajalakshmi on Tuesday and said the woman was moving in with them permanently.     On Wednesday morning, Sambasivam allegedly tied a 'mangalsutra' to Rajalakshmi in front of his wife, police said, based on Shruti's confession. A shocked Shruti picked up a fight with Sambasivam who asked her to maintain a cordial relationship and take care of Rajalakshmi. On Thursday morning, after he left for college a fight broke out between the two women.     Police said Rajalakshmi allegedly abused Sruthi and went into the bathroom. Sruthi followed her in and strangled her with the 'mangalsutra'. She then tried to make it appear that the woman had fainted in the bathroom. She took her in an autorickshaw to a nearby hospital where she was declared 'brought dead'. Doctors who noticed a few marks around her neck informed the Thiruverkadu police who registered a case of suspicious death under CrPC section 176.     The body was sent for postmortem to Kilpauk Medical College and Hospital.     After finding that the two women were at home at the time of the death, police interrogated Sruthi for more than an hour but she continued to maintain that Rajyalakshmi had died of injuries sustained when she fell down in the bathroom.     "She confessed to the murder when we told her that her fingerprints had been lifted from the scene of crime," said an investigating officer. "She said she had smashed the woman's head against the wall and later strangled her with the 'thali'." Police altered the case to murder and arrested Sruthi.     Initial inquiries revealed that Rajalakshmi had been married to a man named Rajasekhar for a while and they had separated. She then got married to Suresh, a relative who worked in a private firm, a few years ago and the couple moved into a house in Mogappair.     They allegedly had frequent quarrels as he tortured her and she left him too, police found.     Rajalakshmi then got a job with Panimalar Engineering College where she met Sambasivam. The two became friends and began seeing each other. Rajalakshmi recently moved to the polytechnic in Choolaimedu, police said.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/US-journalists-killer-annoyed-colleagues-Ex-boss/articleshow/48704167.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:15 IST 2015||ROANOKE, United States: The disgruntled former US television station employee who murdered two journalists had "annoyed" colleagues but showed no signs at work of any mental health issues, his former boss said Thursday.     Vester Lee Flanagan, 41, worked as a reporter for WDBJ in Roanoke, Virginia from March 2012 to February 2013, but was dismissed for poor performance and angry behavior, general manager Jeffrey Marks said.     On Wednesday, Flanagan shot and killed two of the CBS affiliate's journalists while they were conducting an on-air interview. He later fatally shot himself.     "We are still at a loss to figure out what happened to him in those two and a half years" since he was fired, Marks told a news conference flanked by dozens of staff, many of them holding hands.     "I don't think we identified that he had mental health issues. We certainly identified that he had performance issues."     Marks defended the station's hiring record and said its parent company had "a very elaborate program to screen employees."     Flanagan passed background checks and came with only positive references, Marks said.     It was only after he was hired, Marks said, that things went downhill.     "Vester's behavior annoyed a lot of people in the news station," Marks said.     Flanagan, who went by the on-screen name Bryce Williams, alleged in a manifesto faxed to ABC News that he was discriminated against as a gay, black journalist.     Marks said accusations in 2013 that he was treated unfairly were "immediately investigated and found to be without merit."     During his employment, Flanagan complied with demands that he seek medical help, but he was ultimately dismissed.     He was escorted from the building by police and made an ominous aside to the news director -- handing him a wooden cross and saying "'you'll need this'," Marks said.     As he left, he also made a "derogatory comment" to Adam Ward, the cameraman he shot dead on Wednesday.     Flanagan filed a complaint with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and a civil action suit, which were dismissed, he said.     "All of these investigations determined that no reasonable person would have taken any of the cited incidents as discrimination or harassment."     After killing Ward and reporter Alison Parker live on the air, Flanagan posted a video of the attack on social media.||ROANOKE, UNITED STATES
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:15 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/SC-acquits-Romesh-Sharma-in-Budhiraja-murder-case/articleshow/48704930.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:15 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Thursday upheld the Delhi High Court order acquitting former Congress leader Romesh Sharma in the case relating to the killing of fashion designer Kunjum Budhiraja.     A bench of Justices Pinaki Chandra Ghose and R K Agrawal dismissed an appeal filed by the Delhi government challenging HC order.     The Delhi government contended that the HC had erred in acquitting Sharma but it was strongly opposed by his counsel and senior advocate Siddharth Luthra who submitted that his client was in love with Kunjum and there was no evidence to prove his involvement in the case.     Sharma, who was alleged to be a frontman of underworld don Dawood Ibrahim, was convicted by a trial court on February 15, 2008. Kunjum was killed on March 20, 1999 at Sharma's South Delhi-based 'Jai Mata Di' farm house by a group of hired gangsters from Uttar Pradesh.     The trial court had convicted Sharma and five other accused in the case and had awarded life term to all. The HC, however, acquitted Sharma and co-accused Tejendir Verdi but upheld conviction and sentence of other four accused— Sharma's nephew Surinder Mishra, Hemchand, Santram and Ramesh alias Bobby.     While acquitting Sharma, the HC had said "Romesh Sharma and Kunjum were in love, and desired the company of each other. It does not establish that Sharma had got fed up with her". It had turned down Delhi police's contention that Sharma wanted to get rid of Kunjum as she knew about his alleged illegal activities.     "A grieving lover falling over the body of his mate and performing the rituals of a marriage can well be an expression of lasting love, and need not necessarily be a drama," the HC had said.     Sharma was in judicial custody at the time of the Kunjum's murder.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Raid-on-Bengaluru-centre-reveals-horror-tales/articleshow/48704718.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:15 IST 2015||BENGALURU: A State Human Rights Commission raid on a de-addiction centre in Jnanabharati Layout, near Kengeri, southwest Bengaluru, found 90 inmates living in pathetic conditions and subjected to inhuman treatment.     Thursday's raid followed the murder of an inmate of another de-addiction centre in Kothanur recently.     The SHRC raid on Sri Santhosh Social Service Society, also known as 4S Society, followed a tipoff. According to SHRC officials, the centre has been in existence for seven years at least, but the society couldn't produce documents of having obtained permission from the social welfare department. Commission officials said the centre had the permission from the DC and the DHO.     "Most inmates are between 20 and 35 years. They showed us signs of being physically abused. The centre has violated other norms too. Although it's supposed to have one nurse for every 15 patients and at least one in-house doctor and a psychiatrist, it didn't have any," said an SHRC spokesperson.     4 arrested for killing inmate:     Kothanur police arrested a de-addiction centre staffer and three inmates for allegedly beating to death a 28-year-old inmate. Dinesh was admitted to the centre by his family as he was an alcoholic. He was later found dead in a hospital. Family members noticed several bruises on his body. Narayana, an inmate-turned-staffer, gave some medicines to Dinesh, who later turned aggressive. Narayana sought the help of inmates Suresh, Subhan and Simon, to subdue Dinesh.     When Dinesh retaliated, the quartet overpowered him till he became unconscious. He died in hospital.||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/A-jolly-good-fellow-say-Khannas-friends/articleshow/48704630.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:15 IST 2015||Sanjeev Khanna, Indrani Mukerjea's second husband and suspected ally in Sheena Bora's killing, may be the most surprising element in this macabre drama, but his friends and associates in Kolkata refused to cast aspersions on "Sanju" just yet.     From being the biggest dart enthusiast at one of Kolkata's poshest clubs (the CC&FC) to having a finger in every pie, Sanjeev was everyone's "best mate" and go-to guy who friends described as: "A doer... someone who could get things done."     The morning after Khanna's arrest, TOI spoke to Ajay Rawla, the man who Khanna worked for as a consultant and whose house he was picked up from on Wednesday afternoon. "It wasn't like he was hiding like a desperate fugitive in my house. We had a meeting in the morning after which he drove me home and that's when news broke on television. We were sitting, watching, wondering what steps to take when the police arrived," explained Rawla.     Seven years his senior, Khanna's association with Rawla dates back to the time they went to Mayo College in Ajmer. Later, Khanna went on to become an aide for Rawla's pet projects. Besides running his own business in wireless communications, Khanna was there setting up chef Shaun Kenworthy and Rawla's restaurant 1658 or immersed in the heritage project of converting the Bawali Rajbari into a hotel. "He was getting all the construction work and labourers in place. He was very good in helping out with permissions through his connections with excise and contractors," remembers Kenworthy.     Khanna, who seldom missed his outings at the club, motor rallies and horse racing as a prominent face in the social circuit, was not the same man before he met Indrani, recounts Bull Banthia, a close friend. "Well-read and well-versed, Sanju had a great mechanical mind with a solution for everything," is how Bull chose to describe his "jolly good friend who loved meeting new people, hung out at the club but wasn't a social climber". "It was Indrani who emerged as this socialite and drove him to consciously build contacts with those higher up in the social rung after marriage," said the Kolkata-based entrepreneur. "That's the reason why I distanced myself from them until overnight she left Kolkata with their daughter and Sanju's wallet."     While Indrani never surfaces in conversations, his daughter Vidhie, who stayed with Indrani, is a fond subject with his friends. "He would miss his daughter but was resigned to fate, hoping that someday she would find him," said Rawla, adding, "It was Vidhie who called Sanjeev on Wednesday to give him the news."     No one seems to know about any recent interaction between Khanna and Indrani. G M Kapur, a known name in Kolkata who was Intach's state convener and happens to be Khanna's "mama", seemed disturbed with "all the theorizing" of Khanna's role in the crime. He declined to look back on Indrani and Khanna's relationship but added, "The last that there was any contact with Indrani or her family was when Vidhie visited Calcutta last year to celebrate the 75th birthday of her grandmother (Khanna's mother who lives with him)."     Khanna's Facebook posts on "karma" in the weeks and months following Sheena's alleged murder on April 24, 2012, make for interesting reading. On April 30, Khanna shared photo messages: "Say whatever, whenever the f*** you want to"; "Sometimes I get so weird, I even freak myself out".     On May 24, exactly a month after the alleged killing, he wrote: "You can never tell what people are thinking and feeling unless they tell you, and usually they lie. you ask them, 'Whats wrong?' and they say 'Nothing'. You accept this because it's easier than digging for the truth. People smile when they want to cry, they laugh when they want to scream and shout. They pretend like nothing is wrong because they don't want to face the truth. Things aren't always rainbows and butterflies, sometimes you gotta scream and cry your anger and sadness to the world, because you can only hold it in for so long before something in you snaps. so when you want to cry, cry. When you want to scream, scream. Don't hide behind fake smiles, it's ok to not be alright."     ||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Sheena-docu-Michail-add-to-mystery/articleshow/48701752.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:15 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Michail, Sheena's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered have raised a number of unanswered questions.    Two days after his mother, Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Michail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai Police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed that what he gave to police was enough to prove that Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora (who are actually parents of Indrani) as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. Some questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukherjea.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Michail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43 as mentioned in reports after her arrest.    Adding more to the suspense, Michail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Michail studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board examination, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that knew that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard that her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard that she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband who she introduced as Peter Mukherjea."    The two-member Mumbai Police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Michail, who on Wednesday, was the first one to reveal that Sheena was Indrani's daughter, twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Michail's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Michail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukherjae is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Michail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."  ||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Grandparents-are-Sheenas-mom-dad-on-birth-certificate/articleshow/48704559.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:15 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Mikhail, Sheena Bora's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered led to some unanswered questions on Thursday.    Two days after his mother Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Mikhail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed what he gave the police was enough to prove Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora, who are actually Indrani's parents, as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. However, many questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter. In many cases in India involving single mothers, grandparents are known to put in their names as father and mother.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukerjea, that is, 13 years after Sheena was born.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Mikhail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43.    Mikhail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Mikhail     studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board exam, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband, who she introduced as Peter Mukerjea."    The two-member Mumbai police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Mikhail twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Mikhail 's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time, he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Mikhail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukerjea is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Mikhail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Sheena-bowled-us-over-Rahuls-uncle/articleshow/48704552.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:15 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: Had things worked out as desired for Peter Mukherjea's first wife Shabnam and her family in Dehradun, Rahul Mukherjea and Sheena Bora would have been married for over three years now.     Shabnam's brother Shaleen Singh told TOI on Thursday that in 2011 Rahul brought Sheena to their sprawling home in Dehradun to seek approval from the family for their marriage.     The entire family-Shabnam, her younger brother Shaleen, father Anand Singh and mother Seema-were reportedly bowled over by Sheena's jovial nature and affection towards the elderly people. Impressed, the family gave its "unqualified and unanimous approval" for the wedding, which was supposed to take place within a few months, said Shaleen.     Stunned by the recent development, Shaleen said, "Sheena was among those rare persons who left a deep and lifelong impact on people. She was good-looking, a sweet person, clean of heart and good to talk to. None of us objected to the wedding."     Shaleen learnt of Sheena's murder through news channels. "It would have been great if she had become a part of the family. I don't know what was the cause and motive behind the heinous crime, but all those behind the killing of the jovial-natured girl should not be spared at any cost," he said.     A former model and tele-actor, 49-year-old Shaleen today owns the Sanskar International school in Jogiwala here. He recalled the last meeting with Shabnam and Rahul in April this year. "My father Anand Singh passed away in April. They had come to pay their respects but we did not interact much."     However, Shaleen said of late the interaction between him and his sister Shabnam was limited. Although Shabnam's farm Gul-e-Shabnam and Shaleen's residence Shankar Sadan are barely 200 metres away in Badripur, meetings between them were rare. While Shaleen and his mother stay on different floors of Shankar Sadan, Shabnam stays alone at her residence and is frequently visited by Rahul.     "There are matters in each family which we do not want to disclose. We are not against each other but do not interact much. She comes to meet our mother occasionally," said Shaleen, adding that Shabnam was passionate about painting and had a studio in her residence.     Shaleen denied having any details about the presence of Mumbai police in Dehradun. "Neither Doon police nor Mumbai police have contacted me over the issue."     Staff at Shabnam's residence said she was out-of-station but they were not aware of her whereabouts.||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Kilpauk-doctor-murder-Hubby-to-approach-court/articleshow/48704411.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:15 IST 2015||CHENNAI: It's been four days since police claimed to have solved the murder of S Sathya, 24, a PG medical student. However, her husband has put forth questions that police have failed to answer. Though investigating officers confirmed Sathya was not sexually assaulted before she was killed, they leaked to some section of media saying that they changed their stance on Wednesday and said there were indications of attempt to rape on the deceased.     Police personnel revealed the details soon after Sathya's husband Dr P Sesu, also employed at a primary health centre in Perambalur, expressed certain doubts.     He alleged the police hastily solved the case citing the state assembly, which is in motion. Sathya was found dead at her house in Kilpauk on August 20.     On August 23, police arrested Harintham Depnath, a BTech graduate, who lived at the second floor on the same apartment. Neither was there any mention about sexual assault or attempt on Sathya when the body was recovered from the house. The nor did the doctors. Police didn't tell this during the arrest of Depnath on August 23. "What forced the police to reveal about the sexual harassment attempt on my wife now?" asked Sesu.     "I want to live a peaceful life with my two sons - Tamil Nesan, 6, and Karmugilan, 4. The studies and the future of my children is important for me. I do respect the police personnel who spent sleepless nights to solve the murder, but there are questions that need to be answered," he said.     "I live in Perambalur with my children, but we speak through live video calls. I have told my sons that Sathya has gone to the God, as the Almighty likes her more. "Hereafter, we cannot speak or meet her. I don't know how far my children will admit it?" said Sesu. "I will approach the court seeking a fair probe into the murder of my wife. I want to find out the real cause behind her death. I want the real accused to get punished for his deed," said Sesu.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Woman-strangles-husbands-lover/articleshow/48704388.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:15 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A woman beat up and strangled her husband's partner, an assistant professor at a polytechnic in Choolaimedu, in their Thiruverkadu home on Thursday, police said. A court later remanded the accused, 32-year-old Shruti, in judicial custody.     Police said Sambasivam, a professor at Panimalar Engineering College in Poonamallee, used to bring Rajalakshmi, home frequently and introduced her to his wife Shruti as a colleague. He even dropped her home at night. The polytechnic where Rajalakshmi worked was part of the Panimalar group of educational institutions. Shruti initially believed the two were just colleagues until Sambasivam came home with Rajalakshmi on Tuesday and said the woman was moving in with them permanently.     On Wednesday morning, Sambasivam allegedly tied a 'mangalsutra' to Rajalakshmi in front of his wife, police said, based on Shruti's confession. A shocked Shruti picked up a fight with Sambasivam who asked her to maintain a cordial relationship and take care of Rajalakshmi. On Thursday morning, after he left for college a fight broke out between the two women.     Police said Rajalakshmi allegedly abused Sruthi and went into the bathroom. Sruthi followed her in and strangled her with the 'mangalsutra'. She then tried to make it appear that the woman had fainted in the bathroom. She took her in an autorickshaw to a nearby hospital where she was declared 'brought dead'. Doctors who noticed a few marks around her neck informed the Thiruverkadu police who registered a case of suspicious death under CrPC section 176.     The body was sent for postmortem to Kilpauk Medical College and Hospital.     After finding that the two women were at home at the time of the death, police interrogated Sruthi for more than an hour but she continued to maintain that Rajyalakshmi had died of injuries sustained when she fell down in the bathroom.     "She confessed to the murder when we told her that her fingerprints had been lifted from the scene of crime," said an investigating officer. "She said she had smashed the woman's head against the wall and later strangled her with the 'thali'." Police altered the case to murder and arrested Sruthi.     Initial inquiries revealed that Rajalakshmi had been married to a man named Rajasekhar for a while and they had separated. She then got married to Suresh, a relative who worked in a private firm, a few years ago and the couple moved into a house in Mogappair.     They allegedly had frequent quarrels as he tortured her and she left him too, police found.     Rajalakshmi then got a job with Panimalar Engineering College where she met Sambasivam. The two became friends and began seeing each other. Rajalakshmi recently moved to the polytechnic in Choolaimedu, police said.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/US-journalists-killer-annoyed-colleagues-Ex-boss/articleshow/48704167.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:15 IST 2015||ROANOKE, United States: The disgruntled former US television station employee who murdered two journalists had "annoyed" colleagues but showed no signs at work of any mental health issues, his former boss said Thursday.     Vester Lee Flanagan, 41, worked as a reporter for WDBJ in Roanoke, Virginia from March 2012 to February 2013, but was dismissed for poor performance and angry behavior, general manager Jeffrey Marks said.     On Wednesday, Flanagan shot and killed two of the CBS affiliate's journalists while they were conducting an on-air interview. He later fatally shot himself.     "We are still at a loss to figure out what happened to him in those two and a half years" since he was fired, Marks told a news conference flanked by dozens of staff, many of them holding hands.     "I don't think we identified that he had mental health issues. We certainly identified that he had performance issues."     Marks defended the station's hiring record and said its parent company had "a very elaborate program to screen employees."     Flanagan passed background checks and came with only positive references, Marks said.     It was only after he was hired, Marks said, that things went downhill.     "Vester's behavior annoyed a lot of people in the news station," Marks said.     Flanagan, who went by the on-screen name Bryce Williams, alleged in a manifesto faxed to ABC News that he was discriminated against as a gay, black journalist.     Marks said accusations in 2013 that he was treated unfairly were "immediately investigated and found to be without merit."     During his employment, Flanagan complied with demands that he seek medical help, but he was ultimately dismissed.     He was escorted from the building by police and made an ominous aside to the news director -- handing him a wooden cross and saying "'you'll need this'," Marks said.     As he left, he also made a "derogatory comment" to Adam Ward, the cameraman he shot dead on Wednesday.     Flanagan filed a complaint with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and a civil action suit, which were dismissed, he said.     "All of these investigations determined that no reasonable person would have taken any of the cited incidents as discrimination or harassment."     After killing Ward and reporter Alison Parker live on the air, Flanagan posted a video of the attack on social media.||ROANOKE, UNITED STATES
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chandigarh/Sector-26-site-turns-deathbed/articleshow/48520853.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:19 IST 2015||CHANDIGARH: Livelihood and prospects of a better life kept pulling them to the city but this trip was their last. The five people ---- four from Rajasthan and one from Uttar Pradesh --- who were mowed down by a truck driver in a fit of rage at transport area in Sector 26 on Sunday midnight were regular visitors to the city for the last few years, staying for two to three months to sell dry methi (fenugreek) to local wholesale dealers in nearby Sector 26 grain and vegetable market.    A 19-year-old youth who had arrived on Sunday to join the group was among the victims. It was around 12.30 pm when a piercing wail thundered across the transport area after the truck hurtled towards eight persons sleeping on a concrete surface that doubled as a parking lot.    "It was murder not an accident. These people were not sleeping on road or footpath but at a good distance from the parking lot. They all were very good people and used to do their work honestly," said Darshan Singh, 38, a transporter. "They mostly kept to themselves. I never saw or heard them picking a fight or creating a scene," he added.    Suresh Prasad, 45, who belongs to Uttar Pradesh and was sleeping near them, said, "We were cooking our dinner under the tree when the truck driver started urinating. When we stopped him, he started abusing us. We all pushed him away and told him to leave the place peacefully." A few hours later, the enraged and allegedly drunk driver drove over them, killing five and injuring three.    According to local traders, most methi sellers came from Rajasthan, its largest producer in the country. Traders said since these people stayed here for a short time they would sleep in the open on a concrete surface near the parking lot in summer.    Sudarshan, a daily wager who belongs to Uttar Pradesh, has slept at the same spot many a times and quite frequently. But as the luck would have it, on Monday he was not in the transport area.    "I was lucky. I can't imagine that someone can kill someone over such a petty issue. I am not sure I'll ever sleep at this place ever again," said Sudarshan.    �He urinated near our cooking place'    Times News network    Chandigarh: Jitender Yadav, 25, did not expect that such a small altercation would turn into a big tragedy. He was among those who rebuked Sarma Chaudhary from urinating in the open around two-and-half-hours before the truck driver drove into eight men, killing five of them.    "We used to cook our food in the open and Chaudhary was deliberately urinating near our cooking place. We had requested him not to do so but all vain. I had left the place and slept at some distance. I along with others woke up after hearing the cries of victims," Jitender said.    Jitender, who recorded his statement to the police, belonged to Khushinagar district in Uttar Pradesh and was close to one of the victims, Harinder Yadav.    Meanwhile, Jagdish Yadav, brother of Harinder, arrived from Parwanoo, where he was working with a private firm. Jagdish said, "Harinder is survived by his wife and two children residing in his native village in UP."    Later, some family members of the four victims from Rajasthan also arrived and identified the bodies of their relatives. Police said bodies will be handed over to kin after postmortem examination on Tuesday.  ||CHANDIGARH
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Rebuked-for-peeing-man-drives-truck-over-8-kills-5/articleshow/48520703.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:19 IST 2015||CHANDIGARH: A drunk driver drove his truck over eight people sleeping on a pavement in Chandigarh a little past Sunday midnight and killed five of them because some of the victims had rebuked him for urinating in public. Four of the deceased belonged to one family from Rajasthan.Sharma Chaudhary, 23, went on the killing spree at around 12.30am and then ran away after leaving the truck near the accident spot. The truck's cleaner, Ajay, was caught and handed over to the police.Police have charged Sharma, a resident of Bihar, with culpable homicide not amounting to murder. They are hoping to catch and question him before charging him with more serious offences.The deceased from Rajasthan were identified as Jassu Ram (55), Natha Ram (18), Jagdish (23) and Sardara Singh 31. The other victim, Harinder Yadav (25), was from Uttar Pradesh. Natha was Jassu's son and Jagdish was his son-in-law. Sardara was Jassu's cousin.Witness told TOI that the four victims from Rajasthan had not even rebuked Sharma and were in no way involved in the altercation. Apparently, the three injured men, who are recovering at a government hospital, had argued with the driver.Jitender Yadav, a co-worker of Harinder, said: "Sharma was urinating in the open near the place where we cook food. Some of us objected and pushed him away. He left the place threatening he would teach us a lesson. His truck was parked nearby. We did not expect him to cause such a big tragedy over such a small issue."Police officials said the four Rajasthan victims came to Chandigarh regularly to sell fenugreek (methi) during the season. Harinder was a labourer who helped unload trucks. The pavement where the five men were killed is adjacent to the back gates of three liquor vends.Sources said after being humiliated by the workers, Sharma drank a bottle of whisky along with Ajay sitting on the top of his truck. "Sharma took a round of the parking lot at full speed and then drove the truck onto the pavement crushing all eight men sleeping there," said Sanjay, another witness and the complainant in the case. "He tried to escape with the vehicle but the truck stalled after hitting an iron dustbin. Ajay was nabbed on the spot."The truck, bearing a Haryana registration number, belongs to one Sunil Sharma who works as a manager with Zamindara Transports. Sunil told TOI that Sharma was employed with him for the past eight months and had recently become a regular drinker.ASP Guriqbal Singh Sidhu said raids were being conducted to arrest the absconding driver. "Though we have recorded the version of several persons claiming the driver had been rebuked, we want to confront the accused with this version before taking further legal action," Sidhu said.Police officers believe it is a miracle that only five people were killed during Sharma Chaudhary's killing spree. The toll could easily have been higher given that he drove the vehicle in an extremely narrow lane between two shanties, in which around 10 people were sleeping.||CHANDIGARH
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/delhi/SC-upholds-Vikas-Yadavs-conviction-in-Nitish-Katara-murder/articleshow/48520240.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:19 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Monday upheld the conviction of Vikas and Vishal Yadav, who had murdered Nitish Katara in 2002 for having a relationship with their sister Bharti, but agreed to weigh whether the 30-year jail term imposed by the Delhi high court was just punishment for the cousins. A bench of Justices J S Khehar and Adarsh Goel had no doubt about the guilt of the two, who were concurrently held guilty by the trial court and the HC . While they were sentenced to 30 years in prison, their accomplice Sukhdev Pehalwan was awarded 25 years.The bench agreed to examine whether the sentences were disproportionate to the crime as the convicts pleaded for leniency. It sought Delhi Police's response in six weeks on petitions filed by Vikas and Sukhdev. Vishal has not challenged the HC judgment.Senior advocate U R Lalit and advocate Santosh Singh laboured strenuously to punch holes in the prosecution case built mainly on 'last seen' theory, there being no eye-witness to the crime. But the bench had minutely gone through voluminous records of proceedings before the trial court as well as the HC. It asked the counsel to show a single mistake on the part of the courts in convicting the cousins, warranting the apex court's interference in the judgments."You were at the venue of a wedding with your sister. You attempted to physically dissuade Katara from dancing with your sister and then took him away. After leaving the venue with you, Katara was not seen anywhere. His body was found the next day. If you have not killed, then tell us what you did with him," the bench said.Vikas's counsel attempted to build an alibi and said his client had gone to meet an advocate in the dead of the night and claimed that Katara had not accompanied him. It evoked a sharp response from the bench.Justices Khehar and Goel asked, "Why would a millionaire go to meet an advocate at midnight? You (Vikas) are too young. Our heart goes out to you. If you bring something in your favour, then we will consider it. Otherwise, we cannot do anything. Just show us one contradiction and we will consider your plea."The lone witness in the case, Ajay Katara, whose deposition gave weight to the 'last seen' theory and helped nail the accused, was the target of the convicts' counsel. They alleged that the witness was tutored by the prosecution and should not have been trusted by the courts to sustain the conviction.They said Ajay had severe defect in his eyes and his testimony that he had seen the accused along with Nitish in the dead of the night could not have been relied upon for conviction in a murder case."If he can drive a scooter in the middle of the night, if he can see the road in the dead of the night, then he can also see people sitting in a car," the bench said and suggested to the counsel to find something else that could dent the prosecution case. "There is no contradiction in the witness's statements," it said."You want us to close our eyes to the facts of the case and want us to see the other side but you have not given us one strong point in your favour. Just show us one strong point, not even two," the bench repeatedly told the counsel for the convicts.Ajay was the sole witness who stood by his statement in court. Many witnesses, including Nitish Katara's friends and Bharti Yadav, resiled from their statements during trial. Nitish's mother Neelam Katara had to struggle in getting the police to investigate the case properly given that Vikas is the son of influential politician D P Yadav.||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/hyderabad/HC-summons-WG-collector-Mahbubnagar-SP-in-illegal-sand-mining-case/articleshow/48520154.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:19 IST 2015||HYDERABAD: Expressing serious concern over the official apathy towards illegal sand mining in Andhra Pradesh and Telangana, the Hyderabad High Court on Monday summoned the district collector of West Godavari and superintendent of police of Mahbubnagar to explain the reasons for their failure to curb the menace.     The bench comprising acting Chief Justice Dilip B Bhosale and Justice S V Bhatt were dealing with two public interest litigation petitions. While one was filed by D Praveen Kumar of 'Watch Voice of the People', an NGO from Mahbubnagar district, the other by Sunkara Ganga Raju of Prakkilanka village in West Godavari district, complaining about the alarming rise in illegal sand mining and its grave threat to the environment.     According to P Shashi Kiran, the counsel for the petitioner from Mahbubnagar, the mafia has been resorting to indiscriminate sand mining at all river beds, tanks and even in the fields of farmers. A farmer, Lakshman, from Maktal mandal was crushed to death by a tractor driver when he resisted sand extraction in his fields, the counsel said. Not stopping at that the audacious sand mafia burnt the scooter of the mandal revenue officer when he was proceeding to investigate the murder, he said.     When the bench sought to know from the state the truth behind the allegations, special government counsel A Sanjeev Kumar confirmed that these two incidents had indeed happened in 2013 and that the police had registered cases and vigilance teams were deployed to nab the culprits.     Noting that nobody was arrested in both the incidents so far, the bench directed the Mahbubnagar SP to be present in the court on Monday to explain his case.     In the West Gadavari case, a licence was issued to Prakkilanka sand mining mutually aided cooperative society but the entire river bed was indiscriminately exploited with heavy machinery and the sand was being transportation on a large scale. The petitioner attached the photos of the illegal mining and transportation and the affidavit filed by the district collector was silent on this aspect.     Though rules prohibit usage of heavy machinery, they are being openly flouted in the area, said K Naumene Suraparaj, the counsel for the petitioner. The bench ordered the stoppage of sand mining immediately in the area and directed the authorities not to give any way bills or transport permits until further orders and directed the district collector to be present in the court on September 7.     The counsel also pointed out that the licence was granted to the society on November 26, 2014, whereas the 'Prakkilanka Sand Mining Mutually Aided Cooperative Society' was registered only in December 2014. The bench questioned as to how the licence was awarded to a society that was not in existence on the day when it was issued.     ||HYDERABAD
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/lucknow/Protesting-Congress-workers-cane-charged/articleshow/48520088.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:19 IST 2015||LUCKNOW: In a sharp reaction to Mulayam Singh Yadav's withdrawal of support to the Congress in parliament, Congress leaders and party workers took to the streets on Monday to protest the Samajwadi Party government in Uttar Pradesh. Raising slogans against the Samajwadi Party's protection of tainted Noida chief engineer Yadav Singh inside the assembly, Mulayam's cosying with PM Narendra Modi, and the prevailing law and order breakdown in the state, scores of Congress workers gathered at the Lakshman Mela grounds in Lucknow.    The crowds - Congress workers from all parts of the state - were led by UP Congress Committee chief Nirmal Khatri, AICC general secretary in charge of UP Madhusudan Mistry, Rajya Sabha MP Raj Babbar, CLP leader Pradeep Mathur, 25 Congress MLAs and several former MPs and Congress ministers. The protesters' attempt to lead the protest march to outside Vidhan Sabha was foiled by the police personnel, who used water cannons and cane charged the crowds in an attempt to disperse them. Among those who were cane charged included party chief Khatri, Raj Babbar, Mistry and former Union minister of state Pradeep Jain Aditya. About 40 Congress members, including NSUI and Youth Congress functionaries were referred to Lucknow's civil hospital for injuries ranging from fractured limbs and minor head injuries. Launching Congress' frontal attack on former allies, the Samajwadis, Khatri said: "Mulayam Singh Yadav invited prime minister Narendra Modi to his house in Saifai. Today, his true colours stand exposed, especially after he raised slogans of Jai Kisan Jai Musalman during election rallies."    Some district administration officials as well as police personnel also sustained injuries during Monday's clashes. An FIR was registered against 15 Congress leaders and unidentified 5000 party workers, Khatri, Babbar, Rita Joshi, Ajay Rai and Manoj Pathak among them. The protesters were charged with attempt to murder, rioting, deterring public servants from discharging duties, wrongful restraint, endangering life of others.    On Monday, Congress vice president Rahul Gandhi, scheduled to visit Amethi on a two-day trip starting Tuesday, spoke with Mistry and Khatri and criticised the SP government for attempting to silence the Congress' efforts to raise issues affecting the public. Mistry also said Congress will continue to agitate against the ruling SP in every district of UP and will not be scared into silence.  ||LUCKNOW
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/lucknow/CBI-takes-over-curious-case-of-missing-trader/articleshow/48520051.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:19 IST 2015||LUCKNOW: At every turn in the two-year race, he kept beating cops. With time he learned to camouflage quickly and luck favoured him too. Investigations spanned over four states but failed to yield results. Now CBI has also stepped in to solve the mystery of the missing businessman Amit Agarwal.    At Surangi Tola in Chowk, locals shun Amit Agarwal, the bullion trader accused of killing his wife and two young children. Two years back on August 18, Amit (then 31) packed his belongings and left the city along with wife Ankita (28), daughter Bani (7) and son Divyanshu (4) in a Toyota Innova. Before disappearing, Amit worked on a quick gameplan that was soaked in deceit and treachery.    Amit, a member of the close-knit Agarwal and Bania community of Old City, was among the rapidly growing 'dabba' operators. Dabba is an illegal form of market trading in which patrons execute market calls only through books (offline entries maintained on registers) and not through the proper stock exchange to save on commissions, brokerage fee, and more importantly, to evade taxes.    Though no trader lodged a formal police complaint, police unofficially say Rs 35-50 crore was riding on Amit. Four months after the family vanished, there was a bang. Three bodies were found in a hotel room in Puri, Odisha. It was said that on December 14 Amit had allegedly strangled his wife and children.    Circle officer, Chowk, Sarvesh Kumar Mishra says Amit fled as he had borrowed money from some traders and could not return it. But Ankita's kin reject the police theory. "Lucknow police never took the case seriously. They want us to believe all this happened over trivial loans," says Amit's brother-in-law Abhishek Agarwal.    Why a doting father would kill his kids when he is safely hiding 1,200 km away from the city, is a question nobody has an answer to.      The Blunder: On August 19, Amit's car was found abandoned in Daraganj locality of Allahabad. A purported suicide note written by Amit was also found in the car. Amit said the family was committing suicide as he was under lot of debt and was being harassed continuously. "Had cops swung into action right after discovering the misleading suicide note, my sister, niece and nephew would have been alive," says Abhishek. A team from Chowk police station visited Puri once to share their findings after the crime and then left the case to its fate.    The Trail: Odisha police was sure that Amit had lot of money at his disposal and support of some close relatives. The room tariff at Puri hotel was Rs 4,100 per day and Amit had booked it for a week. Through surveillance it was traced that Amit's paternal relatives were in touch with him and one of them was in Puri between December 9-15, 2013. Police started following closely Amit's kin who stayed in Mathura. Twice they came close to nabbing him. Soon after the murders, Amit moved to Vizag. He left the dingy hotel in Vizag on December 22, 2013, two hours before cops came calling. Sixteen days later he was traced again. He stayed at Shirdi, Maharashtra, on January 6-7, 2014, and then shifted to Nashik. He went off radar then. Cops reached his hotel two days later on January 20.    The Motive: What prompted Amit to murder his wife and children while he was safely on the run remains a mystery. Ankita's kin believe the three were killed as "human sacrifice". All three were found holding flowers. Rudraksh beads were tied on wrists and sesame seeds were scattered on the hotel room floor. It seemed Amit had first drugged them before killing them. Police probes showed Amit was briefly in touch with a girl pursuing graduation from a Mysore institute. But the real motive would be clear only when Amit is nabbed.  ||LUCKNOW
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/lucknow/gang-of-4-held-for-petrol-pump-owners-murder/articleshow/48520045.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:19 IST 2015||LUCKNOW: Cracking the MV Trivedi murder case that took place in Riverbank Colony on March 10 last year, the city police nabbed the gang which executed the killing after robbing the victim of Rs 13 lakh. Cops have also discovered that Trivedi's former driver tipped of the killers.    Owner of a fuel station on Kursi Road, Trivedi was gunned down outside his residence by bike-borne criminals. His bag containing cash was looted. The city police said that Jeetendra Pandey alias Tiger had planned the murder and roped in two shooters, identified as Azamgarh residents Rakesh Upadhyaya and Avinash Pandey, for executing it.    SSP Rajesh Pandey said the businessman's former driver Rajesh Yadav had tipped off Tiger. Notorious for executing sensational robberies and killings, Tiger had planned three incidents at Faizabad, Lakhimpur Khiri and Amethi on a similar pattern. While Yadav and Tiger were netted by Faizabad police on Saturday in a different case, the city police late on Sunday nabbed Avinash and Rakesh near City Station in Old City. The crime branch team which worked on the case recovered two debit cards belonging to Trivedi and his bag from the duo.    Earlier, city police conducted narco analysis on a distant relative of the deceased and questioned 16 criminals in connection with the case. Police said Tiger has pursued MA in English and speaks fluent English.||LUCKNOW
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/delhi/Katara-case-shows-how-rich-try-to-bend-justice-SC/articleshow/48519673.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:19 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Monday expressed deep concern over the rich and mighty trying to influence the justice delivery system by winning over crucial witnesses in criminal cases by using their money and muscle power.    A bench of Justices J S Khehar and Adarsh Kumar Goel said justice would be the ultimate casualty if witnesses turned hostile due to fear or favour of the rich and influential people involved in crimes.    Terming the Nitish Katara murder case as a strange one, the bench said influence of Vikas and Vishal Yadav could be easily gauged with many witnesses, including friends of the deceased, turning hostile during the trial.    Vikas is the son of powerful UP politician D P Yadav.    Dismissing the petition filed by Vikas and Sukhdev Pehalwan challenging the Delhi High Court order convicting them in the 2002 murder case, the bench asked how they could cry for justice after committing the heinous act.    "Criminals cry for justice but they don't understand what they did. They commit the crime first and then cry for justice," the bench said and dismissed their plea.    Vikas's sister Bharti, whose relationship with Katara was the trigger for the family to eliminate him, also denied her relationship in her testimony before the court.    "It is a strange case, not a normal case. That's why we are hearing it, otherwise we would have dismissed it without granting elaborate hearing. People turned hostile and resiled from their statements. Why did all people resile? It was because you made them resile. Do you realize how justice delivery system gets affected by it? Power and money are forcing people to resile. Just imagine the kind of threat perception you created that forced people to resile," the bench told Vikas's counsel.    "It is strange that the girl also denied the relationship. She said she did not know the guy. But their relationship was established by emails, SMSs, call details and cards exchanged between them," it said.    "No one was allowed to tell the truth. What will happen to justice? It is a big problem for the prosecution if all witnesses resile," the bench said.    The bench said it was difficult for the court to proceed in such cases and find out the truth if witnesses turned hostile. It praised Ajay Katara for not changing his stand under pressure which led to the conviction of all three accused—Vikas, his cousin Vishal and Sukhdev Pehalwan—in the case.  ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/delhi/Faithful-servant-has-to-pay-price-says-SC/articleshow/48519656.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:19 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Monday convicted Sukhdev Pehalwan, a trusted aide of the D P Yadav family, in the Nitish Katara murder case saying he had to suffer for being a faithful servant by following the orders of his master and becoming a partner in crime.    "You are a good and faithful servant and you will swim or sink with them (Vikas and Vishal Yadav)," a bench of Justices J S Khehar and Adarsh Kumar Goel said.    Pehalwan's counsel tried to dissociate him from the murder but the bench refused to give credence to the arguments and asked why he was untraceable for three years after the murder. SC asked how Pehalwan survived for three years without getting any salary.    "Why should Pehalwan be afraid of facing police? He had the protection of a powerful person. If you are innocent, then why were you not appearing for three years? You are not justifying your conduct," the bench said.    "Where were you for three years? You were declared proclaimed offender and your name was published in newspapers. You cannot say that you did not know about these things," the bench said after his counsel contended that Pehalwan was in his village and was not aware about the Nitish Katara murder case.    Pehalwan was seen along with Vikas and Vishal when they took away Nitish Katara in a car from a marriage function.    "It is good to be faithful to your master. You were a trusted man. You are so stuck with them that you will be released only if they are released. You stand convicted if they are convicted," the bench said.    Upholding Pehlwan's conviction, the court, however, said it would give "some indulgence" while deciding quantum of sentence for him. Pehalwan was awarded 25 years imprisonment by the Delhi HC.    In a lighter vein, the bench said a 'pehalwan' needs more money to eat and survive and questioned his counsel on how the servant managed to survive three years with getting paid.    ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/delhi/Warder-suspended-after-Tihar-murder/articleshow/48519402.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:19 IST 2015||  NEW DELHI: Days after a Tihar prisoner was murdered by four inmates, jail authorities have suspended the warder for being absent on duty. Joginder was suspended the day after the incident.    "The warder was suspended for negligence. He had left his seat five minutes before his hours got over. His replacement arrived at the usual time but the killers took advantage of those five minutes," a senior jail official said.    Joginder's duty was till 10pm but, after lockout of inmates at 9.55, he left. Under normal circumstances, the reliever comes to the seat and takes the keys from the warder. Deepak's murder was reported around 10pm when inmates started screaming for authorities to come to his rescue.    An inquiry has been initiated by jail authorities to pinpoint security loopholes inside the jail. The cell where the attack took place is the high-security ward. The report is expected to come in a week.  ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:19 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:19 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/SC-acquits-Romesh-Sharma-in-Budhiraja-murder-case/articleshow/48704930.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:19 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Thursday upheld the Delhi High Court order acquitting former Congress leader Romesh Sharma in the case relating to the killing of fashion designer Kunjum Budhiraja.     A bench of Justices Pinaki Chandra Ghose and R K Agrawal dismissed an appeal filed by the Delhi government challenging HC order.     The Delhi government contended that the HC had erred in acquitting Sharma but it was strongly opposed by his counsel and senior advocate Siddharth Luthra who submitted that his client was in love with Kunjum and there was no evidence to prove his involvement in the case.     Sharma, who was alleged to be a frontman of underworld don Dawood Ibrahim, was convicted by a trial court on February 15, 2008. Kunjum was killed on March 20, 1999 at Sharma's South Delhi-based 'Jai Mata Di' farm house by a group of hired gangsters from Uttar Pradesh.     The trial court had convicted Sharma and five other accused in the case and had awarded life term to all. The HC, however, acquitted Sharma and co-accused Tejendir Verdi but upheld conviction and sentence of other four accused— Sharma's nephew Surinder Mishra, Hemchand, Santram and Ramesh alias Bobby.     While acquitting Sharma, the HC had said "Romesh Sharma and Kunjum were in love, and desired the company of each other. It does not establish that Sharma had got fed up with her". It had turned down Delhi police's contention that Sharma wanted to get rid of Kunjum as she knew about his alleged illegal activities.     "A grieving lover falling over the body of his mate and performing the rituals of a marriage can well be an expression of lasting love, and need not necessarily be a drama," the HC had said.     Sharma was in judicial custody at the time of the Kunjum's murder.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Raid-on-Bengaluru-centre-reveals-horror-tales/articleshow/48704718.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:19 IST 2015||BENGALURU: A State Human Rights Commission raid on a de-addiction centre in Jnanabharati Layout, near Kengeri, southwest Bengaluru, found 90 inmates living in pathetic conditions and subjected to inhuman treatment.     Thursday's raid followed the murder of an inmate of another de-addiction centre in Kothanur recently.     The SHRC raid on Sri Santhosh Social Service Society, also known as 4S Society, followed a tipoff. According to SHRC officials, the centre has been in existence for seven years at least, but the society couldn't produce documents of having obtained permission from the social welfare department. Commission officials said the centre had the permission from the DC and the DHO.     "Most inmates are between 20 and 35 years. They showed us signs of being physically abused. The centre has violated other norms too. Although it's supposed to have one nurse for every 15 patients and at least one in-house doctor and a psychiatrist, it didn't have any," said an SHRC spokesperson.     4 arrested for killing inmate:     Kothanur police arrested a de-addiction centre staffer and three inmates for allegedly beating to death a 28-year-old inmate. Dinesh was admitted to the centre by his family as he was an alcoholic. He was later found dead in a hospital. Family members noticed several bruises on his body. Narayana, an inmate-turned-staffer, gave some medicines to Dinesh, who later turned aggressive. Narayana sought the help of inmates Suresh, Subhan and Simon, to subdue Dinesh.     When Dinesh retaliated, the quartet overpowered him till he became unconscious. He died in hospital.||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/A-jolly-good-fellow-say-Khannas-friends/articleshow/48704630.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:19 IST 2015||Sanjeev Khanna, Indrani Mukerjea's second husband and suspected ally in Sheena Bora's killing, may be the most surprising element in this macabre drama, but his friends and associates in Kolkata refused to cast aspersions on "Sanju" just yet.     From being the biggest dart enthusiast at one of Kolkata's poshest clubs (the CC&FC) to having a finger in every pie, Sanjeev was everyone's "best mate" and go-to guy who friends described as: "A doer... someone who could get things done."     The morning after Khanna's arrest, TOI spoke to Ajay Rawla, the man who Khanna worked for as a consultant and whose house he was picked up from on Wednesday afternoon. "It wasn't like he was hiding like a desperate fugitive in my house. We had a meeting in the morning after which he drove me home and that's when news broke on television. We were sitting, watching, wondering what steps to take when the police arrived," explained Rawla.     Seven years his senior, Khanna's association with Rawla dates back to the time they went to Mayo College in Ajmer. Later, Khanna went on to become an aide for Rawla's pet projects. Besides running his own business in wireless communications, Khanna was there setting up chef Shaun Kenworthy and Rawla's restaurant 1658 or immersed in the heritage project of converting the Bawali Rajbari into a hotel. "He was getting all the construction work and labourers in place. He was very good in helping out with permissions through his connections with excise and contractors," remembers Kenworthy.     Khanna, who seldom missed his outings at the club, motor rallies and horse racing as a prominent face in the social circuit, was not the same man before he met Indrani, recounts Bull Banthia, a close friend. "Well-read and well-versed, Sanju had a great mechanical mind with a solution for everything," is how Bull chose to describe his "jolly good friend who loved meeting new people, hung out at the club but wasn't a social climber". "It was Indrani who emerged as this socialite and drove him to consciously build contacts with those higher up in the social rung after marriage," said the Kolkata-based entrepreneur. "That's the reason why I distanced myself from them until overnight she left Kolkata with their daughter and Sanju's wallet."     While Indrani never surfaces in conversations, his daughter Vidhie, who stayed with Indrani, is a fond subject with his friends. "He would miss his daughter but was resigned to fate, hoping that someday she would find him," said Rawla, adding, "It was Vidhie who called Sanjeev on Wednesday to give him the news."     No one seems to know about any recent interaction between Khanna and Indrani. G M Kapur, a known name in Kolkata who was Intach's state convener and happens to be Khanna's "mama", seemed disturbed with "all the theorizing" of Khanna's role in the crime. He declined to look back on Indrani and Khanna's relationship but added, "The last that there was any contact with Indrani or her family was when Vidhie visited Calcutta last year to celebrate the 75th birthday of her grandmother (Khanna's mother who lives with him)."     Khanna's Facebook posts on "karma" in the weeks and months following Sheena's alleged murder on April 24, 2012, make for interesting reading. On April 30, Khanna shared photo messages: "Say whatever, whenever the f*** you want to"; "Sometimes I get so weird, I even freak myself out".     On May 24, exactly a month after the alleged killing, he wrote: "You can never tell what people are thinking and feeling unless they tell you, and usually they lie. you ask them, 'Whats wrong?' and they say 'Nothing'. You accept this because it's easier than digging for the truth. People smile when they want to cry, they laugh when they want to scream and shout. They pretend like nothing is wrong because they don't want to face the truth. Things aren't always rainbows and butterflies, sometimes you gotta scream and cry your anger and sadness to the world, because you can only hold it in for so long before something in you snaps. so when you want to cry, cry. When you want to scream, scream. Don't hide behind fake smiles, it's ok to not be alright."     ||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Sheena-docu-Michail-add-to-mystery/articleshow/48701752.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:19 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Michail, Sheena's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered have raised a number of unanswered questions.    Two days after his mother, Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Michail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai Police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed that what he gave to police was enough to prove that Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora (who are actually parents of Indrani) as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. Some questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukherjea.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Michail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43 as mentioned in reports after her arrest.    Adding more to the suspense, Michail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Michail studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board examination, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that knew that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard that her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard that she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband who she introduced as Peter Mukherjea."    The two-member Mumbai Police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Michail, who on Wednesday, was the first one to reveal that Sheena was Indrani's daughter, twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Michail's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Michail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukherjae is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Michail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."  ||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Grandparents-are-Sheenas-mom-dad-on-birth-certificate/articleshow/48704559.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:19 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Mikhail, Sheena Bora's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered led to some unanswered questions on Thursday.    Two days after his mother Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Mikhail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed what he gave the police was enough to prove Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora, who are actually Indrani's parents, as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. However, many questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter. In many cases in India involving single mothers, grandparents are known to put in their names as father and mother.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukerjea, that is, 13 years after Sheena was born.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Mikhail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43.    Mikhail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Mikhail     studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board exam, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband, who she introduced as Peter Mukerjea."    The two-member Mumbai police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Mikhail twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Mikhail 's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time, he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Mikhail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukerjea is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Mikhail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Sheena-bowled-us-over-Rahuls-uncle/articleshow/48704552.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:19 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: Had things worked out as desired for Peter Mukherjea's first wife Shabnam and her family in Dehradun, Rahul Mukherjea and Sheena Bora would have been married for over three years now.     Shabnam's brother Shaleen Singh told TOI on Thursday that in 2011 Rahul brought Sheena to their sprawling home in Dehradun to seek approval from the family for their marriage.     The entire family-Shabnam, her younger brother Shaleen, father Anand Singh and mother Seema-were reportedly bowled over by Sheena's jovial nature and affection towards the elderly people. Impressed, the family gave its "unqualified and unanimous approval" for the wedding, which was supposed to take place within a few months, said Shaleen.     Stunned by the recent development, Shaleen said, "Sheena was among those rare persons who left a deep and lifelong impact on people. She was good-looking, a sweet person, clean of heart and good to talk to. None of us objected to the wedding."     Shaleen learnt of Sheena's murder through news channels. "It would have been great if she had become a part of the family. I don't know what was the cause and motive behind the heinous crime, but all those behind the killing of the jovial-natured girl should not be spared at any cost," he said.     A former model and tele-actor, 49-year-old Shaleen today owns the Sanskar International school in Jogiwala here. He recalled the last meeting with Shabnam and Rahul in April this year. "My father Anand Singh passed away in April. They had come to pay their respects but we did not interact much."     However, Shaleen said of late the interaction between him and his sister Shabnam was limited. Although Shabnam's farm Gul-e-Shabnam and Shaleen's residence Shankar Sadan are barely 200 metres away in Badripur, meetings between them were rare. While Shaleen and his mother stay on different floors of Shankar Sadan, Shabnam stays alone at her residence and is frequently visited by Rahul.     "There are matters in each family which we do not want to disclose. We are not against each other but do not interact much. She comes to meet our mother occasionally," said Shaleen, adding that Shabnam was passionate about painting and had a studio in her residence.     Shaleen denied having any details about the presence of Mumbai police in Dehradun. "Neither Doon police nor Mumbai police have contacted me over the issue."     Staff at Shabnam's residence said she was out-of-station but they were not aware of her whereabouts.||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Kilpauk-doctor-murder-Hubby-to-approach-court/articleshow/48704411.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:19 IST 2015||CHENNAI: It's been four days since police claimed to have solved the murder of S Sathya, 24, a PG medical student. However, her husband has put forth questions that police have failed to answer. Though investigating officers confirmed Sathya was not sexually assaulted before she was killed, they leaked to some section of media saying that they changed their stance on Wednesday and said there were indications of attempt to rape on the deceased.     Police personnel revealed the details soon after Sathya's husband Dr P Sesu, also employed at a primary health centre in Perambalur, expressed certain doubts.     He alleged the police hastily solved the case citing the state assembly, which is in motion. Sathya was found dead at her house in Kilpauk on August 20.     On August 23, police arrested Harintham Depnath, a BTech graduate, who lived at the second floor on the same apartment. Neither was there any mention about sexual assault or attempt on Sathya when the body was recovered from the house. The nor did the doctors. Police didn't tell this during the arrest of Depnath on August 23. "What forced the police to reveal about the sexual harassment attempt on my wife now?" asked Sesu.     "I want to live a peaceful life with my two sons - Tamil Nesan, 6, and Karmugilan, 4. The studies and the future of my children is important for me. I do respect the police personnel who spent sleepless nights to solve the murder, but there are questions that need to be answered," he said.     "I live in Perambalur with my children, but we speak through live video calls. I have told my sons that Sathya has gone to the God, as the Almighty likes her more. "Hereafter, we cannot speak or meet her. I don't know how far my children will admit it?" said Sesu. "I will approach the court seeking a fair probe into the murder of my wife. I want to find out the real cause behind her death. I want the real accused to get punished for his deed," said Sesu.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Woman-strangles-husbands-lover/articleshow/48704388.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:19 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A woman beat up and strangled her husband's partner, an assistant professor at a polytechnic in Choolaimedu, in their Thiruverkadu home on Thursday, police said. A court later remanded the accused, 32-year-old Shruti, in judicial custody.     Police said Sambasivam, a professor at Panimalar Engineering College in Poonamallee, used to bring Rajalakshmi, home frequently and introduced her to his wife Shruti as a colleague. He even dropped her home at night. The polytechnic where Rajalakshmi worked was part of the Panimalar group of educational institutions. Shruti initially believed the two were just colleagues until Sambasivam came home with Rajalakshmi on Tuesday and said the woman was moving in with them permanently.     On Wednesday morning, Sambasivam allegedly tied a 'mangalsutra' to Rajalakshmi in front of his wife, police said, based on Shruti's confession. A shocked Shruti picked up a fight with Sambasivam who asked her to maintain a cordial relationship and take care of Rajalakshmi. On Thursday morning, after he left for college a fight broke out between the two women.     Police said Rajalakshmi allegedly abused Sruthi and went into the bathroom. Sruthi followed her in and strangled her with the 'mangalsutra'. She then tried to make it appear that the woman had fainted in the bathroom. She took her in an autorickshaw to a nearby hospital where she was declared 'brought dead'. Doctors who noticed a few marks around her neck informed the Thiruverkadu police who registered a case of suspicious death under CrPC section 176.     The body was sent for postmortem to Kilpauk Medical College and Hospital.     After finding that the two women were at home at the time of the death, police interrogated Sruthi for more than an hour but she continued to maintain that Rajyalakshmi had died of injuries sustained when she fell down in the bathroom.     "She confessed to the murder when we told her that her fingerprints had been lifted from the scene of crime," said an investigating officer. "She said she had smashed the woman's head against the wall and later strangled her with the 'thali'." Police altered the case to murder and arrested Sruthi.     Initial inquiries revealed that Rajalakshmi had been married to a man named Rajasekhar for a while and they had separated. She then got married to Suresh, a relative who worked in a private firm, a few years ago and the couple moved into a house in Mogappair.     They allegedly had frequent quarrels as he tortured her and she left him too, police found.     Rajalakshmi then got a job with Panimalar Engineering College where she met Sambasivam. The two became friends and began seeing each other. Rajalakshmi recently moved to the polytechnic in Choolaimedu, police said.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/US-journalists-killer-annoyed-colleagues-Ex-boss/articleshow/48704167.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:19 IST 2015||ROANOKE, United States: The disgruntled former US television station employee who murdered two journalists had "annoyed" colleagues but showed no signs at work of any mental health issues, his former boss said Thursday.     Vester Lee Flanagan, 41, worked as a reporter for WDBJ in Roanoke, Virginia from March 2012 to February 2013, but was dismissed for poor performance and angry behavior, general manager Jeffrey Marks said.     On Wednesday, Flanagan shot and killed two of the CBS affiliate's journalists while they were conducting an on-air interview. He later fatally shot himself.     "We are still at a loss to figure out what happened to him in those two and a half years" since he was fired, Marks told a news conference flanked by dozens of staff, many of them holding hands.     "I don't think we identified that he had mental health issues. We certainly identified that he had performance issues."     Marks defended the station's hiring record and said its parent company had "a very elaborate program to screen employees."     Flanagan passed background checks and came with only positive references, Marks said.     It was only after he was hired, Marks said, that things went downhill.     "Vester's behavior annoyed a lot of people in the news station," Marks said.     Flanagan, who went by the on-screen name Bryce Williams, alleged in a manifesto faxed to ABC News that he was discriminated against as a gay, black journalist.     Marks said accusations in 2013 that he was treated unfairly were "immediately investigated and found to be without merit."     During his employment, Flanagan complied with demands that he seek medical help, but he was ultimately dismissed.     He was escorted from the building by police and made an ominous aside to the news director -- handing him a wooden cross and saying "'you'll need this'," Marks said.     As he left, he also made a "derogatory comment" to Adam Ward, the cameraman he shot dead on Wednesday.     Flanagan filed a complaint with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and a civil action suit, which were dismissed, he said.     "All of these investigations determined that no reasonable person would have taken any of the cited incidents as discrimination or harassment."     After killing Ward and reporter Alison Parker live on the air, Flanagan posted a video of the attack on social media.||ROANOKE, UNITED STATES
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:19 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/SC-acquits-Romesh-Sharma-in-Budhiraja-murder-case/articleshow/48704930.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:19 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Thursday upheld the Delhi High Court order acquitting former Congress leader Romesh Sharma in the case relating to the killing of fashion designer Kunjum Budhiraja.     A bench of Justices Pinaki Chandra Ghose and R K Agrawal dismissed an appeal filed by the Delhi government challenging HC order.     The Delhi government contended that the HC had erred in acquitting Sharma but it was strongly opposed by his counsel and senior advocate Siddharth Luthra who submitted that his client was in love with Kunjum and there was no evidence to prove his involvement in the case.     Sharma, who was alleged to be a frontman of underworld don Dawood Ibrahim, was convicted by a trial court on February 15, 2008. Kunjum was killed on March 20, 1999 at Sharma's South Delhi-based 'Jai Mata Di' farm house by a group of hired gangsters from Uttar Pradesh.     The trial court had convicted Sharma and five other accused in the case and had awarded life term to all. The HC, however, acquitted Sharma and co-accused Tejendir Verdi but upheld conviction and sentence of other four accused— Sharma's nephew Surinder Mishra, Hemchand, Santram and Ramesh alias Bobby.     While acquitting Sharma, the HC had said "Romesh Sharma and Kunjum were in love, and desired the company of each other. It does not establish that Sharma had got fed up with her". It had turned down Delhi police's contention that Sharma wanted to get rid of Kunjum as she knew about his alleged illegal activities.     "A grieving lover falling over the body of his mate and performing the rituals of a marriage can well be an expression of lasting love, and need not necessarily be a drama," the HC had said.     Sharma was in judicial custody at the time of the Kunjum's murder.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Raid-on-Bengaluru-centre-reveals-horror-tales/articleshow/48704718.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:19 IST 2015||BENGALURU: A State Human Rights Commission raid on a de-addiction centre in Jnanabharati Layout, near Kengeri, southwest Bengaluru, found 90 inmates living in pathetic conditions and subjected to inhuman treatment.     Thursday's raid followed the murder of an inmate of another de-addiction centre in Kothanur recently.     The SHRC raid on Sri Santhosh Social Service Society, also known as 4S Society, followed a tipoff. According to SHRC officials, the centre has been in existence for seven years at least, but the society couldn't produce documents of having obtained permission from the social welfare department. Commission officials said the centre had the permission from the DC and the DHO.     "Most inmates are between 20 and 35 years. They showed us signs of being physically abused. The centre has violated other norms too. Although it's supposed to have one nurse for every 15 patients and at least one in-house doctor and a psychiatrist, it didn't have any," said an SHRC spokesperson.     4 arrested for killing inmate:     Kothanur police arrested a de-addiction centre staffer and three inmates for allegedly beating to death a 28-year-old inmate. Dinesh was admitted to the centre by his family as he was an alcoholic. He was later found dead in a hospital. Family members noticed several bruises on his body. Narayana, an inmate-turned-staffer, gave some medicines to Dinesh, who later turned aggressive. Narayana sought the help of inmates Suresh, Subhan and Simon, to subdue Dinesh.     When Dinesh retaliated, the quartet overpowered him till he became unconscious. He died in hospital.||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/A-jolly-good-fellow-say-Khannas-friends/articleshow/48704630.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:19 IST 2015||Sanjeev Khanna, Indrani Mukerjea's second husband and suspected ally in Sheena Bora's killing, may be the most surprising element in this macabre drama, but his friends and associates in Kolkata refused to cast aspersions on "Sanju" just yet.     From being the biggest dart enthusiast at one of Kolkata's poshest clubs (the CC&FC) to having a finger in every pie, Sanjeev was everyone's "best mate" and go-to guy who friends described as: "A doer... someone who could get things done."     The morning after Khanna's arrest, TOI spoke to Ajay Rawla, the man who Khanna worked for as a consultant and whose house he was picked up from on Wednesday afternoon. "It wasn't like he was hiding like a desperate fugitive in my house. We had a meeting in the morning after which he drove me home and that's when news broke on television. We were sitting, watching, wondering what steps to take when the police arrived," explained Rawla.     Seven years his senior, Khanna's association with Rawla dates back to the time they went to Mayo College in Ajmer. Later, Khanna went on to become an aide for Rawla's pet projects. Besides running his own business in wireless communications, Khanna was there setting up chef Shaun Kenworthy and Rawla's restaurant 1658 or immersed in the heritage project of converting the Bawali Rajbari into a hotel. "He was getting all the construction work and labourers in place. He was very good in helping out with permissions through his connections with excise and contractors," remembers Kenworthy.     Khanna, who seldom missed his outings at the club, motor rallies and horse racing as a prominent face in the social circuit, was not the same man before he met Indrani, recounts Bull Banthia, a close friend. "Well-read and well-versed, Sanju had a great mechanical mind with a solution for everything," is how Bull chose to describe his "jolly good friend who loved meeting new people, hung out at the club but wasn't a social climber". "It was Indrani who emerged as this socialite and drove him to consciously build contacts with those higher up in the social rung after marriage," said the Kolkata-based entrepreneur. "That's the reason why I distanced myself from them until overnight she left Kolkata with their daughter and Sanju's wallet."     While Indrani never surfaces in conversations, his daughter Vidhie, who stayed with Indrani, is a fond subject with his friends. "He would miss his daughter but was resigned to fate, hoping that someday she would find him," said Rawla, adding, "It was Vidhie who called Sanjeev on Wednesday to give him the news."     No one seems to know about any recent interaction between Khanna and Indrani. G M Kapur, a known name in Kolkata who was Intach's state convener and happens to be Khanna's "mama", seemed disturbed with "all the theorizing" of Khanna's role in the crime. He declined to look back on Indrani and Khanna's relationship but added, "The last that there was any contact with Indrani or her family was when Vidhie visited Calcutta last year to celebrate the 75th birthday of her grandmother (Khanna's mother who lives with him)."     Khanna's Facebook posts on "karma" in the weeks and months following Sheena's alleged murder on April 24, 2012, make for interesting reading. On April 30, Khanna shared photo messages: "Say whatever, whenever the f*** you want to"; "Sometimes I get so weird, I even freak myself out".     On May 24, exactly a month after the alleged killing, he wrote: "You can never tell what people are thinking and feeling unless they tell you, and usually they lie. you ask them, 'Whats wrong?' and they say 'Nothing'. You accept this because it's easier than digging for the truth. People smile when they want to cry, they laugh when they want to scream and shout. They pretend like nothing is wrong because they don't want to face the truth. Things aren't always rainbows and butterflies, sometimes you gotta scream and cry your anger and sadness to the world, because you can only hold it in for so long before something in you snaps. so when you want to cry, cry. When you want to scream, scream. Don't hide behind fake smiles, it's ok to not be alright."     ||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Sheena-docu-Michail-add-to-mystery/articleshow/48701752.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:19 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Michail, Sheena's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered have raised a number of unanswered questions.    Two days after his mother, Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Michail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai Police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed that what he gave to police was enough to prove that Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora (who are actually parents of Indrani) as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. Some questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukherjea.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Michail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43 as mentioned in reports after her arrest.    Adding more to the suspense, Michail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Michail studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board examination, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that knew that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard that her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard that she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband who she introduced as Peter Mukherjea."    The two-member Mumbai Police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Michail, who on Wednesday, was the first one to reveal that Sheena was Indrani's daughter, twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Michail's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Michail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukherjae is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Michail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."  ||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Grandparents-are-Sheenas-mom-dad-on-birth-certificate/articleshow/48704559.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:19 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Mikhail, Sheena Bora's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered led to some unanswered questions on Thursday.    Two days after his mother Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Mikhail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed what he gave the police was enough to prove Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora, who are actually Indrani's parents, as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. However, many questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter. In many cases in India involving single mothers, grandparents are known to put in their names as father and mother.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukerjea, that is, 13 years after Sheena was born.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Mikhail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43.    Mikhail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Mikhail     studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board exam, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband, who she introduced as Peter Mukerjea."    The two-member Mumbai police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Mikhail twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Mikhail 's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time, he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Mikhail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukerjea is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Mikhail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Sheena-bowled-us-over-Rahuls-uncle/articleshow/48704552.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:19 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: Had things worked out as desired for Peter Mukherjea's first wife Shabnam and her family in Dehradun, Rahul Mukherjea and Sheena Bora would have been married for over three years now.     Shabnam's brother Shaleen Singh told TOI on Thursday that in 2011 Rahul brought Sheena to their sprawling home in Dehradun to seek approval from the family for their marriage.     The entire family-Shabnam, her younger brother Shaleen, father Anand Singh and mother Seema-were reportedly bowled over by Sheena's jovial nature and affection towards the elderly people. Impressed, the family gave its "unqualified and unanimous approval" for the wedding, which was supposed to take place within a few months, said Shaleen.     Stunned by the recent development, Shaleen said, "Sheena was among those rare persons who left a deep and lifelong impact on people. She was good-looking, a sweet person, clean of heart and good to talk to. None of us objected to the wedding."     Shaleen learnt of Sheena's murder through news channels. "It would have been great if she had become a part of the family. I don't know what was the cause and motive behind the heinous crime, but all those behind the killing of the jovial-natured girl should not be spared at any cost," he said.     A former model and tele-actor, 49-year-old Shaleen today owns the Sanskar International school in Jogiwala here. He recalled the last meeting with Shabnam and Rahul in April this year. "My father Anand Singh passed away in April. They had come to pay their respects but we did not interact much."     However, Shaleen said of late the interaction between him and his sister Shabnam was limited. Although Shabnam's farm Gul-e-Shabnam and Shaleen's residence Shankar Sadan are barely 200 metres away in Badripur, meetings between them were rare. While Shaleen and his mother stay on different floors of Shankar Sadan, Shabnam stays alone at her residence and is frequently visited by Rahul.     "There are matters in each family which we do not want to disclose. We are not against each other but do not interact much. She comes to meet our mother occasionally," said Shaleen, adding that Shabnam was passionate about painting and had a studio in her residence.     Shaleen denied having any details about the presence of Mumbai police in Dehradun. "Neither Doon police nor Mumbai police have contacted me over the issue."     Staff at Shabnam's residence said she was out-of-station but they were not aware of her whereabouts.||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Kilpauk-doctor-murder-Hubby-to-approach-court/articleshow/48704411.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:19 IST 2015||CHENNAI: It's been four days since police claimed to have solved the murder of S Sathya, 24, a PG medical student. However, her husband has put forth questions that police have failed to answer. Though investigating officers confirmed Sathya was not sexually assaulted before she was killed, they leaked to some section of media saying that they changed their stance on Wednesday and said there were indications of attempt to rape on the deceased.     Police personnel revealed the details soon after Sathya's husband Dr P Sesu, also employed at a primary health centre in Perambalur, expressed certain doubts.     He alleged the police hastily solved the case citing the state assembly, which is in motion. Sathya was found dead at her house in Kilpauk on August 20.     On August 23, police arrested Harintham Depnath, a BTech graduate, who lived at the second floor on the same apartment. Neither was there any mention about sexual assault or attempt on Sathya when the body was recovered from the house. The nor did the doctors. Police didn't tell this during the arrest of Depnath on August 23. "What forced the police to reveal about the sexual harassment attempt on my wife now?" asked Sesu.     "I want to live a peaceful life with my two sons - Tamil Nesan, 6, and Karmugilan, 4. The studies and the future of my children is important for me. I do respect the police personnel who spent sleepless nights to solve the murder, but there are questions that need to be answered," he said.     "I live in Perambalur with my children, but we speak through live video calls. I have told my sons that Sathya has gone to the God, as the Almighty likes her more. "Hereafter, we cannot speak or meet her. I don't know how far my children will admit it?" said Sesu. "I will approach the court seeking a fair probe into the murder of my wife. I want to find out the real cause behind her death. I want the real accused to get punished for his deed," said Sesu.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Woman-strangles-husbands-lover/articleshow/48704388.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:19 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A woman beat up and strangled her husband's partner, an assistant professor at a polytechnic in Choolaimedu, in their Thiruverkadu home on Thursday, police said. A court later remanded the accused, 32-year-old Shruti, in judicial custody.     Police said Sambasivam, a professor at Panimalar Engineering College in Poonamallee, used to bring Rajalakshmi, home frequently and introduced her to his wife Shruti as a colleague. He even dropped her home at night. The polytechnic where Rajalakshmi worked was part of the Panimalar group of educational institutions. Shruti initially believed the two were just colleagues until Sambasivam came home with Rajalakshmi on Tuesday and said the woman was moving in with them permanently.     On Wednesday morning, Sambasivam allegedly tied a 'mangalsutra' to Rajalakshmi in front of his wife, police said, based on Shruti's confession. A shocked Shruti picked up a fight with Sambasivam who asked her to maintain a cordial relationship and take care of Rajalakshmi. On Thursday morning, after he left for college a fight broke out between the two women.     Police said Rajalakshmi allegedly abused Sruthi and went into the bathroom. Sruthi followed her in and strangled her with the 'mangalsutra'. She then tried to make it appear that the woman had fainted in the bathroom. She took her in an autorickshaw to a nearby hospital where she was declared 'brought dead'. Doctors who noticed a few marks around her neck informed the Thiruverkadu police who registered a case of suspicious death under CrPC section 176.     The body was sent for postmortem to Kilpauk Medical College and Hospital.     After finding that the two women were at home at the time of the death, police interrogated Sruthi for more than an hour but she continued to maintain that Rajyalakshmi had died of injuries sustained when she fell down in the bathroom.     "She confessed to the murder when we told her that her fingerprints had been lifted from the scene of crime," said an investigating officer. "She said she had smashed the woman's head against the wall and later strangled her with the 'thali'." Police altered the case to murder and arrested Sruthi.     Initial inquiries revealed that Rajalakshmi had been married to a man named Rajasekhar for a while and they had separated. She then got married to Suresh, a relative who worked in a private firm, a few years ago and the couple moved into a house in Mogappair.     They allegedly had frequent quarrels as he tortured her and she left him too, police found.     Rajalakshmi then got a job with Panimalar Engineering College where she met Sambasivam. The two became friends and began seeing each other. Rajalakshmi recently moved to the polytechnic in Choolaimedu, police said.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/US-journalists-killer-annoyed-colleagues-Ex-boss/articleshow/48704167.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:19 IST 2015||ROANOKE, United States: The disgruntled former US television station employee who murdered two journalists had "annoyed" colleagues but showed no signs at work of any mental health issues, his former boss said Thursday.     Vester Lee Flanagan, 41, worked as a reporter for WDBJ in Roanoke, Virginia from March 2012 to February 2013, but was dismissed for poor performance and angry behavior, general manager Jeffrey Marks said.     On Wednesday, Flanagan shot and killed two of the CBS affiliate's journalists while they were conducting an on-air interview. He later fatally shot himself.     "We are still at a loss to figure out what happened to him in those two and a half years" since he was fired, Marks told a news conference flanked by dozens of staff, many of them holding hands.     "I don't think we identified that he had mental health issues. We certainly identified that he had performance issues."     Marks defended the station's hiring record and said its parent company had "a very elaborate program to screen employees."     Flanagan passed background checks and came with only positive references, Marks said.     It was only after he was hired, Marks said, that things went downhill.     "Vester's behavior annoyed a lot of people in the news station," Marks said.     Flanagan, who went by the on-screen name Bryce Williams, alleged in a manifesto faxed to ABC News that he was discriminated against as a gay, black journalist.     Marks said accusations in 2013 that he was treated unfairly were "immediately investigated and found to be without merit."     During his employment, Flanagan complied with demands that he seek medical help, but he was ultimately dismissed.     He was escorted from the building by police and made an ominous aside to the news director -- handing him a wooden cross and saying "'you'll need this'," Marks said.     As he left, he also made a "derogatory comment" to Adam Ward, the cameraman he shot dead on Wednesday.     Flanagan filed a complaint with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and a civil action suit, which were dismissed, he said.     "All of these investigations determined that no reasonable person would have taken any of the cited incidents as discrimination or harassment."     After killing Ward and reporter Alison Parker live on the air, Flanagan posted a video of the attack on social media.||ROANOKE, UNITED STATES
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/patna/Gang-raped-in-UP-teen-gets-police-help-in-Bihar/articleshow/48518962.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:24 IST 2015||PATNA: A 16-year-old girl was allegedly gang-raped by five youngsters at a deserted place near Charbagh railway station in Uttar Pradesh on Sunday. The matter came to light when she dodged her tormentors, boarded the waiting Farakka Express train at Charbagh late on Sunday night and reached Patna on Monday.    Patna SRP (superintendent of railway police) P N Mishra said he received a message about the girl on WhatsApp from an acquaintance who was also travelling by the train. A picture of the girl was also sent to the officer. Police located the girl in S-4 coach, took her statement and sent her to Patna Medical College & Hospital for medical examination.    According to Mishra, the rape survivor told police she was accosted by one Sonu at Charbagh station on Sunday and taken to an isolated place where Sonu offered to marry her. He forcibly put vermilion on her forehead and called his four friends. They raped her one after another, she said.    The girl also alleged the rapists later attempted to murder her. "She has marks of injuries inflicted by a sharp-edged weapon on her cheeks and throat," the SRP said and added the girl belongs to a poor family of Charbagh. Her father has been called by police to take her back.    Patna GRP has lodged an FIR which would be forwarded to the railway police station at Charbagh. The girl would be produced before a judicial magistrate for recording her statement under Section 164 CrPC on Tuesday.    ||PATNA
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/patna/Murder-accused-burned-alive-at-Nawada-village/articleshow/48518708.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:24 IST 2015||NAWADA: Tension has gripped Garuda village after a man, accused of killing a co-villager on Thursday, was burned alive at the same place where his victim was being cremated on Saturday. A large number of police personnel have been deployed at the village to prevent further bloodshed. Land dispute is said to be the reason behind the killings.    Sources said around 6 katha of land behind Garuda primary school under Roh police station in Nawada district was a bone of contention between Surendra Yadav alias 'bauaji' and Brammar Yadav. It is said Brammar had paid Rs 36,000 as advance to the plot owner Ram Vilas Singh of adjoining Seur village but had not got it registered as he had been convicted in an Arms Act case. Surendra, taking advantage of Brammar's imprisonment, paid Rs 60,000 to Ram Vilas and claimed ownership of the plot.    After serving two years' jail term, Brammar allegedly murdered Surendra on Thursday and dumped his body in the village pond. Surendra's brother Ranjit Yadav lodged an FIR against Brammar, his wife Urmila Devi, their five sons besides Brammar's daughter-in-law. But no arrest was made.    On Saturday evening, when Surendra was being cremated, Brammar reached there and threatened the family members with dire consequences for naming his sons and daughter-in-law in the FIR. That provoked Surendra's grieving relatives who caught hold of Brammar, beat and doused him with kerosene and burnt him alive at the very cremation ground.    On Sunday, villagers supporting both the parties gathered for a showdown. However, Rajauli SDPO Upendra Yadav reached there with force and averted a possible bloodshed. Urmila Devi has lodged an FIR against six family members of Ranjit Yadav for her husband's killing. One person has been arrested, Roh SHO Dharmendra Kumar said on Monday.    ||NAWADA
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/meerut/Villagers-protest-Armyman-killing-brigade-starts-steps-to-declare-him-martyr/articleshow/48517635.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:24 IST 2015||MEERUT: Representatives from 40 villages gathered at the Commissionariat here in a groundswell of protest against the brutal killing of an armyman by miscreants after he saved a girl from harassment on August 13. Meanwhile, the Army has begun proceedings to have the deceased soldier declared a martyr for his actions.     Lance Naik Ved Mitra Chaudhary of the 416 Engineering Brigade was attacked by nearly 30 men and beaten to death at Golabadh locality of Hardev Nagar in Rohta here, while he was trying to save the 20-year-old girl,who is a local% resident.  On Monday, in an outpouring of support for him and in protest against his killing, villagers raised an 8-point list of demands that included the slapping of POSCA Act on the perpetrators of the crime, government job for the Chaudhary's widow and Rs 20 lakh as compensation for the family.   The Army has acknowledged Chaudhary's exemplary courage in standing up to the harassers.     "From the facts which have emerged, Sapper Ved Mitra Choudhary showed exemplary courage as an upright citizen unmindful of personal bodily harm. He has laid down his life in upholding the law of the land, and safeguarding the well-being of fellow citizens, making the supreme sacrifice in the highest traditions of the service," said Brig Raghu Srinivasan, commanding officer of 416 Engineers Brigade, talking to TOI. "He certainly qualifies to be termed as a martyr. The official proceedings are already on but it will take some time before we can officially announce the status."     "The killing clearly reflects the state of affairs in the area. Chaudhary was from the army so he showed the courage to take on the hooligans, but common men choose to stay silent. After all, what can they do? The incident will only embolden the advances of local goons," said Shikhar Chand of Wajidpur village.     "Ved Mitra's body bore marks of extreme violence. There were 52 wounds on him. It seemed as if his body had been tortured inhumanely, not by Indian citizens but by the enemy. His skull was broken and private parts injured. Is this what an Indian soldier deserves from his own countrymen?" asked Suresh Rana, the late soldier's maternal uncle.     Local villagers say that harassment of girls is rampant in the area. "Girls have stopped going to school because of widespread harassment. The area is really dangerous and unsafe for women and police is doing little to enforce the law," said Mahabir Malik, who had arrived at the protest site from Rohta Meerpur village.     Meanwhile, Krishan Pal, father of the girl who Chaudhary saved from goons is apprehensive the criminals might target his family after the events. "My daughter was being harassed for quite some time now, but on Thursday, perhaps emboldened by our silence, the goons tried to molest her right in front of our dairy establishment. What happened later was highly unfortunate. I do not know what is in store for us. I am really worried about my family and particularly about my daughter," he said. The protesting villagers have demanded security for the family.     Police officials have given their assurance that Pal's family is safe. "We will ensure that not even a single incident of harassment is repeated in the area. A police picket will be installed very near the girl's house and regular patrolling has already been finalized. On Sunday night, we nabbed the main accused in the murder, Chhavinder Singh. Three others named in the FIR are already in police custody. Now police is preparing documents to slap NSA on the culprits," said superintendent of police (rural) MM Baig, talking to TOI.   ||MEERUT
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/dehradun/HC-stays-arrest-of-man-accused-of-murdering-neighbors-pet/articleshow/48517439.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:24 IST 2015||NAINITAL: In a strange case, a single judge bench of the Nainital high court stayed the arrest of a man charged with the murder of his neighbor's pet dog. The accused told the court the incident was part of a larger conspiracy against him.     On August 9, Paras, a resident of Nandpur village in Udham Singh Nagar filed a complaint with the police against his neighbour Budhiram who he said had shot his pet dog out of jealousy and spite. The offence is punishable by two years' imprisonment or by fine or both.     Budhiram, on the other hand, approached the high court on Thursday to file a writ petition to prevent his arrest. He said he was attacked by the canine in question while visiting Paras' house and had fired his gun in self defence. On Friday, the single bench of Justice Sudhanshu Dhulia stayed Budhiram's arrest.     "The honorable court stayed the petitioner's arrest as an interim relief measure. The accused was charged with section 428 of Indian Penal Code (mischief by killing, poisoning, maiming or rendering useless any animal or animals of the value of ten rupees or upwards)," said an advocate associated with the case.     ||NAINITAL
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/rest-of-world/Pistorius-prosecutors-file-appeal-papers-at-Supreme-Court/articleshow/48516617.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:24 IST 2015||CAPE TOWN, South Africa: Prosecutors pushing for a murder conviction against Oscar Pistorius have filed papers at South Africa's Supreme Court of Appeal.     Court registrar Paul Myburgh said the papers were filed Monday, four days ahead of Pistorius' expected release from prison to be moved to house arrest.     Prosecutors want a panel of judges at the Supreme Court to overrule a decision by another judge to acquit the double-amputee Olympic athlete of murder for killing girlfriend Reva Steenkamp in 2013. Pistorius was found guilty of culpable homicide, or manslaughter, for shooting Steenkamp through a toilet cubicle door in his home.     He was sentenced to five years in jail.     Pistorius is expected to be released from prison Friday after serving 10 months of his culpable homicide sentence. He would serve the remainder under house arrest.||CAPE TOWN, SOUTH AFRICA
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/noida/Former-Delhi-police-constable-nabbed-after-7-years/articleshow/48515932.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:24 IST 2015||GREATER NOIDA: A former Delhi police constable, allegedly involved in various criminal activities and absconding for the past seven years, was arrested by the Uttar Pradesh Special Task Force, police said today.    The accused, Davinder Singh, was arrested from Ghaziabad area last night after a brief encounter. He was brought here for interrogation, Ajay Kumar Sahdev, ASP, UPSTF, (western UP) said.    Davinder, a resident of Saidpur village had multiple cases registered against him in Uttar Pradesh and was absconding for more than seven years. The state police had also announced a reward of Rs 50,000 for his arrest, he said.    A pistol, four live cartridges, four empty cartridges, Rs 1,065 cash, driving licence and a mobile phone were recovered from the accused, Sahdev said.    During interrogation, Davinder revealed that he joined Delhi police as a constable in 1989. He was dismissed from service in 2001.    He revealed that after his accomplice, Ajay, was killed in a police encounter, he fled to Dehradun. As police was on his lookout and tracing his location, he moved to Gwalior in Madhya Pradesh along with his family members.    He started duping people on the pretext of selling 'radio active material sulemani stone'.    Davinder had struck a deal with a Kolkata-based trader and had come to Ghaziabad in connection with a property deal when he was arrested, the ASP said.    More than 20 cases have been registered against him at Bulandshhar, Meerut, Aligarh, Gautam Budha Nagar, Hapur and Ghaziabad, ranging from attempt to murder and robbery, he added.||GREATER NOIDA
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/hubballi/Belagavi-police-nails-triple-murder-accused-within-12-hours/articleshow/48515573.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:24 IST 2015||BELAGAVI: City police succeeded in nailing the accused of triple murder surfaced at Kuvempu Nagar on Sunday morning, within 12 hours of the incident. In his confession before police, accused narrated the brutal act of killing two school going children and a woman, whom with he has illicit affair.     Accused identified as Praveen Subramanya Bhat (23), resident of Sahyadri Nagar, studying chartered accountant (CA) in Gogte College of Commerce (GCC) here. Police took him to the custody at Sunday 11pm from his house based on clues. Accused had brutally killed Reena Rakesh Malgatti (37) and her children Sahitya (6) and Aditya (11) at the house in Kuvempu Nagar.     He had slit the throat of Reena by knife. Later, he drowned the eyewitnesses Sahitya and Aditya in the bucket water in bathroom. During his confession, accused Praveen Bhat told to the police that, both children looked him like his enemies at that moment, as they saw him while killing their mother, so he had no other option rather finishing them.     According to police sources, accused Praveen and victim Reena had illicit relation since past one year. As Praveen is the neighbour, he used to enter Reena's house by climbing the pipe and sometimes rope left by Reena, whenever her husband Rakesh was on out of station. Rakesh is a cloth merchant, used to remain outside home most of the days and returning late in night. Rakesh is basically from Ballari while Reena from Gujarat. Both loved and married 14 years ago.     During interrogation, accused said he was against the affair with Reena. She used to force and blackmailing him to continue the affair. She used to call him whenever her husband going out of station. He also said that he had frustrated following affair with her and her blackmailing. However, commissioner said it's just one side version and other side is yet to be investigated.     Commissioner S Ravi, said on the day of incident, accused entered Reena's house at 11.30pm by using rope. Before he came, Reena latched the room of Harsha, 17-year-old adopted boy from outside, who used to call her 'maami'. After spending some time along with Reena, accused returned back. Police commissioner said during interrogation, accused said that he had requested Reena to stop calling him henceforth but she ignored it. Therefore, he went again at 3am with making-up mind to finish the story once at all, which he did.     Case has been registered at APMC police station and case is booked against accused Praveen Bhat under sections 302 and 201 IPC. Commissioner said reward will be given to the officers worked on the case and succeeded in arrested accused.     Kendriya Vidyalaya announces holiday:     Kendriya Vidyalaya School-2 at Camp area announced holiday on Monday following the death of its student Aditya in the incident, who was studying in 5th class. School took sudden decision at the morning.||BELAGAVI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/nagpur/Womans-body-found-in-pieces/articleshow/48514731.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:24 IST 2015||Body of a 38-yr-old woman was found in pieces at two different places on Saturday night.  The deceased, identified as Mangala Varathi, wife of Mohan Varathi, was missing for three days. While a piece of hand was found near Anjani Mata temple in Alodi area on Saturday night, her legs and other body parts were found in a drain at Swagat colony of Karla Road on Sunday morning.  Varathi, a resident of Indira Nagar, was reportedly harassed by her husband Mohan Varathi, who used to doubt her character. The relatives of Mangala lodged a murder case against her husband with Sevagram police station, the police said.|| 
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Neelam-Katara-welcomes-SC-verdict/articleshow/48514322.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:24 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: Neelam Katara on Monday welcomed the Supreme Court verdict upholding conviction of all the three accused in the Nitish Katara murder case.     "It's a huge relief," Neelam Katara said.     "What I have been saying for 13 and a half years has been vindicated," she said, adding, "highest court of country has upheld the conviction."    (With inputs from ANI)                 ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Nitish-Katara-murder-case-SC-upholds-conviction-of-Vikas-Yadav-Vishal-Yadav-and-Sukhdev-Pehalwan/articleshow/48513728.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:24 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Monday upheld conviction of Vikas Yadav, Vishal Yadav and Sukhdev Pehalwan in the 2002 Nitish Katara murder case A bench of justices JS Khehar and AK Goel, however, agreed to hear their plea for reducing the quantum of sentence awarded by Delhi high court.The court issued notice to Delhi government to respond on the quantum of sentence to be awarded to them.Katara murder case is a classic example of how the rich and powerful people try to influence the justice delivery system, the apex court said.On February 6 this year, Delhi high court had enhanced the life imprisonment of Vikas Yadav and his cousin Vishal to 25 years in jail without any remission and an additional five years for destruction of evidence in the honour killing of Nitish Katara in 2002.The court had held that the murder of Katara, who was in love with Vikas's sister, was an "honour killing" which was done in a very "carefully planned and premeditated" manner and with "extreme vengeance".Vikas and Vishal had moved the Supreme Court against the Delhi high court's verdict.According to the prosecution, Vikas and Vishal killed Katara on the night of Febraury 17, 2002, after abducting him from a marriage party in Uttar Pradesh's Ghaziabad, as they were opposed to his friendship with their sister Bharti.Vikas and Bharti are children of former parliamentarian DP Yadav.Vishal was convicted in 2008 along with Vikas for kidnapping and murdering Katara, son of an Indian Administrative Service officer.The Yadavs had sought a re-trial of the case, saying the trial was not conducted in accordance with law.They had challenged the trial court order convicting them and sentencing them to life imprisonment. Katara's mother and police had also challenged the trial court's order and sought death penalty for three convicts.(With inputs from agencies)||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:24 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:24 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/SC-acquits-Romesh-Sharma-in-Budhiraja-murder-case/articleshow/48704930.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:24 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Thursday upheld the Delhi High Court order acquitting former Congress leader Romesh Sharma in the case relating to the killing of fashion designer Kunjum Budhiraja.     A bench of Justices Pinaki Chandra Ghose and R K Agrawal dismissed an appeal filed by the Delhi government challenging HC order.     The Delhi government contended that the HC had erred in acquitting Sharma but it was strongly opposed by his counsel and senior advocate Siddharth Luthra who submitted that his client was in love with Kunjum and there was no evidence to prove his involvement in the case.     Sharma, who was alleged to be a frontman of underworld don Dawood Ibrahim, was convicted by a trial court on February 15, 2008. Kunjum was killed on March 20, 1999 at Sharma's South Delhi-based 'Jai Mata Di' farm house by a group of hired gangsters from Uttar Pradesh.     The trial court had convicted Sharma and five other accused in the case and had awarded life term to all. The HC, however, acquitted Sharma and co-accused Tejendir Verdi but upheld conviction and sentence of other four accused— Sharma's nephew Surinder Mishra, Hemchand, Santram and Ramesh alias Bobby.     While acquitting Sharma, the HC had said "Romesh Sharma and Kunjum were in love, and desired the company of each other. It does not establish that Sharma had got fed up with her". It had turned down Delhi police's contention that Sharma wanted to get rid of Kunjum as she knew about his alleged illegal activities.     "A grieving lover falling over the body of his mate and performing the rituals of a marriage can well be an expression of lasting love, and need not necessarily be a drama," the HC had said.     Sharma was in judicial custody at the time of the Kunjum's murder.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Raid-on-Bengaluru-centre-reveals-horror-tales/articleshow/48704718.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:24 IST 2015||BENGALURU: A State Human Rights Commission raid on a de-addiction centre in Jnanabharati Layout, near Kengeri, southwest Bengaluru, found 90 inmates living in pathetic conditions and subjected to inhuman treatment.     Thursday's raid followed the murder of an inmate of another de-addiction centre in Kothanur recently.     The SHRC raid on Sri Santhosh Social Service Society, also known as 4S Society, followed a tipoff. According to SHRC officials, the centre has been in existence for seven years at least, but the society couldn't produce documents of having obtained permission from the social welfare department. Commission officials said the centre had the permission from the DC and the DHO.     "Most inmates are between 20 and 35 years. They showed us signs of being physically abused. The centre has violated other norms too. Although it's supposed to have one nurse for every 15 patients and at least one in-house doctor and a psychiatrist, it didn't have any," said an SHRC spokesperson.     4 arrested for killing inmate:     Kothanur police arrested a de-addiction centre staffer and three inmates for allegedly beating to death a 28-year-old inmate. Dinesh was admitted to the centre by his family as he was an alcoholic. He was later found dead in a hospital. Family members noticed several bruises on his body. Narayana, an inmate-turned-staffer, gave some medicines to Dinesh, who later turned aggressive. Narayana sought the help of inmates Suresh, Subhan and Simon, to subdue Dinesh.     When Dinesh retaliated, the quartet overpowered him till he became unconscious. He died in hospital.||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/A-jolly-good-fellow-say-Khannas-friends/articleshow/48704630.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:24 IST 2015||Sanjeev Khanna, Indrani Mukerjea's second husband and suspected ally in Sheena Bora's killing, may be the most surprising element in this macabre drama, but his friends and associates in Kolkata refused to cast aspersions on "Sanju" just yet.     From being the biggest dart enthusiast at one of Kolkata's poshest clubs (the CC&FC) to having a finger in every pie, Sanjeev was everyone's "best mate" and go-to guy who friends described as: "A doer... someone who could get things done."     The morning after Khanna's arrest, TOI spoke to Ajay Rawla, the man who Khanna worked for as a consultant and whose house he was picked up from on Wednesday afternoon. "It wasn't like he was hiding like a desperate fugitive in my house. We had a meeting in the morning after which he drove me home and that's when news broke on television. We were sitting, watching, wondering what steps to take when the police arrived," explained Rawla.     Seven years his senior, Khanna's association with Rawla dates back to the time they went to Mayo College in Ajmer. Later, Khanna went on to become an aide for Rawla's pet projects. Besides running his own business in wireless communications, Khanna was there setting up chef Shaun Kenworthy and Rawla's restaurant 1658 or immersed in the heritage project of converting the Bawali Rajbari into a hotel. "He was getting all the construction work and labourers in place. He was very good in helping out with permissions through his connections with excise and contractors," remembers Kenworthy.     Khanna, who seldom missed his outings at the club, motor rallies and horse racing as a prominent face in the social circuit, was not the same man before he met Indrani, recounts Bull Banthia, a close friend. "Well-read and well-versed, Sanju had a great mechanical mind with a solution for everything," is how Bull chose to describe his "jolly good friend who loved meeting new people, hung out at the club but wasn't a social climber". "It was Indrani who emerged as this socialite and drove him to consciously build contacts with those higher up in the social rung after marriage," said the Kolkata-based entrepreneur. "That's the reason why I distanced myself from them until overnight she left Kolkata with their daughter and Sanju's wallet."     While Indrani never surfaces in conversations, his daughter Vidhie, who stayed with Indrani, is a fond subject with his friends. "He would miss his daughter but was resigned to fate, hoping that someday she would find him," said Rawla, adding, "It was Vidhie who called Sanjeev on Wednesday to give him the news."     No one seems to know about any recent interaction between Khanna and Indrani. G M Kapur, a known name in Kolkata who was Intach's state convener and happens to be Khanna's "mama", seemed disturbed with "all the theorizing" of Khanna's role in the crime. He declined to look back on Indrani and Khanna's relationship but added, "The last that there was any contact with Indrani or her family was when Vidhie visited Calcutta last year to celebrate the 75th birthday of her grandmother (Khanna's mother who lives with him)."     Khanna's Facebook posts on "karma" in the weeks and months following Sheena's alleged murder on April 24, 2012, make for interesting reading. On April 30, Khanna shared photo messages: "Say whatever, whenever the f*** you want to"; "Sometimes I get so weird, I even freak myself out".     On May 24, exactly a month after the alleged killing, he wrote: "You can never tell what people are thinking and feeling unless they tell you, and usually they lie. you ask them, 'Whats wrong?' and they say 'Nothing'. You accept this because it's easier than digging for the truth. People smile when they want to cry, they laugh when they want to scream and shout. They pretend like nothing is wrong because they don't want to face the truth. Things aren't always rainbows and butterflies, sometimes you gotta scream and cry your anger and sadness to the world, because you can only hold it in for so long before something in you snaps. so when you want to cry, cry. When you want to scream, scream. Don't hide behind fake smiles, it's ok to not be alright."     ||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Sheena-docu-Michail-add-to-mystery/articleshow/48701752.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:24 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Michail, Sheena's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered have raised a number of unanswered questions.    Two days after his mother, Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Michail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai Police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed that what he gave to police was enough to prove that Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora (who are actually parents of Indrani) as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. Some questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukherjea.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Michail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43 as mentioned in reports after her arrest.    Adding more to the suspense, Michail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Michail studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board examination, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that knew that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard that her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard that she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband who she introduced as Peter Mukherjea."    The two-member Mumbai Police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Michail, who on Wednesday, was the first one to reveal that Sheena was Indrani's daughter, twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Michail's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Michail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukherjae is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Michail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."  ||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Grandparents-are-Sheenas-mom-dad-on-birth-certificate/articleshow/48704559.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:24 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Mikhail, Sheena Bora's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered led to some unanswered questions on Thursday.    Two days after his mother Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Mikhail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed what he gave the police was enough to prove Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora, who are actually Indrani's parents, as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. However, many questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter. In many cases in India involving single mothers, grandparents are known to put in their names as father and mother.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukerjea, that is, 13 years after Sheena was born.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Mikhail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43.    Mikhail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Mikhail     studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board exam, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband, who she introduced as Peter Mukerjea."    The two-member Mumbai police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Mikhail twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Mikhail 's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time, he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Mikhail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukerjea is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Mikhail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Sheena-bowled-us-over-Rahuls-uncle/articleshow/48704552.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:24 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: Had things worked out as desired for Peter Mukherjea's first wife Shabnam and her family in Dehradun, Rahul Mukherjea and Sheena Bora would have been married for over three years now.     Shabnam's brother Shaleen Singh told TOI on Thursday that in 2011 Rahul brought Sheena to their sprawling home in Dehradun to seek approval from the family for their marriage.     The entire family-Shabnam, her younger brother Shaleen, father Anand Singh and mother Seema-were reportedly bowled over by Sheena's jovial nature and affection towards the elderly people. Impressed, the family gave its "unqualified and unanimous approval" for the wedding, which was supposed to take place within a few months, said Shaleen.     Stunned by the recent development, Shaleen said, "Sheena was among those rare persons who left a deep and lifelong impact on people. She was good-looking, a sweet person, clean of heart and good to talk to. None of us objected to the wedding."     Shaleen learnt of Sheena's murder through news channels. "It would have been great if she had become a part of the family. I don't know what was the cause and motive behind the heinous crime, but all those behind the killing of the jovial-natured girl should not be spared at any cost," he said.     A former model and tele-actor, 49-year-old Shaleen today owns the Sanskar International school in Jogiwala here. He recalled the last meeting with Shabnam and Rahul in April this year. "My father Anand Singh passed away in April. They had come to pay their respects but we did not interact much."     However, Shaleen said of late the interaction between him and his sister Shabnam was limited. Although Shabnam's farm Gul-e-Shabnam and Shaleen's residence Shankar Sadan are barely 200 metres away in Badripur, meetings between them were rare. While Shaleen and his mother stay on different floors of Shankar Sadan, Shabnam stays alone at her residence and is frequently visited by Rahul.     "There are matters in each family which we do not want to disclose. We are not against each other but do not interact much. She comes to meet our mother occasionally," said Shaleen, adding that Shabnam was passionate about painting and had a studio in her residence.     Shaleen denied having any details about the presence of Mumbai police in Dehradun. "Neither Doon police nor Mumbai police have contacted me over the issue."     Staff at Shabnam's residence said she was out-of-station but they were not aware of her whereabouts.||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Kilpauk-doctor-murder-Hubby-to-approach-court/articleshow/48704411.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:24 IST 2015||CHENNAI: It's been four days since police claimed to have solved the murder of S Sathya, 24, a PG medical student. However, her husband has put forth questions that police have failed to answer. Though investigating officers confirmed Sathya was not sexually assaulted before she was killed, they leaked to some section of media saying that they changed their stance on Wednesday and said there were indications of attempt to rape on the deceased.     Police personnel revealed the details soon after Sathya's husband Dr P Sesu, also employed at a primary health centre in Perambalur, expressed certain doubts.     He alleged the police hastily solved the case citing the state assembly, which is in motion. Sathya was found dead at her house in Kilpauk on August 20.     On August 23, police arrested Harintham Depnath, a BTech graduate, who lived at the second floor on the same apartment. Neither was there any mention about sexual assault or attempt on Sathya when the body was recovered from the house. The nor did the doctors. Police didn't tell this during the arrest of Depnath on August 23. "What forced the police to reveal about the sexual harassment attempt on my wife now?" asked Sesu.     "I want to live a peaceful life with my two sons - Tamil Nesan, 6, and Karmugilan, 4. The studies and the future of my children is important for me. I do respect the police personnel who spent sleepless nights to solve the murder, but there are questions that need to be answered," he said.     "I live in Perambalur with my children, but we speak through live video calls. I have told my sons that Sathya has gone to the God, as the Almighty likes her more. "Hereafter, we cannot speak or meet her. I don't know how far my children will admit it?" said Sesu. "I will approach the court seeking a fair probe into the murder of my wife. I want to find out the real cause behind her death. I want the real accused to get punished for his deed," said Sesu.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Woman-strangles-husbands-lover/articleshow/48704388.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:24 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A woman beat up and strangled her husband's partner, an assistant professor at a polytechnic in Choolaimedu, in their Thiruverkadu home on Thursday, police said. A court later remanded the accused, 32-year-old Shruti, in judicial custody.     Police said Sambasivam, a professor at Panimalar Engineering College in Poonamallee, used to bring Rajalakshmi, home frequently and introduced her to his wife Shruti as a colleague. He even dropped her home at night. The polytechnic where Rajalakshmi worked was part of the Panimalar group of educational institutions. Shruti initially believed the two were just colleagues until Sambasivam came home with Rajalakshmi on Tuesday and said the woman was moving in with them permanently.     On Wednesday morning, Sambasivam allegedly tied a 'mangalsutra' to Rajalakshmi in front of his wife, police said, based on Shruti's confession. A shocked Shruti picked up a fight with Sambasivam who asked her to maintain a cordial relationship and take care of Rajalakshmi. On Thursday morning, after he left for college a fight broke out between the two women.     Police said Rajalakshmi allegedly abused Sruthi and went into the bathroom. Sruthi followed her in and strangled her with the 'mangalsutra'. She then tried to make it appear that the woman had fainted in the bathroom. She took her in an autorickshaw to a nearby hospital where she was declared 'brought dead'. Doctors who noticed a few marks around her neck informed the Thiruverkadu police who registered a case of suspicious death under CrPC section 176.     The body was sent for postmortem to Kilpauk Medical College and Hospital.     After finding that the two women were at home at the time of the death, police interrogated Sruthi for more than an hour but she continued to maintain that Rajyalakshmi had died of injuries sustained when she fell down in the bathroom.     "She confessed to the murder when we told her that her fingerprints had been lifted from the scene of crime," said an investigating officer. "She said she had smashed the woman's head against the wall and later strangled her with the 'thali'." Police altered the case to murder and arrested Sruthi.     Initial inquiries revealed that Rajalakshmi had been married to a man named Rajasekhar for a while and they had separated. She then got married to Suresh, a relative who worked in a private firm, a few years ago and the couple moved into a house in Mogappair.     They allegedly had frequent quarrels as he tortured her and she left him too, police found.     Rajalakshmi then got a job with Panimalar Engineering College where she met Sambasivam. The two became friends and began seeing each other. Rajalakshmi recently moved to the polytechnic in Choolaimedu, police said.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/US-journalists-killer-annoyed-colleagues-Ex-boss/articleshow/48704167.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:24 IST 2015||ROANOKE, United States: The disgruntled former US television station employee who murdered two journalists had "annoyed" colleagues but showed no signs at work of any mental health issues, his former boss said Thursday.     Vester Lee Flanagan, 41, worked as a reporter for WDBJ in Roanoke, Virginia from March 2012 to February 2013, but was dismissed for poor performance and angry behavior, general manager Jeffrey Marks said.     On Wednesday, Flanagan shot and killed two of the CBS affiliate's journalists while they were conducting an on-air interview. He later fatally shot himself.     "We are still at a loss to figure out what happened to him in those two and a half years" since he was fired, Marks told a news conference flanked by dozens of staff, many of them holding hands.     "I don't think we identified that he had mental health issues. We certainly identified that he had performance issues."     Marks defended the station's hiring record and said its parent company had "a very elaborate program to screen employees."     Flanagan passed background checks and came with only positive references, Marks said.     It was only after he was hired, Marks said, that things went downhill.     "Vester's behavior annoyed a lot of people in the news station," Marks said.     Flanagan, who went by the on-screen name Bryce Williams, alleged in a manifesto faxed to ABC News that he was discriminated against as a gay, black journalist.     Marks said accusations in 2013 that he was treated unfairly were "immediately investigated and found to be without merit."     During his employment, Flanagan complied with demands that he seek medical help, but he was ultimately dismissed.     He was escorted from the building by police and made an ominous aside to the news director -- handing him a wooden cross and saying "'you'll need this'," Marks said.     As he left, he also made a "derogatory comment" to Adam Ward, the cameraman he shot dead on Wednesday.     Flanagan filed a complaint with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and a civil action suit, which were dismissed, he said.     "All of these investigations determined that no reasonable person would have taken any of the cited incidents as discrimination or harassment."     After killing Ward and reporter Alison Parker live on the air, Flanagan posted a video of the attack on social media.||ROANOKE, UNITED STATES
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:24 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/SC-acquits-Romesh-Sharma-in-Budhiraja-murder-case/articleshow/48704930.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:24 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Thursday upheld the Delhi High Court order acquitting former Congress leader Romesh Sharma in the case relating to the killing of fashion designer Kunjum Budhiraja.     A bench of Justices Pinaki Chandra Ghose and R K Agrawal dismissed an appeal filed by the Delhi government challenging HC order.     The Delhi government contended that the HC had erred in acquitting Sharma but it was strongly opposed by his counsel and senior advocate Siddharth Luthra who submitted that his client was in love with Kunjum and there was no evidence to prove his involvement in the case.     Sharma, who was alleged to be a frontman of underworld don Dawood Ibrahim, was convicted by a trial court on February 15, 2008. Kunjum was killed on March 20, 1999 at Sharma's South Delhi-based 'Jai Mata Di' farm house by a group of hired gangsters from Uttar Pradesh.     The trial court had convicted Sharma and five other accused in the case and had awarded life term to all. The HC, however, acquitted Sharma and co-accused Tejendir Verdi but upheld conviction and sentence of other four accused— Sharma's nephew Surinder Mishra, Hemchand, Santram and Ramesh alias Bobby.     While acquitting Sharma, the HC had said "Romesh Sharma and Kunjum were in love, and desired the company of each other. It does not establish that Sharma had got fed up with her". It had turned down Delhi police's contention that Sharma wanted to get rid of Kunjum as she knew about his alleged illegal activities.     "A grieving lover falling over the body of his mate and performing the rituals of a marriage can well be an expression of lasting love, and need not necessarily be a drama," the HC had said.     Sharma was in judicial custody at the time of the Kunjum's murder.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Raid-on-Bengaluru-centre-reveals-horror-tales/articleshow/48704718.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:24 IST 2015||BENGALURU: A State Human Rights Commission raid on a de-addiction centre in Jnanabharati Layout, near Kengeri, southwest Bengaluru, found 90 inmates living in pathetic conditions and subjected to inhuman treatment.     Thursday's raid followed the murder of an inmate of another de-addiction centre in Kothanur recently.     The SHRC raid on Sri Santhosh Social Service Society, also known as 4S Society, followed a tipoff. According to SHRC officials, the centre has been in existence for seven years at least, but the society couldn't produce documents of having obtained permission from the social welfare department. Commission officials said the centre had the permission from the DC and the DHO.     "Most inmates are between 20 and 35 years. They showed us signs of being physically abused. The centre has violated other norms too. Although it's supposed to have one nurse for every 15 patients and at least one in-house doctor and a psychiatrist, it didn't have any," said an SHRC spokesperson.     4 arrested for killing inmate:     Kothanur police arrested a de-addiction centre staffer and three inmates for allegedly beating to death a 28-year-old inmate. Dinesh was admitted to the centre by his family as he was an alcoholic. He was later found dead in a hospital. Family members noticed several bruises on his body. Narayana, an inmate-turned-staffer, gave some medicines to Dinesh, who later turned aggressive. Narayana sought the help of inmates Suresh, Subhan and Simon, to subdue Dinesh.     When Dinesh retaliated, the quartet overpowered him till he became unconscious. He died in hospital.||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/A-jolly-good-fellow-say-Khannas-friends/articleshow/48704630.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:24 IST 2015||Sanjeev Khanna, Indrani Mukerjea's second husband and suspected ally in Sheena Bora's killing, may be the most surprising element in this macabre drama, but his friends and associates in Kolkata refused to cast aspersions on "Sanju" just yet.     From being the biggest dart enthusiast at one of Kolkata's poshest clubs (the CC&FC) to having a finger in every pie, Sanjeev was everyone's "best mate" and go-to guy who friends described as: "A doer... someone who could get things done."     The morning after Khanna's arrest, TOI spoke to Ajay Rawla, the man who Khanna worked for as a consultant and whose house he was picked up from on Wednesday afternoon. "It wasn't like he was hiding like a desperate fugitive in my house. We had a meeting in the morning after which he drove me home and that's when news broke on television. We were sitting, watching, wondering what steps to take when the police arrived," explained Rawla.     Seven years his senior, Khanna's association with Rawla dates back to the time they went to Mayo College in Ajmer. Later, Khanna went on to become an aide for Rawla's pet projects. Besides running his own business in wireless communications, Khanna was there setting up chef Shaun Kenworthy and Rawla's restaurant 1658 or immersed in the heritage project of converting the Bawali Rajbari into a hotel. "He was getting all the construction work and labourers in place. He was very good in helping out with permissions through his connections with excise and contractors," remembers Kenworthy.     Khanna, who seldom missed his outings at the club, motor rallies and horse racing as a prominent face in the social circuit, was not the same man before he met Indrani, recounts Bull Banthia, a close friend. "Well-read and well-versed, Sanju had a great mechanical mind with a solution for everything," is how Bull chose to describe his "jolly good friend who loved meeting new people, hung out at the club but wasn't a social climber". "It was Indrani who emerged as this socialite and drove him to consciously build contacts with those higher up in the social rung after marriage," said the Kolkata-based entrepreneur. "That's the reason why I distanced myself from them until overnight she left Kolkata with their daughter and Sanju's wallet."     While Indrani never surfaces in conversations, his daughter Vidhie, who stayed with Indrani, is a fond subject with his friends. "He would miss his daughter but was resigned to fate, hoping that someday she would find him," said Rawla, adding, "It was Vidhie who called Sanjeev on Wednesday to give him the news."     No one seems to know about any recent interaction between Khanna and Indrani. G M Kapur, a known name in Kolkata who was Intach's state convener and happens to be Khanna's "mama", seemed disturbed with "all the theorizing" of Khanna's role in the crime. He declined to look back on Indrani and Khanna's relationship but added, "The last that there was any contact with Indrani or her family was when Vidhie visited Calcutta last year to celebrate the 75th birthday of her grandmother (Khanna's mother who lives with him)."     Khanna's Facebook posts on "karma" in the weeks and months following Sheena's alleged murder on April 24, 2012, make for interesting reading. On April 30, Khanna shared photo messages: "Say whatever, whenever the f*** you want to"; "Sometimes I get so weird, I even freak myself out".     On May 24, exactly a month after the alleged killing, he wrote: "You can never tell what people are thinking and feeling unless they tell you, and usually they lie. you ask them, 'Whats wrong?' and they say 'Nothing'. You accept this because it's easier than digging for the truth. People smile when they want to cry, they laugh when they want to scream and shout. They pretend like nothing is wrong because they don't want to face the truth. Things aren't always rainbows and butterflies, sometimes you gotta scream and cry your anger and sadness to the world, because you can only hold it in for so long before something in you snaps. so when you want to cry, cry. When you want to scream, scream. Don't hide behind fake smiles, it's ok to not be alright."     ||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Sheena-docu-Michail-add-to-mystery/articleshow/48701752.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:24 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Michail, Sheena's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered have raised a number of unanswered questions.    Two days after his mother, Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Michail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai Police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed that what he gave to police was enough to prove that Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora (who are actually parents of Indrani) as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. Some questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukherjea.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Michail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43 as mentioned in reports after her arrest.    Adding more to the suspense, Michail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Michail studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board examination, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that knew that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard that her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard that she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband who she introduced as Peter Mukherjea."    The two-member Mumbai Police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Michail, who on Wednesday, was the first one to reveal that Sheena was Indrani's daughter, twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Michail's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Michail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukherjae is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Michail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."  ||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Grandparents-are-Sheenas-mom-dad-on-birth-certificate/articleshow/48704559.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:24 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Mikhail, Sheena Bora's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered led to some unanswered questions on Thursday.    Two days after his mother Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Mikhail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed what he gave the police was enough to prove Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora, who are actually Indrani's parents, as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. However, many questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter. In many cases in India involving single mothers, grandparents are known to put in their names as father and mother.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukerjea, that is, 13 years after Sheena was born.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Mikhail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43.    Mikhail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Mikhail     studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board exam, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband, who she introduced as Peter Mukerjea."    The two-member Mumbai police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Mikhail twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Mikhail 's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time, he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Mikhail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukerjea is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Mikhail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Sheena-bowled-us-over-Rahuls-uncle/articleshow/48704552.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:24 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: Had things worked out as desired for Peter Mukherjea's first wife Shabnam and her family in Dehradun, Rahul Mukherjea and Sheena Bora would have been married for over three years now.     Shabnam's brother Shaleen Singh told TOI on Thursday that in 2011 Rahul brought Sheena to their sprawling home in Dehradun to seek approval from the family for their marriage.     The entire family-Shabnam, her younger brother Shaleen, father Anand Singh and mother Seema-were reportedly bowled over by Sheena's jovial nature and affection towards the elderly people. Impressed, the family gave its "unqualified and unanimous approval" for the wedding, which was supposed to take place within a few months, said Shaleen.     Stunned by the recent development, Shaleen said, "Sheena was among those rare persons who left a deep and lifelong impact on people. She was good-looking, a sweet person, clean of heart and good to talk to. None of us objected to the wedding."     Shaleen learnt of Sheena's murder through news channels. "It would have been great if she had become a part of the family. I don't know what was the cause and motive behind the heinous crime, but all those behind the killing of the jovial-natured girl should not be spared at any cost," he said.     A former model and tele-actor, 49-year-old Shaleen today owns the Sanskar International school in Jogiwala here. He recalled the last meeting with Shabnam and Rahul in April this year. "My father Anand Singh passed away in April. They had come to pay their respects but we did not interact much."     However, Shaleen said of late the interaction between him and his sister Shabnam was limited. Although Shabnam's farm Gul-e-Shabnam and Shaleen's residence Shankar Sadan are barely 200 metres away in Badripur, meetings between them were rare. While Shaleen and his mother stay on different floors of Shankar Sadan, Shabnam stays alone at her residence and is frequently visited by Rahul.     "There are matters in each family which we do not want to disclose. We are not against each other but do not interact much. She comes to meet our mother occasionally," said Shaleen, adding that Shabnam was passionate about painting and had a studio in her residence.     Shaleen denied having any details about the presence of Mumbai police in Dehradun. "Neither Doon police nor Mumbai police have contacted me over the issue."     Staff at Shabnam's residence said she was out-of-station but they were not aware of her whereabouts.||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Kilpauk-doctor-murder-Hubby-to-approach-court/articleshow/48704411.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:24 IST 2015||CHENNAI: It's been four days since police claimed to have solved the murder of S Sathya, 24, a PG medical student. However, her husband has put forth questions that police have failed to answer. Though investigating officers confirmed Sathya was not sexually assaulted before she was killed, they leaked to some section of media saying that they changed their stance on Wednesday and said there were indications of attempt to rape on the deceased.     Police personnel revealed the details soon after Sathya's husband Dr P Sesu, also employed at a primary health centre in Perambalur, expressed certain doubts.     He alleged the police hastily solved the case citing the state assembly, which is in motion. Sathya was found dead at her house in Kilpauk on August 20.     On August 23, police arrested Harintham Depnath, a BTech graduate, who lived at the second floor on the same apartment. Neither was there any mention about sexual assault or attempt on Sathya when the body was recovered from the house. The nor did the doctors. Police didn't tell this during the arrest of Depnath on August 23. "What forced the police to reveal about the sexual harassment attempt on my wife now?" asked Sesu.     "I want to live a peaceful life with my two sons - Tamil Nesan, 6, and Karmugilan, 4. The studies and the future of my children is important for me. I do respect the police personnel who spent sleepless nights to solve the murder, but there are questions that need to be answered," he said.     "I live in Perambalur with my children, but we speak through live video calls. I have told my sons that Sathya has gone to the God, as the Almighty likes her more. "Hereafter, we cannot speak or meet her. I don't know how far my children will admit it?" said Sesu. "I will approach the court seeking a fair probe into the murder of my wife. I want to find out the real cause behind her death. I want the real accused to get punished for his deed," said Sesu.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Woman-strangles-husbands-lover/articleshow/48704388.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:24 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A woman beat up and strangled her husband's partner, an assistant professor at a polytechnic in Choolaimedu, in their Thiruverkadu home on Thursday, police said. A court later remanded the accused, 32-year-old Shruti, in judicial custody.     Police said Sambasivam, a professor at Panimalar Engineering College in Poonamallee, used to bring Rajalakshmi, home frequently and introduced her to his wife Shruti as a colleague. He even dropped her home at night. The polytechnic where Rajalakshmi worked was part of the Panimalar group of educational institutions. Shruti initially believed the two were just colleagues until Sambasivam came home with Rajalakshmi on Tuesday and said the woman was moving in with them permanently.     On Wednesday morning, Sambasivam allegedly tied a 'mangalsutra' to Rajalakshmi in front of his wife, police said, based on Shruti's confession. A shocked Shruti picked up a fight with Sambasivam who asked her to maintain a cordial relationship and take care of Rajalakshmi. On Thursday morning, after he left for college a fight broke out between the two women.     Police said Rajalakshmi allegedly abused Sruthi and went into the bathroom. Sruthi followed her in and strangled her with the 'mangalsutra'. She then tried to make it appear that the woman had fainted in the bathroom. She took her in an autorickshaw to a nearby hospital where she was declared 'brought dead'. Doctors who noticed a few marks around her neck informed the Thiruverkadu police who registered a case of suspicious death under CrPC section 176.     The body was sent for postmortem to Kilpauk Medical College and Hospital.     After finding that the two women were at home at the time of the death, police interrogated Sruthi for more than an hour but she continued to maintain that Rajyalakshmi had died of injuries sustained when she fell down in the bathroom.     "She confessed to the murder when we told her that her fingerprints had been lifted from the scene of crime," said an investigating officer. "She said she had smashed the woman's head against the wall and later strangled her with the 'thali'." Police altered the case to murder and arrested Sruthi.     Initial inquiries revealed that Rajalakshmi had been married to a man named Rajasekhar for a while and they had separated. She then got married to Suresh, a relative who worked in a private firm, a few years ago and the couple moved into a house in Mogappair.     They allegedly had frequent quarrels as he tortured her and she left him too, police found.     Rajalakshmi then got a job with Panimalar Engineering College where she met Sambasivam. The two became friends and began seeing each other. Rajalakshmi recently moved to the polytechnic in Choolaimedu, police said.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/US-journalists-killer-annoyed-colleagues-Ex-boss/articleshow/48704167.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:24 IST 2015||ROANOKE, United States: The disgruntled former US television station employee who murdered two journalists had "annoyed" colleagues but showed no signs at work of any mental health issues, his former boss said Thursday.     Vester Lee Flanagan, 41, worked as a reporter for WDBJ in Roanoke, Virginia from March 2012 to February 2013, but was dismissed for poor performance and angry behavior, general manager Jeffrey Marks said.     On Wednesday, Flanagan shot and killed two of the CBS affiliate's journalists while they were conducting an on-air interview. He later fatally shot himself.     "We are still at a loss to figure out what happened to him in those two and a half years" since he was fired, Marks told a news conference flanked by dozens of staff, many of them holding hands.     "I don't think we identified that he had mental health issues. We certainly identified that he had performance issues."     Marks defended the station's hiring record and said its parent company had "a very elaborate program to screen employees."     Flanagan passed background checks and came with only positive references, Marks said.     It was only after he was hired, Marks said, that things went downhill.     "Vester's behavior annoyed a lot of people in the news station," Marks said.     Flanagan, who went by the on-screen name Bryce Williams, alleged in a manifesto faxed to ABC News that he was discriminated against as a gay, black journalist.     Marks said accusations in 2013 that he was treated unfairly were "immediately investigated and found to be without merit."     During his employment, Flanagan complied with demands that he seek medical help, but he was ultimately dismissed.     He was escorted from the building by police and made an ominous aside to the news director -- handing him a wooden cross and saying "'you'll need this'," Marks said.     As he left, he also made a "derogatory comment" to Adam Ward, the cameraman he shot dead on Wednesday.     Flanagan filed a complaint with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and a civil action suit, which were dismissed, he said.     "All of these investigations determined that no reasonable person would have taken any of the cited incidents as discrimination or harassment."     After killing Ward and reporter Alison Parker live on the air, Flanagan posted a video of the attack on social media.||ROANOKE, UNITED STATES
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/nagpur/Man-kills-2nd-wife-for-ill-treating-kids/articleshow/48519374.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:29 IST 2015||Bhandara: A man murdered his wife on Monday, allegedly because she was giving stepmotherly treatment to his children from the first wife, who had died earlier. After committing the murder, he went with his children to the Adyal police station and confessed. The police arrested him.  Haridas Istari Dudhpachare, 36, a resident of Wadad rehabilitation settlement has three children from his first wife. After his wife died, he married again and told his second wife to take care of his children. However, his second wife Babita (36) treated the children very cruelly while taking good care of her own son. Haridas had several times asked Babita to treat his children gently but there was no change in her behaviour.  So, on Monday, when Babita was asleep, he murdered her. At dawn, Haridas went to Adyal police station and narrated the gory incident. tnn  Police visited the village to ascertain the incident and then registered offences and arrested him.||BHANDARA
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/vadodara/Nurse-kills-infant-attempts-suicide/articleshow/48510799.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:29 IST 2015||VADODARA: A nurse working with a private hospital in Ahmedabad allegedly killed her one-year-old daughter and then attempted suicide in Bhatiwada village of Dahod district on Friday night.    The woman, Usha Bhuriya, pushed her daughter Aarvi into a watertank in the house and then slit her own wrist and throat, police said.    Police said that Usha and her husband Natwar, who works at a government granary in Devgadh Baria, had strained relationship.    "Usha was recently made permanent in her job. She wanted her husband to shift to Ahmedabad but he wasn't willing. The couple frequently had heated arguments over this issue," said H B Mehta, deputy superintendent of Dahod.    On Friday, Usha came to Bhatiwada with Aarvi and after spending time with her in-laws, she left for her new house nearby.    When she didn't return, her mother-in-law went looking for her and found the house locked from inside. The locals broke into the house and found her lying in a pool of blood.    The Dahod police booked Usha for murder while her brother filed a complaint of harassment against her husband and in-laws.  ||VADODARA
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/coimbatore/Police-go-tough-on-repeat-offenders-with-Goondas-Act/articleshow/48510405.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:29 IST 2015||COIMBATORE: The number of criminals detained by the police department under the Goondas Act has doubled in the last three years in the city. The Coimbatore district police department, which detained just 20 in 2013 and 26 in 2014, has so far detained more than 41 offenders under the act.    "In the past three years, the number of criminals has not increased in the city, but we have become more stringent. We want to ensure that criminals with more than two or three cases do not repeat the offence," said M Sudhakar, Superintendent of police.    Most of these offenders are either involved in robbery, chain snatching or house break-ins. "Some are also involved in the smuggling of PDS rice and other smuggling activities," said a police official. "    Sometimes filing the charge sheet gets delayed. Many times, the offenders apply for bail and get it. Very soon, we see them committing the same offence again," said an inspector of police.    M Selvan, 27, K Arjunan alias Komban, 23, and M Sujith, 26 -- all from Nagarcoil in Kanyakumari district -- murdered Karthik, 34, over a previous grudge. They were all detained as they were known to have a history.    "Generally, offenders with several criminal cases on them are only detained, because we know that once they are out they would commit the offence again. After they get released, we constantly monitor them as well," said a senior police official.    The city police, on the other hand, has detained nearly 49 anti-social elements under this act so far, of which 10 were booked for black market smuggling    . "In the city, most of the detentions are only because they keep repeating their offences. In Sai Baba colony, recently, two youngsters were booked for chain snatching and investigations revealed that one of them was an ex-convict and the other was part of several such chain snatching incidents in just a matter of one-and-a-half months. We immediately detained them," said a police official. Top officials said that Goondas act was more of a deterrent, as criminals are aware if they are caught again they would be detained.    A Muthu alias Thukkamuthu, 43, a native of Andipatti in Theni district, had more than 20 cases of robbery, break-ins, and dacoity pending against him at various stations. He was detained under Goondas after the district police suggested it.    "One of the examples of people repeating their offence was a ganja smuggler, Rahmath Chandra who was arrested by the Rathinapuri police. She kept repeating the offence," said an official.    Shutter Venkatesan was also detained under Goondas act had over 50 cases on him across the state. "We have recommended detention for three other offenders involved in the Seeranaickenpalayam dacoity and would detain them in a month's time," said a senior official.    The city police had detained 66 anti-social elements under the Goondas and four under National security act in 2013. In 2014, they have detained 49 under Goondas most of them rowdies and chain snatchers and 10 for black marketing.    "In the city, there is visible policing and so offenders and anti-social elements are scared to repeat the offence. But it is not the case in rural areas where policemen have to visit several villages, kilometers away from where the previous offence occurred," said a police official. The deputy commissioner, crime, Ramya Bharathi said that most of the notorious rowdies and anti-social elements involved in several property frauds are also detained under this act.    "When they are a threat to the communal harmony we detain them," said deputy commissioner, crime, Ramya Bharathi. Recently, Siddiq Ali who was involved in kidnapping of a girl was also detained under this act.    An activist added that most of these acts should be abolished as they were draconian and not on par with the judiciary of the state.  ||COIMBATORE
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/trichy/Wanted-criminal-held-in-Pondy-after-9-months-of-search/articleshow/48510203.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:29 IST 2015||TRICHY: A special Trichy city police team on Saturday arrested a notorious criminal who was on the run since last year at Puducherry. The accused, who gave police the slip in November, 2014 while returning from Pune, was lodged in the Trichy central prison on Sunday.     S Dhavamani, 29 of Pathirakottai near Panruti in Cuddalore district was allegedly involved in rape, murders, cheating and leaking of Tamil Nadu Public Service Commission (TNPSC) question papers. Acting on a tipoff, a special team led by Cantonment police inspector S Uma Shankar arrested him at Puducherry, where he was staying.     He was brought back to Trichy and interrogated by a police team including higher officials till Sunday evening, and then produced before a magistrate in Trichy who remanded him for judicial custody. "We received information about Dhavamani's whereabouts in Puducherry and nabbed him there. The breakthrough has come after nine months of search," Inspector Uma Shankar told TOI after he was lodged in the central prison here.     Dhavamani had been lodged in Trichy central prison last year after he was given 54 years of imprisonment in a rape and murder case booked against him in Cuddalore in 2012. Meanwhile, he was to be produced before a Pune court in connection with a murder case that took place in 2013.     A five-member police team led by a special sub-inspector (SSI) from Trichy took him to Pune by train and produced him in the court on November 25, 2014. Dhavamani gave the slip to police near Kulbaragi in Karnataka while they were returning to Trichy by train on November 27, 2014. His escape created embarrassment in the police department, since he was involved in a number of cases in Tamil Nadu and Maharashtra. Dhavamani was also named in the TNPSC question paper leaking scam between 2005 and 2010. The police men who escorted him were placed under suspension for their inability to keep a prisoner. KK Nagar police registered a case against him for the act.     While he was convicted in one case, he was tried for eight more cases in both the states. Despite forming special teams for investigation, there had been no clue for the past nine months.     ||TRICHY
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bhopal/Vyapam-fails-to-dent-BJP-at-hustings-big-win-in-civic-polls/articleshow/48510144.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:29 IST 2015||BHOPAL: In the first test of popularity at the hustings after the Vyapam scam, BJP swept the civic body elections, winning 8 of 10 civic bodies on Sunday. Congress and an Independent won one each.    Chief minister Shivraj Singh Chouhan on Sunday was elated by results of civic elections, the first electoral battle amid the raging scam. He said people of the state have spurned "negative politics" of the opposition which defamed Madhya Pradesh as "state of murderers".    Congress on the other hand said, "utter misuse of administrative machinery led to BJP's victory in the civic polls". Addressing party workers at BJP office, Chouhan said, "Our state is moving rapidly on the path of development. It has no place for negative politics." Chouhan said opposition party was creating atmosphere of suspicion in MP, but the poll results have exposed Congress.    Reacting to poll results, Congress spokesman K K Mishra said, "We respect people's mandate. The government misused official machinery during civic polls. Corrupt practices like distribution of money was also used during elections."    However, party's vice-president Manak Agrawal said, "if BJP thinks it is people's mandate on Vyapam, it's mistaken. If it thinks so, let the assembly be dissolved and fresh elections be announced on the Vyapam plank".    After BJP's victory, Prime Minister Narendra Modi has tweeted � MP civic poll results are gladdening. I thank people of MP for reposing trust on BJP. I salute supports of karyakartas and party leaders."  ||BHOPAL
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/varanasi/Cops-file-objections-on-don-Brijeshs-plea/articleshow/48509192.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:29 IST 2015||VARANASI: The Chandauli police have filed objections against mafia don Brijesh Singh's plea to consider him juvenile in Sikraura massacre case of 1986, by mentioning factual differences in his certificates of High School and primary classes.     Following objections by the police, the sessions court of Varanasi has fixed August 28 as the next date of hearing.     Station officer of Balua (Chandauli) Mahendra Kumar Pandey had filed objections before the session court on August 14. "Brijesh appeared before this court on August 6, when he produced his High School certificate mentioning his date of birth as July 1, 1968. He had sought benefit of Juvenile Justice (Care and Protection of Children) Act- 2000 by claiming that he was 17 years nine months and eight days old on the date of Sikraura massacre, which occurred on at night on April 9, 1986. Seven persons were murdered and two women suffered serious injuries. Against this claim, the court had given prosecution time to file objections on August 14.     In his objection, the SO Balua has mentioned that instead of submitting his original High School certificate, Brijesh had given photocopy of duplicate copy of certificate in which his father's name is mentioned as Ravindra Pratap Singh. In his certificates of primary and secondary schools, his father's name is mentioned as Ravindra Nath Singh. Police have also mentioned that Brijesh should not be given benefit of JJ Act 2000 as it was not effective at the time of massacre.     The don's lawyers had given this plea when Brijesh appeared before the court for second time in this case on August 6. Following Sikraura massacre, a case was registered against 14 persons, including Brijesh, under Sections 147, 148, 149, 302, 380, 120B of IPC and 25(1)(B) of Arms Act. Brijesh was absconding so his file was separated from the case file of other 13 accused on January 16, 1990.     On August 6, 2002 the fast track court ordered for acquittal of other accused, against which a criminal appeal was filed by the state government in Allahabad High Court. Ensuring compliance of HC order issued on January 29, 2007, the district judge Varanasi transferred all documents of this case to the high court on February 12, 2007.     Brijesh was arrested by Delhi police from Odisha in 2008.             ||VARANASI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Tension-after-dowry-killing-in-city/articleshow/48505721.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:29 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: Tension gripped the city's Fatashil Ambari area after one Sampa Sarkar was found dead at her in-laws' home on Sunday morning. She was allegedly murdered by her husband.    On the basis of the complaint of the deceased's father, city police recorded a dowry death case and arrested her husband, Rabi Mandal.    "After a month of her wedding, her in-laws started demanding dowry. We had given large amount of gold jewellery during the marriage but recently, Rabi was demanding Rs 2.5 lakh in cash. She was under tremendous torture," the deceased's father said.    Sources said she had informed a local women's group about her disturbed married life. The women's organization has promised her to settle the matter soon.    Angry locals vandalized Rabi's house and damaged property.    In a similar incident, newly-wed Rimpi Bora was poisoned to death, allegedly by her in-laws, due to dowry related conflict in Borpather of Golaghat district on Sunday. Police have arrested the husband, Bitu Bora.  ||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/ranchi/Mandar-witches-kin-want-freedom-from-stigma/articleshow/48505528.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:29 IST 2015||RANCHI: At a time when the entire state was basking in the celebrations of the 69th Independence Day on Saturday, some members of the civil society along with the family members of the five women of Mandar who were lynched for allegedly practicing witchcraft on August 7, took to the streets to protest against witch-hunting and questioned the very meaning of independence.    Wearing placards which read, 'Just because I am alone, I am not a witch', 'I am a widow, but not a witch', 'If I stop people from consuming alcohol, do I become a witch?' and such other questions, more than 20 people staged a protest at Albert Ekka Chowk. They were demanding freedom from the social evil called witch-hunting.    Anil Khalkho, whose mother Jacinta, was among the five women who were killed in Mandar, said, "We are yet to get justice. What was my mother's fault? It is time the country is freed from such evil practices."    Ajay Kumar Jaiswal, general secretary of the Association for Social and Human Awareness (ASHA), an NGO working towards prevention of witch-hunting in the state for over a decade, led the protest. He said, "This is to show that even after 68 years of independence, the women of our country are still waiting for freedom. Being a widow or protesting against an evil can lead to one being branded a witch here. In the last 15 years, around 1500 women have been killed after being branded witches."    As per the Jharkhand Police website, 36 women were killed in witch-hunt in 2012, 50 in 2013 and 44 in 2014.    From January to June, there have been 22 'witch hunt' murders as recorded in the Jharkhand police website.    In August, eight more killings for alleged witchcraft practises took place in the state. On August 7, five women were murdered by villagers in Mandar; a woman in Khunti was killed after being branded a witch on August 13; the very next day two men were lynched for practicing black magic in Lohardaga.    ASHA is conducting a survey of women, who were tortured for alleged witchcraft in the state.        ||RANCHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/ranchi/Protest-after-bizman-murder-in-Khunti/articleshow/48505508.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:29 IST 2015||RANCHI: Locals protested at the Ranchi-Chaibasa road against the murder of a businessman, blocking vehicular traffic for near about two hours on Sunday. The protestors demanded immediate arrest of the accused and refused to leave unless the perpetrators were brought to book.    A Khunti businessman was shot dead by unidentified gunmen on Sunday morning at Hutar, under Khunti police station. The businessman, Karamvir Mahto, 30, was shot from close range and died on the spot. Khunti SP Anish Gupta said initial investigations failed to clear the mystery behind the motivation . Three boys riding a bike stalked Mahto on Sunday, accosted him and then shot him before escaping.    The businessman lived in Khunti town and was engaged in construction materials business. The police records, according to SP Gupta, do not have any report of threat Mahto received from anyone. "He never perceived any threat to his life and did not report it to any police station," he said.    "It will be premature to make a comment on the motivation of murder. We have got important leads in the case. The boys will be identified and arrested soon. It might be out of business rivalry or for extortion money. A fair investigation has begun," Gupta said.    A source said police suspect involvement of People's Liberation Front of India (PLFI), a Left-wing extremism outfit active in Khunti. "The sources have informed us that the men suspected to be behind the murdered him share association with PLFI," Gupta said.    Khunti SP said that Karamvir Mahto was also associated with a criminal gang named Samrat Group active in Khunti and neighbouring Simdega districts. "He used to have a friendly relation with Shui Sahu, a senior leader of the banned criminal group. We will also check his criminal records," he said.        ||RANCHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Despite-Vyapam-BJP-sweeps-MP-civic-polls/articleshow/48507008.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:29 IST 2015||BHOPAL: In the first test of popularity after the Vyapam scam broke, the BJP swept the civic body elections, winning eight of 10 local bodies on Sunday. The Congress won one seat, while an Independent backed by the BJP won another.     Reacting to the victory, Prime Minister Narendra Modi tweeted, "MP civic poll results are gladdening. I thank people of MP for reposing their trust in BJP. I salute efforts of Karyakartas & party leaders."     Chief minister Shivraj Singh Chouhan said the people had spurned "negative politics" of the Congress which was trying to defame Madhya Pradesh as a "state of murderers". The Congress, on the other hand, said, "The utter misuse of administrative machinery led to BJP's victory in the civic polls."     The setback to the Congress, nevertheless, does raise questions whether the party's tactic — of stalling parliament using Vyapam as one of the issues to attack the government — is at all working at the ground level. Congress impresarios Digvijaya Singh and Jyotiraditya Scindia, who had played a key role in organizing the protests from Madhya Pradesh, were unavailable for comment.     Addressing party workers at BJP office, Chouhan said, "Our state is moving rapidly on the path of development. It has no place for negative politics," adding that the results have exposed the Congress.     Reacting to the results, Congress spokesman K K Mishra said, "We respect people's mandate. The government misused official machinery during civic polls. Corrupt practices like distribution of money were also used during elections."     However, party's vice-president Manak Agrawal said, "If the BJP thinks it's the people's mandate on Vyapam, it's mistaken. If it thinks so, let the assembly be dissolved and fresh elections be announced on the Vyapam plank."     The BJP won in Morena, Ujjain, Harda, Chakghat in Rewa district, Bhainsdehi in Betul district, Kotar in Satna, Suwasara in Mandsaur and Vidisha municipal bodies.     A Congress and an Independent candidate were elected as president of municipalities in Sarangpur in Rajgarh district and Guhwara in Chhattarpur district.     BJP had swept the civic polls in the state held earlier this year. In all, BJP rules 16 corporations across MP.||BHOPAL
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:29 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:29 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/SC-acquits-Romesh-Sharma-in-Budhiraja-murder-case/articleshow/48704930.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:29 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Thursday upheld the Delhi High Court order acquitting former Congress leader Romesh Sharma in the case relating to the killing of fashion designer Kunjum Budhiraja.     A bench of Justices Pinaki Chandra Ghose and R K Agrawal dismissed an appeal filed by the Delhi government challenging HC order.     The Delhi government contended that the HC had erred in acquitting Sharma but it was strongly opposed by his counsel and senior advocate Siddharth Luthra who submitted that his client was in love with Kunjum and there was no evidence to prove his involvement in the case.     Sharma, who was alleged to be a frontman of underworld don Dawood Ibrahim, was convicted by a trial court on February 15, 2008. Kunjum was killed on March 20, 1999 at Sharma's South Delhi-based 'Jai Mata Di' farm house by a group of hired gangsters from Uttar Pradesh.     The trial court had convicted Sharma and five other accused in the case and had awarded life term to all. The HC, however, acquitted Sharma and co-accused Tejendir Verdi but upheld conviction and sentence of other four accused— Sharma's nephew Surinder Mishra, Hemchand, Santram and Ramesh alias Bobby.     While acquitting Sharma, the HC had said "Romesh Sharma and Kunjum were in love, and desired the company of each other. It does not establish that Sharma had got fed up with her". It had turned down Delhi police's contention that Sharma wanted to get rid of Kunjum as she knew about his alleged illegal activities.     "A grieving lover falling over the body of his mate and performing the rituals of a marriage can well be an expression of lasting love, and need not necessarily be a drama," the HC had said.     Sharma was in judicial custody at the time of the Kunjum's murder.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Raid-on-Bengaluru-centre-reveals-horror-tales/articleshow/48704718.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:29 IST 2015||BENGALURU: A State Human Rights Commission raid on a de-addiction centre in Jnanabharati Layout, near Kengeri, southwest Bengaluru, found 90 inmates living in pathetic conditions and subjected to inhuman treatment.     Thursday's raid followed the murder of an inmate of another de-addiction centre in Kothanur recently.     The SHRC raid on Sri Santhosh Social Service Society, also known as 4S Society, followed a tipoff. According to SHRC officials, the centre has been in existence for seven years at least, but the society couldn't produce documents of having obtained permission from the social welfare department. Commission officials said the centre had the permission from the DC and the DHO.     "Most inmates are between 20 and 35 years. They showed us signs of being physically abused. The centre has violated other norms too. Although it's supposed to have one nurse for every 15 patients and at least one in-house doctor and a psychiatrist, it didn't have any," said an SHRC spokesperson.     4 arrested for killing inmate:     Kothanur police arrested a de-addiction centre staffer and three inmates for allegedly beating to death a 28-year-old inmate. Dinesh was admitted to the centre by his family as he was an alcoholic. He was later found dead in a hospital. Family members noticed several bruises on his body. Narayana, an inmate-turned-staffer, gave some medicines to Dinesh, who later turned aggressive. Narayana sought the help of inmates Suresh, Subhan and Simon, to subdue Dinesh.     When Dinesh retaliated, the quartet overpowered him till he became unconscious. He died in hospital.||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/A-jolly-good-fellow-say-Khannas-friends/articleshow/48704630.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:29 IST 2015||Sanjeev Khanna, Indrani Mukerjea's second husband and suspected ally in Sheena Bora's killing, may be the most surprising element in this macabre drama, but his friends and associates in Kolkata refused to cast aspersions on "Sanju" just yet.     From being the biggest dart enthusiast at one of Kolkata's poshest clubs (the CC&FC) to having a finger in every pie, Sanjeev was everyone's "best mate" and go-to guy who friends described as: "A doer... someone who could get things done."     The morning after Khanna's arrest, TOI spoke to Ajay Rawla, the man who Khanna worked for as a consultant and whose house he was picked up from on Wednesday afternoon. "It wasn't like he was hiding like a desperate fugitive in my house. We had a meeting in the morning after which he drove me home and that's when news broke on television. We were sitting, watching, wondering what steps to take when the police arrived," explained Rawla.     Seven years his senior, Khanna's association with Rawla dates back to the time they went to Mayo College in Ajmer. Later, Khanna went on to become an aide for Rawla's pet projects. Besides running his own business in wireless communications, Khanna was there setting up chef Shaun Kenworthy and Rawla's restaurant 1658 or immersed in the heritage project of converting the Bawali Rajbari into a hotel. "He was getting all the construction work and labourers in place. He was very good in helping out with permissions through his connections with excise and contractors," remembers Kenworthy.     Khanna, who seldom missed his outings at the club, motor rallies and horse racing as a prominent face in the social circuit, was not the same man before he met Indrani, recounts Bull Banthia, a close friend. "Well-read and well-versed, Sanju had a great mechanical mind with a solution for everything," is how Bull chose to describe his "jolly good friend who loved meeting new people, hung out at the club but wasn't a social climber". "It was Indrani who emerged as this socialite and drove him to consciously build contacts with those higher up in the social rung after marriage," said the Kolkata-based entrepreneur. "That's the reason why I distanced myself from them until overnight she left Kolkata with their daughter and Sanju's wallet."     While Indrani never surfaces in conversations, his daughter Vidhie, who stayed with Indrani, is a fond subject with his friends. "He would miss his daughter but was resigned to fate, hoping that someday she would find him," said Rawla, adding, "It was Vidhie who called Sanjeev on Wednesday to give him the news."     No one seems to know about any recent interaction between Khanna and Indrani. G M Kapur, a known name in Kolkata who was Intach's state convener and happens to be Khanna's "mama", seemed disturbed with "all the theorizing" of Khanna's role in the crime. He declined to look back on Indrani and Khanna's relationship but added, "The last that there was any contact with Indrani or her family was when Vidhie visited Calcutta last year to celebrate the 75th birthday of her grandmother (Khanna's mother who lives with him)."     Khanna's Facebook posts on "karma" in the weeks and months following Sheena's alleged murder on April 24, 2012, make for interesting reading. On April 30, Khanna shared photo messages: "Say whatever, whenever the f*** you want to"; "Sometimes I get so weird, I even freak myself out".     On May 24, exactly a month after the alleged killing, he wrote: "You can never tell what people are thinking and feeling unless they tell you, and usually they lie. you ask them, 'Whats wrong?' and they say 'Nothing'. You accept this because it's easier than digging for the truth. People smile when they want to cry, they laugh when they want to scream and shout. They pretend like nothing is wrong because they don't want to face the truth. Things aren't always rainbows and butterflies, sometimes you gotta scream and cry your anger and sadness to the world, because you can only hold it in for so long before something in you snaps. so when you want to cry, cry. When you want to scream, scream. Don't hide behind fake smiles, it's ok to not be alright."     ||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Sheena-docu-Michail-add-to-mystery/articleshow/48701752.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:29 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Michail, Sheena's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered have raised a number of unanswered questions.    Two days after his mother, Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Michail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai Police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed that what he gave to police was enough to prove that Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora (who are actually parents of Indrani) as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. Some questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukherjea.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Michail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43 as mentioned in reports after her arrest.    Adding more to the suspense, Michail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Michail studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board examination, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that knew that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard that her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard that she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband who she introduced as Peter Mukherjea."    The two-member Mumbai Police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Michail, who on Wednesday, was the first one to reveal that Sheena was Indrani's daughter, twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Michail's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Michail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukherjae is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Michail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."  ||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Grandparents-are-Sheenas-mom-dad-on-birth-certificate/articleshow/48704559.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:29 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Mikhail, Sheena Bora's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered led to some unanswered questions on Thursday.    Two days after his mother Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Mikhail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed what he gave the police was enough to prove Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora, who are actually Indrani's parents, as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. However, many questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter. In many cases in India involving single mothers, grandparents are known to put in their names as father and mother.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukerjea, that is, 13 years after Sheena was born.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Mikhail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43.    Mikhail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Mikhail     studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board exam, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband, who she introduced as Peter Mukerjea."    The two-member Mumbai police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Mikhail twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Mikhail 's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time, he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Mikhail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukerjea is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Mikhail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Sheena-bowled-us-over-Rahuls-uncle/articleshow/48704552.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:29 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: Had things worked out as desired for Peter Mukherjea's first wife Shabnam and her family in Dehradun, Rahul Mukherjea and Sheena Bora would have been married for over three years now.     Shabnam's brother Shaleen Singh told TOI on Thursday that in 2011 Rahul brought Sheena to their sprawling home in Dehradun to seek approval from the family for their marriage.     The entire family-Shabnam, her younger brother Shaleen, father Anand Singh and mother Seema-were reportedly bowled over by Sheena's jovial nature and affection towards the elderly people. Impressed, the family gave its "unqualified and unanimous approval" for the wedding, which was supposed to take place within a few months, said Shaleen.     Stunned by the recent development, Shaleen said, "Sheena was among those rare persons who left a deep and lifelong impact on people. She was good-looking, a sweet person, clean of heart and good to talk to. None of us objected to the wedding."     Shaleen learnt of Sheena's murder through news channels. "It would have been great if she had become a part of the family. I don't know what was the cause and motive behind the heinous crime, but all those behind the killing of the jovial-natured girl should not be spared at any cost," he said.     A former model and tele-actor, 49-year-old Shaleen today owns the Sanskar International school in Jogiwala here. He recalled the last meeting with Shabnam and Rahul in April this year. "My father Anand Singh passed away in April. They had come to pay their respects but we did not interact much."     However, Shaleen said of late the interaction between him and his sister Shabnam was limited. Although Shabnam's farm Gul-e-Shabnam and Shaleen's residence Shankar Sadan are barely 200 metres away in Badripur, meetings between them were rare. While Shaleen and his mother stay on different floors of Shankar Sadan, Shabnam stays alone at her residence and is frequently visited by Rahul.     "There are matters in each family which we do not want to disclose. We are not against each other but do not interact much. She comes to meet our mother occasionally," said Shaleen, adding that Shabnam was passionate about painting and had a studio in her residence.     Shaleen denied having any details about the presence of Mumbai police in Dehradun. "Neither Doon police nor Mumbai police have contacted me over the issue."     Staff at Shabnam's residence said she was out-of-station but they were not aware of her whereabouts.||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Kilpauk-doctor-murder-Hubby-to-approach-court/articleshow/48704411.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:29 IST 2015||CHENNAI: It's been four days since police claimed to have solved the murder of S Sathya, 24, a PG medical student. However, her husband has put forth questions that police have failed to answer. Though investigating officers confirmed Sathya was not sexually assaulted before she was killed, they leaked to some section of media saying that they changed their stance on Wednesday and said there were indications of attempt to rape on the deceased.     Police personnel revealed the details soon after Sathya's husband Dr P Sesu, also employed at a primary health centre in Perambalur, expressed certain doubts.     He alleged the police hastily solved the case citing the state assembly, which is in motion. Sathya was found dead at her house in Kilpauk on August 20.     On August 23, police arrested Harintham Depnath, a BTech graduate, who lived at the second floor on the same apartment. Neither was there any mention about sexual assault or attempt on Sathya when the body was recovered from the house. The nor did the doctors. Police didn't tell this during the arrest of Depnath on August 23. "What forced the police to reveal about the sexual harassment attempt on my wife now?" asked Sesu.     "I want to live a peaceful life with my two sons - Tamil Nesan, 6, and Karmugilan, 4. The studies and the future of my children is important for me. I do respect the police personnel who spent sleepless nights to solve the murder, but there are questions that need to be answered," he said.     "I live in Perambalur with my children, but we speak through live video calls. I have told my sons that Sathya has gone to the God, as the Almighty likes her more. "Hereafter, we cannot speak or meet her. I don't know how far my children will admit it?" said Sesu. "I will approach the court seeking a fair probe into the murder of my wife. I want to find out the real cause behind her death. I want the real accused to get punished for his deed," said Sesu.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Woman-strangles-husbands-lover/articleshow/48704388.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:29 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A woman beat up and strangled her husband's partner, an assistant professor at a polytechnic in Choolaimedu, in their Thiruverkadu home on Thursday, police said. A court later remanded the accused, 32-year-old Shruti, in judicial custody.     Police said Sambasivam, a professor at Panimalar Engineering College in Poonamallee, used to bring Rajalakshmi, home frequently and introduced her to his wife Shruti as a colleague. He even dropped her home at night. The polytechnic where Rajalakshmi worked was part of the Panimalar group of educational institutions. Shruti initially believed the two were just colleagues until Sambasivam came home with Rajalakshmi on Tuesday and said the woman was moving in with them permanently.     On Wednesday morning, Sambasivam allegedly tied a 'mangalsutra' to Rajalakshmi in front of his wife, police said, based on Shruti's confession. A shocked Shruti picked up a fight with Sambasivam who asked her to maintain a cordial relationship and take care of Rajalakshmi. On Thursday morning, after he left for college a fight broke out between the two women.     Police said Rajalakshmi allegedly abused Sruthi and went into the bathroom. Sruthi followed her in and strangled her with the 'mangalsutra'. She then tried to make it appear that the woman had fainted in the bathroom. She took her in an autorickshaw to a nearby hospital where she was declared 'brought dead'. Doctors who noticed a few marks around her neck informed the Thiruverkadu police who registered a case of suspicious death under CrPC section 176.     The body was sent for postmortem to Kilpauk Medical College and Hospital.     After finding that the two women were at home at the time of the death, police interrogated Sruthi for more than an hour but she continued to maintain that Rajyalakshmi had died of injuries sustained when she fell down in the bathroom.     "She confessed to the murder when we told her that her fingerprints had been lifted from the scene of crime," said an investigating officer. "She said she had smashed the woman's head against the wall and later strangled her with the 'thali'." Police altered the case to murder and arrested Sruthi.     Initial inquiries revealed that Rajalakshmi had been married to a man named Rajasekhar for a while and they had separated. She then got married to Suresh, a relative who worked in a private firm, a few years ago and the couple moved into a house in Mogappair.     They allegedly had frequent quarrels as he tortured her and she left him too, police found.     Rajalakshmi then got a job with Panimalar Engineering College where she met Sambasivam. The two became friends and began seeing each other. Rajalakshmi recently moved to the polytechnic in Choolaimedu, police said.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/US-journalists-killer-annoyed-colleagues-Ex-boss/articleshow/48704167.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:29 IST 2015||ROANOKE, United States: The disgruntled former US television station employee who murdered two journalists had "annoyed" colleagues but showed no signs at work of any mental health issues, his former boss said Thursday.     Vester Lee Flanagan, 41, worked as a reporter for WDBJ in Roanoke, Virginia from March 2012 to February 2013, but was dismissed for poor performance and angry behavior, general manager Jeffrey Marks said.     On Wednesday, Flanagan shot and killed two of the CBS affiliate's journalists while they were conducting an on-air interview. He later fatally shot himself.     "We are still at a loss to figure out what happened to him in those two and a half years" since he was fired, Marks told a news conference flanked by dozens of staff, many of them holding hands.     "I don't think we identified that he had mental health issues. We certainly identified that he had performance issues."     Marks defended the station's hiring record and said its parent company had "a very elaborate program to screen employees."     Flanagan passed background checks and came with only positive references, Marks said.     It was only after he was hired, Marks said, that things went downhill.     "Vester's behavior annoyed a lot of people in the news station," Marks said.     Flanagan, who went by the on-screen name Bryce Williams, alleged in a manifesto faxed to ABC News that he was discriminated against as a gay, black journalist.     Marks said accusations in 2013 that he was treated unfairly were "immediately investigated and found to be without merit."     During his employment, Flanagan complied with demands that he seek medical help, but he was ultimately dismissed.     He was escorted from the building by police and made an ominous aside to the news director -- handing him a wooden cross and saying "'you'll need this'," Marks said.     As he left, he also made a "derogatory comment" to Adam Ward, the cameraman he shot dead on Wednesday.     Flanagan filed a complaint with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and a civil action suit, which were dismissed, he said.     "All of these investigations determined that no reasonable person would have taken any of the cited incidents as discrimination or harassment."     After killing Ward and reporter Alison Parker live on the air, Flanagan posted a video of the attack on social media.||ROANOKE, UNITED STATES
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:29 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/SC-acquits-Romesh-Sharma-in-Budhiraja-murder-case/articleshow/48704930.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:29 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Thursday upheld the Delhi High Court order acquitting former Congress leader Romesh Sharma in the case relating to the killing of fashion designer Kunjum Budhiraja.     A bench of Justices Pinaki Chandra Ghose and R K Agrawal dismissed an appeal filed by the Delhi government challenging HC order.     The Delhi government contended that the HC had erred in acquitting Sharma but it was strongly opposed by his counsel and senior advocate Siddharth Luthra who submitted that his client was in love with Kunjum and there was no evidence to prove his involvement in the case.     Sharma, who was alleged to be a frontman of underworld don Dawood Ibrahim, was convicted by a trial court on February 15, 2008. Kunjum was killed on March 20, 1999 at Sharma's South Delhi-based 'Jai Mata Di' farm house by a group of hired gangsters from Uttar Pradesh.     The trial court had convicted Sharma and five other accused in the case and had awarded life term to all. The HC, however, acquitted Sharma and co-accused Tejendir Verdi but upheld conviction and sentence of other four accused— Sharma's nephew Surinder Mishra, Hemchand, Santram and Ramesh alias Bobby.     While acquitting Sharma, the HC had said "Romesh Sharma and Kunjum were in love, and desired the company of each other. It does not establish that Sharma had got fed up with her". It had turned down Delhi police's contention that Sharma wanted to get rid of Kunjum as she knew about his alleged illegal activities.     "A grieving lover falling over the body of his mate and performing the rituals of a marriage can well be an expression of lasting love, and need not necessarily be a drama," the HC had said.     Sharma was in judicial custody at the time of the Kunjum's murder.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Raid-on-Bengaluru-centre-reveals-horror-tales/articleshow/48704718.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:29 IST 2015||BENGALURU: A State Human Rights Commission raid on a de-addiction centre in Jnanabharati Layout, near Kengeri, southwest Bengaluru, found 90 inmates living in pathetic conditions and subjected to inhuman treatment.     Thursday's raid followed the murder of an inmate of another de-addiction centre in Kothanur recently.     The SHRC raid on Sri Santhosh Social Service Society, also known as 4S Society, followed a tipoff. According to SHRC officials, the centre has been in existence for seven years at least, but the society couldn't produce documents of having obtained permission from the social welfare department. Commission officials said the centre had the permission from the DC and the DHO.     "Most inmates are between 20 and 35 years. They showed us signs of being physically abused. The centre has violated other norms too. Although it's supposed to have one nurse for every 15 patients and at least one in-house doctor and a psychiatrist, it didn't have any," said an SHRC spokesperson.     4 arrested for killing inmate:     Kothanur police arrested a de-addiction centre staffer and three inmates for allegedly beating to death a 28-year-old inmate. Dinesh was admitted to the centre by his family as he was an alcoholic. He was later found dead in a hospital. Family members noticed several bruises on his body. Narayana, an inmate-turned-staffer, gave some medicines to Dinesh, who later turned aggressive. Narayana sought the help of inmates Suresh, Subhan and Simon, to subdue Dinesh.     When Dinesh retaliated, the quartet overpowered him till he became unconscious. He died in hospital.||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/A-jolly-good-fellow-say-Khannas-friends/articleshow/48704630.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:29 IST 2015||Sanjeev Khanna, Indrani Mukerjea's second husband and suspected ally in Sheena Bora's killing, may be the most surprising element in this macabre drama, but his friends and associates in Kolkata refused to cast aspersions on "Sanju" just yet.     From being the biggest dart enthusiast at one of Kolkata's poshest clubs (the CC&FC) to having a finger in every pie, Sanjeev was everyone's "best mate" and go-to guy who friends described as: "A doer... someone who could get things done."     The morning after Khanna's arrest, TOI spoke to Ajay Rawla, the man who Khanna worked for as a consultant and whose house he was picked up from on Wednesday afternoon. "It wasn't like he was hiding like a desperate fugitive in my house. We had a meeting in the morning after which he drove me home and that's when news broke on television. We were sitting, watching, wondering what steps to take when the police arrived," explained Rawla.     Seven years his senior, Khanna's association with Rawla dates back to the time they went to Mayo College in Ajmer. Later, Khanna went on to become an aide for Rawla's pet projects. Besides running his own business in wireless communications, Khanna was there setting up chef Shaun Kenworthy and Rawla's restaurant 1658 or immersed in the heritage project of converting the Bawali Rajbari into a hotel. "He was getting all the construction work and labourers in place. He was very good in helping out with permissions through his connections with excise and contractors," remembers Kenworthy.     Khanna, who seldom missed his outings at the club, motor rallies and horse racing as a prominent face in the social circuit, was not the same man before he met Indrani, recounts Bull Banthia, a close friend. "Well-read and well-versed, Sanju had a great mechanical mind with a solution for everything," is how Bull chose to describe his "jolly good friend who loved meeting new people, hung out at the club but wasn't a social climber". "It was Indrani who emerged as this socialite and drove him to consciously build contacts with those higher up in the social rung after marriage," said the Kolkata-based entrepreneur. "That's the reason why I distanced myself from them until overnight she left Kolkata with their daughter and Sanju's wallet."     While Indrani never surfaces in conversations, his daughter Vidhie, who stayed with Indrani, is a fond subject with his friends. "He would miss his daughter but was resigned to fate, hoping that someday she would find him," said Rawla, adding, "It was Vidhie who called Sanjeev on Wednesday to give him the news."     No one seems to know about any recent interaction between Khanna and Indrani. G M Kapur, a known name in Kolkata who was Intach's state convener and happens to be Khanna's "mama", seemed disturbed with "all the theorizing" of Khanna's role in the crime. He declined to look back on Indrani and Khanna's relationship but added, "The last that there was any contact with Indrani or her family was when Vidhie visited Calcutta last year to celebrate the 75th birthday of her grandmother (Khanna's mother who lives with him)."     Khanna's Facebook posts on "karma" in the weeks and months following Sheena's alleged murder on April 24, 2012, make for interesting reading. On April 30, Khanna shared photo messages: "Say whatever, whenever the f*** you want to"; "Sometimes I get so weird, I even freak myself out".     On May 24, exactly a month after the alleged killing, he wrote: "You can never tell what people are thinking and feeling unless they tell you, and usually they lie. you ask them, 'Whats wrong?' and they say 'Nothing'. You accept this because it's easier than digging for the truth. People smile when they want to cry, they laugh when they want to scream and shout. They pretend like nothing is wrong because they don't want to face the truth. Things aren't always rainbows and butterflies, sometimes you gotta scream and cry your anger and sadness to the world, because you can only hold it in for so long before something in you snaps. so when you want to cry, cry. When you want to scream, scream. Don't hide behind fake smiles, it's ok to not be alright."     ||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Sheena-docu-Michail-add-to-mystery/articleshow/48701752.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:29 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Michail, Sheena's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered have raised a number of unanswered questions.    Two days after his mother, Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Michail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai Police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed that what he gave to police was enough to prove that Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora (who are actually parents of Indrani) as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. Some questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukherjea.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Michail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43 as mentioned in reports after her arrest.    Adding more to the suspense, Michail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Michail studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board examination, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that knew that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard that her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard that she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband who she introduced as Peter Mukherjea."    The two-member Mumbai Police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Michail, who on Wednesday, was the first one to reveal that Sheena was Indrani's daughter, twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Michail's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Michail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukherjae is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Michail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."  ||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Grandparents-are-Sheenas-mom-dad-on-birth-certificate/articleshow/48704559.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:29 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Mikhail, Sheena Bora's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered led to some unanswered questions on Thursday.    Two days after his mother Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Mikhail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed what he gave the police was enough to prove Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora, who are actually Indrani's parents, as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. However, many questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter. In many cases in India involving single mothers, grandparents are known to put in their names as father and mother.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukerjea, that is, 13 years after Sheena was born.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Mikhail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43.    Mikhail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Mikhail     studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board exam, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband, who she introduced as Peter Mukerjea."    The two-member Mumbai police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Mikhail twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Mikhail 's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time, he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Mikhail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukerjea is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Mikhail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Sheena-bowled-us-over-Rahuls-uncle/articleshow/48704552.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:29 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: Had things worked out as desired for Peter Mukherjea's first wife Shabnam and her family in Dehradun, Rahul Mukherjea and Sheena Bora would have been married for over three years now.     Shabnam's brother Shaleen Singh told TOI on Thursday that in 2011 Rahul brought Sheena to their sprawling home in Dehradun to seek approval from the family for their marriage.     The entire family-Shabnam, her younger brother Shaleen, father Anand Singh and mother Seema-were reportedly bowled over by Sheena's jovial nature and affection towards the elderly people. Impressed, the family gave its "unqualified and unanimous approval" for the wedding, which was supposed to take place within a few months, said Shaleen.     Stunned by the recent development, Shaleen said, "Sheena was among those rare persons who left a deep and lifelong impact on people. She was good-looking, a sweet person, clean of heart and good to talk to. None of us objected to the wedding."     Shaleen learnt of Sheena's murder through news channels. "It would have been great if she had become a part of the family. I don't know what was the cause and motive behind the heinous crime, but all those behind the killing of the jovial-natured girl should not be spared at any cost," he said.     A former model and tele-actor, 49-year-old Shaleen today owns the Sanskar International school in Jogiwala here. He recalled the last meeting with Shabnam and Rahul in April this year. "My father Anand Singh passed away in April. They had come to pay their respects but we did not interact much."     However, Shaleen said of late the interaction between him and his sister Shabnam was limited. Although Shabnam's farm Gul-e-Shabnam and Shaleen's residence Shankar Sadan are barely 200 metres away in Badripur, meetings between them were rare. While Shaleen and his mother stay on different floors of Shankar Sadan, Shabnam stays alone at her residence and is frequently visited by Rahul.     "There are matters in each family which we do not want to disclose. We are not against each other but do not interact much. She comes to meet our mother occasionally," said Shaleen, adding that Shabnam was passionate about painting and had a studio in her residence.     Shaleen denied having any details about the presence of Mumbai police in Dehradun. "Neither Doon police nor Mumbai police have contacted me over the issue."     Staff at Shabnam's residence said she was out-of-station but they were not aware of her whereabouts.||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Kilpauk-doctor-murder-Hubby-to-approach-court/articleshow/48704411.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:29 IST 2015||CHENNAI: It's been four days since police claimed to have solved the murder of S Sathya, 24, a PG medical student. However, her husband has put forth questions that police have failed to answer. Though investigating officers confirmed Sathya was not sexually assaulted before she was killed, they leaked to some section of media saying that they changed their stance on Wednesday and said there were indications of attempt to rape on the deceased.     Police personnel revealed the details soon after Sathya's husband Dr P Sesu, also employed at a primary health centre in Perambalur, expressed certain doubts.     He alleged the police hastily solved the case citing the state assembly, which is in motion. Sathya was found dead at her house in Kilpauk on August 20.     On August 23, police arrested Harintham Depnath, a BTech graduate, who lived at the second floor on the same apartment. Neither was there any mention about sexual assault or attempt on Sathya when the body was recovered from the house. The nor did the doctors. Police didn't tell this during the arrest of Depnath on August 23. "What forced the police to reveal about the sexual harassment attempt on my wife now?" asked Sesu.     "I want to live a peaceful life with my two sons - Tamil Nesan, 6, and Karmugilan, 4. The studies and the future of my children is important for me. I do respect the police personnel who spent sleepless nights to solve the murder, but there are questions that need to be answered," he said.     "I live in Perambalur with my children, but we speak through live video calls. I have told my sons that Sathya has gone to the God, as the Almighty likes her more. "Hereafter, we cannot speak or meet her. I don't know how far my children will admit it?" said Sesu. "I will approach the court seeking a fair probe into the murder of my wife. I want to find out the real cause behind her death. I want the real accused to get punished for his deed," said Sesu.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Woman-strangles-husbands-lover/articleshow/48704388.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:29 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A woman beat up and strangled her husband's partner, an assistant professor at a polytechnic in Choolaimedu, in their Thiruverkadu home on Thursday, police said. A court later remanded the accused, 32-year-old Shruti, in judicial custody.     Police said Sambasivam, a professor at Panimalar Engineering College in Poonamallee, used to bring Rajalakshmi, home frequently and introduced her to his wife Shruti as a colleague. He even dropped her home at night. The polytechnic where Rajalakshmi worked was part of the Panimalar group of educational institutions. Shruti initially believed the two were just colleagues until Sambasivam came home with Rajalakshmi on Tuesday and said the woman was moving in with them permanently.     On Wednesday morning, Sambasivam allegedly tied a 'mangalsutra' to Rajalakshmi in front of his wife, police said, based on Shruti's confession. A shocked Shruti picked up a fight with Sambasivam who asked her to maintain a cordial relationship and take care of Rajalakshmi. On Thursday morning, after he left for college a fight broke out between the two women.     Police said Rajalakshmi allegedly abused Sruthi and went into the bathroom. Sruthi followed her in and strangled her with the 'mangalsutra'. She then tried to make it appear that the woman had fainted in the bathroom. She took her in an autorickshaw to a nearby hospital where she was declared 'brought dead'. Doctors who noticed a few marks around her neck informed the Thiruverkadu police who registered a case of suspicious death under CrPC section 176.     The body was sent for postmortem to Kilpauk Medical College and Hospital.     After finding that the two women were at home at the time of the death, police interrogated Sruthi for more than an hour but she continued to maintain that Rajyalakshmi had died of injuries sustained when she fell down in the bathroom.     "She confessed to the murder when we told her that her fingerprints had been lifted from the scene of crime," said an investigating officer. "She said she had smashed the woman's head against the wall and later strangled her with the 'thali'." Police altered the case to murder and arrested Sruthi.     Initial inquiries revealed that Rajalakshmi had been married to a man named Rajasekhar for a while and they had separated. She then got married to Suresh, a relative who worked in a private firm, a few years ago and the couple moved into a house in Mogappair.     They allegedly had frequent quarrels as he tortured her and she left him too, police found.     Rajalakshmi then got a job with Panimalar Engineering College where she met Sambasivam. The two became friends and began seeing each other. Rajalakshmi recently moved to the polytechnic in Choolaimedu, police said.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/US-journalists-killer-annoyed-colleagues-Ex-boss/articleshow/48704167.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:29 IST 2015||ROANOKE, United States: The disgruntled former US television station employee who murdered two journalists had "annoyed" colleagues but showed no signs at work of any mental health issues, his former boss said Thursday.     Vester Lee Flanagan, 41, worked as a reporter for WDBJ in Roanoke, Virginia from March 2012 to February 2013, but was dismissed for poor performance and angry behavior, general manager Jeffrey Marks said.     On Wednesday, Flanagan shot and killed two of the CBS affiliate's journalists while they were conducting an on-air interview. He later fatally shot himself.     "We are still at a loss to figure out what happened to him in those two and a half years" since he was fired, Marks told a news conference flanked by dozens of staff, many of them holding hands.     "I don't think we identified that he had mental health issues. We certainly identified that he had performance issues."     Marks defended the station's hiring record and said its parent company had "a very elaborate program to screen employees."     Flanagan passed background checks and came with only positive references, Marks said.     It was only after he was hired, Marks said, that things went downhill.     "Vester's behavior annoyed a lot of people in the news station," Marks said.     Flanagan, who went by the on-screen name Bryce Williams, alleged in a manifesto faxed to ABC News that he was discriminated against as a gay, black journalist.     Marks said accusations in 2013 that he was treated unfairly were "immediately investigated and found to be without merit."     During his employment, Flanagan complied with demands that he seek medical help, but he was ultimately dismissed.     He was escorted from the building by police and made an ominous aside to the news director -- handing him a wooden cross and saying "'you'll need this'," Marks said.     As he left, he also made a "derogatory comment" to Adam Ward, the cameraman he shot dead on Wednesday.     Flanagan filed a complaint with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and a civil action suit, which were dismissed, he said.     "All of these investigations determined that no reasonable person would have taken any of the cited incidents as discrimination or harassment."     After killing Ward and reporter Alison Parker live on the air, Flanagan posted a video of the attack on social media.||ROANOKE, UNITED STATES
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/gurgaon/Gurgaon-Poisoned-drink-to-debtor-Lender-booked/articleshow/48507013.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:34 IST 2015||  GURGAON: A moneylender was booked on Saturday for allegedly poisoning a businessman to death. The victim had gone to Rewari on Friday night to return the money he had borrowed, but was allegedly served a poisoned drink.    The businessman, Vijay Sharma, hails from Heli Mandi in Pataudi. On Friday, he went to Janaula village to return money he had borrowed from moneylender Kuldeep Yadav, and collect the property papers of his house in return. He later called his family and told them he suspected something had been added to the drink he was served at Yadav's house, and that he wasn't feeling well.    He added that Yadav took the money but didn't give return the papers.    Sharma's family reached Janaula bus stand where he was waiting for them. They then and rushed him to a private hospital in Rewari, where he died at 9pm.    Sharma's son Nitin told police the businessman had borrowed Rs 2 lakh from Yadav in exchange of mortgage on his house. Sharma was due to return the money, along with an additional Rs 2 lakh as interest (a total of Rs 4 lakh) for Yadav to return the house documents.    "The victim went to collect the documents from Yadav, who accepted the money but did not return the papers. It is alleged that he killed Sharma by serving him a poisoned drink," said ACP (crime) Rajesh Kumar.    A case was registered on Saturday on the basis of a complaint filed by Nitin.    The FIR has been filed against Yadav under sections 302 (murder) and 328 (Causing hurt by means of poison, etc) of the IPC.    Sharma's body has been sent for a postmortem. Police are waiting for the autopsy report to take further action.  ||GURGAON
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/delhi/One-arrested-for-thrashing-man-at-CNG-station/articleshow/48506862.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:34 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: Eleven days after a taxi driver was attacked when he asked a group of people to observe the queue at a CNG pump in west Delhi's Kirti Nagar, one man has been arrested. The main accused who had attacked the driver with a machete is still absconding.    According to police, the man was identified as Zakir (26). He is also a driver. A senior police official said Zakir is related to and a close aide of the main accused, identified as Riyasat Ali.    "On the basis of a tip-off received, Zakir was arrested on Saturday. Our team conducted several raids and caught him just when he was trying to escape from Delhi," said DCP (west) Pushpendra Kumar.    He confessed to having thrashed Pawan. He also said that when they saw that Pawan was going to make a PCR call, they thought of teaching him a lesson.    Zakir along with Ali and three others had brutally attacked Pawan with a machete and baseball bats at a CNG pump station on August 5. Pawan lost his right hand in the incident and is currently undergoing treatment at Apollo hospital.    Meanwhile, police have claimed to be working hard to trace Ali. According to sources, he has run away to Uttar Pradesh. A senior police officer said a team of three officials have been sent to conduct raids in various cities of Uttar Pradesh and nab Ali.    A case of attempt to murder under (IPC sections 307), voluntarily causing hurt (IPC 324) and common intention (IPC 34) has been registered against the accused at Kirti Nagar police station.||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/goa/Russian-acquitted-for-murder-jailed-for-assault/articleshow/48506368.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:34 IST 2015||Panaji: Acquitting a Russian national Alexander Ippolitov charged for murder of an Ukrainian national, additional sessions court, Mapusa, sentenced him to undergo nine months imprisonment for causing hurt to the deceased and a Russian lady with a metal stick in 2013 at Ashvem.     On January 21, 2013, at about 9pm at Ashvem, the accused assaulted one Ukrainian national Oskar Kayumov with a metal stick on his head and other parts of his body. Police said that the accused pushed Oskar and threw him down from the first floor of the building to the ground, causing him injuries which resulted in his death. The accused was charged with having thereby committed the offence of murder by intentionally causing death of the deceased.     The accused was also charged for beating the complainant, a Russian national Veronika Semikras, with the metal stick causing her injuries and thereby committed the offence of voluntarily causing hurt by a dangerous weapon.     In the absence of any eye witness account of the accused pushing Oskar from the terrace of the first floor, it appears that Oskar accidentally fell from the first floor terrace to the ground sustaining injuries which resulted in his death, additional sessions judge Desmond D'Costa observed.     While holding that it is crystal clear from the memorandum of autopsy that these two injuries that caused the death of Oskar, were due to his falling from the terrace of the first floor to the ground, the judge noted that the evidence of panch witnesses also prove that the accused had also fallen on the ground and he also sustained injuries.     The judge ordered, "The accused stands convicted of the offence under Section 324 of IPC, for voluntarily causing hurt to Semikras and late Oskar by assaulting them with a metal stick, causing them injuries and the accused however stands acquitted of the offence of murder, punishable under Section 302 IPC."     The prosecution examined six witnesses in support of its case. Public prosecutor A Talaulikar submitted that there is cogent evidence to prove that the accused had pushed Oskar from the terrace of the first floor, and had thereby intentionally caused his death.     On the other hand, advocate V Varma for the accused contended that the late Oskar Kayumov had accidentally fallen from the terrace of the first floor and no offence of murder is made out against the accused. He submitted that other witnesses examined are not trustworthy and their depositions do not inspire confidence and hence the accused should be acquitted of both offences.     Semikras in her deposition said that Oskar and the accused had sat together for about one hour on the second floor terrace on the building and they were listening to music and about 9pm, the accused took one metal stick in his hand which was lying on the floor of the terrace, and assaulted her on her right side. She further deposed that the deceased had tried to calm him down but he was aggressive and started assaulting Oskar with a metal stick on his head and other parts of the body.     ||PANAJI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/south-asia/Sirisena-Rajapaksa-face-off-sets-stage-for-Lankan-polls/articleshow/48506682.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:34 IST 2015||CHENNAI: The big story of Monday's parliamentary elections in Sri Lanka may well be the possibility of a comeback by former President Mahinda Rajapaksa. After a surprise defeat in January - in no small measure due to the overwhelming negative vote against him by Tamils and Muslims - Rajapaksa is attempting to do a Putin in the island nation by seeking to assume the recently empowered post of Prime Minister.But an important side story is that elections are becoming a routine affair in Sri Lanka. Earlier, they were held against the backdrop of assassinations, murder bids, forced disappearances and bitter ethnic conflict. Now, with a more independent election commission, there is greater participation. "The political climate is freer, fairer. Major incidents of violence are fewer and the police have arrested hundreds of people (as a preventive measure). The commission has shown it is very much in charge and even warned against the President playing a political role," says Paikiasothy Saravanamuttu of the Colombo-based Centre for Monitoring Election Violence.Many do point to the rather lucklustre campaign, despite a more relaxed atmosphere, and say that could be because of a lack of strong issues. In the last elections, there was one overarching question: Whether Rajapaksa should remain President or not. "Voters everywhere are confused. The Ranil Wickremesinghe-led UNP hasn't really used the mandate it got and forced an agenda for deep-rooted reforms. The President belongs to Rajapaksa's party but has made his opposition to him public. In Tamil areas, TNA hasn't delivered on many issues and rivals have jumped in," says Ahilan Kadirgamar, political analyst.After coming to power, President Maithripala Sirisena was able to push through several Constitutional changes that curtailed his own powers, while setting in motion correctives to guard against abuse of power, which was rampant during Rajapaksa's regime. Sirisena has also been vocal in voicing his misgivings about Rajapaksa during the campaign. On the eve of polls, he sacked key functionaries of his Sri Lanka Freedom Party (SLFP), in what is likely an attempt to influence candidates who will make it to Parliament on the national list.But Rajapaksa is the dominant force in the SLFP and he has tried to make Sirisena fall in line, with some success in the past. He has not been weighed down by allegations of massive corruption.Meanwhile, in a subtle demonstration of India's position, the Indian high commissioner on Independence Day, two days before the Lankan polls, alluded to the improvement in relations as a result of Sirisena and Modi taking charge. "The domestic developments in Sri Lanka and India have led to a revitalisation of the relations between both countries," Y K Sinha said.||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Burnt-body-of-woman-found-in-Kundrathur/articleshow/48506589.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:34 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A charred body of a woman, who appeared to be in her 30s, was found on a vacant plot in Natham near Kundrathur on Sunday.     A few passersby who noticed thick smoke emanating from the plot saw the body and alerted the police. A can of kerosene was also found near the body. Police are yet to ascertain her identity.     They suspect that she could have been murdered elsewhere and the body was brought there to be burnt. Since it was a vacant plot, the locals rarely went near it.     With her identity yet to be established, police are collecting details of missing complaints lodged in different police stations in the city.     "Only after establishing the identity of the victim, we can ascertain the motive behind her death. We have to also receive the post mortem report," said an investigating officer. Kundrathur police have filed a case under Section 174 of IPC (suspicious death).     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/pune/All-seeing-surveillance-system-stays-online-all-the-time/articleshow/48506454.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:34 IST 2015||PUNE: A shrill alarm goes off in the police control room every time a video camera captures a violation or any suspicious activity on the roads in the city. Simultaneously, a snapshot of the footage appears on the large video wall that covers a portion of the room. The team, 10 policemen manning 10 workstations, get into action and communicate the message to the right police station of the 39 in the city who swing into action. Thewatch is on 24x7.     Live Feeds     Connected by a network of 1,250 closed circuit television (CCTV) cameras, the workstations displayed live feed from 440 spots in Pune, monitored with unwavering tenacity. "Amidst the normal day streets, traffic and hawkers, there may be something that does not fit in. We rely on instincts and footage to spot a crime even before it occurs," said assistant police inspector Shailaja Bobade, currently deployed at the control room.     Since the project's launch, last year, the city police has investigated nearly 207 criminal cases using footage off CCTV cameras. "The 1,250 cameras run 24/7. Live feed appears on ten workstations in the control room as well as on the 8 ft by 20 ft video wall in the room. These cameras also monitor over 50 sensitive spots in the four zones of the city, including religious places, peripheries of police stations, state transport bus stand, Mandai parking area, among others," said Bobade.     At their disposal     One workstation displays as many as 12 locations at a single time. The visuals switch at regular intervals. The system runs under the surveillance of a team comprising an assistant police inspector and 25 police constables, who oversee the control room proceedings. Staff members work in four shifts - morning, noon, evening and night. A team of 10 constables, five company operators and a team leader are at work during each shift.     "As soon as we spot a fight or a potential crime, we tip off the control room officials, who alert the police marshal of the area to check it from growing big. However, if it seems like a red-alert situation, we notify all officials and police stations in the city," said Bobade.     Flouting rules     A separate network of 78 automatic number-plate recognition cameras are also at work. Two personnel in the control room sit hawk-eyed to nab every traffic-rule offender who jumps the signal or stops on zebra crossings. Until now, over 1,495 cases of traffic violations have been detected with the help of the cameras, said officials.     Bobade said, "With live feed at our disposal, it is much easier to spot traffic violations. In case of accidents, the feed helps us spot the guilty party. Pictures of traffic violations from the cameras are immediately sent to another control room, which focuses exclusively on dealing with traffic violations. The personnel inform traffic police officers in respective areas, asking them to reach the spot within minutes."     On special days     Every police constable is assigned particular areas of the city. It is his job to keep a constant eye on the activities in these areas. A simple click on the screen can help him swap locations and zero in on an area he wants to view.     With pan-tilt-zoom cameras in this setting, the constable can rotate the camera in several directions for better viewing precision. "Festivities in the city, or VIP convoys, customarily liven up the video wall here. Often times, such events require constant vigil to maintain security," she said.     Following SOPs     Every task executed in the control room has a delineated standard operating procedure and those in charge of the room have been categorically trained to follow the procedure. "Apart from training us, close to 56 chosen personnel from every police station in the city have been trained to perform the procedures as per protocol," the assistant police inspector said.     The video analytic software in the system detects a range of surveillance situations involving suspicious people, vehicles, even objects. "Such footage then automatically pops up on the wall, even while an alarm is sounded off to attract the authorities' attention. The camera also captures a picture of the scene. Various types of surveillance situations have been fed into the system and the video analytics software constantly checks for such circumstances or activities. At the same time, certain police officials in the department automatically receive an SMS and email informing them about the incident," said Ravi Deshpande, the system integration specialist in the control room.     Helping cops     In the last year, police officials have come to utilise the enormous network of CCTVs. They have even been able to set right certain investigations that were earlier going astray. "A video-recording helped us zoom in on an accused, who had kidnapped and murdered an eight-year-old girl in Warje. The accused was seen picking up the girl in his car and, later, he was clearly visible in the CCTV footage captured at Bapuji Bua Chowk in Warje," Bobade said.     In another case, the accused persons, involved in a chain snatching incident on Prabhat Road, were caught after the footage showed them following the victim before the crime was committed.     Keeping evidence     In the control room, stored footage is often copied on CDs for police personnel, who may need it to solve a crime in their area. "Officials in different police stations in the city can view their locality's footage on their workstations but they cannot store it. They have to procure the footage from the commissioner's office, after it has been copied on a CD. In addition, all the footage is tamper-proof. Even if somebody tries to alter the visuals in the footage, the software can detect the tampering," said Deshpande.     In fact, soon, the CCTV footage will be produced in court as evidence in a case. "Otherwise, courts do not accept video recordings as there is no way to ascertain if they are authentic or have been doctored," he said.     ||PUNE
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/lucknow/Wife-her-lover-plotted-BBA-students-murder/articleshow/48506395.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:34 IST 2015||LUCKNOW: Nagram police on Sunday claimed to have cracked the murder case of BBA student Pawan with the arrest of his wife Kamini who is alleged to have planned his murder along with her lover Tinku.    Circle officer, Mohanlalganj, Rakesh Nayak said, "Kamini asked Pawan to bring some soft drinks on Thursday evening. Tinku and his aide Vikram Singh, a Rae Bareli native, were lying in wait en route. They both waylaid Pawan, attacked him with a sharp object, and fled with his cellphone."    Police said Kamini's affair with Tinku preceded her marriage and she continued to talk to him even after tying the knot with Pawan. After a fight over this, Pawan took away Kamini's cellphone. This infuriated Tinku who gifted Kamini another cellphone.    After the murder, police obtained Kamini's call data records and found that Tinku had been a frequent caller. When police questioned Tinku, he confessed to murdering Pawan. He said Kamini had told him that Pawan tortured her.    Police have recovered the murder weapon along with the motorcycle used in the murder. "Even when news of Pawan's murder reached her family, his wife showed no grief, which raised doubts," said Nayak.  ||LUCKNOW
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/meerut/Gunmen-shoot-one-injure-another-at-Bijnor-College-during-national-anthem/articleshow/48505188.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:34 IST 2015||MEERUT: The Independence Day flag hoisting ceremony at a Bijnor high school ended in bloodshed when a member of the college committee was shot dead and another critically injured by five armed men, over what the police say was a family dispute. The shooters allegedly barged in just as the national Anthem was being sung, and the resulting violence caused a near stampede among the hundreds of gathered students, causing injuries to six.     The incident, which played out more on the lines of a terror attack than a personal feud, occurred at the Janta Inter College here. Aman Singh (46) was attending as a guest for the ceremony and was seated next to committee member Hemendra Singh (22) on the dais. As the school choir began singing the national anthem and the guests stood up from their seats, Jagvir Singh, his son Ankur, brother Dheer and two unidentified men allegedly burst into the school waving countrymade pistols.     The five intruders then hit Aman Singh on the head with the butt of a pistol and then shot him dead at close range. The bullet exited Aman Singh's and hit Hemendra Singh, injuring him critically. The shooting triggered utter chaos in the school as horrified students tried to exit from the scene, causing a stampede-like situation in which four girls fainted and two others got their teeth broken. Hemendra Singh was admitted to Bijnor district hospital before being referred to another facility at Meerut. One of the girls who lost consciousness recovered her senses nearly four hours later, according to the police.     The students were left shocked by the sudden violence which unfolded in front of them. "The national anthem was being sung and the prayer was just about to be said when these men walked in with guns and started firing. There was panic and we all ran towards the gate. All I could think of was how to get out of the premises as soon as I could," said a class VIII student who managed to escape the horror.     The incident was caused by a long-standing family dispute, police said. "Aman Singh's son Anuj had eloped with Dheer Singh's daughter two months ago, but Aman Singh brought the girl back to her father's house on the same day. However, this had set off tension between the two families," SP (city) Ajay Gautam said. On July 11, a relative of Dheer Singh cornered Anuj outside a shopping mall and beat him up. In order to send back a message, Anuj fired shots inside Dheer Singh's house on the following day.     "While a case was filed against Anuj in that case, he got a stay order against his arrest from the high court," said SP Gautam. The Independence Day attack was in retaliation to this, said officials, adding that Jagvir Singh has been arrested, his pistol seized and an FIR lodged against all five assailants.     According to police interrogators, Jagvir Singh said the murdered man had taunted his family by saying the next time he would not send their daughter back, a comment which they felt was humiliating.     ||MEERUT
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/meerut/50-accidents-in-2-years-locals-demand-Bhola-Road-now-be-fixed/articleshow/48505085.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:34 IST 2015||MEERUT: Citizens on Sunday protested near Bhola Road demanding that the dug up stretch that has been in a pathetic condition for over five years now be repaired at the earliest. More than 50 accidents have been reported from the area in the past two years.     The thoroughfare was dug up several years ago when a pipeline transporting water from Bhola ki Jhaal to Meerut city was laid in the area. It has not been repaired ever since.     Local members of Aam Aadmi Party also joined the protest to bolster the local people's demand.     "There are about 30 villages on this stretch that are affected by the poor condition of the thoroughfare. We have approached several authorities but they all seem to be passing the buck. Somebody has to take the responsibility," said Shailendra Gaur, district president of AAP.     "I drove along this stretch for the past three days and my car is already damaged. Aside from being ridden with potholes, the road gets completely dark after sunset. This makes it a hotbed for accidents and crime. Locals prefer not to venture out after 6pm," said Manoj Hans, AAP district secretary.     Sanjay Sharma, resident of Peepla village, recounted a painful experience. "Last year, on August 23, my brother Birender had gone out after sunset and was returning home very late. Some men accosted him and dragged him into a mango grove by the road. They looted and murdered my brother. It has nearly been a year but the road has not gotten any better."     "Bhola ki Jhaal is also a popular picnic spot during the summers. Locals even call it 'Chota Haridwar'. Not only are authorities placing the lives of locals at risk, they are also losing out on the opportunity to develop Bhola ki Jhaal as a tourist spot," Sharma added.     ||MEERUT
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/meerut/Drug-addict-slits-brothers-throat/articleshow/48505061.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:34 IST 2015||MEERUT: The police on Sunday arrested a 26-year-old city resident for allegedly killing his younger brother after a fight in the morning.     The cops said Maan Ilahi slit his brother's throat at 3am on Sunday morning. Abaad (24) died on the spot.     "The brothers lived under the same roof, and were drug addicts. They would often get into fights after abuse," said Ravinder Singh, station officer at Lishari gate police station.     "On Saturday night, they were doing drugs when they got into another fight. At 3 am, the fight escalated and Maan slit his brother's throat. Abaad died on the spot," added Singh.     The SO added that Ilahi had been booked under section 302 (murder) of the Indian Penal Code. The victim's body has been sent for a postmortem and we will proceed further once we receive the postmortem report."     ||MEERUT
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:34 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:34 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/SC-acquits-Romesh-Sharma-in-Budhiraja-murder-case/articleshow/48704930.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:34 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Thursday upheld the Delhi High Court order acquitting former Congress leader Romesh Sharma in the case relating to the killing of fashion designer Kunjum Budhiraja.     A bench of Justices Pinaki Chandra Ghose and R K Agrawal dismissed an appeal filed by the Delhi government challenging HC order.     The Delhi government contended that the HC had erred in acquitting Sharma but it was strongly opposed by his counsel and senior advocate Siddharth Luthra who submitted that his client was in love with Kunjum and there was no evidence to prove his involvement in the case.     Sharma, who was alleged to be a frontman of underworld don Dawood Ibrahim, was convicted by a trial court on February 15, 2008. Kunjum was killed on March 20, 1999 at Sharma's South Delhi-based 'Jai Mata Di' farm house by a group of hired gangsters from Uttar Pradesh.     The trial court had convicted Sharma and five other accused in the case and had awarded life term to all. The HC, however, acquitted Sharma and co-accused Tejendir Verdi but upheld conviction and sentence of other four accused— Sharma's nephew Surinder Mishra, Hemchand, Santram and Ramesh alias Bobby.     While acquitting Sharma, the HC had said "Romesh Sharma and Kunjum were in love, and desired the company of each other. It does not establish that Sharma had got fed up with her". It had turned down Delhi police's contention that Sharma wanted to get rid of Kunjum as she knew about his alleged illegal activities.     "A grieving lover falling over the body of his mate and performing the rituals of a marriage can well be an expression of lasting love, and need not necessarily be a drama," the HC had said.     Sharma was in judicial custody at the time of the Kunjum's murder.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Raid-on-Bengaluru-centre-reveals-horror-tales/articleshow/48704718.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:34 IST 2015||BENGALURU: A State Human Rights Commission raid on a de-addiction centre in Jnanabharati Layout, near Kengeri, southwest Bengaluru, found 90 inmates living in pathetic conditions and subjected to inhuman treatment.     Thursday's raid followed the murder of an inmate of another de-addiction centre in Kothanur recently.     The SHRC raid on Sri Santhosh Social Service Society, also known as 4S Society, followed a tipoff. According to SHRC officials, the centre has been in existence for seven years at least, but the society couldn't produce documents of having obtained permission from the social welfare department. Commission officials said the centre had the permission from the DC and the DHO.     "Most inmates are between 20 and 35 years. They showed us signs of being physically abused. The centre has violated other norms too. Although it's supposed to have one nurse for every 15 patients and at least one in-house doctor and a psychiatrist, it didn't have any," said an SHRC spokesperson.     4 arrested for killing inmate:     Kothanur police arrested a de-addiction centre staffer and three inmates for allegedly beating to death a 28-year-old inmate. Dinesh was admitted to the centre by his family as he was an alcoholic. He was later found dead in a hospital. Family members noticed several bruises on his body. Narayana, an inmate-turned-staffer, gave some medicines to Dinesh, who later turned aggressive. Narayana sought the help of inmates Suresh, Subhan and Simon, to subdue Dinesh.     When Dinesh retaliated, the quartet overpowered him till he became unconscious. He died in hospital.||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/A-jolly-good-fellow-say-Khannas-friends/articleshow/48704630.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:34 IST 2015||Sanjeev Khanna, Indrani Mukerjea's second husband and suspected ally in Sheena Bora's killing, may be the most surprising element in this macabre drama, but his friends and associates in Kolkata refused to cast aspersions on "Sanju" just yet.     From being the biggest dart enthusiast at one of Kolkata's poshest clubs (the CC&FC) to having a finger in every pie, Sanjeev was everyone's "best mate" and go-to guy who friends described as: "A doer... someone who could get things done."     The morning after Khanna's arrest, TOI spoke to Ajay Rawla, the man who Khanna worked for as a consultant and whose house he was picked up from on Wednesday afternoon. "It wasn't like he was hiding like a desperate fugitive in my house. We had a meeting in the morning after which he drove me home and that's when news broke on television. We were sitting, watching, wondering what steps to take when the police arrived," explained Rawla.     Seven years his senior, Khanna's association with Rawla dates back to the time they went to Mayo College in Ajmer. Later, Khanna went on to become an aide for Rawla's pet projects. Besides running his own business in wireless communications, Khanna was there setting up chef Shaun Kenworthy and Rawla's restaurant 1658 or immersed in the heritage project of converting the Bawali Rajbari into a hotel. "He was getting all the construction work and labourers in place. He was very good in helping out with permissions through his connections with excise and contractors," remembers Kenworthy.     Khanna, who seldom missed his outings at the club, motor rallies and horse racing as a prominent face in the social circuit, was not the same man before he met Indrani, recounts Bull Banthia, a close friend. "Well-read and well-versed, Sanju had a great mechanical mind with a solution for everything," is how Bull chose to describe his "jolly good friend who loved meeting new people, hung out at the club but wasn't a social climber". "It was Indrani who emerged as this socialite and drove him to consciously build contacts with those higher up in the social rung after marriage," said the Kolkata-based entrepreneur. "That's the reason why I distanced myself from them until overnight she left Kolkata with their daughter and Sanju's wallet."     While Indrani never surfaces in conversations, his daughter Vidhie, who stayed with Indrani, is a fond subject with his friends. "He would miss his daughter but was resigned to fate, hoping that someday she would find him," said Rawla, adding, "It was Vidhie who called Sanjeev on Wednesday to give him the news."     No one seems to know about any recent interaction between Khanna and Indrani. G M Kapur, a known name in Kolkata who was Intach's state convener and happens to be Khanna's "mama", seemed disturbed with "all the theorizing" of Khanna's role in the crime. He declined to look back on Indrani and Khanna's relationship but added, "The last that there was any contact with Indrani or her family was when Vidhie visited Calcutta last year to celebrate the 75th birthday of her grandmother (Khanna's mother who lives with him)."     Khanna's Facebook posts on "karma" in the weeks and months following Sheena's alleged murder on April 24, 2012, make for interesting reading. On April 30, Khanna shared photo messages: "Say whatever, whenever the f*** you want to"; "Sometimes I get so weird, I even freak myself out".     On May 24, exactly a month after the alleged killing, he wrote: "You can never tell what people are thinking and feeling unless they tell you, and usually they lie. you ask them, 'Whats wrong?' and they say 'Nothing'. You accept this because it's easier than digging for the truth. People smile when they want to cry, they laugh when they want to scream and shout. They pretend like nothing is wrong because they don't want to face the truth. Things aren't always rainbows and butterflies, sometimes you gotta scream and cry your anger and sadness to the world, because you can only hold it in for so long before something in you snaps. so when you want to cry, cry. When you want to scream, scream. Don't hide behind fake smiles, it's ok to not be alright."     ||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Sheena-docu-Michail-add-to-mystery/articleshow/48701752.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:34 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Michail, Sheena's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered have raised a number of unanswered questions.    Two days after his mother, Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Michail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai Police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed that what he gave to police was enough to prove that Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora (who are actually parents of Indrani) as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. Some questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukherjea.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Michail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43 as mentioned in reports after her arrest.    Adding more to the suspense, Michail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Michail studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board examination, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that knew that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard that her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard that she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband who she introduced as Peter Mukherjea."    The two-member Mumbai Police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Michail, who on Wednesday, was the first one to reveal that Sheena was Indrani's daughter, twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Michail's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Michail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukherjae is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Michail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."  ||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Grandparents-are-Sheenas-mom-dad-on-birth-certificate/articleshow/48704559.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:34 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Mikhail, Sheena Bora's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered led to some unanswered questions on Thursday.    Two days after his mother Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Mikhail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed what he gave the police was enough to prove Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora, who are actually Indrani's parents, as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. However, many questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter. In many cases in India involving single mothers, grandparents are known to put in their names as father and mother.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukerjea, that is, 13 years after Sheena was born.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Mikhail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43.    Mikhail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Mikhail     studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board exam, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband, who she introduced as Peter Mukerjea."    The two-member Mumbai police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Mikhail twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Mikhail 's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time, he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Mikhail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukerjea is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Mikhail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Sheena-bowled-us-over-Rahuls-uncle/articleshow/48704552.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:34 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: Had things worked out as desired for Peter Mukherjea's first wife Shabnam and her family in Dehradun, Rahul Mukherjea and Sheena Bora would have been married for over three years now.     Shabnam's brother Shaleen Singh told TOI on Thursday that in 2011 Rahul brought Sheena to their sprawling home in Dehradun to seek approval from the family for their marriage.     The entire family-Shabnam, her younger brother Shaleen, father Anand Singh and mother Seema-were reportedly bowled over by Sheena's jovial nature and affection towards the elderly people. Impressed, the family gave its "unqualified and unanimous approval" for the wedding, which was supposed to take place within a few months, said Shaleen.     Stunned by the recent development, Shaleen said, "Sheena was among those rare persons who left a deep and lifelong impact on people. She was good-looking, a sweet person, clean of heart and good to talk to. None of us objected to the wedding."     Shaleen learnt of Sheena's murder through news channels. "It would have been great if she had become a part of the family. I don't know what was the cause and motive behind the heinous crime, but all those behind the killing of the jovial-natured girl should not be spared at any cost," he said.     A former model and tele-actor, 49-year-old Shaleen today owns the Sanskar International school in Jogiwala here. He recalled the last meeting with Shabnam and Rahul in April this year. "My father Anand Singh passed away in April. They had come to pay their respects but we did not interact much."     However, Shaleen said of late the interaction between him and his sister Shabnam was limited. Although Shabnam's farm Gul-e-Shabnam and Shaleen's residence Shankar Sadan are barely 200 metres away in Badripur, meetings between them were rare. While Shaleen and his mother stay on different floors of Shankar Sadan, Shabnam stays alone at her residence and is frequently visited by Rahul.     "There are matters in each family which we do not want to disclose. We are not against each other but do not interact much. She comes to meet our mother occasionally," said Shaleen, adding that Shabnam was passionate about painting and had a studio in her residence.     Shaleen denied having any details about the presence of Mumbai police in Dehradun. "Neither Doon police nor Mumbai police have contacted me over the issue."     Staff at Shabnam's residence said she was out-of-station but they were not aware of her whereabouts.||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Kilpauk-doctor-murder-Hubby-to-approach-court/articleshow/48704411.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:34 IST 2015||CHENNAI: It's been four days since police claimed to have solved the murder of S Sathya, 24, a PG medical student. However, her husband has put forth questions that police have failed to answer. Though investigating officers confirmed Sathya was not sexually assaulted before she was killed, they leaked to some section of media saying that they changed their stance on Wednesday and said there were indications of attempt to rape on the deceased.     Police personnel revealed the details soon after Sathya's husband Dr P Sesu, also employed at a primary health centre in Perambalur, expressed certain doubts.     He alleged the police hastily solved the case citing the state assembly, which is in motion. Sathya was found dead at her house in Kilpauk on August 20.     On August 23, police arrested Harintham Depnath, a BTech graduate, who lived at the second floor on the same apartment. Neither was there any mention about sexual assault or attempt on Sathya when the body was recovered from the house. The nor did the doctors. Police didn't tell this during the arrest of Depnath on August 23. "What forced the police to reveal about the sexual harassment attempt on my wife now?" asked Sesu.     "I want to live a peaceful life with my two sons - Tamil Nesan, 6, and Karmugilan, 4. The studies and the future of my children is important for me. I do respect the police personnel who spent sleepless nights to solve the murder, but there are questions that need to be answered," he said.     "I live in Perambalur with my children, but we speak through live video calls. I have told my sons that Sathya has gone to the God, as the Almighty likes her more. "Hereafter, we cannot speak or meet her. I don't know how far my children will admit it?" said Sesu. "I will approach the court seeking a fair probe into the murder of my wife. I want to find out the real cause behind her death. I want the real accused to get punished for his deed," said Sesu.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Woman-strangles-husbands-lover/articleshow/48704388.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:34 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A woman beat up and strangled her husband's partner, an assistant professor at a polytechnic in Choolaimedu, in their Thiruverkadu home on Thursday, police said. A court later remanded the accused, 32-year-old Shruti, in judicial custody.     Police said Sambasivam, a professor at Panimalar Engineering College in Poonamallee, used to bring Rajalakshmi, home frequently and introduced her to his wife Shruti as a colleague. He even dropped her home at night. The polytechnic where Rajalakshmi worked was part of the Panimalar group of educational institutions. Shruti initially believed the two were just colleagues until Sambasivam came home with Rajalakshmi on Tuesday and said the woman was moving in with them permanently.     On Wednesday morning, Sambasivam allegedly tied a 'mangalsutra' to Rajalakshmi in front of his wife, police said, based on Shruti's confession. A shocked Shruti picked up a fight with Sambasivam who asked her to maintain a cordial relationship and take care of Rajalakshmi. On Thursday morning, after he left for college a fight broke out between the two women.     Police said Rajalakshmi allegedly abused Sruthi and went into the bathroom. Sruthi followed her in and strangled her with the 'mangalsutra'. She then tried to make it appear that the woman had fainted in the bathroom. She took her in an autorickshaw to a nearby hospital where she was declared 'brought dead'. Doctors who noticed a few marks around her neck informed the Thiruverkadu police who registered a case of suspicious death under CrPC section 176.     The body was sent for postmortem to Kilpauk Medical College and Hospital.     After finding that the two women were at home at the time of the death, police interrogated Sruthi for more than an hour but she continued to maintain that Rajyalakshmi had died of injuries sustained when she fell down in the bathroom.     "She confessed to the murder when we told her that her fingerprints had been lifted from the scene of crime," said an investigating officer. "She said she had smashed the woman's head against the wall and later strangled her with the 'thali'." Police altered the case to murder and arrested Sruthi.     Initial inquiries revealed that Rajalakshmi had been married to a man named Rajasekhar for a while and they had separated. She then got married to Suresh, a relative who worked in a private firm, a few years ago and the couple moved into a house in Mogappair.     They allegedly had frequent quarrels as he tortured her and she left him too, police found.     Rajalakshmi then got a job with Panimalar Engineering College where she met Sambasivam. The two became friends and began seeing each other. Rajalakshmi recently moved to the polytechnic in Choolaimedu, police said.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/US-journalists-killer-annoyed-colleagues-Ex-boss/articleshow/48704167.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:34 IST 2015||ROANOKE, United States: The disgruntled former US television station employee who murdered two journalists had "annoyed" colleagues but showed no signs at work of any mental health issues, his former boss said Thursday.     Vester Lee Flanagan, 41, worked as a reporter for WDBJ in Roanoke, Virginia from March 2012 to February 2013, but was dismissed for poor performance and angry behavior, general manager Jeffrey Marks said.     On Wednesday, Flanagan shot and killed two of the CBS affiliate's journalists while they were conducting an on-air interview. He later fatally shot himself.     "We are still at a loss to figure out what happened to him in those two and a half years" since he was fired, Marks told a news conference flanked by dozens of staff, many of them holding hands.     "I don't think we identified that he had mental health issues. We certainly identified that he had performance issues."     Marks defended the station's hiring record and said its parent company had "a very elaborate program to screen employees."     Flanagan passed background checks and came with only positive references, Marks said.     It was only after he was hired, Marks said, that things went downhill.     "Vester's behavior annoyed a lot of people in the news station," Marks said.     Flanagan, who went by the on-screen name Bryce Williams, alleged in a manifesto faxed to ABC News that he was discriminated against as a gay, black journalist.     Marks said accusations in 2013 that he was treated unfairly were "immediately investigated and found to be without merit."     During his employment, Flanagan complied with demands that he seek medical help, but he was ultimately dismissed.     He was escorted from the building by police and made an ominous aside to the news director -- handing him a wooden cross and saying "'you'll need this'," Marks said.     As he left, he also made a "derogatory comment" to Adam Ward, the cameraman he shot dead on Wednesday.     Flanagan filed a complaint with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and a civil action suit, which were dismissed, he said.     "All of these investigations determined that no reasonable person would have taken any of the cited incidents as discrimination or harassment."     After killing Ward and reporter Alison Parker live on the air, Flanagan posted a video of the attack on social media.||ROANOKE, UNITED STATES
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:34 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/SC-acquits-Romesh-Sharma-in-Budhiraja-murder-case/articleshow/48704930.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:34 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Thursday upheld the Delhi High Court order acquitting former Congress leader Romesh Sharma in the case relating to the killing of fashion designer Kunjum Budhiraja.     A bench of Justices Pinaki Chandra Ghose and R K Agrawal dismissed an appeal filed by the Delhi government challenging HC order.     The Delhi government contended that the HC had erred in acquitting Sharma but it was strongly opposed by his counsel and senior advocate Siddharth Luthra who submitted that his client was in love with Kunjum and there was no evidence to prove his involvement in the case.     Sharma, who was alleged to be a frontman of underworld don Dawood Ibrahim, was convicted by a trial court on February 15, 2008. Kunjum was killed on March 20, 1999 at Sharma's South Delhi-based 'Jai Mata Di' farm house by a group of hired gangsters from Uttar Pradesh.     The trial court had convicted Sharma and five other accused in the case and had awarded life term to all. The HC, however, acquitted Sharma and co-accused Tejendir Verdi but upheld conviction and sentence of other four accused— Sharma's nephew Surinder Mishra, Hemchand, Santram and Ramesh alias Bobby.     While acquitting Sharma, the HC had said "Romesh Sharma and Kunjum were in love, and desired the company of each other. It does not establish that Sharma had got fed up with her". It had turned down Delhi police's contention that Sharma wanted to get rid of Kunjum as she knew about his alleged illegal activities.     "A grieving lover falling over the body of his mate and performing the rituals of a marriage can well be an expression of lasting love, and need not necessarily be a drama," the HC had said.     Sharma was in judicial custody at the time of the Kunjum's murder.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Raid-on-Bengaluru-centre-reveals-horror-tales/articleshow/48704718.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:34 IST 2015||BENGALURU: A State Human Rights Commission raid on a de-addiction centre in Jnanabharati Layout, near Kengeri, southwest Bengaluru, found 90 inmates living in pathetic conditions and subjected to inhuman treatment.     Thursday's raid followed the murder of an inmate of another de-addiction centre in Kothanur recently.     The SHRC raid on Sri Santhosh Social Service Society, also known as 4S Society, followed a tipoff. According to SHRC officials, the centre has been in existence for seven years at least, but the society couldn't produce documents of having obtained permission from the social welfare department. Commission officials said the centre had the permission from the DC and the DHO.     "Most inmates are between 20 and 35 years. They showed us signs of being physically abused. The centre has violated other norms too. Although it's supposed to have one nurse for every 15 patients and at least one in-house doctor and a psychiatrist, it didn't have any," said an SHRC spokesperson.     4 arrested for killing inmate:     Kothanur police arrested a de-addiction centre staffer and three inmates for allegedly beating to death a 28-year-old inmate. Dinesh was admitted to the centre by his family as he was an alcoholic. He was later found dead in a hospital. Family members noticed several bruises on his body. Narayana, an inmate-turned-staffer, gave some medicines to Dinesh, who later turned aggressive. Narayana sought the help of inmates Suresh, Subhan and Simon, to subdue Dinesh.     When Dinesh retaliated, the quartet overpowered him till he became unconscious. He died in hospital.||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/A-jolly-good-fellow-say-Khannas-friends/articleshow/48704630.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:34 IST 2015||Sanjeev Khanna, Indrani Mukerjea's second husband and suspected ally in Sheena Bora's killing, may be the most surprising element in this macabre drama, but his friends and associates in Kolkata refused to cast aspersions on "Sanju" just yet.     From being the biggest dart enthusiast at one of Kolkata's poshest clubs (the CC&FC) to having a finger in every pie, Sanjeev was everyone's "best mate" and go-to guy who friends described as: "A doer... someone who could get things done."     The morning after Khanna's arrest, TOI spoke to Ajay Rawla, the man who Khanna worked for as a consultant and whose house he was picked up from on Wednesday afternoon. "It wasn't like he was hiding like a desperate fugitive in my house. We had a meeting in the morning after which he drove me home and that's when news broke on television. We were sitting, watching, wondering what steps to take when the police arrived," explained Rawla.     Seven years his senior, Khanna's association with Rawla dates back to the time they went to Mayo College in Ajmer. Later, Khanna went on to become an aide for Rawla's pet projects. Besides running his own business in wireless communications, Khanna was there setting up chef Shaun Kenworthy and Rawla's restaurant 1658 or immersed in the heritage project of converting the Bawali Rajbari into a hotel. "He was getting all the construction work and labourers in place. He was very good in helping out with permissions through his connections with excise and contractors," remembers Kenworthy.     Khanna, who seldom missed his outings at the club, motor rallies and horse racing as a prominent face in the social circuit, was not the same man before he met Indrani, recounts Bull Banthia, a close friend. "Well-read and well-versed, Sanju had a great mechanical mind with a solution for everything," is how Bull chose to describe his "jolly good friend who loved meeting new people, hung out at the club but wasn't a social climber". "It was Indrani who emerged as this socialite and drove him to consciously build contacts with those higher up in the social rung after marriage," said the Kolkata-based entrepreneur. "That's the reason why I distanced myself from them until overnight she left Kolkata with their daughter and Sanju's wallet."     While Indrani never surfaces in conversations, his daughter Vidhie, who stayed with Indrani, is a fond subject with his friends. "He would miss his daughter but was resigned to fate, hoping that someday she would find him," said Rawla, adding, "It was Vidhie who called Sanjeev on Wednesday to give him the news."     No one seems to know about any recent interaction between Khanna and Indrani. G M Kapur, a known name in Kolkata who was Intach's state convener and happens to be Khanna's "mama", seemed disturbed with "all the theorizing" of Khanna's role in the crime. He declined to look back on Indrani and Khanna's relationship but added, "The last that there was any contact with Indrani or her family was when Vidhie visited Calcutta last year to celebrate the 75th birthday of her grandmother (Khanna's mother who lives with him)."     Khanna's Facebook posts on "karma" in the weeks and months following Sheena's alleged murder on April 24, 2012, make for interesting reading. On April 30, Khanna shared photo messages: "Say whatever, whenever the f*** you want to"; "Sometimes I get so weird, I even freak myself out".     On May 24, exactly a month after the alleged killing, he wrote: "You can never tell what people are thinking and feeling unless they tell you, and usually they lie. you ask them, 'Whats wrong?' and they say 'Nothing'. You accept this because it's easier than digging for the truth. People smile when they want to cry, they laugh when they want to scream and shout. They pretend like nothing is wrong because they don't want to face the truth. Things aren't always rainbows and butterflies, sometimes you gotta scream and cry your anger and sadness to the world, because you can only hold it in for so long before something in you snaps. so when you want to cry, cry. When you want to scream, scream. Don't hide behind fake smiles, it's ok to not be alright."     ||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Sheena-docu-Michail-add-to-mystery/articleshow/48701752.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:34 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Michail, Sheena's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered have raised a number of unanswered questions.    Two days after his mother, Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Michail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai Police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed that what he gave to police was enough to prove that Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora (who are actually parents of Indrani) as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. Some questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukherjea.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Michail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43 as mentioned in reports after her arrest.    Adding more to the suspense, Michail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Michail studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board examination, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that knew that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard that her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard that she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband who she introduced as Peter Mukherjea."    The two-member Mumbai Police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Michail, who on Wednesday, was the first one to reveal that Sheena was Indrani's daughter, twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Michail's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Michail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukherjae is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Michail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."  ||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Grandparents-are-Sheenas-mom-dad-on-birth-certificate/articleshow/48704559.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:34 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Mikhail, Sheena Bora's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered led to some unanswered questions on Thursday.    Two days after his mother Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Mikhail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed what he gave the police was enough to prove Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora, who are actually Indrani's parents, as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. However, many questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter. In many cases in India involving single mothers, grandparents are known to put in their names as father and mother.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukerjea, that is, 13 years after Sheena was born.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Mikhail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43.    Mikhail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Mikhail     studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board exam, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband, who she introduced as Peter Mukerjea."    The two-member Mumbai police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Mikhail twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Mikhail 's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time, he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Mikhail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukerjea is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Mikhail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Sheena-bowled-us-over-Rahuls-uncle/articleshow/48704552.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:34 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: Had things worked out as desired for Peter Mukherjea's first wife Shabnam and her family in Dehradun, Rahul Mukherjea and Sheena Bora would have been married for over three years now.     Shabnam's brother Shaleen Singh told TOI on Thursday that in 2011 Rahul brought Sheena to their sprawling home in Dehradun to seek approval from the family for their marriage.     The entire family-Shabnam, her younger brother Shaleen, father Anand Singh and mother Seema-were reportedly bowled over by Sheena's jovial nature and affection towards the elderly people. Impressed, the family gave its "unqualified and unanimous approval" for the wedding, which was supposed to take place within a few months, said Shaleen.     Stunned by the recent development, Shaleen said, "Sheena was among those rare persons who left a deep and lifelong impact on people. She was good-looking, a sweet person, clean of heart and good to talk to. None of us objected to the wedding."     Shaleen learnt of Sheena's murder through news channels. "It would have been great if she had become a part of the family. I don't know what was the cause and motive behind the heinous crime, but all those behind the killing of the jovial-natured girl should not be spared at any cost," he said.     A former model and tele-actor, 49-year-old Shaleen today owns the Sanskar International school in Jogiwala here. He recalled the last meeting with Shabnam and Rahul in April this year. "My father Anand Singh passed away in April. They had come to pay their respects but we did not interact much."     However, Shaleen said of late the interaction between him and his sister Shabnam was limited. Although Shabnam's farm Gul-e-Shabnam and Shaleen's residence Shankar Sadan are barely 200 metres away in Badripur, meetings between them were rare. While Shaleen and his mother stay on different floors of Shankar Sadan, Shabnam stays alone at her residence and is frequently visited by Rahul.     "There are matters in each family which we do not want to disclose. We are not against each other but do not interact much. She comes to meet our mother occasionally," said Shaleen, adding that Shabnam was passionate about painting and had a studio in her residence.     Shaleen denied having any details about the presence of Mumbai police in Dehradun. "Neither Doon police nor Mumbai police have contacted me over the issue."     Staff at Shabnam's residence said she was out-of-station but they were not aware of her whereabouts.||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Kilpauk-doctor-murder-Hubby-to-approach-court/articleshow/48704411.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:34 IST 2015||CHENNAI: It's been four days since police claimed to have solved the murder of S Sathya, 24, a PG medical student. However, her husband has put forth questions that police have failed to answer. Though investigating officers confirmed Sathya was not sexually assaulted before she was killed, they leaked to some section of media saying that they changed their stance on Wednesday and said there were indications of attempt to rape on the deceased.     Police personnel revealed the details soon after Sathya's husband Dr P Sesu, also employed at a primary health centre in Perambalur, expressed certain doubts.     He alleged the police hastily solved the case citing the state assembly, which is in motion. Sathya was found dead at her house in Kilpauk on August 20.     On August 23, police arrested Harintham Depnath, a BTech graduate, who lived at the second floor on the same apartment. Neither was there any mention about sexual assault or attempt on Sathya when the body was recovered from the house. The nor did the doctors. Police didn't tell this during the arrest of Depnath on August 23. "What forced the police to reveal about the sexual harassment attempt on my wife now?" asked Sesu.     "I want to live a peaceful life with my two sons - Tamil Nesan, 6, and Karmugilan, 4. The studies and the future of my children is important for me. I do respect the police personnel who spent sleepless nights to solve the murder, but there are questions that need to be answered," he said.     "I live in Perambalur with my children, but we speak through live video calls. I have told my sons that Sathya has gone to the God, as the Almighty likes her more. "Hereafter, we cannot speak or meet her. I don't know how far my children will admit it?" said Sesu. "I will approach the court seeking a fair probe into the murder of my wife. I want to find out the real cause behind her death. I want the real accused to get punished for his deed," said Sesu.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Woman-strangles-husbands-lover/articleshow/48704388.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:34 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A woman beat up and strangled her husband's partner, an assistant professor at a polytechnic in Choolaimedu, in their Thiruverkadu home on Thursday, police said. A court later remanded the accused, 32-year-old Shruti, in judicial custody.     Police said Sambasivam, a professor at Panimalar Engineering College in Poonamallee, used to bring Rajalakshmi, home frequently and introduced her to his wife Shruti as a colleague. He even dropped her home at night. The polytechnic where Rajalakshmi worked was part of the Panimalar group of educational institutions. Shruti initially believed the two were just colleagues until Sambasivam came home with Rajalakshmi on Tuesday and said the woman was moving in with them permanently.     On Wednesday morning, Sambasivam allegedly tied a 'mangalsutra' to Rajalakshmi in front of his wife, police said, based on Shruti's confession. A shocked Shruti picked up a fight with Sambasivam who asked her to maintain a cordial relationship and take care of Rajalakshmi. On Thursday morning, after he left for college a fight broke out between the two women.     Police said Rajalakshmi allegedly abused Sruthi and went into the bathroom. Sruthi followed her in and strangled her with the 'mangalsutra'. She then tried to make it appear that the woman had fainted in the bathroom. She took her in an autorickshaw to a nearby hospital where she was declared 'brought dead'. Doctors who noticed a few marks around her neck informed the Thiruverkadu police who registered a case of suspicious death under CrPC section 176.     The body was sent for postmortem to Kilpauk Medical College and Hospital.     After finding that the two women were at home at the time of the death, police interrogated Sruthi for more than an hour but she continued to maintain that Rajyalakshmi had died of injuries sustained when she fell down in the bathroom.     "She confessed to the murder when we told her that her fingerprints had been lifted from the scene of crime," said an investigating officer. "She said she had smashed the woman's head against the wall and later strangled her with the 'thali'." Police altered the case to murder and arrested Sruthi.     Initial inquiries revealed that Rajalakshmi had been married to a man named Rajasekhar for a while and they had separated. She then got married to Suresh, a relative who worked in a private firm, a few years ago and the couple moved into a house in Mogappair.     They allegedly had frequent quarrels as he tortured her and she left him too, police found.     Rajalakshmi then got a job with Panimalar Engineering College where she met Sambasivam. The two became friends and began seeing each other. Rajalakshmi recently moved to the polytechnic in Choolaimedu, police said.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/US-journalists-killer-annoyed-colleagues-Ex-boss/articleshow/48704167.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:34 IST 2015||ROANOKE, United States: The disgruntled former US television station employee who murdered two journalists had "annoyed" colleagues but showed no signs at work of any mental health issues, his former boss said Thursday.     Vester Lee Flanagan, 41, worked as a reporter for WDBJ in Roanoke, Virginia from March 2012 to February 2013, but was dismissed for poor performance and angry behavior, general manager Jeffrey Marks said.     On Wednesday, Flanagan shot and killed two of the CBS affiliate's journalists while they were conducting an on-air interview. He later fatally shot himself.     "We are still at a loss to figure out what happened to him in those two and a half years" since he was fired, Marks told a news conference flanked by dozens of staff, many of them holding hands.     "I don't think we identified that he had mental health issues. We certainly identified that he had performance issues."     Marks defended the station's hiring record and said its parent company had "a very elaborate program to screen employees."     Flanagan passed background checks and came with only positive references, Marks said.     It was only after he was hired, Marks said, that things went downhill.     "Vester's behavior annoyed a lot of people in the news station," Marks said.     Flanagan, who went by the on-screen name Bryce Williams, alleged in a manifesto faxed to ABC News that he was discriminated against as a gay, black journalist.     Marks said accusations in 2013 that he was treated unfairly were "immediately investigated and found to be without merit."     During his employment, Flanagan complied with demands that he seek medical help, but he was ultimately dismissed.     He was escorted from the building by police and made an ominous aside to the news director -- handing him a wooden cross and saying "'you'll need this'," Marks said.     As he left, he also made a "derogatory comment" to Adam Ward, the cameraman he shot dead on Wednesday.     Flanagan filed a complaint with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and a civil action suit, which were dismissed, he said.     "All of these investigations determined that no reasonable person would have taken any of the cited incidents as discrimination or harassment."     After killing Ward and reporter Alison Parker live on the air, Flanagan posted a video of the attack on social media.||ROANOKE, UNITED STATES
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/jaipur/Schoolmate-hammered-to-death-by-jealous-minor-in-Rajasthan/articleshow/48504432.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:38 IST 2015||JAIPUR: A 19-year-old student was allegedly hammered to death by a minor who was jealous of his smart-phone, police said on Sunday.     The incident took place at a deserted location near a government school at Bassi, a sub-urban town here, on August 14, they said.     An abandoned body found near a temple in Bassi town, on Friday, was identified as Babulal Bairwa. He was an 11th class student of Government Higher Secondary School at Bassi, the police said.     The 15-year-old accused lured Babulal to buy his smartphone having whatsapp, and took him at a deserted place near a temple in Bassi. He then took out a hammer, about 4kgs, that was concealed in his bag, and hit him (Babu) on the back on his head, the police said.     The accused run away with handset leaving Babulal unconscious and profusely bleeding, they said.     The accused was apprehended from his home and police recovered the hammer (moonsal), blood stained clothes, bag and victim's mobile in which he used his sim, they said.     A case under IPC section 302 for murder was registered against him, and he would be produced before the court from where he would be sent to "Bal Sudhar Grah", the police said.||JAIPUR
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/life-style/books/The-fuzzy-logic-of-India-Pakistan-relations/articleshow/48500593.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:38 IST 2015||India and Pakistan have just celebrated their 69th Independence Days.But born in a climate of pervasive hostility, indiscriminate violence and unimaginable suffering and forced translocations for their peoples, the two countries have yet to overcome their toxic birthright to live as better neighbours than they have done so far. What are the reasons for the continuing mutual suspicion? The bitter memories of Partition? The Kashmir issue/dispute? The lingering distrust of the 'Other'? There are no easy answers but that hasn't stopped various interested parties from trying to reason why.Objectivity is very difficult to attain - especially if you belong to either of the nations. Are works on the twisted, tangled India-Pakistan relations prejudiced (subtle or blatant) rants or disingenuous/self-serving justifications with some hidden agendas, or sincere attempts to chart how and why Pakistan-India relations have evolved this way? The answer depends on what you choose to believe.Among the problems in making an objective assessment is of fixing a point when ostensibly irreconcilable and hostile political differences arose - and did they owe to personality clashes, or wider historical/cultural factors? Does such a point lie at Partition or well before 1947 or was there any such decisive moment and it was rather the cumulative effect of decades of political estrangement. There is a host of such issues that can bewilder and perplex.Only time can answer these questions but for those who choose to satisfy their curiosity now only, half a dozen accessible works can be illuminating.An overview of India-Pakistan relations extending down to the present day (by a Pakistani/Indian) used to be as rare as travelogues of India/Pakistan by a Pakistani or Indian (one each - Yoginder Sikand's "Beyond the Border: An Indian in Pakistan" and Raza Rumi's "Delhi By Heart: Impressions of a Pakistani Traveller" - leaving out India-born but American passport-holder Stephen Alter's "Amritsar to Lahore: A Journey Across the India-Pakistan Border") but two have come out in this year only. These are Indian diplomat Rajiv Dogra's "Where Borders Bleed: An Insider's Account of Indo-Pak Relations" and journalist Dilip Hiro's "The Longest August: The Unflinching Rivalry Between India and Pakistan" (both 2015).Dogra, a former Indian consul-general in Karachi, seeks to provide an anecdote-studded account of the region's recent history, beginning with the run-up to the Partition, its aftermath, other issues that have impacted bilateral relations since and various arbiters of its destiny from the departing British to successors on either side. He also speculates on some "what if" scenarios - no division or a re-union. However, his own professional involvement does mean an element of subjectivity and it is up to the reader to judge the validity of the implied malignity/criminal squandering of advantage but there is no doubt about the less than salutary role of the great powers - but then great power diplomacy is about advantage and influence, not principles.Hiro's work, whose title seeks to stress how that terrible month seems to have never ended, follows mostly the same approach but seems a little more equitable and at places quite revealing (especially for Indians conditioned to a particular view of the freedom struggle and its (their) titans (the despair of Mohammad Ali Jinnah as well as many Congress leaders at the direction that the Mahatma was taking the freedom struggle - also corroborated by veteran journalist Durga Das in his memoirs "India from Curzon to Nehru and After" ). One problem is some small but egregious mistakes - Shahzada Yaqub Khan instead of Sahabzada and the like.If we accept the Partition as a watershed moment, then academician Yasmin Khan's "The Great Partition: The Making of India and Pakistan" (2008) provides a crisp, balanced analysis of how the murderous madness ensued and played out but also what effect it had on mutual mindsets then (and up to now), while journalist-turned-writer Nisid Hajari's "Midnight's Furies: The Deadly Legacy of India's Partition" (2015) contends how the then unleashed paranoia and hatred, in conjunction with the Kashmir and Hyderabad issue, dug a virtually unbridgeable chasm - and laid the seeds for global terrorism and nuclear proliferation in Pakistan.Taking the effect forward through oral testimonies is Anam Zakaria's "Footprints of Partition: Narratives of four generations of Pakistanis and Indians" (2015) which has some touching and saddening examples of the illogicality and iniquity of the division (but also some quite counter-intuitive reactions), though is ultimately disheartening, going by responses of young, impressionable minds.Marx held the objective was not merely to interpret the world but to change it. For this in the India-Pakistan context, an overwhelming shift in perceptions on both sides is needed. But miracles can happen!||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/entertainment/hindi/bollywood/news/Jacqueline-Fernandez-Actresses-cant-be-friends-due-to-insecurity/articleshow/48500200.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:38 IST 2015||    See more of: Jacqueline Fernandez Jacqueline Fernandez during the launch of The Body Shop's new range of beauty products in Mumbai, on August 04, 2015. (Pics: Viral Bhayani)      See more of: Jacqueline Fernandez Jacqueline Fernandez during the launch of The Body Shop's new range of beauty products in Mumbai, on August 04, 2015. (Pics: Viral Bhayani)      See more of: Jacqueline Fernandez Jacqueline Fernandez during the launch of The Body Shop's new range of beauty products in Mumbai, on August 04, 2015. (Pics: Viral Bhayani)      See more of: Jacqueline Fernandez Jacqueline Fernandez during the launch of The Body Shop's new range of beauty products in Mumbai, on August 04, 2015. (Pics: Viral Bhayani)      See more of: Shriti Malhotra, Jacqueline Fernandez Shriti Malhotra, COO, The Body Shop India with Jacqueline Fernandez during the launch of The Body Shop's new range of beauty products in Mumbai, on August 04, 2015. (Pics: Viral Bhayani)||SEE MORE OF
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Spell-of-doom-in-witch-hunt-village/articleshow/48497477.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:38 IST 2015||MANDAR, Ranchi district: Kanjiya Maraitoli is now a ghost village, with a pall of last week's horror hanging heavy over its 40-odd mud houses. The grisly mass murder of five "witches" on the night of August 7 has touched every home here — every household has either a victim or an accused. As of Wednesday, 31 people from the village with a population of about 200 have been arrested. Several others have run away, afraid of police action.     Taking a detour from NH-75, about 40km from Ranchi, the first thing one sees is a group of young children — including an infant — leaving the village with their belongings. The kids are led by Khushbu Tigga, the niece of Bipin Khalkho, whose death due to jaundice triggered an unprecedented witch-hunt. Every adult member of the Khalkho family is behind bars and the kids are heading to another village to live with their relatives.     Even in Mandar, one of the more developed blocks in rural Jharkhand, superstition runs deep — the ill prefer to visit a 'bhagat' (witch doctor) instead of a hospital. The little ones are convinced that the five dead women were witches. "We know they were up to no good. There were times when we found Etwariya Khalkho staring at us through the window at night. 'Go to sleep or I'll suck your soul out', she'd tell us," says Khushbu. "She is responsible for my uncle's death," she adds, before heading out of the village.     Little Khushbu is one of the few people who'll talk about what happened that night. Every other person was apparently either drunk or asleep. "I can hardly see and hear," says an elderly tribal as he walks past. "I have no idea about what happened. I only came to know about the incident when I woke up the next morning."     After a bit more cajoling, an elderly couple blame the five women for most of the deaths and diseases that have taken place in the village over the past 12 years. Some even hold their "dark magic" responsible for the death of their cattle. "Etwariya was seen near a cemetery on Friday night. She definitely was a witch," mumbles Somra Khalkho, as his wife nudges him to keep quiet.     Karamdev Khalkho, son of one of the victims, Madni, said a few villagers had visited Etwariya's home and accused her of practising black magic two days before the lynching. "Her two sons assured the villagers that they would not stop their mother from being punished if they could prove the charges," says Karamdev. "None of the other women, including my mother, had any inkling that they were being targeted."     Even Jacinta Khalkho's son Anil, an Army jawan posted in Himachal Pradesh, had no idea about the accusations against his mother. "The entire village would visit my house whenever I was on a vacation," Anil says. "Bottles of rum from the army canteen were always a coveted commodity here and I brought several of them for the villagers. I never thought these same people would murder my mother."     There is, however, a lot more to the case than meets the eye. Experts in tribal traditions say this was not a usual case of a witch-hunt. Thousands of women have been killed on the stake over the past few decades, but usually it is one, or at the most two, women who are attacked at a given time. "There has not been a case of five women being killed together in the past 25 years," says Prem Chand, founding member of Free Legal Aid Committee and an anti-witch-hunt crusader.     J N Oraon, former mukhiya of Mandar village and an activist working to eliminate witch-hunts, says: "Also, unlike most such cases, these women had no idea that they would be targeted. The village committee usually first warns the 'witches'. Some are given an ultimatum to leave the area, while some are forced to eat faeces or stripped and paraded. Hardly any woman branded a witch is killed without a prior warning."     Villagers say the victims were not over-friendly with each other and were not even neighbours. Also, the five women did not meet the 'criteria' that brands a woman a witch. "Generally, the woman is either a widow or has lost at least one of her sons — they have to 'eat up' their closest male relative," says Premchand Ekka, a local leader and the husband of the village mukhiya. "But only two of the five were widows and none of them had a son who had died."     The police admit the women would have approached them had they been taunted or harassed in the past and felt they were in any sort of danger. R N Singh, officer in charge of Mandar police station who is investigating the case, said, "The police station is barely a kilometre from the village, and we reached the spot within minutes after we got the information that a few women were dragged out of their houses and taken to the village assembly. By the time we reached the spot, all the five were dead. It seems that the murders were planned and executed within a couple of hours."     Whatever the investigation concludes, the village will not get over the horrors of that night anytime soon. Even the police are shocked by the macabre celebrations around the five mangled bodies. "The dead-drunk villagers were sitting in a circle around the bodies listening to Nagpuri music when we reached the spot around midnight," says Singh. "The villagers did not let us take the bodies until next morning — they wanted the neighbouring villages to see what the fate of other witches would be."     (With Sanjay Ojha and Alok KN Mishra)||MANDAR, RANCHI DISTRICT
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Bannanje-Raje-in-Udupi-to-be-grilled-in-murder-case/articleshow/48498018.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:38 IST 2015||UDUPI/MANGALURU: Underworld don Rajendra Kumar alias Bannanje Raja, 47, has been brought to Udupi.     He was arrested by a special team led by CH Pratap Reddy, Bengaluru City police additional commissioner of police (west), in Morocco recently. The Karnataka Control of Organized Crime Act (KCOCA) court judge P Krishna Bhat in Belagavi late on Friday remanded Raja to police custody till August 28.     K Annamalai is the investigating officer in the murder case of cooperative leader RN Nayak in Ankola of Uttara Kannada district.     "Superintendent of police K Annamalai, the investigating officer in the murder case of cooperative leader RN Nayak in Ankola of Uttara Kannada district, will grill Raja first. Raja will have to face probe by jurisdictional police stations where cases have been registered against him. Jurisdictional police will move the court to get his custody," he said.     He said the state police had to work hard for two years to nab Raja. It was possible only after India managed to convince Moroccan courts to extradite him, he added.     Reddy dismissed reports that police intended to arrest Sona Hemanath Hegde, his wife who lives in Dubai, as 'speculation.' Media reported that Sona is expected to fly back to India soon to help her husband in the legal battle for bail and trial. Raja, against whom cases have been filed under KCOCA, has been evading state police for over 15 years. He had three fake passports.     City police chief S Murugan said in Mangaluru, Raja is wanted in four cases for which he has been extradited and at least six other cases where he is named an accused. Police will not seek setting up of a special court to try these cases, he added.||UDUPI/MANGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/BPO-employee-kills-brother-over-property-row-held/articleshow/48497617.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:38 IST 2015||  MUMBAI: A BPO employee, Ashok Thakur, was arrested for allegedly murdering his brother in Kandivli (E) following a dispute over ownership of their house on Friday. The Samta Nagar police solved the case within four hours of registering the offence.    The incident came to light at 7.40am, when 26-year-old Vijay Thakur's was found unconscious at his Poisar home. He was on his stomach, with a handkerchief wound tightly around his neck and arms tied behind his back while the house door was open. There was also a knife injury on his forehead. Locals took him to a doctor, but he was declared dead.    "After an inquiry, we learnt that Vijay had had a fight with his brother, Ashok, the previous night. Vijay was an alcoholic and worked as a labourer. His wife and parents had deserted him and moved to their hometown," said senior inspector Dilip Yadav.    The police then tracked down Ashok, who works at a call centre in Goregaon, with the help of a friend who gave them his phone number. The cellphone location showed that Ashok was in the city. The police then got the friend to call Ashok near Kandivli (E) station for a meeting. "The police had laid a trap at the railway station. He has said that he had had a dispute with Vijay over the ownership of their house in Poisar," an officer said. Ashok has been booked on charges of murder under Section 302 of IPC. tnn  ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/delhi/20-Delhi-cops-given-gallantry-awards/articleshow/48497440.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:38 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: Gallantry awards were given to four officials of Delhi Police's special cell for fighting back a group of terrorists during an operation with the Rashtriya Rifles (RR) in Jammu and Kashmir in 2010. Four ACPs were also awarded the President's Police Medal for their meritorious service. The men were among 20 officers from Delhi Police selected for the awards.    Inspector Kailash Singh Bisht and his team, comprising head constable Satender Kumar and Rajeev Kumar, and constable Birender Singh, had busted a hideout of members of terror outfit Jaish-e-Mohammad after they were informed about their presence in the Mendhar sector of Jammu & Kashmir.    They were assisted in the operation by a special group of the 37 Rashtriya Rifles.    The team, armed with only Kalashnikovs and bullet-proof jackets surrounded the house allegedly occupied by the terrorists. When the militants opened fire, the two teams retaliated instantly. One of the RR jawans was injured in the gunfight.    But, the two teams managed to overpower the terrorists and kill their divisional commander, later identified as Umar Khitab. Another terrorist named Zubair was also arrested after the two-hour long operation. None of the policemen sustained any injuries during the incident.    ACP Gyan Singh Meena was awarded the medal for solving five sensational murder cases during his tenure as SHO, Mayapuri, including the rape and murder of a child. He was later transferred to Dadra Nagar and Haveli as an officer with the crime branch where he solved another murder case of a foreign national. Meena was also awarded the Asadharan Karya Puraskar in 1992 for solving the kidnapping case of a businessman's son. He is presently posted as an ACP in the outer district.    While ACP Vijay Kumar was awarded the Police Medal for his distinguished service during the Commonwealth Games, ACP Laxmibai Kanwat was given the award for solving the rape case of a 17-year-old girl in Buddha Jayanti Park. ACP Swatanter Gill was awarded the medal for his role in apprehending a terrorist while he was posted as a traffic cop.  ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/delhi/After-scuffle-four-stone-man-to-death/articleshow/48497498.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:38 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: A young man was bludgeoned to death with stones by four men, including two minors, in west Delhi's Tilak Nagar area on Friday night. All four have been apprehended.    The incident took place around 11pm. The four men had got into a scuffle with the victim over a petty matter. "The deceased has been identified as Zeeshan (20) who was a flower dealer. Last night, all five of them were returning after consuming drugs and alcohol when an argument broke out between Zeeshan and two others. Zeeshan punched one of them and the others ganged up against him. The men hit Zeeshan with stones. He started bleeding profusely but was bludgeoned till he died on the spot," said a policeman.    Zeeshan had three brothers and one sister. "We have arrested the two main accused, who are both aged 23. The two juveniles have also been detained. All are drug addicts and we suspect the incident to be a fallout of past enmity. The accused have been identified as residents of Khayala area," said a senior police officer.    "We came to know about Zeeshan's death around midnight. Some locals informed us about the incident. He was then taken to a hospital, where the doctors declared him dead. He had already died on the spot. We dont know of anyone with whom he had enmity," said a friend who didn't want to be named.  ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/MP-CM-raises-issue-of-Vyapam-in-Independence-Day-speech/articleshow/48494815.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:38 IST 2015||BHOPAL: Chief minister Shivraj Singh Chouhan raised issue of Vyapam scam while addressing the Independence Day function here at Motilal Nehru stadium on Saturday. After unfurling the national tricolour and inspecting the parade, Chouhan in his long speech said he was hurt by the way some people have defamed Madhya Pradesh.     Without mentioning the word Vyapam, Chouhan said he would not sit quietly till the blot is removed.     He took up the issue in the middle of his long speech saying that "I am hurt and I want to share my feelings with you".     He said that he was sad about the fact that some people tried to defame the state. Chouhan reiterated that he made the recruitment process transparent in Madhya Pradesh.     "Earlier there were lots of irregularities taking place but we put a system in place. And in the process when we found something wrong we started taking action that was required. But some people started maligning us", he said.     A visibly agitated Chouhan said 1.60 crore students appeared in exams and about 3.54 lakh cleared it. Irregularities were found only in 1641 cases, it is a minuscule 0.01% of the total. He threw his hands in the air and said that if you go out in some other state you would find more irregularities.     Chouhan said that they had started cleaning the system but some people started maligning the image of Madhya Pradesh.     They launched a campaign as if MP is "a state of murderers, looters and conmen".     Indicating at the police personnel in the parade ground, he asked "were their recruitments bungled? ... and have they become dishonest? ... have teachers in MP become dishonest and have all the patwaris become dishonest...?" He went on asking questions to the public present at the parade ground.     He said he has taken pledge that he would not all this conspiracy to be successful.||BHOPAL
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/ranchi/Family-of-3-found-dead/articleshow/48492718.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:38 IST 2015||RANCHI: The bodies of three members of a family were found on Friday at Kuchhu village under Ormanjhi police station. The bodies of a man, his wife and two-year-old daughter were found inside their home which was locked from inside, said police. The bodies had cuts on them, suggesting that a sharp weapon was used to kill them, police added. A case was lodged against unknown persons with the local police station.     Rural SP Raj Kumar Lakra said locals suspected something amiss when they got a foul smell from the home of the deceased on Friday morning. "After villagers informed us, police broke into the house and found the family lying in a pool of blood. The bodies had started decomposing. It seems that they were killed three days ago," Lakra said.     Police allege that an outsider could not have killed the family as the house was locked from inside. Police, during their search, found a sharp weapon which they believe is the murder weapon. "We suspect that the man killed his family and then committed suicide. A probe into the incident will reveal more details," said Lakra.     According to locals, the husband and wife would fight frequently over domestic issues.     ||RANCHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:38 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:38 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/SC-acquits-Romesh-Sharma-in-Budhiraja-murder-case/articleshow/48704930.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:38 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Thursday upheld the Delhi High Court order acquitting former Congress leader Romesh Sharma in the case relating to the killing of fashion designer Kunjum Budhiraja.     A bench of Justices Pinaki Chandra Ghose and R K Agrawal dismissed an appeal filed by the Delhi government challenging HC order.     The Delhi government contended that the HC had erred in acquitting Sharma but it was strongly opposed by his counsel and senior advocate Siddharth Luthra who submitted that his client was in love with Kunjum and there was no evidence to prove his involvement in the case.     Sharma, who was alleged to be a frontman of underworld don Dawood Ibrahim, was convicted by a trial court on February 15, 2008. Kunjum was killed on March 20, 1999 at Sharma's South Delhi-based 'Jai Mata Di' farm house by a group of hired gangsters from Uttar Pradesh.     The trial court had convicted Sharma and five other accused in the case and had awarded life term to all. The HC, however, acquitted Sharma and co-accused Tejendir Verdi but upheld conviction and sentence of other four accused— Sharma's nephew Surinder Mishra, Hemchand, Santram and Ramesh alias Bobby.     While acquitting Sharma, the HC had said "Romesh Sharma and Kunjum were in love, and desired the company of each other. It does not establish that Sharma had got fed up with her". It had turned down Delhi police's contention that Sharma wanted to get rid of Kunjum as she knew about his alleged illegal activities.     "A grieving lover falling over the body of his mate and performing the rituals of a marriage can well be an expression of lasting love, and need not necessarily be a drama," the HC had said.     Sharma was in judicial custody at the time of the Kunjum's murder.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Raid-on-Bengaluru-centre-reveals-horror-tales/articleshow/48704718.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:38 IST 2015||BENGALURU: A State Human Rights Commission raid on a de-addiction centre in Jnanabharati Layout, near Kengeri, southwest Bengaluru, found 90 inmates living in pathetic conditions and subjected to inhuman treatment.     Thursday's raid followed the murder of an inmate of another de-addiction centre in Kothanur recently.     The SHRC raid on Sri Santhosh Social Service Society, also known as 4S Society, followed a tipoff. According to SHRC officials, the centre has been in existence for seven years at least, but the society couldn't produce documents of having obtained permission from the social welfare department. Commission officials said the centre had the permission from the DC and the DHO.     "Most inmates are between 20 and 35 years. They showed us signs of being physically abused. The centre has violated other norms too. Although it's supposed to have one nurse for every 15 patients and at least one in-house doctor and a psychiatrist, it didn't have any," said an SHRC spokesperson.     4 arrested for killing inmate:     Kothanur police arrested a de-addiction centre staffer and three inmates for allegedly beating to death a 28-year-old inmate. Dinesh was admitted to the centre by his family as he was an alcoholic. He was later found dead in a hospital. Family members noticed several bruises on his body. Narayana, an inmate-turned-staffer, gave some medicines to Dinesh, who later turned aggressive. Narayana sought the help of inmates Suresh, Subhan and Simon, to subdue Dinesh.     When Dinesh retaliated, the quartet overpowered him till he became unconscious. He died in hospital.||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/A-jolly-good-fellow-say-Khannas-friends/articleshow/48704630.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:38 IST 2015||Sanjeev Khanna, Indrani Mukerjea's second husband and suspected ally in Sheena Bora's killing, may be the most surprising element in this macabre drama, but his friends and associates in Kolkata refused to cast aspersions on "Sanju" just yet.     From being the biggest dart enthusiast at one of Kolkata's poshest clubs (the CC&FC) to having a finger in every pie, Sanjeev was everyone's "best mate" and go-to guy who friends described as: "A doer... someone who could get things done."     The morning after Khanna's arrest, TOI spoke to Ajay Rawla, the man who Khanna worked for as a consultant and whose house he was picked up from on Wednesday afternoon. "It wasn't like he was hiding like a desperate fugitive in my house. We had a meeting in the morning after which he drove me home and that's when news broke on television. We were sitting, watching, wondering what steps to take when the police arrived," explained Rawla.     Seven years his senior, Khanna's association with Rawla dates back to the time they went to Mayo College in Ajmer. Later, Khanna went on to become an aide for Rawla's pet projects. Besides running his own business in wireless communications, Khanna was there setting up chef Shaun Kenworthy and Rawla's restaurant 1658 or immersed in the heritage project of converting the Bawali Rajbari into a hotel. "He was getting all the construction work and labourers in place. He was very good in helping out with permissions through his connections with excise and contractors," remembers Kenworthy.     Khanna, who seldom missed his outings at the club, motor rallies and horse racing as a prominent face in the social circuit, was not the same man before he met Indrani, recounts Bull Banthia, a close friend. "Well-read and well-versed, Sanju had a great mechanical mind with a solution for everything," is how Bull chose to describe his "jolly good friend who loved meeting new people, hung out at the club but wasn't a social climber". "It was Indrani who emerged as this socialite and drove him to consciously build contacts with those higher up in the social rung after marriage," said the Kolkata-based entrepreneur. "That's the reason why I distanced myself from them until overnight she left Kolkata with their daughter and Sanju's wallet."     While Indrani never surfaces in conversations, his daughter Vidhie, who stayed with Indrani, is a fond subject with his friends. "He would miss his daughter but was resigned to fate, hoping that someday she would find him," said Rawla, adding, "It was Vidhie who called Sanjeev on Wednesday to give him the news."     No one seems to know about any recent interaction between Khanna and Indrani. G M Kapur, a known name in Kolkata who was Intach's state convener and happens to be Khanna's "mama", seemed disturbed with "all the theorizing" of Khanna's role in the crime. He declined to look back on Indrani and Khanna's relationship but added, "The last that there was any contact with Indrani or her family was when Vidhie visited Calcutta last year to celebrate the 75th birthday of her grandmother (Khanna's mother who lives with him)."     Khanna's Facebook posts on "karma" in the weeks and months following Sheena's alleged murder on April 24, 2012, make for interesting reading. On April 30, Khanna shared photo messages: "Say whatever, whenever the f*** you want to"; "Sometimes I get so weird, I even freak myself out".     On May 24, exactly a month after the alleged killing, he wrote: "You can never tell what people are thinking and feeling unless they tell you, and usually they lie. you ask them, 'Whats wrong?' and they say 'Nothing'. You accept this because it's easier than digging for the truth. People smile when they want to cry, they laugh when they want to scream and shout. They pretend like nothing is wrong because they don't want to face the truth. Things aren't always rainbows and butterflies, sometimes you gotta scream and cry your anger and sadness to the world, because you can only hold it in for so long before something in you snaps. so when you want to cry, cry. When you want to scream, scream. Don't hide behind fake smiles, it's ok to not be alright."     ||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Sheena-docu-Michail-add-to-mystery/articleshow/48701752.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:38 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Michail, Sheena's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered have raised a number of unanswered questions.    Two days after his mother, Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Michail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai Police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed that what he gave to police was enough to prove that Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora (who are actually parents of Indrani) as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. Some questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukherjea.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Michail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43 as mentioned in reports after her arrest.    Adding more to the suspense, Michail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Michail studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board examination, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that knew that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard that her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard that she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband who she introduced as Peter Mukherjea."    The two-member Mumbai Police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Michail, who on Wednesday, was the first one to reveal that Sheena was Indrani's daughter, twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Michail's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Michail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukherjae is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Michail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."  ||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Grandparents-are-Sheenas-mom-dad-on-birth-certificate/articleshow/48704559.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:38 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Mikhail, Sheena Bora's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered led to some unanswered questions on Thursday.    Two days after his mother Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Mikhail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed what he gave the police was enough to prove Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora, who are actually Indrani's parents, as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. However, many questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter. In many cases in India involving single mothers, grandparents are known to put in their names as father and mother.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukerjea, that is, 13 years after Sheena was born.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Mikhail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43.    Mikhail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Mikhail     studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board exam, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband, who she introduced as Peter Mukerjea."    The two-member Mumbai police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Mikhail twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Mikhail 's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time, he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Mikhail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukerjea is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Mikhail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Sheena-bowled-us-over-Rahuls-uncle/articleshow/48704552.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:38 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: Had things worked out as desired for Peter Mukherjea's first wife Shabnam and her family in Dehradun, Rahul Mukherjea and Sheena Bora would have been married for over three years now.     Shabnam's brother Shaleen Singh told TOI on Thursday that in 2011 Rahul brought Sheena to their sprawling home in Dehradun to seek approval from the family for their marriage.     The entire family-Shabnam, her younger brother Shaleen, father Anand Singh and mother Seema-were reportedly bowled over by Sheena's jovial nature and affection towards the elderly people. Impressed, the family gave its "unqualified and unanimous approval" for the wedding, which was supposed to take place within a few months, said Shaleen.     Stunned by the recent development, Shaleen said, "Sheena was among those rare persons who left a deep and lifelong impact on people. She was good-looking, a sweet person, clean of heart and good to talk to. None of us objected to the wedding."     Shaleen learnt of Sheena's murder through news channels. "It would have been great if she had become a part of the family. I don't know what was the cause and motive behind the heinous crime, but all those behind the killing of the jovial-natured girl should not be spared at any cost," he said.     A former model and tele-actor, 49-year-old Shaleen today owns the Sanskar International school in Jogiwala here. He recalled the last meeting with Shabnam and Rahul in April this year. "My father Anand Singh passed away in April. They had come to pay their respects but we did not interact much."     However, Shaleen said of late the interaction between him and his sister Shabnam was limited. Although Shabnam's farm Gul-e-Shabnam and Shaleen's residence Shankar Sadan are barely 200 metres away in Badripur, meetings between them were rare. While Shaleen and his mother stay on different floors of Shankar Sadan, Shabnam stays alone at her residence and is frequently visited by Rahul.     "There are matters in each family which we do not want to disclose. We are not against each other but do not interact much. She comes to meet our mother occasionally," said Shaleen, adding that Shabnam was passionate about painting and had a studio in her residence.     Shaleen denied having any details about the presence of Mumbai police in Dehradun. "Neither Doon police nor Mumbai police have contacted me over the issue."     Staff at Shabnam's residence said she was out-of-station but they were not aware of her whereabouts.||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Kilpauk-doctor-murder-Hubby-to-approach-court/articleshow/48704411.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:38 IST 2015||CHENNAI: It's been four days since police claimed to have solved the murder of S Sathya, 24, a PG medical student. However, her husband has put forth questions that police have failed to answer. Though investigating officers confirmed Sathya was not sexually assaulted before she was killed, they leaked to some section of media saying that they changed their stance on Wednesday and said there were indications of attempt to rape on the deceased.     Police personnel revealed the details soon after Sathya's husband Dr P Sesu, also employed at a primary health centre in Perambalur, expressed certain doubts.     He alleged the police hastily solved the case citing the state assembly, which is in motion. Sathya was found dead at her house in Kilpauk on August 20.     On August 23, police arrested Harintham Depnath, a BTech graduate, who lived at the second floor on the same apartment. Neither was there any mention about sexual assault or attempt on Sathya when the body was recovered from the house. The nor did the doctors. Police didn't tell this during the arrest of Depnath on August 23. "What forced the police to reveal about the sexual harassment attempt on my wife now?" asked Sesu.     "I want to live a peaceful life with my two sons - Tamil Nesan, 6, and Karmugilan, 4. The studies and the future of my children is important for me. I do respect the police personnel who spent sleepless nights to solve the murder, but there are questions that need to be answered," he said.     "I live in Perambalur with my children, but we speak through live video calls. I have told my sons that Sathya has gone to the God, as the Almighty likes her more. "Hereafter, we cannot speak or meet her. I don't know how far my children will admit it?" said Sesu. "I will approach the court seeking a fair probe into the murder of my wife. I want to find out the real cause behind her death. I want the real accused to get punished for his deed," said Sesu.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Woman-strangles-husbands-lover/articleshow/48704388.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:38 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A woman beat up and strangled her husband's partner, an assistant professor at a polytechnic in Choolaimedu, in their Thiruverkadu home on Thursday, police said. A court later remanded the accused, 32-year-old Shruti, in judicial custody.     Police said Sambasivam, a professor at Panimalar Engineering College in Poonamallee, used to bring Rajalakshmi, home frequently and introduced her to his wife Shruti as a colleague. He even dropped her home at night. The polytechnic where Rajalakshmi worked was part of the Panimalar group of educational institutions. Shruti initially believed the two were just colleagues until Sambasivam came home with Rajalakshmi on Tuesday and said the woman was moving in with them permanently.     On Wednesday morning, Sambasivam allegedly tied a 'mangalsutra' to Rajalakshmi in front of his wife, police said, based on Shruti's confession. A shocked Shruti picked up a fight with Sambasivam who asked her to maintain a cordial relationship and take care of Rajalakshmi. On Thursday morning, after he left for college a fight broke out between the two women.     Police said Rajalakshmi allegedly abused Sruthi and went into the bathroom. Sruthi followed her in and strangled her with the 'mangalsutra'. She then tried to make it appear that the woman had fainted in the bathroom. She took her in an autorickshaw to a nearby hospital where she was declared 'brought dead'. Doctors who noticed a few marks around her neck informed the Thiruverkadu police who registered a case of suspicious death under CrPC section 176.     The body was sent for postmortem to Kilpauk Medical College and Hospital.     After finding that the two women were at home at the time of the death, police interrogated Sruthi for more than an hour but she continued to maintain that Rajyalakshmi had died of injuries sustained when she fell down in the bathroom.     "She confessed to the murder when we told her that her fingerprints had been lifted from the scene of crime," said an investigating officer. "She said she had smashed the woman's head against the wall and later strangled her with the 'thali'." Police altered the case to murder and arrested Sruthi.     Initial inquiries revealed that Rajalakshmi had been married to a man named Rajasekhar for a while and they had separated. She then got married to Suresh, a relative who worked in a private firm, a few years ago and the couple moved into a house in Mogappair.     They allegedly had frequent quarrels as he tortured her and she left him too, police found.     Rajalakshmi then got a job with Panimalar Engineering College where she met Sambasivam. The two became friends and began seeing each other. Rajalakshmi recently moved to the polytechnic in Choolaimedu, police said.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/US-journalists-killer-annoyed-colleagues-Ex-boss/articleshow/48704167.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:38 IST 2015||ROANOKE, United States: The disgruntled former US television station employee who murdered two journalists had "annoyed" colleagues but showed no signs at work of any mental health issues, his former boss said Thursday.     Vester Lee Flanagan, 41, worked as a reporter for WDBJ in Roanoke, Virginia from March 2012 to February 2013, but was dismissed for poor performance and angry behavior, general manager Jeffrey Marks said.     On Wednesday, Flanagan shot and killed two of the CBS affiliate's journalists while they were conducting an on-air interview. He later fatally shot himself.     "We are still at a loss to figure out what happened to him in those two and a half years" since he was fired, Marks told a news conference flanked by dozens of staff, many of them holding hands.     "I don't think we identified that he had mental health issues. We certainly identified that he had performance issues."     Marks defended the station's hiring record and said its parent company had "a very elaborate program to screen employees."     Flanagan passed background checks and came with only positive references, Marks said.     It was only after he was hired, Marks said, that things went downhill.     "Vester's behavior annoyed a lot of people in the news station," Marks said.     Flanagan, who went by the on-screen name Bryce Williams, alleged in a manifesto faxed to ABC News that he was discriminated against as a gay, black journalist.     Marks said accusations in 2013 that he was treated unfairly were "immediately investigated and found to be without merit."     During his employment, Flanagan complied with demands that he seek medical help, but he was ultimately dismissed.     He was escorted from the building by police and made an ominous aside to the news director -- handing him a wooden cross and saying "'you'll need this'," Marks said.     As he left, he also made a "derogatory comment" to Adam Ward, the cameraman he shot dead on Wednesday.     Flanagan filed a complaint with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and a civil action suit, which were dismissed, he said.     "All of these investigations determined that no reasonable person would have taken any of the cited incidents as discrimination or harassment."     After killing Ward and reporter Alison Parker live on the air, Flanagan posted a video of the attack on social media.||ROANOKE, UNITED STATES
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:38 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/SC-acquits-Romesh-Sharma-in-Budhiraja-murder-case/articleshow/48704930.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:38 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Thursday upheld the Delhi High Court order acquitting former Congress leader Romesh Sharma in the case relating to the killing of fashion designer Kunjum Budhiraja.     A bench of Justices Pinaki Chandra Ghose and R K Agrawal dismissed an appeal filed by the Delhi government challenging HC order.     The Delhi government contended that the HC had erred in acquitting Sharma but it was strongly opposed by his counsel and senior advocate Siddharth Luthra who submitted that his client was in love with Kunjum and there was no evidence to prove his involvement in the case.     Sharma, who was alleged to be a frontman of underworld don Dawood Ibrahim, was convicted by a trial court on February 15, 2008. Kunjum was killed on March 20, 1999 at Sharma's South Delhi-based 'Jai Mata Di' farm house by a group of hired gangsters from Uttar Pradesh.     The trial court had convicted Sharma and five other accused in the case and had awarded life term to all. The HC, however, acquitted Sharma and co-accused Tejendir Verdi but upheld conviction and sentence of other four accused— Sharma's nephew Surinder Mishra, Hemchand, Santram and Ramesh alias Bobby.     While acquitting Sharma, the HC had said "Romesh Sharma and Kunjum were in love, and desired the company of each other. It does not establish that Sharma had got fed up with her". It had turned down Delhi police's contention that Sharma wanted to get rid of Kunjum as she knew about his alleged illegal activities.     "A grieving lover falling over the body of his mate and performing the rituals of a marriage can well be an expression of lasting love, and need not necessarily be a drama," the HC had said.     Sharma was in judicial custody at the time of the Kunjum's murder.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Raid-on-Bengaluru-centre-reveals-horror-tales/articleshow/48704718.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:38 IST 2015||BENGALURU: A State Human Rights Commission raid on a de-addiction centre in Jnanabharati Layout, near Kengeri, southwest Bengaluru, found 90 inmates living in pathetic conditions and subjected to inhuman treatment.     Thursday's raid followed the murder of an inmate of another de-addiction centre in Kothanur recently.     The SHRC raid on Sri Santhosh Social Service Society, also known as 4S Society, followed a tipoff. According to SHRC officials, the centre has been in existence for seven years at least, but the society couldn't produce documents of having obtained permission from the social welfare department. Commission officials said the centre had the permission from the DC and the DHO.     "Most inmates are between 20 and 35 years. They showed us signs of being physically abused. The centre has violated other norms too. Although it's supposed to have one nurse for every 15 patients and at least one in-house doctor and a psychiatrist, it didn't have any," said an SHRC spokesperson.     4 arrested for killing inmate:     Kothanur police arrested a de-addiction centre staffer and three inmates for allegedly beating to death a 28-year-old inmate. Dinesh was admitted to the centre by his family as he was an alcoholic. He was later found dead in a hospital. Family members noticed several bruises on his body. Narayana, an inmate-turned-staffer, gave some medicines to Dinesh, who later turned aggressive. Narayana sought the help of inmates Suresh, Subhan and Simon, to subdue Dinesh.     When Dinesh retaliated, the quartet overpowered him till he became unconscious. He died in hospital.||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/A-jolly-good-fellow-say-Khannas-friends/articleshow/48704630.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:38 IST 2015||Sanjeev Khanna, Indrani Mukerjea's second husband and suspected ally in Sheena Bora's killing, may be the most surprising element in this macabre drama, but his friends and associates in Kolkata refused to cast aspersions on "Sanju" just yet.     From being the biggest dart enthusiast at one of Kolkata's poshest clubs (the CC&FC) to having a finger in every pie, Sanjeev was everyone's "best mate" and go-to guy who friends described as: "A doer... someone who could get things done."     The morning after Khanna's arrest, TOI spoke to Ajay Rawla, the man who Khanna worked for as a consultant and whose house he was picked up from on Wednesday afternoon. "It wasn't like he was hiding like a desperate fugitive in my house. We had a meeting in the morning after which he drove me home and that's when news broke on television. We were sitting, watching, wondering what steps to take when the police arrived," explained Rawla.     Seven years his senior, Khanna's association with Rawla dates back to the time they went to Mayo College in Ajmer. Later, Khanna went on to become an aide for Rawla's pet projects. Besides running his own business in wireless communications, Khanna was there setting up chef Shaun Kenworthy and Rawla's restaurant 1658 or immersed in the heritage project of converting the Bawali Rajbari into a hotel. "He was getting all the construction work and labourers in place. He was very good in helping out with permissions through his connections with excise and contractors," remembers Kenworthy.     Khanna, who seldom missed his outings at the club, motor rallies and horse racing as a prominent face in the social circuit, was not the same man before he met Indrani, recounts Bull Banthia, a close friend. "Well-read and well-versed, Sanju had a great mechanical mind with a solution for everything," is how Bull chose to describe his "jolly good friend who loved meeting new people, hung out at the club but wasn't a social climber". "It was Indrani who emerged as this socialite and drove him to consciously build contacts with those higher up in the social rung after marriage," said the Kolkata-based entrepreneur. "That's the reason why I distanced myself from them until overnight she left Kolkata with their daughter and Sanju's wallet."     While Indrani never surfaces in conversations, his daughter Vidhie, who stayed with Indrani, is a fond subject with his friends. "He would miss his daughter but was resigned to fate, hoping that someday she would find him," said Rawla, adding, "It was Vidhie who called Sanjeev on Wednesday to give him the news."     No one seems to know about any recent interaction between Khanna and Indrani. G M Kapur, a known name in Kolkata who was Intach's state convener and happens to be Khanna's "mama", seemed disturbed with "all the theorizing" of Khanna's role in the crime. He declined to look back on Indrani and Khanna's relationship but added, "The last that there was any contact with Indrani or her family was when Vidhie visited Calcutta last year to celebrate the 75th birthday of her grandmother (Khanna's mother who lives with him)."     Khanna's Facebook posts on "karma" in the weeks and months following Sheena's alleged murder on April 24, 2012, make for interesting reading. On April 30, Khanna shared photo messages: "Say whatever, whenever the f*** you want to"; "Sometimes I get so weird, I even freak myself out".     On May 24, exactly a month after the alleged killing, he wrote: "You can never tell what people are thinking and feeling unless they tell you, and usually they lie. you ask them, 'Whats wrong?' and they say 'Nothing'. You accept this because it's easier than digging for the truth. People smile when they want to cry, they laugh when they want to scream and shout. They pretend like nothing is wrong because they don't want to face the truth. Things aren't always rainbows and butterflies, sometimes you gotta scream and cry your anger and sadness to the world, because you can only hold it in for so long before something in you snaps. so when you want to cry, cry. When you want to scream, scream. Don't hide behind fake smiles, it's ok to not be alright."     ||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Sheena-docu-Michail-add-to-mystery/articleshow/48701752.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:38 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Michail, Sheena's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered have raised a number of unanswered questions.    Two days after his mother, Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Michail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai Police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed that what he gave to police was enough to prove that Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora (who are actually parents of Indrani) as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. Some questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukherjea.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Michail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43 as mentioned in reports after her arrest.    Adding more to the suspense, Michail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Michail studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board examination, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that knew that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard that her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard that she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband who she introduced as Peter Mukherjea."    The two-member Mumbai Police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Michail, who on Wednesday, was the first one to reveal that Sheena was Indrani's daughter, twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Michail's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Michail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukherjae is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Michail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."  ||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Grandparents-are-Sheenas-mom-dad-on-birth-certificate/articleshow/48704559.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:38 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Mikhail, Sheena Bora's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered led to some unanswered questions on Thursday.    Two days after his mother Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Mikhail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed what he gave the police was enough to prove Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora, who are actually Indrani's parents, as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. However, many questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter. In many cases in India involving single mothers, grandparents are known to put in their names as father and mother.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukerjea, that is, 13 years after Sheena was born.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Mikhail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43.    Mikhail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Mikhail     studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board exam, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband, who she introduced as Peter Mukerjea."    The two-member Mumbai police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Mikhail twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Mikhail 's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time, he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Mikhail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukerjea is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Mikhail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Sheena-bowled-us-over-Rahuls-uncle/articleshow/48704552.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:38 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: Had things worked out as desired for Peter Mukherjea's first wife Shabnam and her family in Dehradun, Rahul Mukherjea and Sheena Bora would have been married for over three years now.     Shabnam's brother Shaleen Singh told TOI on Thursday that in 2011 Rahul brought Sheena to their sprawling home in Dehradun to seek approval from the family for their marriage.     The entire family-Shabnam, her younger brother Shaleen, father Anand Singh and mother Seema-were reportedly bowled over by Sheena's jovial nature and affection towards the elderly people. Impressed, the family gave its "unqualified and unanimous approval" for the wedding, which was supposed to take place within a few months, said Shaleen.     Stunned by the recent development, Shaleen said, "Sheena was among those rare persons who left a deep and lifelong impact on people. She was good-looking, a sweet person, clean of heart and good to talk to. None of us objected to the wedding."     Shaleen learnt of Sheena's murder through news channels. "It would have been great if she had become a part of the family. I don't know what was the cause and motive behind the heinous crime, but all those behind the killing of the jovial-natured girl should not be spared at any cost," he said.     A former model and tele-actor, 49-year-old Shaleen today owns the Sanskar International school in Jogiwala here. He recalled the last meeting with Shabnam and Rahul in April this year. "My father Anand Singh passed away in April. They had come to pay their respects but we did not interact much."     However, Shaleen said of late the interaction between him and his sister Shabnam was limited. Although Shabnam's farm Gul-e-Shabnam and Shaleen's residence Shankar Sadan are barely 200 metres away in Badripur, meetings between them were rare. While Shaleen and his mother stay on different floors of Shankar Sadan, Shabnam stays alone at her residence and is frequently visited by Rahul.     "There are matters in each family which we do not want to disclose. We are not against each other but do not interact much. She comes to meet our mother occasionally," said Shaleen, adding that Shabnam was passionate about painting and had a studio in her residence.     Shaleen denied having any details about the presence of Mumbai police in Dehradun. "Neither Doon police nor Mumbai police have contacted me over the issue."     Staff at Shabnam's residence said she was out-of-station but they were not aware of her whereabouts.||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Kilpauk-doctor-murder-Hubby-to-approach-court/articleshow/48704411.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:38 IST 2015||CHENNAI: It's been four days since police claimed to have solved the murder of S Sathya, 24, a PG medical student. However, her husband has put forth questions that police have failed to answer. Though investigating officers confirmed Sathya was not sexually assaulted before she was killed, they leaked to some section of media saying that they changed their stance on Wednesday and said there were indications of attempt to rape on the deceased.     Police personnel revealed the details soon after Sathya's husband Dr P Sesu, also employed at a primary health centre in Perambalur, expressed certain doubts.     He alleged the police hastily solved the case citing the state assembly, which is in motion. Sathya was found dead at her house in Kilpauk on August 20.     On August 23, police arrested Harintham Depnath, a BTech graduate, who lived at the second floor on the same apartment. Neither was there any mention about sexual assault or attempt on Sathya when the body was recovered from the house. The nor did the doctors. Police didn't tell this during the arrest of Depnath on August 23. "What forced the police to reveal about the sexual harassment attempt on my wife now?" asked Sesu.     "I want to live a peaceful life with my two sons - Tamil Nesan, 6, and Karmugilan, 4. The studies and the future of my children is important for me. I do respect the police personnel who spent sleepless nights to solve the murder, but there are questions that need to be answered," he said.     "I live in Perambalur with my children, but we speak through live video calls. I have told my sons that Sathya has gone to the God, as the Almighty likes her more. "Hereafter, we cannot speak or meet her. I don't know how far my children will admit it?" said Sesu. "I will approach the court seeking a fair probe into the murder of my wife. I want to find out the real cause behind her death. I want the real accused to get punished for his deed," said Sesu.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Woman-strangles-husbands-lover/articleshow/48704388.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:38 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A woman beat up and strangled her husband's partner, an assistant professor at a polytechnic in Choolaimedu, in their Thiruverkadu home on Thursday, police said. A court later remanded the accused, 32-year-old Shruti, in judicial custody.     Police said Sambasivam, a professor at Panimalar Engineering College in Poonamallee, used to bring Rajalakshmi, home frequently and introduced her to his wife Shruti as a colleague. He even dropped her home at night. The polytechnic where Rajalakshmi worked was part of the Panimalar group of educational institutions. Shruti initially believed the two were just colleagues until Sambasivam came home with Rajalakshmi on Tuesday and said the woman was moving in with them permanently.     On Wednesday morning, Sambasivam allegedly tied a 'mangalsutra' to Rajalakshmi in front of his wife, police said, based on Shruti's confession. A shocked Shruti picked up a fight with Sambasivam who asked her to maintain a cordial relationship and take care of Rajalakshmi. On Thursday morning, after he left for college a fight broke out between the two women.     Police said Rajalakshmi allegedly abused Sruthi and went into the bathroom. Sruthi followed her in and strangled her with the 'mangalsutra'. She then tried to make it appear that the woman had fainted in the bathroom. She took her in an autorickshaw to a nearby hospital where she was declared 'brought dead'. Doctors who noticed a few marks around her neck informed the Thiruverkadu police who registered a case of suspicious death under CrPC section 176.     The body was sent for postmortem to Kilpauk Medical College and Hospital.     After finding that the two women were at home at the time of the death, police interrogated Sruthi for more than an hour but she continued to maintain that Rajyalakshmi had died of injuries sustained when she fell down in the bathroom.     "She confessed to the murder when we told her that her fingerprints had been lifted from the scene of crime," said an investigating officer. "She said she had smashed the woman's head against the wall and later strangled her with the 'thali'." Police altered the case to murder and arrested Sruthi.     Initial inquiries revealed that Rajalakshmi had been married to a man named Rajasekhar for a while and they had separated. She then got married to Suresh, a relative who worked in a private firm, a few years ago and the couple moved into a house in Mogappair.     They allegedly had frequent quarrels as he tortured her and she left him too, police found.     Rajalakshmi then got a job with Panimalar Engineering College where she met Sambasivam. The two became friends and began seeing each other. Rajalakshmi recently moved to the polytechnic in Choolaimedu, police said.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/US-journalists-killer-annoyed-colleagues-Ex-boss/articleshow/48704167.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:38 IST 2015||ROANOKE, United States: The disgruntled former US television station employee who murdered two journalists had "annoyed" colleagues but showed no signs at work of any mental health issues, his former boss said Thursday.     Vester Lee Flanagan, 41, worked as a reporter for WDBJ in Roanoke, Virginia from March 2012 to February 2013, but was dismissed for poor performance and angry behavior, general manager Jeffrey Marks said.     On Wednesday, Flanagan shot and killed two of the CBS affiliate's journalists while they were conducting an on-air interview. He later fatally shot himself.     "We are still at a loss to figure out what happened to him in those two and a half years" since he was fired, Marks told a news conference flanked by dozens of staff, many of them holding hands.     "I don't think we identified that he had mental health issues. We certainly identified that he had performance issues."     Marks defended the station's hiring record and said its parent company had "a very elaborate program to screen employees."     Flanagan passed background checks and came with only positive references, Marks said.     It was only after he was hired, Marks said, that things went downhill.     "Vester's behavior annoyed a lot of people in the news station," Marks said.     Flanagan, who went by the on-screen name Bryce Williams, alleged in a manifesto faxed to ABC News that he was discriminated against as a gay, black journalist.     Marks said accusations in 2013 that he was treated unfairly were "immediately investigated and found to be without merit."     During his employment, Flanagan complied with demands that he seek medical help, but he was ultimately dismissed.     He was escorted from the building by police and made an ominous aside to the news director -- handing him a wooden cross and saying "'you'll need this'," Marks said.     As he left, he also made a "derogatory comment" to Adam Ward, the cameraman he shot dead on Wednesday.     Flanagan filed a complaint with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and a civil action suit, which were dismissed, he said.     "All of these investigations determined that no reasonable person would have taken any of the cited incidents as discrimination or harassment."     After killing Ward and reporter Alison Parker live on the air, Flanagan posted a video of the attack on social media.||ROANOKE, UNITED STATES
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/ranchi/Free-we-are-but-what-about-safety/articleshow/48492204.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:42 IST 2015||RANCHI: Ranchi is the capital of a developing state, be it in education or sports. The progress has been slow but it is progressing nevertheless and here arises the question: how safe is the city for its people, especially its women?     When people from various fields of work were asked how safe they felt in the city, everyone came up with one answer. "The implementation and execution of laws are not proper here ," they said.     The students of St Xavier's College felt the complexity of the legal system and a poor sense of morality among the people allowed criminal activities to flourish. Theft, murder, eve-teasing, loot and extortion are so common these days that people have now become used to them and accepted them as part of their life.     While some felt good has the power to overcome evil, how many have the moral courage to stand up against wrong, bound as they are by responsibilities towards their family and loved ones. Everyone is waiting for that "someone" to take the initiative and lead. Instead of raising their voice together, they have learnt to move along with the problem. Looting and snatching have become so common in the city that women have been forced to give up the tradition of wearing jewellery.     Ranchi may be safer than other cities in India, but it is definitely not the safest one. Parents here are scared to send their children to tuition alone and daughters cannot step out of home after dark.     "Money is perhaps the biggest corrupting factor leading to crime. Even school and college students are involved in it sometimes," said a parent, who was waiting for her son to come home from his coaching class.     She added that families have to guide and teach their children right from the very beginning so that they become worthy citizens of the country in the future. "The discrimination between boys and the girls has to be eradicated and there should be equality between the two at home so that boys develop a sense of respect towards girls. In the broader perspective, this will help ensure women's safety," she said.     When a cross-section of working women were asked how safe they felt returning home, "The city is not safe for women at night" they said in unison. Working women feel threatened despite a 24x7 police patrol. Public transport also does not guarantee them a sense of security.     Businessmen blamed the administration for the poor law and order and said laws are "worthless" if they are not strictly implemented.     A wine dealer was asked about the relation between drinking and criminal activities. He said, "Problem nasha me nahi logon ke dimag me hai, police ko kuch karna chahiye (the problem does not lie in drinking, it's the mindset of the people and the police have to do something)."     It is apparent that people have lost faith in the law-enforcing agencies but when the police were asked to comment, they said the people do not co-operate with them. What action can they take if the people do not report cases? "Eight of the 10 callers at 100 are fraud," said a police official.       (The writer is a student of Class X, DPS, Ranchi)||RANCHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/surat/Doc-assistant-arrested-for-womans-death-during-abortion/articleshow/48491327.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:42 IST 2015||SURAT: A doctor and his assistant were arrested for allegedly causing the death of a woman while carrying out abortion of her 14-week-old foetus in the city in March. They have been booked for culpable homicide not amounting to murder.     Taruna Magan Thakre, a resident of Priyanka Society of Kadodara Charrasta, was admitted to a private hospital in Godadara in March.     Dr Sreekalol Malik, 39, MBBS, and his assistant Sanjay R Patil, 40, performed the abortion on the woman. The operation was not done properly and this allegedly caused Taruna's death soon after. A case of accidental death was registered at Limbayat police station then.     "Investigation and analysis showed that the foetus was normal and that the abortion was not done properly. A part of foetus was left in the woman's body, which created health complications and caused her death subsequently. The doctor was not qualified to carry out abortion or perform surgery, being a general practitioner," police inspector JT Sonara said.     "Abortion is done to save the life of a mother, but here a faulty procedure caused the death of a woman. We have arrested the doctor and his assistant," Sonara added.                     ||SURAT
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/UP-isolated-in-opposing-CBI-lens-on-scribe-murder/articleshow/48490370.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:42 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: With pressure mounting for an independent probe into the murder of journalist Jagendra Singh allegedly at the behest of UP minister Ram Murti Verma, the state on Friday requested the Supreme Court to lay down guidelines against increasing violence against journalists across the country.Notwithstanding its pan-India stand on violence against scribes, the Akhilesh Yadav government stood isolated before a bench of Chief Justice HL Dattu and justices Arun Mishra and Amitava Roy in the face of demands from journalists and Press Council of India (PCI) for a probe by the CBI or an independent agency into Jagendra Singh's murder.The bench was hearing an application filed by journalist Mudit Mathur requesting the SC to transfer to itself a pending writ petition before the Lucknow bench of Allahabad high court, from where the deceased journalist's son had withdrawn his writ petition.The petitioner alleged that the son was forced to withdraw the writ petition seeking CBI probe into his father's murder in the face of threat to his life, lure of money and promise of job. The bench issued notice to the state government on the transfer petition and asked it to file its response in three weeks.Appearing for UP, senior advocate Kapil Sibal said, "It is a serious issue. The state also joins the petitioners in condemning the series of attacks against journalists in various states. If journalists are treated like this, the matter becomes very serious. The Supreme Court can lay down guidelines on this issue."However, he was quick to clarify that the state was not commenting on the murder of Jagendra Singh. Sibal, along with additional advocate general Gaurav Bhatia, said the Lucknow bench of Allahabad HC was capable of dealing with the pending petition. "The state has filed a probe status report about the murder case before the HC," Bhatia said.Jagendra Singh had been writing extensively on social media about alleged illegal activities — encroachment of land, issuance of fake ration cards to pilfer PDS grains, illegal sand mining and satta trade — being carried out by cronies of minister Ram Murti Verma.He had alleged that the minister's goons had assaulted him on April 28 and left him with a fractured leg. From the hospital bed, he had told the police that the minister's men had barged into his house again on June 1, poured petrol on him and set him afire. Singh died on June 8.The state Congress, which had joined the opposition in demanding CBI probe into the incident, reacted sharply to Sibal appearing for the SP government in the SC to oppose the petition.In a letter to Congress president Sonia Gandhi, state legislature party leader Pradeep Mathur said, "A senior journalist has filed a PIL before the Supreme Court demanding CBI probe into Jagendra Singh murder case that is coming for hearing on August 14 before a bench headed by the CJI."It has come as a surprise to us that our senior leader Kapil Sibal is appearing in the matter against the stand of the state Congress leaders, who have been also demanding CBI probe into the matter. His opposing CBI probe will embarrass us of double speak. Please look into the matter and see that state leaders are not embarrassed due to our senior leader and get support from high command to give strength to public feelings against poor law and order situation of the state."||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/CBI-team-visits-site-where-Namrata-Damors-body-was-found-in-Ujjain/articleshow/48490360.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:42 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: Days after beginning murder investigations into the Vyapam scam, a team of 13 CBI officials on Friday visited a crime scene where the mutilated body of MBBS student Namrata Damor, one of the suspects, was found near railway tracks in Ujjain.     CBI sources said the team led by superintendent of police Hari Singh reached the railway tracks in the Bhairopora area under Kaitha Police Station in Madhya Pradesh and also quizzed all the police officials and railway staff who had seen the body.     The team which stayed there for two hours collected pictures of the body and crime scene which were clicked when the body was discovered on January 7, 2012, a week after she went missing from her hostel the sources said.     CBI sleuths accompanied by a team from CFSL made a detailed video recording of the crime scene and quizzed eye witnesses of nearby villages and the railway gangman who had discovered the body.     The team moved to Kaitha police station where it questioned Town Inspector (TI) Munni Parihar and sub-inspector Madhav Sharma who initially probed the case, the sources said.     Source said the team has also asked the police to provide call records collected by its cyber crime wing.     Namrata's family had claimed that she was killed and her body was dumped on the railway tracks but police had termed it as suicide claiming that she jumped off the train because of family opposition to her alleged friendship with a boy.     The police investigation was in contrast to post-mortem report which had said that she died because of "violent asphyxia as a result of smothering" suggestive of "homicide".     Namrata is suspected to have taken admission in MBBS illegally which further raised suspicion that she might have been eliminated by vested interests. The role of Namrata's alleged friend Vishal Verma is also under scanner of the CBI as he is suspected to be one of the persons who had allegedly appeared in the pre-medical tests of 2009 as an impersonator.||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Rowdy-sheeters-too-bask-under-poll-sun/articleshow/48490237.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:42 IST 2015||Endless traffic snarls and polluted air. How did Bengaluru -once famed for its pleasant weather, tree-lined avenues and clean streets -become such a mess?     It's a question that often crosses our mind as we walk or drive to work. The Times of India brought six civic and urban experts together and asked them these questions: What ails Bengaluru? How did we get in to this mess? What can we do to resolve it? Urban experts, citizen activists and doctors spent a couple of hours debating problems and possible solu tions. While the de bate often grew heated, all of them concurred that too many agencies were involved and government bodies were not lutions. While the debate often grew heated, all of them concurred that too many agencies were involved and government bodies were not consulting one another. Streamlining governance with the use of technology is the key.     "No one has drawn up a blueprint of how BBMP should be functioning," said urban planner H S Sudhira. Perhaps poll season rings in the best tidings for anti-social elements. Despite strictures on giving tickets to those facing criminal charges, there are at least a dozen such candidates contesting the BBMP election.     "We have no say in the electoral process. The State Election Commission is empowered to eliminate those with criminal background.We keep watch on such persons on our list of rowdies to ensure they don't indulge in any unlawful activities," said police commissioner NS Megharikh.     The most keenly contested election could be in the wards of Padarayanapura and Bapujinagar in Chamarajpet. The JD(S) candidates -father and son -face murder charges.     Arif Pasha, for mer BBMP councillor, is contesting from Bapujinagar, and son Imran Pasha from Padarayanapura. The area simmers with vengeance and rivalry , with arch rival Altaf Khan fielding his wife Seema from Jagjeevanaramnagar ward, sandwiched between the two wards, resulting in a hyper campaign.     The father and son duo are accused of murdering Altaf 's brothers Amjad and Ejaz in April 2004. They are on the list of rowdies in JJ Nagar police station, accused of attempt to murder and rioting, among others.     Marimuthu, 67, known as the hooch queen among the older generations of Devarajeevanahalli and Kadugondanahalli, is also a JD(S) candidate. "How can the police treat me as a rowdy-sheeter at this age? The people of Old Bagalur in Sagayapuram ward respect me. There aren't any cases against me. Though my children are against my contesting elections, my people have urged me to represent them," she said.     'If criminals are elected, how will Bengaluru run?'  Freedom fighter and Gandhian H S Doreswamy expressed regret at candidates with criminal cases contesting BBMP poll. At a media meet on Friday, Doreswamy said, "Candidates from Bharthinagar, Bapujinagar and Shivaji-nagar have criminal charges against them. Marimuthu has been given the JD(S) ticket though she was held for selling illicit liquor 15 years ago, killing 229 people. If criminals are elected, how can our governing body function? Candidates are nominated not based on their ability but based on how much money they can invest."||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/pune/Radhe-Maa-cant-be-compared-to-saints/articleshow/48489849.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:42 IST 2015||PUNE: Maharashtra Andhashraddha Nirmoolan Samiti (MANS), on Friday, demanded that the state government act against Radhe Maa alias Sukhwinder Kaur under provisions of the Anti-Superstition Act.    "If she is found guilty, the government must act against Radhe Maa under the Anti-Superstition Act. The state and home department must not succumb to any pressure. They must probe the case diligently," demanded Avinash Patil, state president of MANS, in a press statement.    Patil added that to defame and disgrace the names of saints or gods by claiming to be their reincarnation, thereby cheating the gullible and god-fearing simple folks, is a cognisable offence as per section 5 of the Anti-Superstition Act, which was approved by the state legislature after rationalist Narendra Dabholkar was murdered in 2013.    The Bombay High Court, on Friday, granted anticipatory bail to Radhe Maa in connection with a dowry harassment case. The court directed her to submit a cash bond of Rs 30,000 and be present at Kandivali police station in Mumbai, on August19 and 26 to cooperate with the investigation.    "Radhe Maa cannot be compared to saints, who were religious philosophers and preached moral values. It is quite clear that she is a fake spiritual guru, who lives lavishly and calls herself an incarnation of a goddess. If the government fails to act against Radhe Maa, we will consider it as shielding bogus religious leaders in the name of spirituality," the statement added.    Addressing a press conference, Milind Deshmukh, state secretary of MANS, stated, "Radhe Maa has made claims of curing diseases like cancer and AIDS through miracles and other so-called supernatural acts. She is doing so in Maharashtra and this makes her practice illegal under the law."  ||PUNE
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/pune/Cops-seize-SUV-used-to-transport-teens-body/articleshow/48489841.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:42 IST 2015||PUNE: The Vishrantwadi police seized an SUV used by prime suspect Rakhi alias Rekha Balpande in the murder of her 13-year-old son, Chaitanya.    The SUV is owned by Sunil More, father of the flat owner Sumit More, who was arrested on August 7. The vehicle worth Rs 4.5 lakh, parked outside the Mores' residence at Sainiknagar in Yerawada, was seized by assistant inspector Suryakant Marode after investigations revealed that it was used for transporting Chaitanya's body. Police have recovered Rakhi's gold chain, cellphone, master card and keys of the flat.    Rakhi was arrested for beating Chaitanaya to death using a cricket bat on August 5. She is in police custody till August 17.    Sudhir Hiremath, deputy commissioner of police (Zone IV), told TOI on Friday, "More was seen in the SUV in Tingrenagar area probably wanting to dispose of the body. However, he transported the body to Sassoon General Hospital."    Earlier, Marode produced More before the Khadki cantonment court, judicial magistrate first class S K Balpande around 3.45pm, following expiry of his police custody remand on Friday. He filed a plea for seeking extension of his police custody remand. Assistant public prosecutor Sheela Khadke submitted before the court that More's custodial interrogation was essential to collect more evidence of alleged criminal conspiracy against him and Rakhi and pleaded to give sufficient time to the police to conduct further investigations.    Opposing the prosecution's plea, defence lawyer Anay Kulkarni submitted that his client (More) was in police custody for eight days and further detention was not essential as the police have collected evidence, recorded statements of witnesses and prepared the spot panchanama.    He submitted the evidence against his client was circumstantial because he did not play an active role in the crime. He said police have recovered the cricket bat and clothes of the victims and suspects. He pleaded to send More in magisterial custody.    The court after hearing both sides extended More's police custody till August 16.  ||PUNE
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/kolkata/Adhir-visits-Sabang-victims-house/articleshow/48489791.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:42 IST 2015||SABANG: Pradesh Congress president Adhir Chowdhury visited the house of slain Chhatra Parishad (CP) supporter Krishna Prasad Jana at Sabang on Friday. Significantly, party's local MLA Manas Bhuiyan was away from the locality on the day, which raised many eyebrows and hinted at a rift within the party.     But Adhir quickly rubbished all such speculations. "Manas is busy pursuing the case on the death of Krishna in Calcutta high court," he said. Adhir garlanded a portrait of the slain student leader. He spoke to Krishna's parents and assured them that the Congress would always be with the family, while handing over an envelope containing Rs 10,000.     Addressing a gathering at Temathani, Adhir condemned chief minister Mamata Banerjee's reaction to Krishna's murder. "Without trying to ascertain what exactly happened, the CM just attributed it to a clash within Chhatra Parishad. Through her reaction, she gave the police a pre-determined conclusion to draw even before they began investigating the incident."         ||SABANG
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/noida/Construction-supervisor-kills-5-yr-old-girl/articleshow/48489566.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:42 IST 2015||GHAZIABAD: A five-year-old girl was allegedly murdered in Nyay Khand I in Indirapuram on Friday afternoon. The victim, Pooja, was allegedly strangled by Salman, a supervisor at a construction site near Indirapuram Public School, where the girl's parents worked as labourers.     According to police, Salman was angry with Pooja for having teased him.     "We got a call around 1.30pm that a man had murdered a five-year-old girl and that the accused, Salman, has been caught by the labourers and passersby," Vishal Srivastava, SSI, Indirapuram police station, said. "We took the accused in custody and he confessed to having committed the crime during interrogation."     Natives of Madhya Pradesh, the girl and her family had been living at the construction site for the past three years. Thallu, Pooja's father, said, "My younger son was with Pooja when she was attacked. He raised an alarm when he saw Salman strangling my daughter in one of the flats under construction. We rushed to the spot and saw Pooja in Salman's arms. He said that she had fainted and he was rushing her to the hospital but my son narrated the entire incident to us."     The girl was admitted to a nearby nursing home where she was declared dead. Salman has been arrested and the body has been sent for postmortem.     ||GHAZIABAD
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/delhi/Auto-drivers-stab-Samaritan-to-death/articleshow/48489510.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:42 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: A 28-year-old was stabbed to death by some men when he tried to stop a fight between two autorickshaw drivers at a market near Kalka Garhi village in Amar Colony on Thursday night. A few people have been detained for interrogations.     The incident was reported around 6pm. Saddam Hussain was walking back to his house when he witnessed a brawl between two auto drivers over parking. A crowd had gathered at the spot. Hussain intervened and tried to help resolve the matter.     But one of the drivers called a few others over and, accusing Hussain of taking sides, thrashed him. When Hussain resisted, one of them pulled out a knife and stabbed him a few times. Hussain collapsed. Hussain's family said he was set to get married on Sunday and had reached Delhi on Thursday morning. His father owns a few rickshaws plying in the area. The family staged a protest outside Amar Colony police station. A case of murder has been registered.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:42 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:42 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/SC-acquits-Romesh-Sharma-in-Budhiraja-murder-case/articleshow/48704930.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:42 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Thursday upheld the Delhi High Court order acquitting former Congress leader Romesh Sharma in the case relating to the killing of fashion designer Kunjum Budhiraja.     A bench of Justices Pinaki Chandra Ghose and R K Agrawal dismissed an appeal filed by the Delhi government challenging HC order.     The Delhi government contended that the HC had erred in acquitting Sharma but it was strongly opposed by his counsel and senior advocate Siddharth Luthra who submitted that his client was in love with Kunjum and there was no evidence to prove his involvement in the case.     Sharma, who was alleged to be a frontman of underworld don Dawood Ibrahim, was convicted by a trial court on February 15, 2008. Kunjum was killed on March 20, 1999 at Sharma's South Delhi-based 'Jai Mata Di' farm house by a group of hired gangsters from Uttar Pradesh.     The trial court had convicted Sharma and five other accused in the case and had awarded life term to all. The HC, however, acquitted Sharma and co-accused Tejendir Verdi but upheld conviction and sentence of other four accused— Sharma's nephew Surinder Mishra, Hemchand, Santram and Ramesh alias Bobby.     While acquitting Sharma, the HC had said "Romesh Sharma and Kunjum were in love, and desired the company of each other. It does not establish that Sharma had got fed up with her". It had turned down Delhi police's contention that Sharma wanted to get rid of Kunjum as she knew about his alleged illegal activities.     "A grieving lover falling over the body of his mate and performing the rituals of a marriage can well be an expression of lasting love, and need not necessarily be a drama," the HC had said.     Sharma was in judicial custody at the time of the Kunjum's murder.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Raid-on-Bengaluru-centre-reveals-horror-tales/articleshow/48704718.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:42 IST 2015||BENGALURU: A State Human Rights Commission raid on a de-addiction centre in Jnanabharati Layout, near Kengeri, southwest Bengaluru, found 90 inmates living in pathetic conditions and subjected to inhuman treatment.     Thursday's raid followed the murder of an inmate of another de-addiction centre in Kothanur recently.     The SHRC raid on Sri Santhosh Social Service Society, also known as 4S Society, followed a tipoff. According to SHRC officials, the centre has been in existence for seven years at least, but the society couldn't produce documents of having obtained permission from the social welfare department. Commission officials said the centre had the permission from the DC and the DHO.     "Most inmates are between 20 and 35 years. They showed us signs of being physically abused. The centre has violated other norms too. Although it's supposed to have one nurse for every 15 patients and at least one in-house doctor and a psychiatrist, it didn't have any," said an SHRC spokesperson.     4 arrested for killing inmate:     Kothanur police arrested a de-addiction centre staffer and three inmates for allegedly beating to death a 28-year-old inmate. Dinesh was admitted to the centre by his family as he was an alcoholic. He was later found dead in a hospital. Family members noticed several bruises on his body. Narayana, an inmate-turned-staffer, gave some medicines to Dinesh, who later turned aggressive. Narayana sought the help of inmates Suresh, Subhan and Simon, to subdue Dinesh.     When Dinesh retaliated, the quartet overpowered him till he became unconscious. He died in hospital.||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/A-jolly-good-fellow-say-Khannas-friends/articleshow/48704630.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:42 IST 2015||Sanjeev Khanna, Indrani Mukerjea's second husband and suspected ally in Sheena Bora's killing, may be the most surprising element in this macabre drama, but his friends and associates in Kolkata refused to cast aspersions on "Sanju" just yet.     From being the biggest dart enthusiast at one of Kolkata's poshest clubs (the CC&FC) to having a finger in every pie, Sanjeev was everyone's "best mate" and go-to guy who friends described as: "A doer... someone who could get things done."     The morning after Khanna's arrest, TOI spoke to Ajay Rawla, the man who Khanna worked for as a consultant and whose house he was picked up from on Wednesday afternoon. "It wasn't like he was hiding like a desperate fugitive in my house. We had a meeting in the morning after which he drove me home and that's when news broke on television. We were sitting, watching, wondering what steps to take when the police arrived," explained Rawla.     Seven years his senior, Khanna's association with Rawla dates back to the time they went to Mayo College in Ajmer. Later, Khanna went on to become an aide for Rawla's pet projects. Besides running his own business in wireless communications, Khanna was there setting up chef Shaun Kenworthy and Rawla's restaurant 1658 or immersed in the heritage project of converting the Bawali Rajbari into a hotel. "He was getting all the construction work and labourers in place. He was very good in helping out with permissions through his connections with excise and contractors," remembers Kenworthy.     Khanna, who seldom missed his outings at the club, motor rallies and horse racing as a prominent face in the social circuit, was not the same man before he met Indrani, recounts Bull Banthia, a close friend. "Well-read and well-versed, Sanju had a great mechanical mind with a solution for everything," is how Bull chose to describe his "jolly good friend who loved meeting new people, hung out at the club but wasn't a social climber". "It was Indrani who emerged as this socialite and drove him to consciously build contacts with those higher up in the social rung after marriage," said the Kolkata-based entrepreneur. "That's the reason why I distanced myself from them until overnight she left Kolkata with their daughter and Sanju's wallet."     While Indrani never surfaces in conversations, his daughter Vidhie, who stayed with Indrani, is a fond subject with his friends. "He would miss his daughter but was resigned to fate, hoping that someday she would find him," said Rawla, adding, "It was Vidhie who called Sanjeev on Wednesday to give him the news."     No one seems to know about any recent interaction between Khanna and Indrani. G M Kapur, a known name in Kolkata who was Intach's state convener and happens to be Khanna's "mama", seemed disturbed with "all the theorizing" of Khanna's role in the crime. He declined to look back on Indrani and Khanna's relationship but added, "The last that there was any contact with Indrani or her family was when Vidhie visited Calcutta last year to celebrate the 75th birthday of her grandmother (Khanna's mother who lives with him)."     Khanna's Facebook posts on "karma" in the weeks and months following Sheena's alleged murder on April 24, 2012, make for interesting reading. On April 30, Khanna shared photo messages: "Say whatever, whenever the f*** you want to"; "Sometimes I get so weird, I even freak myself out".     On May 24, exactly a month after the alleged killing, he wrote: "You can never tell what people are thinking and feeling unless they tell you, and usually they lie. you ask them, 'Whats wrong?' and they say 'Nothing'. You accept this because it's easier than digging for the truth. People smile when they want to cry, they laugh when they want to scream and shout. They pretend like nothing is wrong because they don't want to face the truth. Things aren't always rainbows and butterflies, sometimes you gotta scream and cry your anger and sadness to the world, because you can only hold it in for so long before something in you snaps. so when you want to cry, cry. When you want to scream, scream. Don't hide behind fake smiles, it's ok to not be alright."     ||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Sheena-docu-Michail-add-to-mystery/articleshow/48701752.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:42 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Michail, Sheena's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered have raised a number of unanswered questions.    Two days after his mother, Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Michail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai Police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed that what he gave to police was enough to prove that Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora (who are actually parents of Indrani) as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. Some questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukherjea.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Michail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43 as mentioned in reports after her arrest.    Adding more to the suspense, Michail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Michail studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board examination, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that knew that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard that her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard that she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband who she introduced as Peter Mukherjea."    The two-member Mumbai Police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Michail, who on Wednesday, was the first one to reveal that Sheena was Indrani's daughter, twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Michail's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Michail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukherjae is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Michail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."  ||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Grandparents-are-Sheenas-mom-dad-on-birth-certificate/articleshow/48704559.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:42 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Mikhail, Sheena Bora's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered led to some unanswered questions on Thursday.    Two days after his mother Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Mikhail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed what he gave the police was enough to prove Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora, who are actually Indrani's parents, as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. However, many questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter. In many cases in India involving single mothers, grandparents are known to put in their names as father and mother.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukerjea, that is, 13 years after Sheena was born.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Mikhail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43.    Mikhail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Mikhail     studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board exam, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband, who she introduced as Peter Mukerjea."    The two-member Mumbai police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Mikhail twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Mikhail 's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time, he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Mikhail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukerjea is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Mikhail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Sheena-bowled-us-over-Rahuls-uncle/articleshow/48704552.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:42 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: Had things worked out as desired for Peter Mukherjea's first wife Shabnam and her family in Dehradun, Rahul Mukherjea and Sheena Bora would have been married for over three years now.     Shabnam's brother Shaleen Singh told TOI on Thursday that in 2011 Rahul brought Sheena to their sprawling home in Dehradun to seek approval from the family for their marriage.     The entire family-Shabnam, her younger brother Shaleen, father Anand Singh and mother Seema-were reportedly bowled over by Sheena's jovial nature and affection towards the elderly people. Impressed, the family gave its "unqualified and unanimous approval" for the wedding, which was supposed to take place within a few months, said Shaleen.     Stunned by the recent development, Shaleen said, "Sheena was among those rare persons who left a deep and lifelong impact on people. She was good-looking, a sweet person, clean of heart and good to talk to. None of us objected to the wedding."     Shaleen learnt of Sheena's murder through news channels. "It would have been great if she had become a part of the family. I don't know what was the cause and motive behind the heinous crime, but all those behind the killing of the jovial-natured girl should not be spared at any cost," he said.     A former model and tele-actor, 49-year-old Shaleen today owns the Sanskar International school in Jogiwala here. He recalled the last meeting with Shabnam and Rahul in April this year. "My father Anand Singh passed away in April. They had come to pay their respects but we did not interact much."     However, Shaleen said of late the interaction between him and his sister Shabnam was limited. Although Shabnam's farm Gul-e-Shabnam and Shaleen's residence Shankar Sadan are barely 200 metres away in Badripur, meetings between them were rare. While Shaleen and his mother stay on different floors of Shankar Sadan, Shabnam stays alone at her residence and is frequently visited by Rahul.     "There are matters in each family which we do not want to disclose. We are not against each other but do not interact much. She comes to meet our mother occasionally," said Shaleen, adding that Shabnam was passionate about painting and had a studio in her residence.     Shaleen denied having any details about the presence of Mumbai police in Dehradun. "Neither Doon police nor Mumbai police have contacted me over the issue."     Staff at Shabnam's residence said she was out-of-station but they were not aware of her whereabouts.||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Kilpauk-doctor-murder-Hubby-to-approach-court/articleshow/48704411.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:42 IST 2015||CHENNAI: It's been four days since police claimed to have solved the murder of S Sathya, 24, a PG medical student. However, her husband has put forth questions that police have failed to answer. Though investigating officers confirmed Sathya was not sexually assaulted before she was killed, they leaked to some section of media saying that they changed their stance on Wednesday and said there were indications of attempt to rape on the deceased.     Police personnel revealed the details soon after Sathya's husband Dr P Sesu, also employed at a primary health centre in Perambalur, expressed certain doubts.     He alleged the police hastily solved the case citing the state assembly, which is in motion. Sathya was found dead at her house in Kilpauk on August 20.     On August 23, police arrested Harintham Depnath, a BTech graduate, who lived at the second floor on the same apartment. Neither was there any mention about sexual assault or attempt on Sathya when the body was recovered from the house. The nor did the doctors. Police didn't tell this during the arrest of Depnath on August 23. "What forced the police to reveal about the sexual harassment attempt on my wife now?" asked Sesu.     "I want to live a peaceful life with my two sons - Tamil Nesan, 6, and Karmugilan, 4. The studies and the future of my children is important for me. I do respect the police personnel who spent sleepless nights to solve the murder, but there are questions that need to be answered," he said.     "I live in Perambalur with my children, but we speak through live video calls. I have told my sons that Sathya has gone to the God, as the Almighty likes her more. "Hereafter, we cannot speak or meet her. I don't know how far my children will admit it?" said Sesu. "I will approach the court seeking a fair probe into the murder of my wife. I want to find out the real cause behind her death. I want the real accused to get punished for his deed," said Sesu.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Woman-strangles-husbands-lover/articleshow/48704388.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:42 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A woman beat up and strangled her husband's partner, an assistant professor at a polytechnic in Choolaimedu, in their Thiruverkadu home on Thursday, police said. A court later remanded the accused, 32-year-old Shruti, in judicial custody.     Police said Sambasivam, a professor at Panimalar Engineering College in Poonamallee, used to bring Rajalakshmi, home frequently and introduced her to his wife Shruti as a colleague. He even dropped her home at night. The polytechnic where Rajalakshmi worked was part of the Panimalar group of educational institutions. Shruti initially believed the two were just colleagues until Sambasivam came home with Rajalakshmi on Tuesday and said the woman was moving in with them permanently.     On Wednesday morning, Sambasivam allegedly tied a 'mangalsutra' to Rajalakshmi in front of his wife, police said, based on Shruti's confession. A shocked Shruti picked up a fight with Sambasivam who asked her to maintain a cordial relationship and take care of Rajalakshmi. On Thursday morning, after he left for college a fight broke out between the two women.     Police said Rajalakshmi allegedly abused Sruthi and went into the bathroom. Sruthi followed her in and strangled her with the 'mangalsutra'. She then tried to make it appear that the woman had fainted in the bathroom. She took her in an autorickshaw to a nearby hospital where she was declared 'brought dead'. Doctors who noticed a few marks around her neck informed the Thiruverkadu police who registered a case of suspicious death under CrPC section 176.     The body was sent for postmortem to Kilpauk Medical College and Hospital.     After finding that the two women were at home at the time of the death, police interrogated Sruthi for more than an hour but she continued to maintain that Rajyalakshmi had died of injuries sustained when she fell down in the bathroom.     "She confessed to the murder when we told her that her fingerprints had been lifted from the scene of crime," said an investigating officer. "She said she had smashed the woman's head against the wall and later strangled her with the 'thali'." Police altered the case to murder and arrested Sruthi.     Initial inquiries revealed that Rajalakshmi had been married to a man named Rajasekhar for a while and they had separated. She then got married to Suresh, a relative who worked in a private firm, a few years ago and the couple moved into a house in Mogappair.     They allegedly had frequent quarrels as he tortured her and she left him too, police found.     Rajalakshmi then got a job with Panimalar Engineering College where she met Sambasivam. The two became friends and began seeing each other. Rajalakshmi recently moved to the polytechnic in Choolaimedu, police said.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/US-journalists-killer-annoyed-colleagues-Ex-boss/articleshow/48704167.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:42 IST 2015||ROANOKE, United States: The disgruntled former US television station employee who murdered two journalists had "annoyed" colleagues but showed no signs at work of any mental health issues, his former boss said Thursday.     Vester Lee Flanagan, 41, worked as a reporter for WDBJ in Roanoke, Virginia from March 2012 to February 2013, but was dismissed for poor performance and angry behavior, general manager Jeffrey Marks said.     On Wednesday, Flanagan shot and killed two of the CBS affiliate's journalists while they were conducting an on-air interview. He later fatally shot himself.     "We are still at a loss to figure out what happened to him in those two and a half years" since he was fired, Marks told a news conference flanked by dozens of staff, many of them holding hands.     "I don't think we identified that he had mental health issues. We certainly identified that he had performance issues."     Marks defended the station's hiring record and said its parent company had "a very elaborate program to screen employees."     Flanagan passed background checks and came with only positive references, Marks said.     It was only after he was hired, Marks said, that things went downhill.     "Vester's behavior annoyed a lot of people in the news station," Marks said.     Flanagan, who went by the on-screen name Bryce Williams, alleged in a manifesto faxed to ABC News that he was discriminated against as a gay, black journalist.     Marks said accusations in 2013 that he was treated unfairly were "immediately investigated and found to be without merit."     During his employment, Flanagan complied with demands that he seek medical help, but he was ultimately dismissed.     He was escorted from the building by police and made an ominous aside to the news director -- handing him a wooden cross and saying "'you'll need this'," Marks said.     As he left, he also made a "derogatory comment" to Adam Ward, the cameraman he shot dead on Wednesday.     Flanagan filed a complaint with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and a civil action suit, which were dismissed, he said.     "All of these investigations determined that no reasonable person would have taken any of the cited incidents as discrimination or harassment."     After killing Ward and reporter Alison Parker live on the air, Flanagan posted a video of the attack on social media.||ROANOKE, UNITED STATES
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:42 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/SC-acquits-Romesh-Sharma-in-Budhiraja-murder-case/articleshow/48704930.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:42 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Thursday upheld the Delhi High Court order acquitting former Congress leader Romesh Sharma in the case relating to the killing of fashion designer Kunjum Budhiraja.     A bench of Justices Pinaki Chandra Ghose and R K Agrawal dismissed an appeal filed by the Delhi government challenging HC order.     The Delhi government contended that the HC had erred in acquitting Sharma but it was strongly opposed by his counsel and senior advocate Siddharth Luthra who submitted that his client was in love with Kunjum and there was no evidence to prove his involvement in the case.     Sharma, who was alleged to be a frontman of underworld don Dawood Ibrahim, was convicted by a trial court on February 15, 2008. Kunjum was killed on March 20, 1999 at Sharma's South Delhi-based 'Jai Mata Di' farm house by a group of hired gangsters from Uttar Pradesh.     The trial court had convicted Sharma and five other accused in the case and had awarded life term to all. The HC, however, acquitted Sharma and co-accused Tejendir Verdi but upheld conviction and sentence of other four accused— Sharma's nephew Surinder Mishra, Hemchand, Santram and Ramesh alias Bobby.     While acquitting Sharma, the HC had said "Romesh Sharma and Kunjum were in love, and desired the company of each other. It does not establish that Sharma had got fed up with her". It had turned down Delhi police's contention that Sharma wanted to get rid of Kunjum as she knew about his alleged illegal activities.     "A grieving lover falling over the body of his mate and performing the rituals of a marriage can well be an expression of lasting love, and need not necessarily be a drama," the HC had said.     Sharma was in judicial custody at the time of the Kunjum's murder.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Raid-on-Bengaluru-centre-reveals-horror-tales/articleshow/48704718.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:42 IST 2015||BENGALURU: A State Human Rights Commission raid on a de-addiction centre in Jnanabharati Layout, near Kengeri, southwest Bengaluru, found 90 inmates living in pathetic conditions and subjected to inhuman treatment.     Thursday's raid followed the murder of an inmate of another de-addiction centre in Kothanur recently.     The SHRC raid on Sri Santhosh Social Service Society, also known as 4S Society, followed a tipoff. According to SHRC officials, the centre has been in existence for seven years at least, but the society couldn't produce documents of having obtained permission from the social welfare department. Commission officials said the centre had the permission from the DC and the DHO.     "Most inmates are between 20 and 35 years. They showed us signs of being physically abused. The centre has violated other norms too. Although it's supposed to have one nurse for every 15 patients and at least one in-house doctor and a psychiatrist, it didn't have any," said an SHRC spokesperson.     4 arrested for killing inmate:     Kothanur police arrested a de-addiction centre staffer and three inmates for allegedly beating to death a 28-year-old inmate. Dinesh was admitted to the centre by his family as he was an alcoholic. He was later found dead in a hospital. Family members noticed several bruises on his body. Narayana, an inmate-turned-staffer, gave some medicines to Dinesh, who later turned aggressive. Narayana sought the help of inmates Suresh, Subhan and Simon, to subdue Dinesh.     When Dinesh retaliated, the quartet overpowered him till he became unconscious. He died in hospital.||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/A-jolly-good-fellow-say-Khannas-friends/articleshow/48704630.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:42 IST 2015||Sanjeev Khanna, Indrani Mukerjea's second husband and suspected ally in Sheena Bora's killing, may be the most surprising element in this macabre drama, but his friends and associates in Kolkata refused to cast aspersions on "Sanju" just yet.     From being the biggest dart enthusiast at one of Kolkata's poshest clubs (the CC&FC) to having a finger in every pie, Sanjeev was everyone's "best mate" and go-to guy who friends described as: "A doer... someone who could get things done."     The morning after Khanna's arrest, TOI spoke to Ajay Rawla, the man who Khanna worked for as a consultant and whose house he was picked up from on Wednesday afternoon. "It wasn't like he was hiding like a desperate fugitive in my house. We had a meeting in the morning after which he drove me home and that's when news broke on television. We were sitting, watching, wondering what steps to take when the police arrived," explained Rawla.     Seven years his senior, Khanna's association with Rawla dates back to the time they went to Mayo College in Ajmer. Later, Khanna went on to become an aide for Rawla's pet projects. Besides running his own business in wireless communications, Khanna was there setting up chef Shaun Kenworthy and Rawla's restaurant 1658 or immersed in the heritage project of converting the Bawali Rajbari into a hotel. "He was getting all the construction work and labourers in place. He was very good in helping out with permissions through his connections with excise and contractors," remembers Kenworthy.     Khanna, who seldom missed his outings at the club, motor rallies and horse racing as a prominent face in the social circuit, was not the same man before he met Indrani, recounts Bull Banthia, a close friend. "Well-read and well-versed, Sanju had a great mechanical mind with a solution for everything," is how Bull chose to describe his "jolly good friend who loved meeting new people, hung out at the club but wasn't a social climber". "It was Indrani who emerged as this socialite and drove him to consciously build contacts with those higher up in the social rung after marriage," said the Kolkata-based entrepreneur. "That's the reason why I distanced myself from them until overnight she left Kolkata with their daughter and Sanju's wallet."     While Indrani never surfaces in conversations, his daughter Vidhie, who stayed with Indrani, is a fond subject with his friends. "He would miss his daughter but was resigned to fate, hoping that someday she would find him," said Rawla, adding, "It was Vidhie who called Sanjeev on Wednesday to give him the news."     No one seems to know about any recent interaction between Khanna and Indrani. G M Kapur, a known name in Kolkata who was Intach's state convener and happens to be Khanna's "mama", seemed disturbed with "all the theorizing" of Khanna's role in the crime. He declined to look back on Indrani and Khanna's relationship but added, "The last that there was any contact with Indrani or her family was when Vidhie visited Calcutta last year to celebrate the 75th birthday of her grandmother (Khanna's mother who lives with him)."     Khanna's Facebook posts on "karma" in the weeks and months following Sheena's alleged murder on April 24, 2012, make for interesting reading. On April 30, Khanna shared photo messages: "Say whatever, whenever the f*** you want to"; "Sometimes I get so weird, I even freak myself out".     On May 24, exactly a month after the alleged killing, he wrote: "You can never tell what people are thinking and feeling unless they tell you, and usually they lie. you ask them, 'Whats wrong?' and they say 'Nothing'. You accept this because it's easier than digging for the truth. People smile when they want to cry, they laugh when they want to scream and shout. They pretend like nothing is wrong because they don't want to face the truth. Things aren't always rainbows and butterflies, sometimes you gotta scream and cry your anger and sadness to the world, because you can only hold it in for so long before something in you snaps. so when you want to cry, cry. When you want to scream, scream. Don't hide behind fake smiles, it's ok to not be alright."     ||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Sheena-docu-Michail-add-to-mystery/articleshow/48701752.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:42 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Michail, Sheena's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered have raised a number of unanswered questions.    Two days after his mother, Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Michail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai Police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed that what he gave to police was enough to prove that Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora (who are actually parents of Indrani) as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. Some questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukherjea.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Michail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43 as mentioned in reports after her arrest.    Adding more to the suspense, Michail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Michail studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board examination, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that knew that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard that her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard that she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband who she introduced as Peter Mukherjea."    The two-member Mumbai Police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Michail, who on Wednesday, was the first one to reveal that Sheena was Indrani's daughter, twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Michail's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Michail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukherjae is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Michail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."  ||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Grandparents-are-Sheenas-mom-dad-on-birth-certificate/articleshow/48704559.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:42 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Mikhail, Sheena Bora's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered led to some unanswered questions on Thursday.    Two days after his mother Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Mikhail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed what he gave the police was enough to prove Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora, who are actually Indrani's parents, as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. However, many questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter. In many cases in India involving single mothers, grandparents are known to put in their names as father and mother.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukerjea, that is, 13 years after Sheena was born.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Mikhail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43.    Mikhail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Mikhail     studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board exam, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband, who she introduced as Peter Mukerjea."    The two-member Mumbai police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Mikhail twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Mikhail 's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time, he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Mikhail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukerjea is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Mikhail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Sheena-bowled-us-over-Rahuls-uncle/articleshow/48704552.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:42 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: Had things worked out as desired for Peter Mukherjea's first wife Shabnam and her family in Dehradun, Rahul Mukherjea and Sheena Bora would have been married for over three years now.     Shabnam's brother Shaleen Singh told TOI on Thursday that in 2011 Rahul brought Sheena to their sprawling home in Dehradun to seek approval from the family for their marriage.     The entire family-Shabnam, her younger brother Shaleen, father Anand Singh and mother Seema-were reportedly bowled over by Sheena's jovial nature and affection towards the elderly people. Impressed, the family gave its "unqualified and unanimous approval" for the wedding, which was supposed to take place within a few months, said Shaleen.     Stunned by the recent development, Shaleen said, "Sheena was among those rare persons who left a deep and lifelong impact on people. She was good-looking, a sweet person, clean of heart and good to talk to. None of us objected to the wedding."     Shaleen learnt of Sheena's murder through news channels. "It would have been great if she had become a part of the family. I don't know what was the cause and motive behind the heinous crime, but all those behind the killing of the jovial-natured girl should not be spared at any cost," he said.     A former model and tele-actor, 49-year-old Shaleen today owns the Sanskar International school in Jogiwala here. He recalled the last meeting with Shabnam and Rahul in April this year. "My father Anand Singh passed away in April. They had come to pay their respects but we did not interact much."     However, Shaleen said of late the interaction between him and his sister Shabnam was limited. Although Shabnam's farm Gul-e-Shabnam and Shaleen's residence Shankar Sadan are barely 200 metres away in Badripur, meetings between them were rare. While Shaleen and his mother stay on different floors of Shankar Sadan, Shabnam stays alone at her residence and is frequently visited by Rahul.     "There are matters in each family which we do not want to disclose. We are not against each other but do not interact much. She comes to meet our mother occasionally," said Shaleen, adding that Shabnam was passionate about painting and had a studio in her residence.     Shaleen denied having any details about the presence of Mumbai police in Dehradun. "Neither Doon police nor Mumbai police have contacted me over the issue."     Staff at Shabnam's residence said she was out-of-station but they were not aware of her whereabouts.||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Kilpauk-doctor-murder-Hubby-to-approach-court/articleshow/48704411.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:42 IST 2015||CHENNAI: It's been four days since police claimed to have solved the murder of S Sathya, 24, a PG medical student. However, her husband has put forth questions that police have failed to answer. Though investigating officers confirmed Sathya was not sexually assaulted before she was killed, they leaked to some section of media saying that they changed their stance on Wednesday and said there were indications of attempt to rape on the deceased.     Police personnel revealed the details soon after Sathya's husband Dr P Sesu, also employed at a primary health centre in Perambalur, expressed certain doubts.     He alleged the police hastily solved the case citing the state assembly, which is in motion. Sathya was found dead at her house in Kilpauk on August 20.     On August 23, police arrested Harintham Depnath, a BTech graduate, who lived at the second floor on the same apartment. Neither was there any mention about sexual assault or attempt on Sathya when the body was recovered from the house. The nor did the doctors. Police didn't tell this during the arrest of Depnath on August 23. "What forced the police to reveal about the sexual harassment attempt on my wife now?" asked Sesu.     "I want to live a peaceful life with my two sons - Tamil Nesan, 6, and Karmugilan, 4. The studies and the future of my children is important for me. I do respect the police personnel who spent sleepless nights to solve the murder, but there are questions that need to be answered," he said.     "I live in Perambalur with my children, but we speak through live video calls. I have told my sons that Sathya has gone to the God, as the Almighty likes her more. "Hereafter, we cannot speak or meet her. I don't know how far my children will admit it?" said Sesu. "I will approach the court seeking a fair probe into the murder of my wife. I want to find out the real cause behind her death. I want the real accused to get punished for his deed," said Sesu.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Woman-strangles-husbands-lover/articleshow/48704388.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:42 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A woman beat up and strangled her husband's partner, an assistant professor at a polytechnic in Choolaimedu, in their Thiruverkadu home on Thursday, police said. A court later remanded the accused, 32-year-old Shruti, in judicial custody.     Police said Sambasivam, a professor at Panimalar Engineering College in Poonamallee, used to bring Rajalakshmi, home frequently and introduced her to his wife Shruti as a colleague. He even dropped her home at night. The polytechnic where Rajalakshmi worked was part of the Panimalar group of educational institutions. Shruti initially believed the two were just colleagues until Sambasivam came home with Rajalakshmi on Tuesday and said the woman was moving in with them permanently.     On Wednesday morning, Sambasivam allegedly tied a 'mangalsutra' to Rajalakshmi in front of his wife, police said, based on Shruti's confession. A shocked Shruti picked up a fight with Sambasivam who asked her to maintain a cordial relationship and take care of Rajalakshmi. On Thursday morning, after he left for college a fight broke out between the two women.     Police said Rajalakshmi allegedly abused Sruthi and went into the bathroom. Sruthi followed her in and strangled her with the 'mangalsutra'. She then tried to make it appear that the woman had fainted in the bathroom. She took her in an autorickshaw to a nearby hospital where she was declared 'brought dead'. Doctors who noticed a few marks around her neck informed the Thiruverkadu police who registered a case of suspicious death under CrPC section 176.     The body was sent for postmortem to Kilpauk Medical College and Hospital.     After finding that the two women were at home at the time of the death, police interrogated Sruthi for more than an hour but she continued to maintain that Rajyalakshmi had died of injuries sustained when she fell down in the bathroom.     "She confessed to the murder when we told her that her fingerprints had been lifted from the scene of crime," said an investigating officer. "She said she had smashed the woman's head against the wall and later strangled her with the 'thali'." Police altered the case to murder and arrested Sruthi.     Initial inquiries revealed that Rajalakshmi had been married to a man named Rajasekhar for a while and they had separated. She then got married to Suresh, a relative who worked in a private firm, a few years ago and the couple moved into a house in Mogappair.     They allegedly had frequent quarrels as he tortured her and she left him too, police found.     Rajalakshmi then got a job with Panimalar Engineering College where she met Sambasivam. The two became friends and began seeing each other. Rajalakshmi recently moved to the polytechnic in Choolaimedu, police said.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/US-journalists-killer-annoyed-colleagues-Ex-boss/articleshow/48704167.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:42 IST 2015||ROANOKE, United States: The disgruntled former US television station employee who murdered two journalists had "annoyed" colleagues but showed no signs at work of any mental health issues, his former boss said Thursday.     Vester Lee Flanagan, 41, worked as a reporter for WDBJ in Roanoke, Virginia from March 2012 to February 2013, but was dismissed for poor performance and angry behavior, general manager Jeffrey Marks said.     On Wednesday, Flanagan shot and killed two of the CBS affiliate's journalists while they were conducting an on-air interview. He later fatally shot himself.     "We are still at a loss to figure out what happened to him in those two and a half years" since he was fired, Marks told a news conference flanked by dozens of staff, many of them holding hands.     "I don't think we identified that he had mental health issues. We certainly identified that he had performance issues."     Marks defended the station's hiring record and said its parent company had "a very elaborate program to screen employees."     Flanagan passed background checks and came with only positive references, Marks said.     It was only after he was hired, Marks said, that things went downhill.     "Vester's behavior annoyed a lot of people in the news station," Marks said.     Flanagan, who went by the on-screen name Bryce Williams, alleged in a manifesto faxed to ABC News that he was discriminated against as a gay, black journalist.     Marks said accusations in 2013 that he was treated unfairly were "immediately investigated and found to be without merit."     During his employment, Flanagan complied with demands that he seek medical help, but he was ultimately dismissed.     He was escorted from the building by police and made an ominous aside to the news director -- handing him a wooden cross and saying "'you'll need this'," Marks said.     As he left, he also made a "derogatory comment" to Adam Ward, the cameraman he shot dead on Wednesday.     Flanagan filed a complaint with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and a civil action suit, which were dismissed, he said.     "All of these investigations determined that no reasonable person would have taken any of the cited incidents as discrimination or harassment."     After killing Ward and reporter Alison Parker live on the air, Flanagan posted a video of the attack on social media.||ROANOKE, UNITED STATES
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/noida/How-Kargil-hero-helped-Kashmir-girl-speak-again/articleshow/48489505.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:46 IST 2015||NOIDA: Ruksana was six when she witnessed her father's murder at the hands of militants in Kupwara district of Jammu and Kashmir in 1999. Silenced by shock, the girl had gone into a shock and stopped speaking after that.The same year, Capt Vijyant Thapar, a 22-year-old Army officer, was posted in the district with a battalion of the Jammu and Kashmir rifles. Thapar had come from the 2 Rajputana Rifles in Gwalior. When the young officer came to know about Ruksana's plight, he went to her school to meet her . The two formed an instant bond that grew stronger with each subsequent meeting. Thapar and a friend, sepoy Jagmal Singh Shekhawat, would carry sweets and chocolates for Ruksana. They also took her to a doctor to help her with her speech. Slowly, Ruksana recovered from the trauma of her father's death and started speaking again.But in June that year, Thapar died during the battle of Tololing Knoll in Kargil. Before embarking on the mission, he wrote to his family, asking them to take care of Ruksana. He described his bond and deep love for Ruksana in the letter and asked his family to "keep sending some money to Ruksana every month", his father Col Virender Nath Thapar (retd), told TOI on Friday.The senior Thapar (73) lives in Noida and the family continues to keep in touch with Ruksana and sends her money annually. "I had gone to Jammu & Kashmir last month and met Ruksana. She is now 20 and lives with her mother." Ruksana's father was a woodcutter.Capt Vijyant Thapar was commissioned on December 12, 1998. His father said he had barely stayed in Gwalior for a month before he was moved to Kashmir."He was on a mission to capture Knoll when a fireball struck him on his head and he fell in the arms of his comrade Naik Tilak Singh. His martyrdom will continue to inspire the young generation," said his father.In the letter he wrote before the Tololing assault, Thapar said, "By the time you get this letter I'll be observing you all from the sky while enjoying the hospitality of apsaras. I have no regrets, in fact if I am born a human again, I'll join the Army and fight for my nation."He was awarded the Vir Chakra posthumously. The Gautam Budh Nagar administration has also named a road in front of the GIP mall after him.||NOIDA
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/delhi/2-Delhi-Police-officers-get-President-medal/articleshow/48489494.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:46 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: Two Delhi Police officers were decorated with the President's medal for distinguished service while 14 others bagged awards for meritorious service. Four cops were awarded the police medal for gallantry.     S Vasudeva Rao, special commissioner of police (welfare and estate oversight) and Vivek Gogia, joint CP (special cell) were recognized for rendering distinguished service. Vijay Kumar, ACP (Rashtrapati Bhavan), Laxmi Bai Kanwat, ACP (special police unit for women and children) and Sawtantar Singh Gill, ACP (1st battalion DAP), were among the 14 officers who received the medal for meritorious service.     Inspector Kailash Singh Bisht of the special cell, who received the medal for gallantry, had fought back a group of terrorists during a shootout in Jammu and Kashmir.     Head constable Jitender Kumar, who too won the medal for gallantry, apprehended two Maoists from Jharkhand, who were wanted in the murder case of an SSP and assassination of CRPF jawans. Sub-inspector, Brahm Pal Singh, solved five murder and robbery cases. He was recommended for an out-of-turn promotion.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/nagpur/Rare-double-death-double-lifer-for-2-yr-olds-rape-murder/articleshow/48489050.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:46 IST 2015||In perhaps the first death sentence under the amended Section 376 of IPC, a Yavatmal sessions court on Friday sent a person convicted of brutally raping and murdering a two-year-old girl to the gallows. The accused was also awarded another death sentence under section 302 for murder. He was also sentenced to two life terms under Section 376 (rape) and Protection of Children from Sexual Offences Act (POCSO Act) 2012.  Judge AC Chaphale, while terming the killing as 'rarest of rare', said that there was no chance of reformation of 21-year-old Shatrughan Masram and he would continue to be a menace to the society.  The spine-chilling incident had taken place on February 11, 2013, where the accused had torn flesh off the toddler's body with his teeth. Her upper and lower lips were later found near the place of the crime. There were bite marks all over her body. The assault was so brutal that the entire portion from her vagina till anus was torn apart, resulting in her death.  Public prosecutor Parshuram Gadbaile said the victim belonged to a labourer family from Andhra Pradesh, who had arrived in Ghatanji tehsil of Yavatmal just four months before the incident. On the fateful day, there was some function in nearby Dutt temple, where villagers, including the girl's parents, had gathered. They had left the girl at Pundlik Masram's home, where she was playing with other girls.  At around 7.30pm, the convict came to Pundlik's home and said that the girls' parents had told him to bring her to the temple. Pundlik objected, since it was night and said the girl will go off to sleep. However, the convict insisted on taking the girl with him. He then took the girl to a secluded place at a nearby building under construction. He had been seen by some witnesses while carrying the girl.  The girl's parents reached the spot while searching for the girl and caught the convict while performing the heinous act. They immediately took her to Dr Jaffer Siddiqui, who declared her brought dead. The post mortem confirmed the brutal assault by Masram that led to her death. The Parwa police station lodged offences against him under section 302, section 376 (A) (amended), 376 (2) (f) (i) (m) (rape) and under POSCO Act and filed a charge sheet. Thirteen witnesses were identified and called in court by the prosecution.  The court observed that there are several aggravating circumstances that prove the convict's clear involvement in the crime and the brutality with which he had carried out the act on an innocent victim. There were hardly any mitigating circumstances except his age. It said that in view of the depravity and brutality shown by the convict while committing the heinous act, there appears to be no chance of reformation or rehabilitation and he fittingly deserved nothing else but capital punishment.|| 
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Bannanje-back-home-shifted-to-Udupi-jail/articleshow/48488903.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:46 IST 2015||BENGALURU: A special team led by additional commissioner of police (West) CH Pratap Reddy brought underworld don Rajendra Kumar alias Bannanje Raja, 47, here from Morocco via Delhi on Friday afternoon. He was immediately flown to Belagavi to be produced before a court, after which he was shifted to Udupi .     DG-IGP Om Prakash told TOI they would start with the investigation of the 2013 murder of cooperative leader RN Nayak in Uttara Kannada. "First, we will take him in police custody and proceed with the investigation," he said.     Bannanje, who is wanted in more than 44 cases including that of murder, attempt to murder and extortion, was brought by an Air India flight (AI 502) from Delhi. Soon after the flight landed at the Kempegowda International airport around 3.50pm, Bannnanje was taken to a special room near the CISF cabin, where airlines and immigration officials completed the paper work. Later, the police team took Bannanje to Belagavi by a SpiceJet flight.     Around 8.25pm, he was produced before the Belagavi district principal and sessions judge P Krishna Bhat, who remanded him in police custody till August 28. Bannanje was produced in the court in connection with the murder of businessman and cooperative leader RN Nayak of Ankola in Uttar Kannada district in December 2013.     Bannanje has been booked under the Karnataka Control of Organized Crime Act (KCOCA) in the case. All KCOCA cases in Uttar Kannada come under the jurisdiction of the Belagavi court. Bannanje was arrested in Morocco this month. The Interpol had issued a red corner notice in his name in 2010 following a request from Karnataka police.     ||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/kolkata/Fantastic-At-Fifty/articleshow/48488863.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:46 IST 2015||Subhayu Mazumder    KOLKATA: He turns 77 this year, but to his fans, he's eternally frozen somewhere in his late twenties or mid-thirties. He is most likely to be seen sipping tea in the drawing room of 21 Rajani Sen Road, the quintessential Bengali, a lit Charminar dangling precariously between his lips, clad in a simple pajama-panjabi, maybe a shawl casually draped around his shoulders if it's winter, speaking little but listening hard to a client... or engaged in a bout of serious adda with his constant companions — cousin Topshe and Lalmohan Ganguly, aka Jatayu, the prolific purveyor of potboilers with alliterative titles. It's hard to believe, but it's been 50 years since the first story featuring Prodosh C. Mitter — aka ABCD (Asia's Brightest Crime Detector), aka Feluda, the possessor of the sharpest 'Mogojastro' this side of the Suez — came out in a children's magazine. Seventy-seven going on 30 he may be, but the strapping 27-year-old who first solved a mystery at Darjeeling, every Bengali's go-to holiday spot (however juvenile the denouement may have been), has had countless pre-teens and teens breathlessly turning pages, long before they knew what 'Avada Kedavra' meant. And he's still going strong. The last Feluda story came out in 1996 (Indrajal Rahasya), four years after Satyajit Ray's death, but films continue to be made, English translations are flying off the shelves and old stories are being reworked as comics. Fifty years on, how does one explain the enduring popularity of Feluda? In terms of being purely detective stories, where does he rank in the pantheon of the greats, like his "guru" Sherlock Holmes, Hercule Poirot or Dr Gideon Fell? Not very high, feels Feluda fan Abhijit Gupta, professor of English, Jadavpur University. "The stories, while extremely readable, do not rank very high purely as detective fiction, and Feluda, regrettably, cannot be ranked with them," he says. To the typical Feluda fan, this might be sacrilegious. For 14-year-old Souvik Chattopadhyay, a Class IX student at a city school, Feluda is "the best detective ever". Souvik, a self-confessed "voracious reader", says his English-medium background means that he finds Bengali books tougher to read. "Feluda, however, poses no such problem. The language is easy, the plots fantastic and there is a lot of travel in the novellas. What's not to like?" he says. Feluda's enduring appeal, Gupta feels, lies in the "absolutely lucid, spare narrative style that Ray used; the construction of a Bengali masculinity with wide appeal; and the suave urbanity of Feluda, who seems to be completely at home in his setting". One must remember, though, that the Feluda canon was especially targeted at pre-teens and teens, and so Ray had to leave out a lot of elements that are mainstays of "adult" detective fiction — love angles, sexual tension, violence (though there are murders). There is also an absence of strong women characters and the crafty plot twists and complications that characterise the locked-room murder mysteries of John Dickson Carr or even Agatha Christie. It's safe to say that no detective fiction aficionado would call Feluda stories classics. "That there is no love/sex in the Feluda stories meant that they were accessible to a larger readership, both adult and juvenile," Gupta says. "Having said which, lots of young people read Holmes in translation or the original. Travel, or the note of the vacation, remains a key element in the popularity of the Feluda stories. This is a marked Bengali trait, and one which Ray was able to tap into." "The Feluda stories are a great way to familiarize oneself with Bengali," feels 13-year-old Sreyoshi Datta. "I moved to the city when I was in Class V, and had to take up Bengali here. I was home-schooled in the language, but naturally it wasn't as good as that of my classmates. I started reading a lot of children's books in Bengali and started to improve soon. I started devouring Feluda stories because they are fun to read, thanks to the lucid prose and interesting storylines. Now, my Bengali is almost as good as that of my classmates." There are several flaws in Feluda stories in terms of character development, especially when contrasted with Saradindu's Byomkesh. But then, it has to be remembered that Saradindu allowed Byomkesh to have a love life, marry, settle down and grow old. Feluda does not have such luxuries. As a character, Feluda seems too good to be true. Most of the other prominent fictional detectives have a flaw or vice that make them more believable and interesting, Gupta says. Holmes has his seven percent cocaine habit, and his supreme confidence often borders on arrogance; Poirot shares Holmes' arrogance and confidence, and he is also finicky and vain to a fault. Feluda has no vices except his smoking habit, which was quite socially acceptable at the time the stories actually came out. Topshe, the first-person narrator modelled on Dr Watson, is "workmanlike and necessary, from the point of view of the plot, but not very exciting as a character", says Gupta. Also, because Topshe, unlike Watson, is not Feluda's friend but a younger cousin, his relationship with Feluda does not have the Holmes-Dr Watson or Poirot-Captain Hastings dynamic. His role, apart from recording Feluda's feats, is hardly more than that of an earnest student in awe of his teacher. The real star is Jatayu, the bumbling thriller writer who makes silly mistakes in his plots, is often (unintentionally) funny, and who has nothing but admiration for Feluda, even though he is often at the receiving end of the detective's sharp tongue. "It is hard to imagine the Feluda stories being the success they are without Jatayu," Gupta says. It's strange, though, that in the 50 years since the first story came out, and especially since it's almost a cult, there has never been any Feluda fan fiction or pastiche. Sherlock Holmes pastiches, on the other hand, are quite common. Some — especially 'The Exploits of Sherlock Holmes' by Adrian Conan Doyle (Arthur Conan Doyle's son) and John Dickson Carr; 'The Mandala of Sherlock Holmes' by Jamyang Norbu, which takes a look at 'The Great Hiatus'; Nicholas Meyer's 'The Seven-Per-Cent Solution' — are classics in their own right. Wouldn't it be interesting to read about, say, an older Feluda solving 'adult' problems? And would Bengali readers accept that? "Of course there should be fanfic, and there is room for it, and also for the adult vintage," Gupta believes. "And there is no reason why the family cannot authorize it. Holmes pastiches thrived even during the lifetime of Arthur Conan Doyle, why cannot it be the same with Feluda?" Is there anyone brave enough to attempt a novella on Feluda's love life? Seventy-seven years old now, has he retired to a quiet life in the country, tending to bees? Has he given up smoking yet? Someone please tell us. We're dying to know.||SUBHAYU MAZUMDER    KOLKATA
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/lucknow/Police-bravehearts-to-get-gallantry-award-from-Prez/articleshow/48488803.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:46 IST 2015||LUCKNOW: Fifteen years after one of the fiercest gunbattles between the police and Naxalites in the state left 15 ultras dead, six police personnel of the ambush party will be awarded President's Police Medal for Gallantry on Saturday. While the senior-most officer leading the team has retired from services, one of the junior-most members has passed away and will be awarded posthumously.    In all, 15 police personnel, including 7 IPS officers, involved in five different operations between 2001 and 2011 have been shortlisted for the gallantry award for their valour during police operations.    The encounter with the Naxalites took place on March 9, 2001 in Bhawanipur village of Mirzapur following a specific tip-off that more than a dozen people armed with latest rifles and ammunition had gathered in the village. About a dozen police teams zeroed in on the village and after evacuating the civilians, raided the hideouts of the Naxalites. As many as 15 Naxalites were killed and police recovered a total of 13 rifles, guns and pistols apart from a satchel of cartridges and countrymade rocket bombs from their possession.    The special task force (STF) of the Uttar Pradesh Police (UPP) bagged a total of five gallantry medals for operations in Lucknow and Noida. The Lucknow operation relates to an encounter in 2006 in which listed gangster Sachin Pahari, who was carrying a reward of Rs 50,000 on his head, along with his aide Vikas Kannaujiya were killed in Triveninagar area of the state capital. Police recovered two handguns from the ambush site after the encounter.    In the Noida encounter, the STF shot dead Ashutosh Rai and Ajay Singh in an ambush near the expressway in Noida in 2010. Each of the two gangsters was carrying a reward of Rs 50,000 on his head. Police recovered a 9mm carbine and two pistols from the two gangsters.    Other incidents in which gallantry awards have been announced include the arrest of six criminals in Kavinagar area of Ghaziabad and an encounter in Varanasi in which listed historysheeter Satyendra Tewari, who was carrying a reward of Rs 50,000 on his head, was gunned down. Tewari was reportedly wanted in more than 20 criminal cases including those of murder, kidnapping for ransom and extortion.    Apart from the gallantry awards, four police personnel will be awarded medals for distinguished services and 70 for meritorious services. As many as 25 other senior police officers and jawans will be presented with Commendation Discs as well.  ||LUCKNOW
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/delhi/Two-Delhi-Police-officers-get-Presidents-medal/articleshow/48488500.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:46 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: Two Delhi Police officers were decorated with the President's medal for distinguished service while 14 others bagged awards for meritorious service. Four cops were awarded the President's medal for gallantry.    S Vasudeva Rao, special commissioner of police (welfare and estate oversight) and Vivek Gogia, joint CP (special cell) were recognized for rendering distinguished service. Vijay Kumar, ACP (Rashtrapati Bhavan), Laxmi Bai Kanwat, ACP (special police unit for women and children) and Sawtantar Singh Gill, ACP (1st battalion DAP), were among the 14 officers who received the medal for meritorious service.    Inspector Kailash Singh Bisht of the special cell, who received the medal for gallantry, had fought back a group of terrorists during a shootout in Jammu and Kashmir.    Head constable Jitender Kumar, who too won the medal for gallantry, apprehended two Maoists from Jharkhand, who were wanted in the murder case of an SSP and assassination of CRPF jawans. Sub-inspector, Brahm Pal Singh, solved five murder and robbery cases. He was recommended for an out-of-turn promotion.    The 1991 batch IPS officer, Vivek Gogia, is the joint commissioner of special cell. He has received President Police Medal for meritorious services on the occasion of Republic Day, 2008. During his tenure as joint commissioner (south-western range), he supervised the investigation of December 16, 2012 gangrape (Nirbhaya case). He has also handled the surcharged communal situation between two communities in Tilak Vihar area in 2013 for which he was even appreciated by the Lieutenant Governor. His handling of Karbala's sensitive issue was also appreciated.    Assistant commissioner (SPUWAC), Laxmi Bai Kanwat had joined as sub-inspector in 1991 and in eight years she was promoted to the rank of Inspector. She has solved the gangrape of a 17-year-old student done by four employees of the President's bodyguards in 2003. After getting transferred to SPUWAC as ACP in 2009, she has been part of the self-defence training wing of SPUWAC. During her tenure, 358 self defence Training programmes have been organized in which 36752 participants have been trained in basic self defence techniques.    Sawtantar Singh Gill, who joined Delhi Police as sub-inspector in 1981, was deputed to Punjab in operation black thunder at Golden Temple. While working as Traffic Inspector in Gandhi Nagar, he arrested a Kashmiri militant also. He was deputed to United Nation for peace keeping operations in Angole in 1998 and has also been awarded peace keeping medal by UN.    He has also solved three blind murder cases of Rohini. While conducting raids he even got injured as the accused shot at his right eye.  ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/delhi/Auto-drivers-stab-Samaritan-to-death/articleshow/48488481.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:46 IST 2015||  NEW DELHI: A 28-year-old was stabbed to death by some men when he tried to stop a fight between two autorickshaw drivers at a market near Kalka Garhi village in Amar Colony on Thursday night. A few people have been detained for interrogations.    The incident was reported around 6pm. Saddam Hussain was walking back to his house when he witnessed a brawl between two auto drivers over parking. A crowd had gathered at the spot. Hussain intervened and tried to help resolve the matter.    But one of the drivers called a few others over and, accusing Hussain of taking sides, thrashed him. When Hussain resisted, one of them pulled out a knife and stabbed him a few times. Hussain collapsed. Hussain's family said he was set to get married on Sunday and had reached Delhi on Thursday morning. His father owns a few rickshaws plying in the area. The family staged a protest outside Amar Colony police station. A case of murder has been registered.  ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/DK-Rao-acquitted-in-killing-of-Dawood-aide/articleshow/48488445.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:46 IST 2015||MUMBAI: The city crime branch received a major setback when the special MCOCA court on Friday acquitted D K Rao, Umaid Ur Rahman and two other accused in the 2011 murder of Arif Bael, the driver and guard of Dawood Ibrahim's brother Iqbal Kaskar. The court cited lack of evidence and benefit of doubt while acquitting the four, believed to be aides of gangster Chhota Rajan.However, the MCOCA court convicted three key accused Indira Khatri, Sayyed Bilal and Rashad Khan. The quantum of punishment will be announced later. Police said they will push for the death penalty for at least two of them. "We are trying to push for the death penalty as it is one of the rarest of rare cases, since the murder was part of a gang war and the shooters even wanted to kill Haneef Talwar, another Kaskar aide," said a crime branch officer.The court, while acquitting the four, said there is no evidence against them and even set aside the evidence of a media report which stated that Rajan, in a telephonic interview, claimed it was he who had ordered Bael's killing, said Rao's advocate Randhir Kale. "As the telephonic interview was not recorded, the court didn't believe the claim that Rao was involved in the crime or that he paid Rs 5 lakh to Rahman to kill Bael. Now there is only one case of extortion pending against Rao," said Kale. Investigating officers, ACP Yashwant Watkar and Santosh Bagwe said the accused were acquitted on technical grounds. While Rahman was not present at the scene of the crime and had used a SIM card registered in someone else's name, police also could not prove the financial trail between Rao and Rahman.The acquittal of Rao, Rahman, the latter's step father Asif Jaan and Sayyid Adnan assumes significance as arch rival Chhota Shakeel plans to eliminate them as part of the bitter rivalry between the Dawood and Rajan gangs. During investigations it emerged that Rajan believed that Shakeel asked Bael and Talwar to kill Rahman, who was involved in the killings of bookie Chhote Miya, a Shakeel henchman, and a politician Asif Dadhi.The killing of Bael in broad daylight in Dawood's fortress shook the Dawood gang.||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/dehradun/Mussoories-tryst-with-Partition-pangs/articleshow/48486771.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:46 IST 2015||MUSSOORIE: Few are aware that the hatred and violence that swept over the country soon after Partition, engulfed even peaceful Mussoorie, and claimed one of the ablest administrators of the hill town. Shafi Ahmed Kidwai, the younger brother of Congress party stalwart Rafi Ahmad Kidwai, was reportedly stabbed to death two months after India got its independence.    According to historian Gopal Bharadwaj, Kidwai was a well-respected man in the hill station, and lived with his wife Anis in Herndale cottage in Happy Valley where the Tibetan Homes School today stands. "Though Mussoorie had been an island of peace during the Partition riots, there were several people who had run away from Pakistan and come here. Many of them had seen horrible caranage in Pakistan, and Kidwai became a target of this anger and hatred. He was murdered by a few of these men when he was walking back home one day", says Bharadwaj.     The brutal murder of a prominent personality shook Mussoorie at that time, resulting in a curfew being imposed in the town. "This was the first time that Mussoorie witnessed a curfew," recalls Bharadwaj.     Another fallout of the murder was that Anis Kidwai was forced to move to Delhi. Old timers recall that Mrs Kidwai, a very politically aware and articulate lady, was so shaken by the murder of her husband that she sought solace from Mahatma Gandhi who reportedly advised her to work with people who had lost their all during Partition.     Accordingly, Anis Kidwai started working at the Purana Qila refugee camp in Delhi. Later, she also worked at the Humayun's Tomb refugee camp and thereafter associated with young students from Jamia Milia. A diary that she kept of her experiences during this time became the basis of her book 'Azaadi ki chhaon mein (a recollection of her observations and what she saw between 1947 and 1949). The book was originally written in Urdu and later translated into English as 'In Freedom's Shade' by her granddaughter Ayesha Kidwai.     ||MUSSOORIE
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:46 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:46 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/SC-acquits-Romesh-Sharma-in-Budhiraja-murder-case/articleshow/48704930.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:46 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Thursday upheld the Delhi High Court order acquitting former Congress leader Romesh Sharma in the case relating to the killing of fashion designer Kunjum Budhiraja.     A bench of Justices Pinaki Chandra Ghose and R K Agrawal dismissed an appeal filed by the Delhi government challenging HC order.     The Delhi government contended that the HC had erred in acquitting Sharma but it was strongly opposed by his counsel and senior advocate Siddharth Luthra who submitted that his client was in love with Kunjum and there was no evidence to prove his involvement in the case.     Sharma, who was alleged to be a frontman of underworld don Dawood Ibrahim, was convicted by a trial court on February 15, 2008. Kunjum was killed on March 20, 1999 at Sharma's South Delhi-based 'Jai Mata Di' farm house by a group of hired gangsters from Uttar Pradesh.     The trial court had convicted Sharma and five other accused in the case and had awarded life term to all. The HC, however, acquitted Sharma and co-accused Tejendir Verdi but upheld conviction and sentence of other four accused— Sharma's nephew Surinder Mishra, Hemchand, Santram and Ramesh alias Bobby.     While acquitting Sharma, the HC had said "Romesh Sharma and Kunjum were in love, and desired the company of each other. It does not establish that Sharma had got fed up with her". It had turned down Delhi police's contention that Sharma wanted to get rid of Kunjum as she knew about his alleged illegal activities.     "A grieving lover falling over the body of his mate and performing the rituals of a marriage can well be an expression of lasting love, and need not necessarily be a drama," the HC had said.     Sharma was in judicial custody at the time of the Kunjum's murder.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Raid-on-Bengaluru-centre-reveals-horror-tales/articleshow/48704718.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:46 IST 2015||BENGALURU: A State Human Rights Commission raid on a de-addiction centre in Jnanabharati Layout, near Kengeri, southwest Bengaluru, found 90 inmates living in pathetic conditions and subjected to inhuman treatment.     Thursday's raid followed the murder of an inmate of another de-addiction centre in Kothanur recently.     The SHRC raid on Sri Santhosh Social Service Society, also known as 4S Society, followed a tipoff. According to SHRC officials, the centre has been in existence for seven years at least, but the society couldn't produce documents of having obtained permission from the social welfare department. Commission officials said the centre had the permission from the DC and the DHO.     "Most inmates are between 20 and 35 years. They showed us signs of being physically abused. The centre has violated other norms too. Although it's supposed to have one nurse for every 15 patients and at least one in-house doctor and a psychiatrist, it didn't have any," said an SHRC spokesperson.     4 arrested for killing inmate:     Kothanur police arrested a de-addiction centre staffer and three inmates for allegedly beating to death a 28-year-old inmate. Dinesh was admitted to the centre by his family as he was an alcoholic. He was later found dead in a hospital. Family members noticed several bruises on his body. Narayana, an inmate-turned-staffer, gave some medicines to Dinesh, who later turned aggressive. Narayana sought the help of inmates Suresh, Subhan and Simon, to subdue Dinesh.     When Dinesh retaliated, the quartet overpowered him till he became unconscious. He died in hospital.||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/A-jolly-good-fellow-say-Khannas-friends/articleshow/48704630.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:46 IST 2015||Sanjeev Khanna, Indrani Mukerjea's second husband and suspected ally in Sheena Bora's killing, may be the most surprising element in this macabre drama, but his friends and associates in Kolkata refused to cast aspersions on "Sanju" just yet.     From being the biggest dart enthusiast at one of Kolkata's poshest clubs (the CC&FC) to having a finger in every pie, Sanjeev was everyone's "best mate" and go-to guy who friends described as: "A doer... someone who could get things done."     The morning after Khanna's arrest, TOI spoke to Ajay Rawla, the man who Khanna worked for as a consultant and whose house he was picked up from on Wednesday afternoon. "It wasn't like he was hiding like a desperate fugitive in my house. We had a meeting in the morning after which he drove me home and that's when news broke on television. We were sitting, watching, wondering what steps to take when the police arrived," explained Rawla.     Seven years his senior, Khanna's association with Rawla dates back to the time they went to Mayo College in Ajmer. Later, Khanna went on to become an aide for Rawla's pet projects. Besides running his own business in wireless communications, Khanna was there setting up chef Shaun Kenworthy and Rawla's restaurant 1658 or immersed in the heritage project of converting the Bawali Rajbari into a hotel. "He was getting all the construction work and labourers in place. He was very good in helping out with permissions through his connections with excise and contractors," remembers Kenworthy.     Khanna, who seldom missed his outings at the club, motor rallies and horse racing as a prominent face in the social circuit, was not the same man before he met Indrani, recounts Bull Banthia, a close friend. "Well-read and well-versed, Sanju had a great mechanical mind with a solution for everything," is how Bull chose to describe his "jolly good friend who loved meeting new people, hung out at the club but wasn't a social climber". "It was Indrani who emerged as this socialite and drove him to consciously build contacts with those higher up in the social rung after marriage," said the Kolkata-based entrepreneur. "That's the reason why I distanced myself from them until overnight she left Kolkata with their daughter and Sanju's wallet."     While Indrani never surfaces in conversations, his daughter Vidhie, who stayed with Indrani, is a fond subject with his friends. "He would miss his daughter but was resigned to fate, hoping that someday she would find him," said Rawla, adding, "It was Vidhie who called Sanjeev on Wednesday to give him the news."     No one seems to know about any recent interaction between Khanna and Indrani. G M Kapur, a known name in Kolkata who was Intach's state convener and happens to be Khanna's "mama", seemed disturbed with "all the theorizing" of Khanna's role in the crime. He declined to look back on Indrani and Khanna's relationship but added, "The last that there was any contact with Indrani or her family was when Vidhie visited Calcutta last year to celebrate the 75th birthday of her grandmother (Khanna's mother who lives with him)."     Khanna's Facebook posts on "karma" in the weeks and months following Sheena's alleged murder on April 24, 2012, make for interesting reading. On April 30, Khanna shared photo messages: "Say whatever, whenever the f*** you want to"; "Sometimes I get so weird, I even freak myself out".     On May 24, exactly a month after the alleged killing, he wrote: "You can never tell what people are thinking and feeling unless they tell you, and usually they lie. you ask them, 'Whats wrong?' and they say 'Nothing'. You accept this because it's easier than digging for the truth. People smile when they want to cry, they laugh when they want to scream and shout. They pretend like nothing is wrong because they don't want to face the truth. Things aren't always rainbows and butterflies, sometimes you gotta scream and cry your anger and sadness to the world, because you can only hold it in for so long before something in you snaps. so when you want to cry, cry. When you want to scream, scream. Don't hide behind fake smiles, it's ok to not be alright."     ||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Sheena-docu-Michail-add-to-mystery/articleshow/48701752.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:46 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Michail, Sheena's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered have raised a number of unanswered questions.    Two days after his mother, Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Michail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai Police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed that what he gave to police was enough to prove that Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora (who are actually parents of Indrani) as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. Some questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukherjea.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Michail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43 as mentioned in reports after her arrest.    Adding more to the suspense, Michail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Michail studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board examination, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that knew that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard that her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard that she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband who she introduced as Peter Mukherjea."    The two-member Mumbai Police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Michail, who on Wednesday, was the first one to reveal that Sheena was Indrani's daughter, twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Michail's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Michail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukherjae is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Michail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."  ||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Grandparents-are-Sheenas-mom-dad-on-birth-certificate/articleshow/48704559.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:46 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Mikhail, Sheena Bora's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered led to some unanswered questions on Thursday.    Two days after his mother Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Mikhail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed what he gave the police was enough to prove Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora, who are actually Indrani's parents, as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. However, many questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter. In many cases in India involving single mothers, grandparents are known to put in their names as father and mother.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukerjea, that is, 13 years after Sheena was born.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Mikhail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43.    Mikhail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Mikhail     studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board exam, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband, who she introduced as Peter Mukerjea."    The two-member Mumbai police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Mikhail twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Mikhail 's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time, he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Mikhail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukerjea is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Mikhail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Sheena-bowled-us-over-Rahuls-uncle/articleshow/48704552.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:46 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: Had things worked out as desired for Peter Mukherjea's first wife Shabnam and her family in Dehradun, Rahul Mukherjea and Sheena Bora would have been married for over three years now.     Shabnam's brother Shaleen Singh told TOI on Thursday that in 2011 Rahul brought Sheena to their sprawling home in Dehradun to seek approval from the family for their marriage.     The entire family-Shabnam, her younger brother Shaleen, father Anand Singh and mother Seema-were reportedly bowled over by Sheena's jovial nature and affection towards the elderly people. Impressed, the family gave its "unqualified and unanimous approval" for the wedding, which was supposed to take place within a few months, said Shaleen.     Stunned by the recent development, Shaleen said, "Sheena was among those rare persons who left a deep and lifelong impact on people. She was good-looking, a sweet person, clean of heart and good to talk to. None of us objected to the wedding."     Shaleen learnt of Sheena's murder through news channels. "It would have been great if she had become a part of the family. I don't know what was the cause and motive behind the heinous crime, but all those behind the killing of the jovial-natured girl should not be spared at any cost," he said.     A former model and tele-actor, 49-year-old Shaleen today owns the Sanskar International school in Jogiwala here. He recalled the last meeting with Shabnam and Rahul in April this year. "My father Anand Singh passed away in April. They had come to pay their respects but we did not interact much."     However, Shaleen said of late the interaction between him and his sister Shabnam was limited. Although Shabnam's farm Gul-e-Shabnam and Shaleen's residence Shankar Sadan are barely 200 metres away in Badripur, meetings between them were rare. While Shaleen and his mother stay on different floors of Shankar Sadan, Shabnam stays alone at her residence and is frequently visited by Rahul.     "There are matters in each family which we do not want to disclose. We are not against each other but do not interact much. She comes to meet our mother occasionally," said Shaleen, adding that Shabnam was passionate about painting and had a studio in her residence.     Shaleen denied having any details about the presence of Mumbai police in Dehradun. "Neither Doon police nor Mumbai police have contacted me over the issue."     Staff at Shabnam's residence said she was out-of-station but they were not aware of her whereabouts.||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Kilpauk-doctor-murder-Hubby-to-approach-court/articleshow/48704411.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:46 IST 2015||CHENNAI: It's been four days since police claimed to have solved the murder of S Sathya, 24, a PG medical student. However, her husband has put forth questions that police have failed to answer. Though investigating officers confirmed Sathya was not sexually assaulted before she was killed, they leaked to some section of media saying that they changed their stance on Wednesday and said there were indications of attempt to rape on the deceased.     Police personnel revealed the details soon after Sathya's husband Dr P Sesu, also employed at a primary health centre in Perambalur, expressed certain doubts.     He alleged the police hastily solved the case citing the state assembly, which is in motion. Sathya was found dead at her house in Kilpauk on August 20.     On August 23, police arrested Harintham Depnath, a BTech graduate, who lived at the second floor on the same apartment. Neither was there any mention about sexual assault or attempt on Sathya when the body was recovered from the house. The nor did the doctors. Police didn't tell this during the arrest of Depnath on August 23. "What forced the police to reveal about the sexual harassment attempt on my wife now?" asked Sesu.     "I want to live a peaceful life with my two sons - Tamil Nesan, 6, and Karmugilan, 4. The studies and the future of my children is important for me. I do respect the police personnel who spent sleepless nights to solve the murder, but there are questions that need to be answered," he said.     "I live in Perambalur with my children, but we speak through live video calls. I have told my sons that Sathya has gone to the God, as the Almighty likes her more. "Hereafter, we cannot speak or meet her. I don't know how far my children will admit it?" said Sesu. "I will approach the court seeking a fair probe into the murder of my wife. I want to find out the real cause behind her death. I want the real accused to get punished for his deed," said Sesu.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Woman-strangles-husbands-lover/articleshow/48704388.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:46 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A woman beat up and strangled her husband's partner, an assistant professor at a polytechnic in Choolaimedu, in their Thiruverkadu home on Thursday, police said. A court later remanded the accused, 32-year-old Shruti, in judicial custody.     Police said Sambasivam, a professor at Panimalar Engineering College in Poonamallee, used to bring Rajalakshmi, home frequently and introduced her to his wife Shruti as a colleague. He even dropped her home at night. The polytechnic where Rajalakshmi worked was part of the Panimalar group of educational institutions. Shruti initially believed the two were just colleagues until Sambasivam came home with Rajalakshmi on Tuesday and said the woman was moving in with them permanently.     On Wednesday morning, Sambasivam allegedly tied a 'mangalsutra' to Rajalakshmi in front of his wife, police said, based on Shruti's confession. A shocked Shruti picked up a fight with Sambasivam who asked her to maintain a cordial relationship and take care of Rajalakshmi. On Thursday morning, after he left for college a fight broke out between the two women.     Police said Rajalakshmi allegedly abused Sruthi and went into the bathroom. Sruthi followed her in and strangled her with the 'mangalsutra'. She then tried to make it appear that the woman had fainted in the bathroom. She took her in an autorickshaw to a nearby hospital where she was declared 'brought dead'. Doctors who noticed a few marks around her neck informed the Thiruverkadu police who registered a case of suspicious death under CrPC section 176.     The body was sent for postmortem to Kilpauk Medical College and Hospital.     After finding that the two women were at home at the time of the death, police interrogated Sruthi for more than an hour but she continued to maintain that Rajyalakshmi had died of injuries sustained when she fell down in the bathroom.     "She confessed to the murder when we told her that her fingerprints had been lifted from the scene of crime," said an investigating officer. "She said she had smashed the woman's head against the wall and later strangled her with the 'thali'." Police altered the case to murder and arrested Sruthi.     Initial inquiries revealed that Rajalakshmi had been married to a man named Rajasekhar for a while and they had separated. She then got married to Suresh, a relative who worked in a private firm, a few years ago and the couple moved into a house in Mogappair.     They allegedly had frequent quarrels as he tortured her and she left him too, police found.     Rajalakshmi then got a job with Panimalar Engineering College where she met Sambasivam. The two became friends and began seeing each other. Rajalakshmi recently moved to the polytechnic in Choolaimedu, police said.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/US-journalists-killer-annoyed-colleagues-Ex-boss/articleshow/48704167.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:46 IST 2015||ROANOKE, United States: The disgruntled former US television station employee who murdered two journalists had "annoyed" colleagues but showed no signs at work of any mental health issues, his former boss said Thursday.     Vester Lee Flanagan, 41, worked as a reporter for WDBJ in Roanoke, Virginia from March 2012 to February 2013, but was dismissed for poor performance and angry behavior, general manager Jeffrey Marks said.     On Wednesday, Flanagan shot and killed two of the CBS affiliate's journalists while they were conducting an on-air interview. He later fatally shot himself.     "We are still at a loss to figure out what happened to him in those two and a half years" since he was fired, Marks told a news conference flanked by dozens of staff, many of them holding hands.     "I don't think we identified that he had mental health issues. We certainly identified that he had performance issues."     Marks defended the station's hiring record and said its parent company had "a very elaborate program to screen employees."     Flanagan passed background checks and came with only positive references, Marks said.     It was only after he was hired, Marks said, that things went downhill.     "Vester's behavior annoyed a lot of people in the news station," Marks said.     Flanagan, who went by the on-screen name Bryce Williams, alleged in a manifesto faxed to ABC News that he was discriminated against as a gay, black journalist.     Marks said accusations in 2013 that he was treated unfairly were "immediately investigated and found to be without merit."     During his employment, Flanagan complied with demands that he seek medical help, but he was ultimately dismissed.     He was escorted from the building by police and made an ominous aside to the news director -- handing him a wooden cross and saying "'you'll need this'," Marks said.     As he left, he also made a "derogatory comment" to Adam Ward, the cameraman he shot dead on Wednesday.     Flanagan filed a complaint with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and a civil action suit, which were dismissed, he said.     "All of these investigations determined that no reasonable person would have taken any of the cited incidents as discrimination or harassment."     After killing Ward and reporter Alison Parker live on the air, Flanagan posted a video of the attack on social media.||ROANOKE, UNITED STATES
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:46 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/SC-acquits-Romesh-Sharma-in-Budhiraja-murder-case/articleshow/48704930.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:46 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Thursday upheld the Delhi High Court order acquitting former Congress leader Romesh Sharma in the case relating to the killing of fashion designer Kunjum Budhiraja.     A bench of Justices Pinaki Chandra Ghose and R K Agrawal dismissed an appeal filed by the Delhi government challenging HC order.     The Delhi government contended that the HC had erred in acquitting Sharma but it was strongly opposed by his counsel and senior advocate Siddharth Luthra who submitted that his client was in love with Kunjum and there was no evidence to prove his involvement in the case.     Sharma, who was alleged to be a frontman of underworld don Dawood Ibrahim, was convicted by a trial court on February 15, 2008. Kunjum was killed on March 20, 1999 at Sharma's South Delhi-based 'Jai Mata Di' farm house by a group of hired gangsters from Uttar Pradesh.     The trial court had convicted Sharma and five other accused in the case and had awarded life term to all. The HC, however, acquitted Sharma and co-accused Tejendir Verdi but upheld conviction and sentence of other four accused— Sharma's nephew Surinder Mishra, Hemchand, Santram and Ramesh alias Bobby.     While acquitting Sharma, the HC had said "Romesh Sharma and Kunjum were in love, and desired the company of each other. It does not establish that Sharma had got fed up with her". It had turned down Delhi police's contention that Sharma wanted to get rid of Kunjum as she knew about his alleged illegal activities.     "A grieving lover falling over the body of his mate and performing the rituals of a marriage can well be an expression of lasting love, and need not necessarily be a drama," the HC had said.     Sharma was in judicial custody at the time of the Kunjum's murder.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Raid-on-Bengaluru-centre-reveals-horror-tales/articleshow/48704718.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:46 IST 2015||BENGALURU: A State Human Rights Commission raid on a de-addiction centre in Jnanabharati Layout, near Kengeri, southwest Bengaluru, found 90 inmates living in pathetic conditions and subjected to inhuman treatment.     Thursday's raid followed the murder of an inmate of another de-addiction centre in Kothanur recently.     The SHRC raid on Sri Santhosh Social Service Society, also known as 4S Society, followed a tipoff. According to SHRC officials, the centre has been in existence for seven years at least, but the society couldn't produce documents of having obtained permission from the social welfare department. Commission officials said the centre had the permission from the DC and the DHO.     "Most inmates are between 20 and 35 years. They showed us signs of being physically abused. The centre has violated other norms too. Although it's supposed to have one nurse for every 15 patients and at least one in-house doctor and a psychiatrist, it didn't have any," said an SHRC spokesperson.     4 arrested for killing inmate:     Kothanur police arrested a de-addiction centre staffer and three inmates for allegedly beating to death a 28-year-old inmate. Dinesh was admitted to the centre by his family as he was an alcoholic. He was later found dead in a hospital. Family members noticed several bruises on his body. Narayana, an inmate-turned-staffer, gave some medicines to Dinesh, who later turned aggressive. Narayana sought the help of inmates Suresh, Subhan and Simon, to subdue Dinesh.     When Dinesh retaliated, the quartet overpowered him till he became unconscious. He died in hospital.||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/A-jolly-good-fellow-say-Khannas-friends/articleshow/48704630.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:46 IST 2015||Sanjeev Khanna, Indrani Mukerjea's second husband and suspected ally in Sheena Bora's killing, may be the most surprising element in this macabre drama, but his friends and associates in Kolkata refused to cast aspersions on "Sanju" just yet.     From being the biggest dart enthusiast at one of Kolkata's poshest clubs (the CC&FC) to having a finger in every pie, Sanjeev was everyone's "best mate" and go-to guy who friends described as: "A doer... someone who could get things done."     The morning after Khanna's arrest, TOI spoke to Ajay Rawla, the man who Khanna worked for as a consultant and whose house he was picked up from on Wednesday afternoon. "It wasn't like he was hiding like a desperate fugitive in my house. We had a meeting in the morning after which he drove me home and that's when news broke on television. We were sitting, watching, wondering what steps to take when the police arrived," explained Rawla.     Seven years his senior, Khanna's association with Rawla dates back to the time they went to Mayo College in Ajmer. Later, Khanna went on to become an aide for Rawla's pet projects. Besides running his own business in wireless communications, Khanna was there setting up chef Shaun Kenworthy and Rawla's restaurant 1658 or immersed in the heritage project of converting the Bawali Rajbari into a hotel. "He was getting all the construction work and labourers in place. He was very good in helping out with permissions through his connections with excise and contractors," remembers Kenworthy.     Khanna, who seldom missed his outings at the club, motor rallies and horse racing as a prominent face in the social circuit, was not the same man before he met Indrani, recounts Bull Banthia, a close friend. "Well-read and well-versed, Sanju had a great mechanical mind with a solution for everything," is how Bull chose to describe his "jolly good friend who loved meeting new people, hung out at the club but wasn't a social climber". "It was Indrani who emerged as this socialite and drove him to consciously build contacts with those higher up in the social rung after marriage," said the Kolkata-based entrepreneur. "That's the reason why I distanced myself from them until overnight she left Kolkata with their daughter and Sanju's wallet."     While Indrani never surfaces in conversations, his daughter Vidhie, who stayed with Indrani, is a fond subject with his friends. "He would miss his daughter but was resigned to fate, hoping that someday she would find him," said Rawla, adding, "It was Vidhie who called Sanjeev on Wednesday to give him the news."     No one seems to know about any recent interaction between Khanna and Indrani. G M Kapur, a known name in Kolkata who was Intach's state convener and happens to be Khanna's "mama", seemed disturbed with "all the theorizing" of Khanna's role in the crime. He declined to look back on Indrani and Khanna's relationship but added, "The last that there was any contact with Indrani or her family was when Vidhie visited Calcutta last year to celebrate the 75th birthday of her grandmother (Khanna's mother who lives with him)."     Khanna's Facebook posts on "karma" in the weeks and months following Sheena's alleged murder on April 24, 2012, make for interesting reading. On April 30, Khanna shared photo messages: "Say whatever, whenever the f*** you want to"; "Sometimes I get so weird, I even freak myself out".     On May 24, exactly a month after the alleged killing, he wrote: "You can never tell what people are thinking and feeling unless they tell you, and usually they lie. you ask them, 'Whats wrong?' and they say 'Nothing'. You accept this because it's easier than digging for the truth. People smile when they want to cry, they laugh when they want to scream and shout. They pretend like nothing is wrong because they don't want to face the truth. Things aren't always rainbows and butterflies, sometimes you gotta scream and cry your anger and sadness to the world, because you can only hold it in for so long before something in you snaps. so when you want to cry, cry. When you want to scream, scream. Don't hide behind fake smiles, it's ok to not be alright."     ||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Sheena-docu-Michail-add-to-mystery/articleshow/48701752.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:46 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Michail, Sheena's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered have raised a number of unanswered questions.    Two days after his mother, Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Michail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai Police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed that what he gave to police was enough to prove that Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora (who are actually parents of Indrani) as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. Some questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukherjea.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Michail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43 as mentioned in reports after her arrest.    Adding more to the suspense, Michail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Michail studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board examination, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that knew that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard that her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard that she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband who she introduced as Peter Mukherjea."    The two-member Mumbai Police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Michail, who on Wednesday, was the first one to reveal that Sheena was Indrani's daughter, twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Michail's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Michail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukherjae is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Michail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."  ||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Grandparents-are-Sheenas-mom-dad-on-birth-certificate/articleshow/48704559.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:46 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Mikhail, Sheena Bora's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered led to some unanswered questions on Thursday.    Two days after his mother Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Mikhail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed what he gave the police was enough to prove Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora, who are actually Indrani's parents, as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. However, many questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter. In many cases in India involving single mothers, grandparents are known to put in their names as father and mother.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukerjea, that is, 13 years after Sheena was born.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Mikhail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43.    Mikhail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Mikhail     studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board exam, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband, who she introduced as Peter Mukerjea."    The two-member Mumbai police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Mikhail twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Mikhail 's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time, he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Mikhail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukerjea is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Mikhail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Sheena-bowled-us-over-Rahuls-uncle/articleshow/48704552.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:46 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: Had things worked out as desired for Peter Mukherjea's first wife Shabnam and her family in Dehradun, Rahul Mukherjea and Sheena Bora would have been married for over three years now.     Shabnam's brother Shaleen Singh told TOI on Thursday that in 2011 Rahul brought Sheena to their sprawling home in Dehradun to seek approval from the family for their marriage.     The entire family-Shabnam, her younger brother Shaleen, father Anand Singh and mother Seema-were reportedly bowled over by Sheena's jovial nature and affection towards the elderly people. Impressed, the family gave its "unqualified and unanimous approval" for the wedding, which was supposed to take place within a few months, said Shaleen.     Stunned by the recent development, Shaleen said, "Sheena was among those rare persons who left a deep and lifelong impact on people. She was good-looking, a sweet person, clean of heart and good to talk to. None of us objected to the wedding."     Shaleen learnt of Sheena's murder through news channels. "It would have been great if she had become a part of the family. I don't know what was the cause and motive behind the heinous crime, but all those behind the killing of the jovial-natured girl should not be spared at any cost," he said.     A former model and tele-actor, 49-year-old Shaleen today owns the Sanskar International school in Jogiwala here. He recalled the last meeting with Shabnam and Rahul in April this year. "My father Anand Singh passed away in April. They had come to pay their respects but we did not interact much."     However, Shaleen said of late the interaction between him and his sister Shabnam was limited. Although Shabnam's farm Gul-e-Shabnam and Shaleen's residence Shankar Sadan are barely 200 metres away in Badripur, meetings between them were rare. While Shaleen and his mother stay on different floors of Shankar Sadan, Shabnam stays alone at her residence and is frequently visited by Rahul.     "There are matters in each family which we do not want to disclose. We are not against each other but do not interact much. She comes to meet our mother occasionally," said Shaleen, adding that Shabnam was passionate about painting and had a studio in her residence.     Shaleen denied having any details about the presence of Mumbai police in Dehradun. "Neither Doon police nor Mumbai police have contacted me over the issue."     Staff at Shabnam's residence said she was out-of-station but they were not aware of her whereabouts.||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Kilpauk-doctor-murder-Hubby-to-approach-court/articleshow/48704411.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:46 IST 2015||CHENNAI: It's been four days since police claimed to have solved the murder of S Sathya, 24, a PG medical student. However, her husband has put forth questions that police have failed to answer. Though investigating officers confirmed Sathya was not sexually assaulted before she was killed, they leaked to some section of media saying that they changed their stance on Wednesday and said there were indications of attempt to rape on the deceased.     Police personnel revealed the details soon after Sathya's husband Dr P Sesu, also employed at a primary health centre in Perambalur, expressed certain doubts.     He alleged the police hastily solved the case citing the state assembly, which is in motion. Sathya was found dead at her house in Kilpauk on August 20.     On August 23, police arrested Harintham Depnath, a BTech graduate, who lived at the second floor on the same apartment. Neither was there any mention about sexual assault or attempt on Sathya when the body was recovered from the house. The nor did the doctors. Police didn't tell this during the arrest of Depnath on August 23. "What forced the police to reveal about the sexual harassment attempt on my wife now?" asked Sesu.     "I want to live a peaceful life with my two sons - Tamil Nesan, 6, and Karmugilan, 4. The studies and the future of my children is important for me. I do respect the police personnel who spent sleepless nights to solve the murder, but there are questions that need to be answered," he said.     "I live in Perambalur with my children, but we speak through live video calls. I have told my sons that Sathya has gone to the God, as the Almighty likes her more. "Hereafter, we cannot speak or meet her. I don't know how far my children will admit it?" said Sesu. "I will approach the court seeking a fair probe into the murder of my wife. I want to find out the real cause behind her death. I want the real accused to get punished for his deed," said Sesu.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Woman-strangles-husbands-lover/articleshow/48704388.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:46 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A woman beat up and strangled her husband's partner, an assistant professor at a polytechnic in Choolaimedu, in their Thiruverkadu home on Thursday, police said. A court later remanded the accused, 32-year-old Shruti, in judicial custody.     Police said Sambasivam, a professor at Panimalar Engineering College in Poonamallee, used to bring Rajalakshmi, home frequently and introduced her to his wife Shruti as a colleague. He even dropped her home at night. The polytechnic where Rajalakshmi worked was part of the Panimalar group of educational institutions. Shruti initially believed the two were just colleagues until Sambasivam came home with Rajalakshmi on Tuesday and said the woman was moving in with them permanently.     On Wednesday morning, Sambasivam allegedly tied a 'mangalsutra' to Rajalakshmi in front of his wife, police said, based on Shruti's confession. A shocked Shruti picked up a fight with Sambasivam who asked her to maintain a cordial relationship and take care of Rajalakshmi. On Thursday morning, after he left for college a fight broke out between the two women.     Police said Rajalakshmi allegedly abused Sruthi and went into the bathroom. Sruthi followed her in and strangled her with the 'mangalsutra'. She then tried to make it appear that the woman had fainted in the bathroom. She took her in an autorickshaw to a nearby hospital where she was declared 'brought dead'. Doctors who noticed a few marks around her neck informed the Thiruverkadu police who registered a case of suspicious death under CrPC section 176.     The body was sent for postmortem to Kilpauk Medical College and Hospital.     After finding that the two women were at home at the time of the death, police interrogated Sruthi for more than an hour but she continued to maintain that Rajyalakshmi had died of injuries sustained when she fell down in the bathroom.     "She confessed to the murder when we told her that her fingerprints had been lifted from the scene of crime," said an investigating officer. "She said she had smashed the woman's head against the wall and later strangled her with the 'thali'." Police altered the case to murder and arrested Sruthi.     Initial inquiries revealed that Rajalakshmi had been married to a man named Rajasekhar for a while and they had separated. She then got married to Suresh, a relative who worked in a private firm, a few years ago and the couple moved into a house in Mogappair.     They allegedly had frequent quarrels as he tortured her and she left him too, police found.     Rajalakshmi then got a job with Panimalar Engineering College where she met Sambasivam. The two became friends and began seeing each other. Rajalakshmi recently moved to the polytechnic in Choolaimedu, police said.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/US-journalists-killer-annoyed-colleagues-Ex-boss/articleshow/48704167.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:46 IST 2015||ROANOKE, United States: The disgruntled former US television station employee who murdered two journalists had "annoyed" colleagues but showed no signs at work of any mental health issues, his former boss said Thursday.     Vester Lee Flanagan, 41, worked as a reporter for WDBJ in Roanoke, Virginia from March 2012 to February 2013, but was dismissed for poor performance and angry behavior, general manager Jeffrey Marks said.     On Wednesday, Flanagan shot and killed two of the CBS affiliate's journalists while they were conducting an on-air interview. He later fatally shot himself.     "We are still at a loss to figure out what happened to him in those two and a half years" since he was fired, Marks told a news conference flanked by dozens of staff, many of them holding hands.     "I don't think we identified that he had mental health issues. We certainly identified that he had performance issues."     Marks defended the station's hiring record and said its parent company had "a very elaborate program to screen employees."     Flanagan passed background checks and came with only positive references, Marks said.     It was only after he was hired, Marks said, that things went downhill.     "Vester's behavior annoyed a lot of people in the news station," Marks said.     Flanagan, who went by the on-screen name Bryce Williams, alleged in a manifesto faxed to ABC News that he was discriminated against as a gay, black journalist.     Marks said accusations in 2013 that he was treated unfairly were "immediately investigated and found to be without merit."     During his employment, Flanagan complied with demands that he seek medical help, but he was ultimately dismissed.     He was escorted from the building by police and made an ominous aside to the news director -- handing him a wooden cross and saying "'you'll need this'," Marks said.     As he left, he also made a "derogatory comment" to Adam Ward, the cameraman he shot dead on Wednesday.     Flanagan filed a complaint with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and a civil action suit, which were dismissed, he said.     "All of these investigations determined that no reasonable person would have taken any of the cited incidents as discrimination or harassment."     After killing Ward and reporter Alison Parker live on the air, Flanagan posted a video of the attack on social media.||ROANOKE, UNITED STATES
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/dehradun/3-held-for-murder-of-ATM-guard-in-Udham-Singh-Nagar-district/articleshow/48486717.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:50 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: The Udham Singh Nagar district police on Friday cracked the murder case of an ATM guard, who prevented a loot, in the early hours of August 3. The case had become a major challenge for the police department as it was virtually "clueless" in the matter and barring a few small leads, it did not have any major evidence.     In the CCTV camera footage, the probe team noticed that one of the three assailants had a limp in his left leg.     "Our teams collected the footage of other CCTVs cameras in the area and collected information about the people who were present in the ITI area on the night of incident," SSP Udham Singh Nagar, Nilesh Anand Bharney told TOI. Following the initial clues, police teams were rushed to western districts of Uttar Pradesh.     "During the probe, the names of Palwinder Singh and his two sons Gurpreet and Harvinder came to the fore. The three are residents of Maheshpura village of the district and own a truck container," said the senior police official.     Acting on a tip-off, the police team arrested them near the Begumabad tiraha on Bajpur-Kashipur highway. "The three have admitted their involvement in the crime. They claimed that their container had been seized by the RTO staff at Bijnore and they had planned the loot to pay the penalty of Rs 50,000," said Bharney.     Shiv Charan Sharma, 70, a resident of Shyampuram Colony was the security guard of the ATM of a private bank near Aloo Farm area under ITI police station. Between 2 am and 4 am, three unidentified persons with their faces covered had entered the booth on August 3 with the intention of cutting and carrying away the machine containing the amount.     When Sharma had stopped them, they had attacked him with rods and strangled him to death. With the fear of getting caught, the trio had escaped from the spot. However, before escaping, they had placed the guard's body on the chair to give an impression that everything was normal inside the ATM booth.     ||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mangaluru/Don-Bannanje-Raja-given-to-police-custody-till-28th-august/articleshow/48486588.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:50 IST 2015||BELAGAVI: Underworld don Bannanje Raja was produced before district principle and session court here on Friday 8.25pm amid huge police security, in connection to murder case of businessman and cooperative leader RN Nayak from Ankola in Uttar Kannada district in December 2013.    Judge P Krishna Bhat remanded him to police custody till 28th August. Bannanje is an accused under Karnataka Control of Organized Crime Act (KCOCA). KCOCA related cases in Uttar Kannada falls in the jurisdiction of Belagavi Court.    Accused was brought by SpaceJet flight to Sambra Airport here at 7.20pm. It took around an hour to inspect security issues and later he moved towards court. He was in one police vehicle among eight vehicles back to back. Udupi SP Annamalai was along with the accused. Huge security had arranged at court premises and entry for journalists at the court premises banned.    Bannanje was taken out to Udupi amid huge security.||BELAGAVI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/patna/Mutilated-body-of-RTI-activist-found/articleshow/48486497.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:50 IST 2015||Muzaffarpur: The mutilated body of an RTI and JP Movement activist Jawahar Tiwary of Bangara Nizamjat village under Sahebganj PS in Muzaffarpur district, who had been kidnapped four days ago, was found in the diara belt of Gandak river in Sohasa village under Deoria PS on Friday morning.    It is believed that he was killed for exposing a huge bungling in the distribution of flood relief cash in Bangara Nizamat panchayat under Sahebganj block last year. He had organized a long-drawn dharna and 'satyagraha' on Sahebganj block office premises last year under the banner of Sahebganj Vikas Manch.    The then DM Anupam Kumar had ordered a magisterial inquiry into the allegations. His house had been attacked by some goons and some shots too had been fired.    Tiwary was returning from Paroo block to his village home on August 10 when he was kidnapped. According to Paru police, the body was found in five parts on Friday. Parts of the body had been strewn at different places and the head portion had been covered under sand. Locating and collecting parts of the body was a tough task for the police.    Braj Kishore Singh, husband of Bangara Nizamat panchayat's mukhiya , their kin Raj Kishore Singh, Satyendra Singh and others have been made named accused in the FIR lodged on the statement of Tiwary's family members. But no arrest had been made till Friday.        SSP Ranjeet Kumar Mishra said Braj Kishore Singh had earlier lodged a case of murder of his brother against Jawahar Tiwary.    Meanwhile, in the connection with the murder of Md. Sarfaraj of Pankaj Market area in Sikandarpur on Wednesday night, the SSP said the Town police have arrested four of the seven named a0ccused so far and assured to nab the rest three also soon.    ||MUZAFFARPUR
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bhopal/Three-maoists-convicted-in-former-Madhya-Pradesh-transport-ministers-murder/articleshow/48485466.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:50 IST 2015||BHOPAL: A court in Balaghat district of Madhya Pradesh on Friday sentenced three Maoists to life in prison in connection with murder former transport minister Likhiram Kawre.  Those convicted have been identified as Madan Lal Varkhade @ Ayugchandra Mouli, Santosh @ Jagdeesh and Jhinia Bai @ Rukhmabai.  First Additional District and Sessions Judge, Balaghat, Deepak Tripathi also ordered that these accused will have to undergo additional one year's imprisonment if they fail to pay fine of Rs 5000 each.  All the above said accused persons are in judicial custody. The corresponding period spent under judicial custody will deducted from the above said sentences in respect of all the accused persons, court ruled.  Kawre was murdered as a retaliatory action by banned People's War Group in his native village Sonepuri, 40 km from Balaghat on December 15/16 2009. Posters left behind with his body proclaim that the murder ''a punishment for the killing of four PWG top brass.''. They were arrested in Bangalore and killed in an encounter in Karimnagar Andhra Pradesh on December 1 that year. PWG had claimed the encounter was fake.  Case was registered at Kirnapur police station, Balaghat MP and subsequently, transferred to CID. In 2000 this case was transferred to CBI.  CBI had charge-sheeted 12 people in this connection. Four of them identified - Bhaiyalal, Makhan, Chetram and Lalita got arrested and were sentenced to life in jail in 2005.||BHOPAL
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/rajkot/Man-murdered-in-Rajkot-three-accused-held/articleshow/48485195.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:50 IST 2015||RAJKOT: A 38-year-old Jitu Chavda, a resident of Ramnathpara area, was murdered over old animosity on Thursday late night.     According to police, Jitu Chavda was coconut seller at Mama Ni Pir, a religious place, near Kothariya on outskirts of the city.     Jitu's wife Jashoda Chavda, lodged a complaint with against Yusuf Majothi, Hanif Majothi, Murtuza Majothi, Vipul Patel, and three others.     Accused were booked under various sections of Indian Penal Code including 302(murder) and rioting. The accused are also engaged in selling coconut and other religious items at the same spot in Kothariya.     Jashoda told police that Jitu and Yusuf had been at loggerhead since last few years.     Jashoda, a divorce, was living with Jitu, who was also married with Kavita but gave divorce to her ten days ago.     On Thursday night, according to Jashoda, when she was selling coconut other items, Yusuf and his assailants came there and started ruckus with me and ransacked our handcart lorry.     'During that time, Jitu was not present and I called him up and asked to come soon at earliest. I and my father-in-law received injuries and went to hospital and Jitu reached at the incident spot. However, as soon as he reached there, Yusuf and others who were ready with knife and other lethal instruments attacked on him. He was rushed to hospital but died soon after'' she told police.     "We have detained Yusuf Majothi, Hanif and Vipul Patel in this case and are questioning them over the incident. Accused Yusuf told us that they have some problems woth Jitu over the business and it turned out ugly on Thursday night'' said police official.     Sources said that Jitu's fathe Govind Chavda has been doing business at the spot since last 40 years. However, a few years ago Yusuf and others also arrived and started selling the same items at the religious spot and tussle began between them.||RAJKOT
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/entertainment/english/hollywood/news/Teaser-of-Minority-Report-released/articleshow/48478766.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:50 IST 2015||Minority Report is a sequel to the hit 2002 science fiction film, which in itself was based on a famed novel by Phillip K Dick, reported Digital Spy.For the latest in Hollywood news, like us on Facebook >>> TOIEntertain For latest Hollywood updates follow us on Twitter >>> @TOIEntertain Fox's series picks up 15 years after the events of the movie, when the use of so-called Precogs to predict crimes is outlawed by the police.One hold-over from the Precog police force is Dash (Stark Sands), who becomes committed to using his power to help cop Lara Vega (Meagan Good) prevent crimes.For more interesting Hollywood news and pictures follow us on Pinterest>>> timesofindia For latest Hollywood updates follow us on G+ >>> The Times of India Entertainment The original movie's director Steven Spielberg has been heavily involved in its transition to television as an executive producer.Minority Report will debut on Fox in the US on September 21.|| 
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/south-asia/2-suspects-arrested-in-Bangladesh-blogger-murder-case/articleshow/48477334.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:50 IST 2015||DHAKA: Detectives in Bangladesh's capital have arrested two suspects in connection with the killing of a secular blogger by suspected Muslim militants last week.     Dhaka Metropolitan Police spokesman Muntasirul Islam said Friday they picked up Saad-al-Nahin and Masud Rana, both suspected members of Ansarullah Bangla Team, a group blamed for some previous attacks on bloggers.     On Aug. 7, at least four men posing as tenants entered an apartment building and hacked to death the 28-year-old Niladri Chottopadhay Niloy, in the fourth such deadly attack this year.     Police would not provide other details about the arrests and whether the two were suspected of being directly involved in the attack.     The blogger's wife, Asha Moni, has filed a murder case against four unnamed persons.     ||DHAKA
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Knife-bloody-trail-tell-a-ghastly-tale/articleshow/48476506.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:50 IST 2015||The trail of blood leading to Flat No. 204, named Kalyan, in Kalpana Paradise on Thursday evening was proof of the ghastly events which unfolded there earlier that afternoon.As you walk up the stairs and into the corridor, you can see blood splattered on the walls. The calling bell of the flat next to Arbindo Chakarvarti's house too has blood smears on it.Arbindo, bleeding from the stomach, walked out of his flat to the neighbour's flat and rang the bell. As he stumbled along the corridor, he left blood stains where he placed his hands for support. He reportedly told his neighbour what had happened between him and his wife.Back in the Chakravartis' flat, there was a pool of blood near the door and a blood-stained knife near it. Nearby was a trainerwheeler, apparently used by the couple's eight-year-old daughter.The neighours told police their first impression was that the couple had been attacked but Arbindo confessed to the crime.The main door of the apartment where the couple has been living for the past three years was open when police landed there, sources said.Dr S Murali, chief of clinical services, Manipal Hospital said, "Two middle-aged persons were brought to the emergency room around 1pm by security personnel of their apartment. Both sustained abdominal injuries, allegedly due to stabbing. They underwent surgery and moved to the Medical Intensive Care Unit and are stable as of Thursday evening. A medico-legal case has been filed."Sept 20, 2013: Senior software engineer Madhusudan YG fatally stabbed his techie-wife Roopa Belur, 32, on her face, chest, hands and stomach, in their 13th floor Sobha Tulip flat in JP Nagar 6th Phase, and then jumped to his death. Madhusudan attempted to hang himself from the ceiling fan, but the rope snapped. He rushed into the kitchen and doused himself with kerosene, and finally, headed to the balcony and leapt down. The couple's six-year-old daughter was in Madhusudan's parents' house, 200m away. The ouple had quarrelled over visit ng Roopa's house for her father's birthday party.Aug 11, 2010: Infosys HR manager Sathish Gupta played out a drama calling cops to say his wife, Delhi Public School teacher Priyanka, was murdered at their Hulimavu house in south Bengaluru. He claimed his wife had called him about two strangers at their doorstep, when he had gone for a his morning jog. He had rushed back to find his wife bound to a chair and her throat slit. Call detail records revealed Sathish was near their home at the time of the murder. Family problems were said to be the motive. Police arrested him a couple of days later.||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/nagpur/Man-shoots-at-rival-over-petty-issue-in-Mominpura/articleshow/48475203.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:50 IST 2015||Nagpur: The dingy Kabrastan road of Mominpura on Thursday became a battlefield for two warring groups. The issue of riding a bicycle in a narrow lane seemed pretty trivial.  Tehsil police said that Maqsood Ansari tried to shoot Mohd Mustaque Ahmed after a brief altercation between the two. He has been booked for attempt to murder.  Maqsood, who was on a bike, was angry after a child from Mustaque's family blocked his path while playing with a bicycle. Maqsood kicked the cycle while chiding the child. This sparked off a fight between Maqsood and Mustaque.  The argument gradually snowballed into a fight when Maqsood whipped out a firearm targeting at Mustaque. Maqsood soon left the place after the fiasco as Tehsil police reached the place.  It is learnt that even Maqsood's family members even demanded that an offence be registered against Mustaque and his family for trying to confront his brother with swords. Police, however, did not pay any heed to Maqsood's family members' complaint citing it as a mere revengeful attempt and not a genuine claim.  "We will nab Maqsood soon," said senior PI Santosh Khandekar of Tehsil police station.  In September last year, Maqsood had shot thrice at Mustaque's brother Ishrar Ahmed over a 'goat' incident. Two bullets had hit Ishrar while one went astray.  Ishrar is now behind bars after the crime branch nabbed him for dealing in illegal arms. Maqsood was in jail for seven months.  Last month, Mominpura had turned into a hotbed of security concern for police department after Iftekhar Hasan was shot by unidentified assailants. Hasan, acquitted from murder, had a miraculous escape after being hit thrice. Tehsil police are yet to nab the offenders involved in targeting Hasan.||NAGPUR
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chandigarh/Married-couple-kidnapped-from-motel-by-gang-of-12/articleshow/48475832.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:50 IST 2015||MOHALI: One married couple was kidnapped from a motel at Nayagaon by 12 unidentified persons late on Tuesday evening. The couple, identified as Jaswinder Singh Gill and his wife Hapreet Kaur , was travelling to a religious place, when they decided to halt at the motel.    Twelve unidentified persons came to the motel in an SUV, broke into their room, thrashed and dumped them in the car's boot. One of the accused drove away the couple's car parked outside the motel. Hushiyar Singh, the motel's manager, was out for some work, when he received information about the kidnapping from an employee, Haripal, on the phone.    Rushing to the motel, he saw the room's condition and heard eyewitnesses before calling up the cops. The police, after investigating the crime scene, lodged a case under sections 364 (kidnapping or abducting in order to murder), 450 (house-trespass in order to commit offence punishable with imprisonment for life), 147 (punishment for rioting) and 149 (unlawful assembly) of the IPC against the 12 unidentified persons. Even after two days, the police are still clueless about both the accused and the victims.  ||MOHALI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:50 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:50 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/SC-acquits-Romesh-Sharma-in-Budhiraja-murder-case/articleshow/48704930.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:50 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Thursday upheld the Delhi High Court order acquitting former Congress leader Romesh Sharma in the case relating to the killing of fashion designer Kunjum Budhiraja.     A bench of Justices Pinaki Chandra Ghose and R K Agrawal dismissed an appeal filed by the Delhi government challenging HC order.     The Delhi government contended that the HC had erred in acquitting Sharma but it was strongly opposed by his counsel and senior advocate Siddharth Luthra who submitted that his client was in love with Kunjum and there was no evidence to prove his involvement in the case.     Sharma, who was alleged to be a frontman of underworld don Dawood Ibrahim, was convicted by a trial court on February 15, 2008. Kunjum was killed on March 20, 1999 at Sharma's South Delhi-based 'Jai Mata Di' farm house by a group of hired gangsters from Uttar Pradesh.     The trial court had convicted Sharma and five other accused in the case and had awarded life term to all. The HC, however, acquitted Sharma and co-accused Tejendir Verdi but upheld conviction and sentence of other four accused— Sharma's nephew Surinder Mishra, Hemchand, Santram and Ramesh alias Bobby.     While acquitting Sharma, the HC had said "Romesh Sharma and Kunjum were in love, and desired the company of each other. It does not establish that Sharma had got fed up with her". It had turned down Delhi police's contention that Sharma wanted to get rid of Kunjum as she knew about his alleged illegal activities.     "A grieving lover falling over the body of his mate and performing the rituals of a marriage can well be an expression of lasting love, and need not necessarily be a drama," the HC had said.     Sharma was in judicial custody at the time of the Kunjum's murder.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Raid-on-Bengaluru-centre-reveals-horror-tales/articleshow/48704718.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:50 IST 2015||BENGALURU: A State Human Rights Commission raid on a de-addiction centre in Jnanabharati Layout, near Kengeri, southwest Bengaluru, found 90 inmates living in pathetic conditions and subjected to inhuman treatment.     Thursday's raid followed the murder of an inmate of another de-addiction centre in Kothanur recently.     The SHRC raid on Sri Santhosh Social Service Society, also known as 4S Society, followed a tipoff. According to SHRC officials, the centre has been in existence for seven years at least, but the society couldn't produce documents of having obtained permission from the social welfare department. Commission officials said the centre had the permission from the DC and the DHO.     "Most inmates are between 20 and 35 years. They showed us signs of being physically abused. The centre has violated other norms too. Although it's supposed to have one nurse for every 15 patients and at least one in-house doctor and a psychiatrist, it didn't have any," said an SHRC spokesperson.     4 arrested for killing inmate:     Kothanur police arrested a de-addiction centre staffer and three inmates for allegedly beating to death a 28-year-old inmate. Dinesh was admitted to the centre by his family as he was an alcoholic. He was later found dead in a hospital. Family members noticed several bruises on his body. Narayana, an inmate-turned-staffer, gave some medicines to Dinesh, who later turned aggressive. Narayana sought the help of inmates Suresh, Subhan and Simon, to subdue Dinesh.     When Dinesh retaliated, the quartet overpowered him till he became unconscious. He died in hospital.||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/A-jolly-good-fellow-say-Khannas-friends/articleshow/48704630.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:50 IST 2015||Sanjeev Khanna, Indrani Mukerjea's second husband and suspected ally in Sheena Bora's killing, may be the most surprising element in this macabre drama, but his friends and associates in Kolkata refused to cast aspersions on "Sanju" just yet.     From being the biggest dart enthusiast at one of Kolkata's poshest clubs (the CC&FC) to having a finger in every pie, Sanjeev was everyone's "best mate" and go-to guy who friends described as: "A doer... someone who could get things done."     The morning after Khanna's arrest, TOI spoke to Ajay Rawla, the man who Khanna worked for as a consultant and whose house he was picked up from on Wednesday afternoon. "It wasn't like he was hiding like a desperate fugitive in my house. We had a meeting in the morning after which he drove me home and that's when news broke on television. We were sitting, watching, wondering what steps to take when the police arrived," explained Rawla.     Seven years his senior, Khanna's association with Rawla dates back to the time they went to Mayo College in Ajmer. Later, Khanna went on to become an aide for Rawla's pet projects. Besides running his own business in wireless communications, Khanna was there setting up chef Shaun Kenworthy and Rawla's restaurant 1658 or immersed in the heritage project of converting the Bawali Rajbari into a hotel. "He was getting all the construction work and labourers in place. He was very good in helping out with permissions through his connections with excise and contractors," remembers Kenworthy.     Khanna, who seldom missed his outings at the club, motor rallies and horse racing as a prominent face in the social circuit, was not the same man before he met Indrani, recounts Bull Banthia, a close friend. "Well-read and well-versed, Sanju had a great mechanical mind with a solution for everything," is how Bull chose to describe his "jolly good friend who loved meeting new people, hung out at the club but wasn't a social climber". "It was Indrani who emerged as this socialite and drove him to consciously build contacts with those higher up in the social rung after marriage," said the Kolkata-based entrepreneur. "That's the reason why I distanced myself from them until overnight she left Kolkata with their daughter and Sanju's wallet."     While Indrani never surfaces in conversations, his daughter Vidhie, who stayed with Indrani, is a fond subject with his friends. "He would miss his daughter but was resigned to fate, hoping that someday she would find him," said Rawla, adding, "It was Vidhie who called Sanjeev on Wednesday to give him the news."     No one seems to know about any recent interaction between Khanna and Indrani. G M Kapur, a known name in Kolkata who was Intach's state convener and happens to be Khanna's "mama", seemed disturbed with "all the theorizing" of Khanna's role in the crime. He declined to look back on Indrani and Khanna's relationship but added, "The last that there was any contact with Indrani or her family was when Vidhie visited Calcutta last year to celebrate the 75th birthday of her grandmother (Khanna's mother who lives with him)."     Khanna's Facebook posts on "karma" in the weeks and months following Sheena's alleged murder on April 24, 2012, make for interesting reading. On April 30, Khanna shared photo messages: "Say whatever, whenever the f*** you want to"; "Sometimes I get so weird, I even freak myself out".     On May 24, exactly a month after the alleged killing, he wrote: "You can never tell what people are thinking and feeling unless they tell you, and usually they lie. you ask them, 'Whats wrong?' and they say 'Nothing'. You accept this because it's easier than digging for the truth. People smile when they want to cry, they laugh when they want to scream and shout. They pretend like nothing is wrong because they don't want to face the truth. Things aren't always rainbows and butterflies, sometimes you gotta scream and cry your anger and sadness to the world, because you can only hold it in for so long before something in you snaps. so when you want to cry, cry. When you want to scream, scream. Don't hide behind fake smiles, it's ok to not be alright."     ||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Sheena-docu-Michail-add-to-mystery/articleshow/48701752.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:50 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Michail, Sheena's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered have raised a number of unanswered questions.    Two days after his mother, Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Michail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai Police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed that what he gave to police was enough to prove that Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora (who are actually parents of Indrani) as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. Some questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukherjea.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Michail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43 as mentioned in reports after her arrest.    Adding more to the suspense, Michail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Michail studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board examination, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that knew that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard that her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard that she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband who she introduced as Peter Mukherjea."    The two-member Mumbai Police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Michail, who on Wednesday, was the first one to reveal that Sheena was Indrani's daughter, twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Michail's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Michail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukherjae is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Michail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."  ||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Grandparents-are-Sheenas-mom-dad-on-birth-certificate/articleshow/48704559.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:50 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Mikhail, Sheena Bora's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered led to some unanswered questions on Thursday.    Two days after his mother Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Mikhail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed what he gave the police was enough to prove Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora, who are actually Indrani's parents, as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. However, many questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter. In many cases in India involving single mothers, grandparents are known to put in their names as father and mother.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukerjea, that is, 13 years after Sheena was born.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Mikhail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43.    Mikhail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Mikhail     studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board exam, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband, who she introduced as Peter Mukerjea."    The two-member Mumbai police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Mikhail twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Mikhail 's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time, he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Mikhail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukerjea is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Mikhail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Sheena-bowled-us-over-Rahuls-uncle/articleshow/48704552.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:50 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: Had things worked out as desired for Peter Mukherjea's first wife Shabnam and her family in Dehradun, Rahul Mukherjea and Sheena Bora would have been married for over three years now.     Shabnam's brother Shaleen Singh told TOI on Thursday that in 2011 Rahul brought Sheena to their sprawling home in Dehradun to seek approval from the family for their marriage.     The entire family-Shabnam, her younger brother Shaleen, father Anand Singh and mother Seema-were reportedly bowled over by Sheena's jovial nature and affection towards the elderly people. Impressed, the family gave its "unqualified and unanimous approval" for the wedding, which was supposed to take place within a few months, said Shaleen.     Stunned by the recent development, Shaleen said, "Sheena was among those rare persons who left a deep and lifelong impact on people. She was good-looking, a sweet person, clean of heart and good to talk to. None of us objected to the wedding."     Shaleen learnt of Sheena's murder through news channels. "It would have been great if she had become a part of the family. I don't know what was the cause and motive behind the heinous crime, but all those behind the killing of the jovial-natured girl should not be spared at any cost," he said.     A former model and tele-actor, 49-year-old Shaleen today owns the Sanskar International school in Jogiwala here. He recalled the last meeting with Shabnam and Rahul in April this year. "My father Anand Singh passed away in April. They had come to pay their respects but we did not interact much."     However, Shaleen said of late the interaction between him and his sister Shabnam was limited. Although Shabnam's farm Gul-e-Shabnam and Shaleen's residence Shankar Sadan are barely 200 metres away in Badripur, meetings between them were rare. While Shaleen and his mother stay on different floors of Shankar Sadan, Shabnam stays alone at her residence and is frequently visited by Rahul.     "There are matters in each family which we do not want to disclose. We are not against each other but do not interact much. She comes to meet our mother occasionally," said Shaleen, adding that Shabnam was passionate about painting and had a studio in her residence.     Shaleen denied having any details about the presence of Mumbai police in Dehradun. "Neither Doon police nor Mumbai police have contacted me over the issue."     Staff at Shabnam's residence said she was out-of-station but they were not aware of her whereabouts.||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Kilpauk-doctor-murder-Hubby-to-approach-court/articleshow/48704411.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:50 IST 2015||CHENNAI: It's been four days since police claimed to have solved the murder of S Sathya, 24, a PG medical student. However, her husband has put forth questions that police have failed to answer. Though investigating officers confirmed Sathya was not sexually assaulted before she was killed, they leaked to some section of media saying that they changed their stance on Wednesday and said there were indications of attempt to rape on the deceased.     Police personnel revealed the details soon after Sathya's husband Dr P Sesu, also employed at a primary health centre in Perambalur, expressed certain doubts.     He alleged the police hastily solved the case citing the state assembly, which is in motion. Sathya was found dead at her house in Kilpauk on August 20.     On August 23, police arrested Harintham Depnath, a BTech graduate, who lived at the second floor on the same apartment. Neither was there any mention about sexual assault or attempt on Sathya when the body was recovered from the house. The nor did the doctors. Police didn't tell this during the arrest of Depnath on August 23. "What forced the police to reveal about the sexual harassment attempt on my wife now?" asked Sesu.     "I want to live a peaceful life with my two sons - Tamil Nesan, 6, and Karmugilan, 4. The studies and the future of my children is important for me. I do respect the police personnel who spent sleepless nights to solve the murder, but there are questions that need to be answered," he said.     "I live in Perambalur with my children, but we speak through live video calls. I have told my sons that Sathya has gone to the God, as the Almighty likes her more. "Hereafter, we cannot speak or meet her. I don't know how far my children will admit it?" said Sesu. "I will approach the court seeking a fair probe into the murder of my wife. I want to find out the real cause behind her death. I want the real accused to get punished for his deed," said Sesu.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Woman-strangles-husbands-lover/articleshow/48704388.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:50 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A woman beat up and strangled her husband's partner, an assistant professor at a polytechnic in Choolaimedu, in their Thiruverkadu home on Thursday, police said. A court later remanded the accused, 32-year-old Shruti, in judicial custody.     Police said Sambasivam, a professor at Panimalar Engineering College in Poonamallee, used to bring Rajalakshmi, home frequently and introduced her to his wife Shruti as a colleague. He even dropped her home at night. The polytechnic where Rajalakshmi worked was part of the Panimalar group of educational institutions. Shruti initially believed the two were just colleagues until Sambasivam came home with Rajalakshmi on Tuesday and said the woman was moving in with them permanently.     On Wednesday morning, Sambasivam allegedly tied a 'mangalsutra' to Rajalakshmi in front of his wife, police said, based on Shruti's confession. A shocked Shruti picked up a fight with Sambasivam who asked her to maintain a cordial relationship and take care of Rajalakshmi. On Thursday morning, after he left for college a fight broke out between the two women.     Police said Rajalakshmi allegedly abused Sruthi and went into the bathroom. Sruthi followed her in and strangled her with the 'mangalsutra'. She then tried to make it appear that the woman had fainted in the bathroom. She took her in an autorickshaw to a nearby hospital where she was declared 'brought dead'. Doctors who noticed a few marks around her neck informed the Thiruverkadu police who registered a case of suspicious death under CrPC section 176.     The body was sent for postmortem to Kilpauk Medical College and Hospital.     After finding that the two women were at home at the time of the death, police interrogated Sruthi for more than an hour but she continued to maintain that Rajyalakshmi had died of injuries sustained when she fell down in the bathroom.     "She confessed to the murder when we told her that her fingerprints had been lifted from the scene of crime," said an investigating officer. "She said she had smashed the woman's head against the wall and later strangled her with the 'thali'." Police altered the case to murder and arrested Sruthi.     Initial inquiries revealed that Rajalakshmi had been married to a man named Rajasekhar for a while and they had separated. She then got married to Suresh, a relative who worked in a private firm, a few years ago and the couple moved into a house in Mogappair.     They allegedly had frequent quarrels as he tortured her and she left him too, police found.     Rajalakshmi then got a job with Panimalar Engineering College where she met Sambasivam. The two became friends and began seeing each other. Rajalakshmi recently moved to the polytechnic in Choolaimedu, police said.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/US-journalists-killer-annoyed-colleagues-Ex-boss/articleshow/48704167.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:50 IST 2015||ROANOKE, United States: The disgruntled former US television station employee who murdered two journalists had "annoyed" colleagues but showed no signs at work of any mental health issues, his former boss said Thursday.     Vester Lee Flanagan, 41, worked as a reporter for WDBJ in Roanoke, Virginia from March 2012 to February 2013, but was dismissed for poor performance and angry behavior, general manager Jeffrey Marks said.     On Wednesday, Flanagan shot and killed two of the CBS affiliate's journalists while they were conducting an on-air interview. He later fatally shot himself.     "We are still at a loss to figure out what happened to him in those two and a half years" since he was fired, Marks told a news conference flanked by dozens of staff, many of them holding hands.     "I don't think we identified that he had mental health issues. We certainly identified that he had performance issues."     Marks defended the station's hiring record and said its parent company had "a very elaborate program to screen employees."     Flanagan passed background checks and came with only positive references, Marks said.     It was only after he was hired, Marks said, that things went downhill.     "Vester's behavior annoyed a lot of people in the news station," Marks said.     Flanagan, who went by the on-screen name Bryce Williams, alleged in a manifesto faxed to ABC News that he was discriminated against as a gay, black journalist.     Marks said accusations in 2013 that he was treated unfairly were "immediately investigated and found to be without merit."     During his employment, Flanagan complied with demands that he seek medical help, but he was ultimately dismissed.     He was escorted from the building by police and made an ominous aside to the news director -- handing him a wooden cross and saying "'you'll need this'," Marks said.     As he left, he also made a "derogatory comment" to Adam Ward, the cameraman he shot dead on Wednesday.     Flanagan filed a complaint with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and a civil action suit, which were dismissed, he said.     "All of these investigations determined that no reasonable person would have taken any of the cited incidents as discrimination or harassment."     After killing Ward and reporter Alison Parker live on the air, Flanagan posted a video of the attack on social media.||ROANOKE, UNITED STATES
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:50 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/SC-acquits-Romesh-Sharma-in-Budhiraja-murder-case/articleshow/48704930.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:50 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Thursday upheld the Delhi High Court order acquitting former Congress leader Romesh Sharma in the case relating to the killing of fashion designer Kunjum Budhiraja.     A bench of Justices Pinaki Chandra Ghose and R K Agrawal dismissed an appeal filed by the Delhi government challenging HC order.     The Delhi government contended that the HC had erred in acquitting Sharma but it was strongly opposed by his counsel and senior advocate Siddharth Luthra who submitted that his client was in love with Kunjum and there was no evidence to prove his involvement in the case.     Sharma, who was alleged to be a frontman of underworld don Dawood Ibrahim, was convicted by a trial court on February 15, 2008. Kunjum was killed on March 20, 1999 at Sharma's South Delhi-based 'Jai Mata Di' farm house by a group of hired gangsters from Uttar Pradesh.     The trial court had convicted Sharma and five other accused in the case and had awarded life term to all. The HC, however, acquitted Sharma and co-accused Tejendir Verdi but upheld conviction and sentence of other four accused— Sharma's nephew Surinder Mishra, Hemchand, Santram and Ramesh alias Bobby.     While acquitting Sharma, the HC had said "Romesh Sharma and Kunjum were in love, and desired the company of each other. It does not establish that Sharma had got fed up with her". It had turned down Delhi police's contention that Sharma wanted to get rid of Kunjum as she knew about his alleged illegal activities.     "A grieving lover falling over the body of his mate and performing the rituals of a marriage can well be an expression of lasting love, and need not necessarily be a drama," the HC had said.     Sharma was in judicial custody at the time of the Kunjum's murder.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Raid-on-Bengaluru-centre-reveals-horror-tales/articleshow/48704718.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:50 IST 2015||BENGALURU: A State Human Rights Commission raid on a de-addiction centre in Jnanabharati Layout, near Kengeri, southwest Bengaluru, found 90 inmates living in pathetic conditions and subjected to inhuman treatment.     Thursday's raid followed the murder of an inmate of another de-addiction centre in Kothanur recently.     The SHRC raid on Sri Santhosh Social Service Society, also known as 4S Society, followed a tipoff. According to SHRC officials, the centre has been in existence for seven years at least, but the society couldn't produce documents of having obtained permission from the social welfare department. Commission officials said the centre had the permission from the DC and the DHO.     "Most inmates are between 20 and 35 years. They showed us signs of being physically abused. The centre has violated other norms too. Although it's supposed to have one nurse for every 15 patients and at least one in-house doctor and a psychiatrist, it didn't have any," said an SHRC spokesperson.     4 arrested for killing inmate:     Kothanur police arrested a de-addiction centre staffer and three inmates for allegedly beating to death a 28-year-old inmate. Dinesh was admitted to the centre by his family as he was an alcoholic. He was later found dead in a hospital. Family members noticed several bruises on his body. Narayana, an inmate-turned-staffer, gave some medicines to Dinesh, who later turned aggressive. Narayana sought the help of inmates Suresh, Subhan and Simon, to subdue Dinesh.     When Dinesh retaliated, the quartet overpowered him till he became unconscious. He died in hospital.||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/A-jolly-good-fellow-say-Khannas-friends/articleshow/48704630.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:50 IST 2015||Sanjeev Khanna, Indrani Mukerjea's second husband and suspected ally in Sheena Bora's killing, may be the most surprising element in this macabre drama, but his friends and associates in Kolkata refused to cast aspersions on "Sanju" just yet.     From being the biggest dart enthusiast at one of Kolkata's poshest clubs (the CC&FC) to having a finger in every pie, Sanjeev was everyone's "best mate" and go-to guy who friends described as: "A doer... someone who could get things done."     The morning after Khanna's arrest, TOI spoke to Ajay Rawla, the man who Khanna worked for as a consultant and whose house he was picked up from on Wednesday afternoon. "It wasn't like he was hiding like a desperate fugitive in my house. We had a meeting in the morning after which he drove me home and that's when news broke on television. We were sitting, watching, wondering what steps to take when the police arrived," explained Rawla.     Seven years his senior, Khanna's association with Rawla dates back to the time they went to Mayo College in Ajmer. Later, Khanna went on to become an aide for Rawla's pet projects. Besides running his own business in wireless communications, Khanna was there setting up chef Shaun Kenworthy and Rawla's restaurant 1658 or immersed in the heritage project of converting the Bawali Rajbari into a hotel. "He was getting all the construction work and labourers in place. He was very good in helping out with permissions through his connections with excise and contractors," remembers Kenworthy.     Khanna, who seldom missed his outings at the club, motor rallies and horse racing as a prominent face in the social circuit, was not the same man before he met Indrani, recounts Bull Banthia, a close friend. "Well-read and well-versed, Sanju had a great mechanical mind with a solution for everything," is how Bull chose to describe his "jolly good friend who loved meeting new people, hung out at the club but wasn't a social climber". "It was Indrani who emerged as this socialite and drove him to consciously build contacts with those higher up in the social rung after marriage," said the Kolkata-based entrepreneur. "That's the reason why I distanced myself from them until overnight she left Kolkata with their daughter and Sanju's wallet."     While Indrani never surfaces in conversations, his daughter Vidhie, who stayed with Indrani, is a fond subject with his friends. "He would miss his daughter but was resigned to fate, hoping that someday she would find him," said Rawla, adding, "It was Vidhie who called Sanjeev on Wednesday to give him the news."     No one seems to know about any recent interaction between Khanna and Indrani. G M Kapur, a known name in Kolkata who was Intach's state convener and happens to be Khanna's "mama", seemed disturbed with "all the theorizing" of Khanna's role in the crime. He declined to look back on Indrani and Khanna's relationship but added, "The last that there was any contact with Indrani or her family was when Vidhie visited Calcutta last year to celebrate the 75th birthday of her grandmother (Khanna's mother who lives with him)."     Khanna's Facebook posts on "karma" in the weeks and months following Sheena's alleged murder on April 24, 2012, make for interesting reading. On April 30, Khanna shared photo messages: "Say whatever, whenever the f*** you want to"; "Sometimes I get so weird, I even freak myself out".     On May 24, exactly a month after the alleged killing, he wrote: "You can never tell what people are thinking and feeling unless they tell you, and usually they lie. you ask them, 'Whats wrong?' and they say 'Nothing'. You accept this because it's easier than digging for the truth. People smile when they want to cry, they laugh when they want to scream and shout. They pretend like nothing is wrong because they don't want to face the truth. Things aren't always rainbows and butterflies, sometimes you gotta scream and cry your anger and sadness to the world, because you can only hold it in for so long before something in you snaps. so when you want to cry, cry. When you want to scream, scream. Don't hide behind fake smiles, it's ok to not be alright."     ||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Sheena-docu-Michail-add-to-mystery/articleshow/48701752.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:50 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Michail, Sheena's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered have raised a number of unanswered questions.    Two days after his mother, Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Michail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai Police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed that what he gave to police was enough to prove that Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora (who are actually parents of Indrani) as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. Some questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukherjea.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Michail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43 as mentioned in reports after her arrest.    Adding more to the suspense, Michail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Michail studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board examination, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that knew that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard that her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard that she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband who she introduced as Peter Mukherjea."    The two-member Mumbai Police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Michail, who on Wednesday, was the first one to reveal that Sheena was Indrani's daughter, twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Michail's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Michail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukherjae is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Michail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."  ||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Grandparents-are-Sheenas-mom-dad-on-birth-certificate/articleshow/48704559.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:50 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Mikhail, Sheena Bora's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered led to some unanswered questions on Thursday.    Two days after his mother Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Mikhail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed what he gave the police was enough to prove Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora, who are actually Indrani's parents, as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. However, many questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter. In many cases in India involving single mothers, grandparents are known to put in their names as father and mother.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukerjea, that is, 13 years after Sheena was born.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Mikhail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43.    Mikhail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Mikhail     studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board exam, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband, who she introduced as Peter Mukerjea."    The two-member Mumbai police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Mikhail twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Mikhail 's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time, he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Mikhail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukerjea is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Mikhail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Sheena-bowled-us-over-Rahuls-uncle/articleshow/48704552.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:50 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: Had things worked out as desired for Peter Mukherjea's first wife Shabnam and her family in Dehradun, Rahul Mukherjea and Sheena Bora would have been married for over three years now.     Shabnam's brother Shaleen Singh told TOI on Thursday that in 2011 Rahul brought Sheena to their sprawling home in Dehradun to seek approval from the family for their marriage.     The entire family-Shabnam, her younger brother Shaleen, father Anand Singh and mother Seema-were reportedly bowled over by Sheena's jovial nature and affection towards the elderly people. Impressed, the family gave its "unqualified and unanimous approval" for the wedding, which was supposed to take place within a few months, said Shaleen.     Stunned by the recent development, Shaleen said, "Sheena was among those rare persons who left a deep and lifelong impact on people. She was good-looking, a sweet person, clean of heart and good to talk to. None of us objected to the wedding."     Shaleen learnt of Sheena's murder through news channels. "It would have been great if she had become a part of the family. I don't know what was the cause and motive behind the heinous crime, but all those behind the killing of the jovial-natured girl should not be spared at any cost," he said.     A former model and tele-actor, 49-year-old Shaleen today owns the Sanskar International school in Jogiwala here. He recalled the last meeting with Shabnam and Rahul in April this year. "My father Anand Singh passed away in April. They had come to pay their respects but we did not interact much."     However, Shaleen said of late the interaction between him and his sister Shabnam was limited. Although Shabnam's farm Gul-e-Shabnam and Shaleen's residence Shankar Sadan are barely 200 metres away in Badripur, meetings between them were rare. While Shaleen and his mother stay on different floors of Shankar Sadan, Shabnam stays alone at her residence and is frequently visited by Rahul.     "There are matters in each family which we do not want to disclose. We are not against each other but do not interact much. She comes to meet our mother occasionally," said Shaleen, adding that Shabnam was passionate about painting and had a studio in her residence.     Shaleen denied having any details about the presence of Mumbai police in Dehradun. "Neither Doon police nor Mumbai police have contacted me over the issue."     Staff at Shabnam's residence said she was out-of-station but they were not aware of her whereabouts.||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Kilpauk-doctor-murder-Hubby-to-approach-court/articleshow/48704411.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:50 IST 2015||CHENNAI: It's been four days since police claimed to have solved the murder of S Sathya, 24, a PG medical student. However, her husband has put forth questions that police have failed to answer. Though investigating officers confirmed Sathya was not sexually assaulted before she was killed, they leaked to some section of media saying that they changed their stance on Wednesday and said there were indications of attempt to rape on the deceased.     Police personnel revealed the details soon after Sathya's husband Dr P Sesu, also employed at a primary health centre in Perambalur, expressed certain doubts.     He alleged the police hastily solved the case citing the state assembly, which is in motion. Sathya was found dead at her house in Kilpauk on August 20.     On August 23, police arrested Harintham Depnath, a BTech graduate, who lived at the second floor on the same apartment. Neither was there any mention about sexual assault or attempt on Sathya when the body was recovered from the house. The nor did the doctors. Police didn't tell this during the arrest of Depnath on August 23. "What forced the police to reveal about the sexual harassment attempt on my wife now?" asked Sesu.     "I want to live a peaceful life with my two sons - Tamil Nesan, 6, and Karmugilan, 4. The studies and the future of my children is important for me. I do respect the police personnel who spent sleepless nights to solve the murder, but there are questions that need to be answered," he said.     "I live in Perambalur with my children, but we speak through live video calls. I have told my sons that Sathya has gone to the God, as the Almighty likes her more. "Hereafter, we cannot speak or meet her. I don't know how far my children will admit it?" said Sesu. "I will approach the court seeking a fair probe into the murder of my wife. I want to find out the real cause behind her death. I want the real accused to get punished for his deed," said Sesu.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Woman-strangles-husbands-lover/articleshow/48704388.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:50 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A woman beat up and strangled her husband's partner, an assistant professor at a polytechnic in Choolaimedu, in their Thiruverkadu home on Thursday, police said. A court later remanded the accused, 32-year-old Shruti, in judicial custody.     Police said Sambasivam, a professor at Panimalar Engineering College in Poonamallee, used to bring Rajalakshmi, home frequently and introduced her to his wife Shruti as a colleague. He even dropped her home at night. The polytechnic where Rajalakshmi worked was part of the Panimalar group of educational institutions. Shruti initially believed the two were just colleagues until Sambasivam came home with Rajalakshmi on Tuesday and said the woman was moving in with them permanently.     On Wednesday morning, Sambasivam allegedly tied a 'mangalsutra' to Rajalakshmi in front of his wife, police said, based on Shruti's confession. A shocked Shruti picked up a fight with Sambasivam who asked her to maintain a cordial relationship and take care of Rajalakshmi. On Thursday morning, after he left for college a fight broke out between the two women.     Police said Rajalakshmi allegedly abused Sruthi and went into the bathroom. Sruthi followed her in and strangled her with the 'mangalsutra'. She then tried to make it appear that the woman had fainted in the bathroom. She took her in an autorickshaw to a nearby hospital where she was declared 'brought dead'. Doctors who noticed a few marks around her neck informed the Thiruverkadu police who registered a case of suspicious death under CrPC section 176.     The body was sent for postmortem to Kilpauk Medical College and Hospital.     After finding that the two women were at home at the time of the death, police interrogated Sruthi for more than an hour but she continued to maintain that Rajyalakshmi had died of injuries sustained when she fell down in the bathroom.     "She confessed to the murder when we told her that her fingerprints had been lifted from the scene of crime," said an investigating officer. "She said she had smashed the woman's head against the wall and later strangled her with the 'thali'." Police altered the case to murder and arrested Sruthi.     Initial inquiries revealed that Rajalakshmi had been married to a man named Rajasekhar for a while and they had separated. She then got married to Suresh, a relative who worked in a private firm, a few years ago and the couple moved into a house in Mogappair.     They allegedly had frequent quarrels as he tortured her and she left him too, police found.     Rajalakshmi then got a job with Panimalar Engineering College where she met Sambasivam. The two became friends and began seeing each other. Rajalakshmi recently moved to the polytechnic in Choolaimedu, police said.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/US-journalists-killer-annoyed-colleagues-Ex-boss/articleshow/48704167.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:50 IST 2015||ROANOKE, United States: The disgruntled former US television station employee who murdered two journalists had "annoyed" colleagues but showed no signs at work of any mental health issues, his former boss said Thursday.     Vester Lee Flanagan, 41, worked as a reporter for WDBJ in Roanoke, Virginia from March 2012 to February 2013, but was dismissed for poor performance and angry behavior, general manager Jeffrey Marks said.     On Wednesday, Flanagan shot and killed two of the CBS affiliate's journalists while they were conducting an on-air interview. He later fatally shot himself.     "We are still at a loss to figure out what happened to him in those two and a half years" since he was fired, Marks told a news conference flanked by dozens of staff, many of them holding hands.     "I don't think we identified that he had mental health issues. We certainly identified that he had performance issues."     Marks defended the station's hiring record and said its parent company had "a very elaborate program to screen employees."     Flanagan passed background checks and came with only positive references, Marks said.     It was only after he was hired, Marks said, that things went downhill.     "Vester's behavior annoyed a lot of people in the news station," Marks said.     Flanagan, who went by the on-screen name Bryce Williams, alleged in a manifesto faxed to ABC News that he was discriminated against as a gay, black journalist.     Marks said accusations in 2013 that he was treated unfairly were "immediately investigated and found to be without merit."     During his employment, Flanagan complied with demands that he seek medical help, but he was ultimately dismissed.     He was escorted from the building by police and made an ominous aside to the news director -- handing him a wooden cross and saying "'you'll need this'," Marks said.     As he left, he also made a "derogatory comment" to Adam Ward, the cameraman he shot dead on Wednesday.     Flanagan filed a complaint with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and a civil action suit, which were dismissed, he said.     "All of these investigations determined that no reasonable person would have taken any of the cited incidents as discrimination or harassment."     After killing Ward and reporter Alison Parker live on the air, Flanagan posted a video of the attack on social media.||ROANOKE, UNITED STATES
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/goa/4-accused-get-7-day-police-custody/articleshow/48474723.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:56 IST 2015||Vasco: The four accused in the murder of 35-year-old Birla resident, Vijay Shrivastava, at Velsao, were produced before the Vasco judicial magistrate first class on Thursday. They have been taken into seven days police custody for further investigation.    PSI Anand Shirodkar said that so far, the police have not yet ascertained the cause of the murder, though the main accused, Renuka Chavan, has repeatedly been saying that the deceased use to harass her to marry him.    The four accused, along with Shrivastava, had gone to Velsao beach. The group was trying to explain something to Srivastava, but as he was not convinced, the talk turned into an argument and later, assault. Shrivastava ultimately succumbed to his injuries.    He was murdered in Velsao on Monday and later transported to Consua church by rickshaw. The body was recovered by the police on Tuesday and the accused were nabbed on Wednesday.    The police first succeeded in arresting the rickshaw driver, Samashekarappa Yemmetti, 23, of Birla. Later, Chavan, 35, her friend Meenadevi Yadav, 35, and her husband Mulchandra, 52, were arrested. All are residents of Zuarinagar, Birla.    PSI Vivek Halarnkar and Shirodkar along with a Verna police team under the supervision of PI Shailesh Narvekar solved the case.    ||VASCO
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/gurgaon/600-school-children-inspired-to-pursue-science/articleshow/48475494.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:56 IST 2015||GURGAON: The department of science and technology organized a five-day science internship camp, INSPIRE (Innovation in Science Pursuit for Inspired Research), in the city. Over 600 students from different schools attended the camp, which gave them practical exposure to different fields of science such as forensic science, earth sciences, virology, biology and chemistry.     Kavita, a Class XI student of the Government Senior Secondary School, Wazirabad, said she found it interesting to learn about criminology and fingerprints and not engineering or medicine.     The camp introduced her to investigative sciences. "When I took up science, I didn't know that forensic science could be a career option. I am glad that I attended the internship. Solving a mystery seems very exciting. I will surely consider forensic science as a career option," she said.     Lopamudra, another student, was surprised to know about the application of forensic science. "We never get to learn such things in books. We got to know about circulation of blood in a dead body, which can help figure out the cause of death. In a dead body, the circulation of blood is towards gravity. So if a body is found hanging from a tree but the circulation is towards the back, it is a murder," she said.     "I never knew that hand sanitizer can be made at home with a very simple chemical formula. The camp has undoubtedly given us a lot of practical exposure," said Ashish, a student of a government school in Khandsa.     "We need to build the required human resource pool for strengthening the science and technology system and research and development baseMost students opt for professional courses asthey are lucrativeThe aim of such camps is to encourage students to take up career in research-based fieldsI think there should be planning at the highest level to support research-based career and make it well-paid for students," said S S Agarwal, director, Kamrah institute of information and technology, who held a session at the camp."Besides arranging such camps, the government should also introduce opportunities in research-based fields like forensic sciences," said Dr. Kanudeep Kaur, assistant professor in Khalsa College.||GURGAON
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/pune/Ill-timed-call-to-kin-spoiled-murder-suspects-escape-bid/articleshow/48474927.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:56 IST 2015||PUNE: A 24-year-old murder suspect succeeded in escaping from the Bund Garden police station, only to be caught within three hours because of a phone call he made to his brother-in-law.    Nitin Mohan Mhaske and his accomplices are facing trial for killing one Mahesh Budhram Verma on Tadiwala Road on June 5. The Bund Garden police had arrested three suspects, but Mhaske was on the run. On August 10, the cops arrested him following a tip-off. Mhaske was remanded in police custody till August 14. Since, then he was in the lock-up at the Bund Garden police station.    Around 7am on Thursday, Mhaske requested prison guard, Raghunath Mane, to take him to the wash room. Mane opened the lock-up gate to take Mhaske out. At the same time a sweeper came in for cleaning the lock-up room. "Mhaske pushed the sweeper and ran out," said Atmacharan Shinde, assistant commissioner of police (Cantonment division).    Mane alerted other policemen and began chasing Mhaske. The cops gave him a chase, but he ran towards the Pune railway station and disa peared, said Bund Garden police station senior PI Madan Bahaddarpure.    Bahaddarpure and his team rushed to Mhaske's house on Tadiwala Road. His mother and sister said they knew nothing about his escape. They checked the house but found nothing. While they were checking his mother's cellphone, it rang. "We asked her to turn the speaker on and talk to the caller. It was Mhaske's brother-in-law. He said he was calling from a place nearby. We got suspicious and nabbed him near the Tadiwala road police chowkey," Bahaddarpure said.    The police team searched Mhaske's brother-in-law's house in Nagpur chawl area of Yerawada. "Meanwhile, his phone rang. We asked him to turn the speaker on and talk. Our constable immediately recognized Mhaske's voice," Bahaddarpure said.    Mhaske told his brother-in-law to meet him near Hajarat Sadalbaba Dargah. "Out team rushed to the dargah. Mhaske saw the police and started running but we nabbed him after a brief chase," Bahaddarpure added.    Police have registered a separate case against Mhaske. "I have also sent a report about negligence of our policeman Raghunath Mane to our senior officers. The reply is awaited," he said.  ||PUNE
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/lucknow/BBA-student-found-murdered/articleshow/48474922.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:56 IST 2015||LUCKNOW: A BBA student was found murdered near his home in Nagram area of Gosainganj on Thursday morning. Pawan Kumar, 20, was a first year BBA student at the Dayal Institute in Gosainganj. He lived with his father Lalai, wife Suman and two sisters.    On Wednesday evening, Pawan left his home saying that he would return in a while. When he did not come back till late night, his father along with some neighbors went to search for him but in vain.    On Thursday morning, some locals found Pawan's body near a lake in the area and informed the police. Pawan's throat had been slit with a sharp object. Circle officer, Mohanlalganj, Rakesh Naik said Pawan's cellphone was missing though his bike was found near the lake. He added that probably an axe was used in the murder.    Though family said Pawan did not have enmity with anyone, police suspect a land dispute or an illicit relation behind his murder. "The case is under investigation. The real cause behind the murder would be ascertained once we trace the missing cellphone" said SP rural Manoj Kumar Sonker.    Police lodged a case of murder against unidentified persons and sent the body for postmortem.  ||LUCKNOW
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/pune/Gadhve-committed-first-crime-at-14/articleshow/48474917.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:56 IST 2015||PUNE: Autorickshaw driver Uttam Gadhve, who brutally killed IBM employee Mohan Shenoy at Pirangut ghat on August 2, had perpetrated a string of crimes, including thefts and burglaries, when he was just 14 years old.    In 2014, the police had issued a notice in his name, asking him to submit a good behaviour bond promising that he will not commit any crime. This came after he was nabbed for robbing a shopping mall's money van on Ahmednagar road. However, the police failed to keep a tab on Gadhve weren't aware if he was, indeed, maintaining good behaviour.    "Before he killed Mohan Shenoy, Gadhve had been involved in robbing the money van of a shopping mall where he would wait to ferry passengers in the autorickshaw. An amount of Rs 5 lakh was recovered from him and, along with his accomplices, he was arrested," said Sanjay Patil, senior police inspector, Yerawada police station. Interestingly, even though the money would be transported from the mall in an ambulance, Gadhve had received a tip off about it and his gang managed to stop the vehicle in Kalyaninagar, said Patil.    The officer added that after this robbery and in view of his criminal history the police had initiated preventive action against him and sent a proposal to the executive magistrate, under CrPC Section 110, stating that Gadhve be asked to submit a bond of two years. "The assistant commissioner of police, Khadki, had acted on our suggestion and a bond of two years promising good behaviour was taken from Gadhve and his guarantor," Patil explained.    Now that the bond has been violated, police officials will send a notice to the guarantor, who will have to deposit the bond amount of Rs 10,000 with the state government.    Gadhve, a resident of Yerawada, hails from Nevasa, Ahmednagar, although he was brought up in Pune. According to police records, he committed his first crime in 2006, when he was barely 14 years old.    The same year, as many as eight cases were registered against Gadhve for thefts and house break-ins. According to police records, since 2006, criminal cases, which included cognisable and non-cognisable offences, have been registered against Gadhve every year. The murder is his most serious crime.    "He was booked under Section 394 of the Indian Penal Code i.e. the IPC in 2014 after robbing the money van. He was arrested and was in jail for around three months, after which he was released on bail. It was then that we initiated the procedure to secure the good behaviour bond," said senior inspector Sanjay Patil.  ||PUNE
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/delhi/16-year-old-stabbed-to-death-at-home/articleshow/48474565.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:56 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: A 16-year-old boy was stabbed to death by unidentified men who allegedly barged into his house in outer Delhi's Sultanpuri area on Tuesday night.    Police said the boy was sleeping when he was attacked and had about 60-70 stab injuries on his back and chest, probably caused using an ice pick.    The boy, Pushpratan, was found lying in a pool of blood by his cousin, who claims that he did not hear any sounds from the room. The family members said that they belong to Uttar Pradesh's Etah and the boy was studying in Class X in a government school. He had to come to Delhi for his studies and was staying at the fourth floor of the house with his cousin and uncle.    Police said the room was ransacked and it appears that the men had a scuffle with the boy before he was killed.    A case of murder has been registered and police are looking for the accused. Police suspect personal enmity to be the cause of the murder.  ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/delhi/Cops-fail-to-nab-cabbies-attackers/articleshow/48474463.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:56 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: It has been nine days since a taxi driver lost his right hand after being attacked by a group of men with a machete and baseball bat, but police are yet to make any arrests. The incident took place at a CNG station in west Delhi's Kirti Nagar after the victim, Pawan Kumar (36), objected to the accused jumping the queue. Cops claim they have major leads in the case.    The taxi driver was initially taken to RML Hospital, but was shifted to Apollo two days later. His wife said that Pawan may have to undergo another surgery. He had to get a letter from Delhi government's health department for free treatment as an inpatient. The letter entitles him to get 80% rebate at Apollo.    Pawan supports a family of eight and was returning home from Jhandewalan after dropping a woman when he thought of refilling CNG in his Baleno. Around 10pm he noticed a silver Santro trying to get ahead in the queue. He asked the guard to stop the Scorpio driver, but he did not respond. He then asked the driver to follow the queue, but was slapped by him.    "I then called the PCR, but one of the men sitting in the Scorpio saw me dialling 100. He came and snatched my cellphone and wallet. When I resisted, the others came at me with the machete and baseball bat. I tried to hide in a corner near the toilet at the pump, but they hit me on the nose and head with the bat. Then two of them held me and a third man attacked me with the machete," Pawan said.    The man slashed him twice near the elbow and he fell unconscious bleeding. His brother, who was incidentally also refilling his vehicle, rushed to see why a crowd had gathered and was shocked to Pawan lying there. As he rushed to save him, he was also attacked from behind. The five accused then fled.    Employees at the pump said they were busy refilling vehicles, but after seeing the fight they also called the cops. "The staff can't leave the pump or the cash box immediately. They are trained not to do so as it might result in a bigger tragedy," said the pump manager.    Cops claim to have identified the accused with the help of traffic challans. The Scorpio (DL4CP7408) has been issued several challans in Kirti Nagar, Shadipur and Patel Nagar. "We are conducting raids to nab them," said DCP (west) Pushpendra Kumar.    A case of attempt to murder (section 307), voluntarily causing hurt (324) and common intention (34) has been registered at Kirti Nagar police station.  ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/lucknow/Deceased-RamJi-who-was-killed-by-robot-is-a-native-of-Bangarmau-in-Unnao/articleshow/48474226.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:56 IST 2015||UNNAO: Pal of gloom descended at the remote Nela Alam Shah-native village of Ramji Lal who was killed by a robot in SKH Metals, an auto ancillary company, at the Industrial Model Township (IMT) in Manesar in Gurgaon. The inconsolable family members of Ramji were still confused over the cause of death. They had been informed that their son was attacked by a robot while working in the factory and later succumbed to wounds. This death is claimed to be first ever death in India by a robot.     "I am tired answering questions of villagers how did my son Ramji die. I have been told that he was attacked by a machine but it is difficult to believe how can a machine kill a man", said Acchey Lal, father of deceased Ramji while talking to the mediapersons.     He further said, "If I aware of machines capable of snuffing out lives, I would have never allowed my son to work at such a unit."     For Ramdei, mother of Ramji the world has come to an end. "Ramji was my dutiful son. He used to send money home and take care of everyone. Never heard of any machine killing a human being. I just want to see my son. Don't know what to say more", said Ramdei in a chocked voice.     Equally shocked and saddened was Suneeta, wife of Ramji who on being asked about the cause of the death, could not explain and broke down. Ramji was just 24 years of age and had been married to Suneeta three years ago.     The aggrieved family informed that Ramji and his cousin Sandeep used to work in the same factory since past one and a half year.     Acchey Lal told mediapersons that it became tough to wait for the mortal remains as the company in which Ramji used to work did not reveal about his demise. "Sandeep told us over the phone that Ramji is no more and has been murdered by the machine. Since then we are in a state of shock and unable to believe. When some of our relatives reached Manesar to receive the body, it was not handed over to them. With more police force it could become possible to claim the body which was then sent to mortuary for postmortem", said Acchey Lal while levelling allegation against the company management.     The body of Ramji Lal is expected to reach his village in Bangarmau in Unnao on Friday after which the cremation would take place.     It might be noted that sharp welding sticks jutting out of the robotic arm of a machine pierced a worker killing him at a factory on Wednesday. The worker had apparently moved too close to the robot while adjusting a metal sheet that had come unstuck.||UNNAO
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/agra/Traders-Rally-Protesting-Lax-Policing-At-Raja-Ki-Mandi/articleshow/48473585.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:56 IST 2015||Agra: Bike-borne men shot two businessmen in the Raja Ki Mandi locality on Wednesday night. Sushil Jaiswani, one of the businessmen who took the shots and died, had witnessed the murder of his father Hemandas Jaswani, a trader leader in the area, last Diwali. His father too had been killed by men on a bike.    Hundreds of businessmen jammed MG Road in protest against the laxity of policemen soon after the shooting incident. The dead man's mother said her son had been threatened for several months. The matter had been reported to police, she said.    Police said Sushil Jaswani and Manoj Jaswani, sons of late Hemandas Jaswani, were returning home from their shops in Raja Ki Mandi around 10.20 pm on Wednesday. The duo was attacked by bike-borne miscreants who shot them on the chest, legs and neck and fled. It was pitch dark as there was no electricity supply in the area at the time, so those in the area could not see the faces of the attackers.    The injured men were rushed to SN Medical College. Doctors declared Sushil Jaswani brought dead; Manoj Jaswani is under treatment.     SP City RK Singh said police searched every nook and corner of the city for the three accused of murder, but no leads have yet been found. Policemen said raids are being conducted and people are being questioned to trace the attackers.     Relatives of the two said the family had been receiving death threats over the past two months. They said police had been informed of the threats. Requests were made for heightened security arrangements, but police would not heed these requests, members of the family said.    "Who will get my brother back now? We were getting threat calls, asking us to withdraw the case we had lodged after our father was murdered. The accused in that case is a man named Pranjal. Now I fear that if I lodge an FIR in this case, I too will be killed. The police are good for nothing, the whole force should be given bangles to wear," said Manoj Jaswani. Although the SP city requested him to lodge an FIR after Wednesday's murder, he has refused.     On Thursday, a large number of shopkeepers in Raja Ki Mandi demonstrated on MG Road, angry at the dismal law and order situation in the city. MG Road was jammed by protesters. Businessmenraised anti-police and anti-government slogans and threatened to stop all trading activities if the criminals were not quickly nabbed.    On Thursday, policemen lodged an FIR against three men identified as Pranjal, Chetan and Ketan - all three have been lodged in Agra district jail after the murder of Hemandas Jaswani. They are suspected to have hired contract killers for the Wednesday night murder.    Policemen said a case would also be lodged against Pranjal's mother and other kin, who are suspected to have aided in the murder.    Hemandas Jaswani, 49, president of Raja Mandi cloth market association and a cloth merchant, was shot dead by two motorcycle-borne miscreants on November 20, 2014 near the busy Saket Colony. The merchant died on the spot while the assailants fled. His relatives said wanted criminal Pranjal had attempted to kill the cloth merchant in 2009 too.     Although police claimed to have combed the city for the murderer, he was nowhere to be found. A week after murdering the senior Jaswani, Pankaj Diwakar arrived at the district court on a motorbike and surrendered in connection with some earlier crimes for which he was wanted. He has been lodged in jail since then.  ||AGRA
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/meerut/Traders-resistance-caused-his-murder-reveal-murderers/articleshow/48473520.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:56 IST 2015||MEERUT: Five days after the brutal murder of ghee trader in the city on Sunday, the police on Thursday produced the assailants in court. Crime branch had nabbed two of the robbers, Mohd Afzal and Naushad Ahmad on Wednesday, after a tip off.     Police recovered two countrymade weapons, a knife, live cartridges, Rs 45,500 and a car from the robbers. The accused who were residents of Lisari Gate of Meerut were regular customers of the trader.     "The mastermind of the entire episode was Mulla Quasim, another Lisari Gate resident. He formed a team of Afzal, Naushad, Gulfam, Shahnawaz and two others. Afzal and Gulfam posed as customers and reached Agrawal's godown. While they were negotiating the deal, other gang members barged in and tried to overpower Agarwal who fought fiercely to thwart their attempts," said SSP DC Dubey.     Soon after the attack on Agrawal, his wife reached the spot, she was tied up and the robbers went on to ransack the house.     As per the police sources, efforts are on to nab the other culprits. The police officials said during interrogation the robbers admitted that had Agarwal not resisted the way he did, he wouldn't have been dead.     ||MEERUT
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:56 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:56 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/SC-acquits-Romesh-Sharma-in-Budhiraja-murder-case/articleshow/48704930.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:56 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Thursday upheld the Delhi High Court order acquitting former Congress leader Romesh Sharma in the case relating to the killing of fashion designer Kunjum Budhiraja.     A bench of Justices Pinaki Chandra Ghose and R K Agrawal dismissed an appeal filed by the Delhi government challenging HC order.     The Delhi government contended that the HC had erred in acquitting Sharma but it was strongly opposed by his counsel and senior advocate Siddharth Luthra who submitted that his client was in love with Kunjum and there was no evidence to prove his involvement in the case.     Sharma, who was alleged to be a frontman of underworld don Dawood Ibrahim, was convicted by a trial court on February 15, 2008. Kunjum was killed on March 20, 1999 at Sharma's South Delhi-based 'Jai Mata Di' farm house by a group of hired gangsters from Uttar Pradesh.     The trial court had convicted Sharma and five other accused in the case and had awarded life term to all. The HC, however, acquitted Sharma and co-accused Tejendir Verdi but upheld conviction and sentence of other four accused— Sharma's nephew Surinder Mishra, Hemchand, Santram and Ramesh alias Bobby.     While acquitting Sharma, the HC had said "Romesh Sharma and Kunjum were in love, and desired the company of each other. It does not establish that Sharma had got fed up with her". It had turned down Delhi police's contention that Sharma wanted to get rid of Kunjum as she knew about his alleged illegal activities.     "A grieving lover falling over the body of his mate and performing the rituals of a marriage can well be an expression of lasting love, and need not necessarily be a drama," the HC had said.     Sharma was in judicial custody at the time of the Kunjum's murder.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Raid-on-Bengaluru-centre-reveals-horror-tales/articleshow/48704718.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:56 IST 2015||BENGALURU: A State Human Rights Commission raid on a de-addiction centre in Jnanabharati Layout, near Kengeri, southwest Bengaluru, found 90 inmates living in pathetic conditions and subjected to inhuman treatment.     Thursday's raid followed the murder of an inmate of another de-addiction centre in Kothanur recently.     The SHRC raid on Sri Santhosh Social Service Society, also known as 4S Society, followed a tipoff. According to SHRC officials, the centre has been in existence for seven years at least, but the society couldn't produce documents of having obtained permission from the social welfare department. Commission officials said the centre had the permission from the DC and the DHO.     "Most inmates are between 20 and 35 years. They showed us signs of being physically abused. The centre has violated other norms too. Although it's supposed to have one nurse for every 15 patients and at least one in-house doctor and a psychiatrist, it didn't have any," said an SHRC spokesperson.     4 arrested for killing inmate:     Kothanur police arrested a de-addiction centre staffer and three inmates for allegedly beating to death a 28-year-old inmate. Dinesh was admitted to the centre by his family as he was an alcoholic. He was later found dead in a hospital. Family members noticed several bruises on his body. Narayana, an inmate-turned-staffer, gave some medicines to Dinesh, who later turned aggressive. Narayana sought the help of inmates Suresh, Subhan and Simon, to subdue Dinesh.     When Dinesh retaliated, the quartet overpowered him till he became unconscious. He died in hospital.||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/A-jolly-good-fellow-say-Khannas-friends/articleshow/48704630.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:56 IST 2015||Sanjeev Khanna, Indrani Mukerjea's second husband and suspected ally in Sheena Bora's killing, may be the most surprising element in this macabre drama, but his friends and associates in Kolkata refused to cast aspersions on "Sanju" just yet.     From being the biggest dart enthusiast at one of Kolkata's poshest clubs (the CC&FC) to having a finger in every pie, Sanjeev was everyone's "best mate" and go-to guy who friends described as: "A doer... someone who could get things done."     The morning after Khanna's arrest, TOI spoke to Ajay Rawla, the man who Khanna worked for as a consultant and whose house he was picked up from on Wednesday afternoon. "It wasn't like he was hiding like a desperate fugitive in my house. We had a meeting in the morning after which he drove me home and that's when news broke on television. We were sitting, watching, wondering what steps to take when the police arrived," explained Rawla.     Seven years his senior, Khanna's association with Rawla dates back to the time they went to Mayo College in Ajmer. Later, Khanna went on to become an aide for Rawla's pet projects. Besides running his own business in wireless communications, Khanna was there setting up chef Shaun Kenworthy and Rawla's restaurant 1658 or immersed in the heritage project of converting the Bawali Rajbari into a hotel. "He was getting all the construction work and labourers in place. He was very good in helping out with permissions through his connections with excise and contractors," remembers Kenworthy.     Khanna, who seldom missed his outings at the club, motor rallies and horse racing as a prominent face in the social circuit, was not the same man before he met Indrani, recounts Bull Banthia, a close friend. "Well-read and well-versed, Sanju had a great mechanical mind with a solution for everything," is how Bull chose to describe his "jolly good friend who loved meeting new people, hung out at the club but wasn't a social climber". "It was Indrani who emerged as this socialite and drove him to consciously build contacts with those higher up in the social rung after marriage," said the Kolkata-based entrepreneur. "That's the reason why I distanced myself from them until overnight she left Kolkata with their daughter and Sanju's wallet."     While Indrani never surfaces in conversations, his daughter Vidhie, who stayed with Indrani, is a fond subject with his friends. "He would miss his daughter but was resigned to fate, hoping that someday she would find him," said Rawla, adding, "It was Vidhie who called Sanjeev on Wednesday to give him the news."     No one seems to know about any recent interaction between Khanna and Indrani. G M Kapur, a known name in Kolkata who was Intach's state convener and happens to be Khanna's "mama", seemed disturbed with "all the theorizing" of Khanna's role in the crime. He declined to look back on Indrani and Khanna's relationship but added, "The last that there was any contact with Indrani or her family was when Vidhie visited Calcutta last year to celebrate the 75th birthday of her grandmother (Khanna's mother who lives with him)."     Khanna's Facebook posts on "karma" in the weeks and months following Sheena's alleged murder on April 24, 2012, make for interesting reading. On April 30, Khanna shared photo messages: "Say whatever, whenever the f*** you want to"; "Sometimes I get so weird, I even freak myself out".     On May 24, exactly a month after the alleged killing, he wrote: "You can never tell what people are thinking and feeling unless they tell you, and usually they lie. you ask them, 'Whats wrong?' and they say 'Nothing'. You accept this because it's easier than digging for the truth. People smile when they want to cry, they laugh when they want to scream and shout. They pretend like nothing is wrong because they don't want to face the truth. Things aren't always rainbows and butterflies, sometimes you gotta scream and cry your anger and sadness to the world, because you can only hold it in for so long before something in you snaps. so when you want to cry, cry. When you want to scream, scream. Don't hide behind fake smiles, it's ok to not be alright."     ||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Sheena-docu-Michail-add-to-mystery/articleshow/48701752.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:56 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Michail, Sheena's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered have raised a number of unanswered questions.    Two days after his mother, Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Michail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai Police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed that what he gave to police was enough to prove that Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora (who are actually parents of Indrani) as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. Some questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukherjea.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Michail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43 as mentioned in reports after her arrest.    Adding more to the suspense, Michail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Michail studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board examination, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that knew that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard that her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard that she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband who she introduced as Peter Mukherjea."    The two-member Mumbai Police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Michail, who on Wednesday, was the first one to reveal that Sheena was Indrani's daughter, twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Michail's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Michail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukherjae is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Michail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."  ||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Grandparents-are-Sheenas-mom-dad-on-birth-certificate/articleshow/48704559.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:56 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Mikhail, Sheena Bora's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered led to some unanswered questions on Thursday.    Two days after his mother Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Mikhail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed what he gave the police was enough to prove Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora, who are actually Indrani's parents, as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. However, many questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter. In many cases in India involving single mothers, grandparents are known to put in their names as father and mother.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukerjea, that is, 13 years after Sheena was born.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Mikhail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43.    Mikhail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Mikhail     studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board exam, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband, who she introduced as Peter Mukerjea."    The two-member Mumbai police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Mikhail twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Mikhail 's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time, he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Mikhail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukerjea is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Mikhail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Sheena-bowled-us-over-Rahuls-uncle/articleshow/48704552.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:56 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: Had things worked out as desired for Peter Mukherjea's first wife Shabnam and her family in Dehradun, Rahul Mukherjea and Sheena Bora would have been married for over three years now.     Shabnam's brother Shaleen Singh told TOI on Thursday that in 2011 Rahul brought Sheena to their sprawling home in Dehradun to seek approval from the family for their marriage.     The entire family-Shabnam, her younger brother Shaleen, father Anand Singh and mother Seema-were reportedly bowled over by Sheena's jovial nature and affection towards the elderly people. Impressed, the family gave its "unqualified and unanimous approval" for the wedding, which was supposed to take place within a few months, said Shaleen.     Stunned by the recent development, Shaleen said, "Sheena was among those rare persons who left a deep and lifelong impact on people. She was good-looking, a sweet person, clean of heart and good to talk to. None of us objected to the wedding."     Shaleen learnt of Sheena's murder through news channels. "It would have been great if she had become a part of the family. I don't know what was the cause and motive behind the heinous crime, but all those behind the killing of the jovial-natured girl should not be spared at any cost," he said.     A former model and tele-actor, 49-year-old Shaleen today owns the Sanskar International school in Jogiwala here. He recalled the last meeting with Shabnam and Rahul in April this year. "My father Anand Singh passed away in April. They had come to pay their respects but we did not interact much."     However, Shaleen said of late the interaction between him and his sister Shabnam was limited. Although Shabnam's farm Gul-e-Shabnam and Shaleen's residence Shankar Sadan are barely 200 metres away in Badripur, meetings between them were rare. While Shaleen and his mother stay on different floors of Shankar Sadan, Shabnam stays alone at her residence and is frequently visited by Rahul.     "There are matters in each family which we do not want to disclose. We are not against each other but do not interact much. She comes to meet our mother occasionally," said Shaleen, adding that Shabnam was passionate about painting and had a studio in her residence.     Shaleen denied having any details about the presence of Mumbai police in Dehradun. "Neither Doon police nor Mumbai police have contacted me over the issue."     Staff at Shabnam's residence said she was out-of-station but they were not aware of her whereabouts.||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Kilpauk-doctor-murder-Hubby-to-approach-court/articleshow/48704411.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:56 IST 2015||CHENNAI: It's been four days since police claimed to have solved the murder of S Sathya, 24, a PG medical student. However, her husband has put forth questions that police have failed to answer. Though investigating officers confirmed Sathya was not sexually assaulted before she was killed, they leaked to some section of media saying that they changed their stance on Wednesday and said there were indications of attempt to rape on the deceased.     Police personnel revealed the details soon after Sathya's husband Dr P Sesu, also employed at a primary health centre in Perambalur, expressed certain doubts.     He alleged the police hastily solved the case citing the state assembly, which is in motion. Sathya was found dead at her house in Kilpauk on August 20.     On August 23, police arrested Harintham Depnath, a BTech graduate, who lived at the second floor on the same apartment. Neither was there any mention about sexual assault or attempt on Sathya when the body was recovered from the house. The nor did the doctors. Police didn't tell this during the arrest of Depnath on August 23. "What forced the police to reveal about the sexual harassment attempt on my wife now?" asked Sesu.     "I want to live a peaceful life with my two sons - Tamil Nesan, 6, and Karmugilan, 4. The studies and the future of my children is important for me. I do respect the police personnel who spent sleepless nights to solve the murder, but there are questions that need to be answered," he said.     "I live in Perambalur with my children, but we speak through live video calls. I have told my sons that Sathya has gone to the God, as the Almighty likes her more. "Hereafter, we cannot speak or meet her. I don't know how far my children will admit it?" said Sesu. "I will approach the court seeking a fair probe into the murder of my wife. I want to find out the real cause behind her death. I want the real accused to get punished for his deed," said Sesu.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Woman-strangles-husbands-lover/articleshow/48704388.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:56 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A woman beat up and strangled her husband's partner, an assistant professor at a polytechnic in Choolaimedu, in their Thiruverkadu home on Thursday, police said. A court later remanded the accused, 32-year-old Shruti, in judicial custody.     Police said Sambasivam, a professor at Panimalar Engineering College in Poonamallee, used to bring Rajalakshmi, home frequently and introduced her to his wife Shruti as a colleague. He even dropped her home at night. The polytechnic where Rajalakshmi worked was part of the Panimalar group of educational institutions. Shruti initially believed the two were just colleagues until Sambasivam came home with Rajalakshmi on Tuesday and said the woman was moving in with them permanently.     On Wednesday morning, Sambasivam allegedly tied a 'mangalsutra' to Rajalakshmi in front of his wife, police said, based on Shruti's confession. A shocked Shruti picked up a fight with Sambasivam who asked her to maintain a cordial relationship and take care of Rajalakshmi. On Thursday morning, after he left for college a fight broke out between the two women.     Police said Rajalakshmi allegedly abused Sruthi and went into the bathroom. Sruthi followed her in and strangled her with the 'mangalsutra'. She then tried to make it appear that the woman had fainted in the bathroom. She took her in an autorickshaw to a nearby hospital where she was declared 'brought dead'. Doctors who noticed a few marks around her neck informed the Thiruverkadu police who registered a case of suspicious death under CrPC section 176.     The body was sent for postmortem to Kilpauk Medical College and Hospital.     After finding that the two women were at home at the time of the death, police interrogated Sruthi for more than an hour but she continued to maintain that Rajyalakshmi had died of injuries sustained when she fell down in the bathroom.     "She confessed to the murder when we told her that her fingerprints had been lifted from the scene of crime," said an investigating officer. "She said she had smashed the woman's head against the wall and later strangled her with the 'thali'." Police altered the case to murder and arrested Sruthi.     Initial inquiries revealed that Rajalakshmi had been married to a man named Rajasekhar for a while and they had separated. She then got married to Suresh, a relative who worked in a private firm, a few years ago and the couple moved into a house in Mogappair.     They allegedly had frequent quarrels as he tortured her and she left him too, police found.     Rajalakshmi then got a job with Panimalar Engineering College where she met Sambasivam. The two became friends and began seeing each other. Rajalakshmi recently moved to the polytechnic in Choolaimedu, police said.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/US-journalists-killer-annoyed-colleagues-Ex-boss/articleshow/48704167.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:56 IST 2015||ROANOKE, United States: The disgruntled former US television station employee who murdered two journalists had "annoyed" colleagues but showed no signs at work of any mental health issues, his former boss said Thursday.     Vester Lee Flanagan, 41, worked as a reporter for WDBJ in Roanoke, Virginia from March 2012 to February 2013, but was dismissed for poor performance and angry behavior, general manager Jeffrey Marks said.     On Wednesday, Flanagan shot and killed two of the CBS affiliate's journalists while they were conducting an on-air interview. He later fatally shot himself.     "We are still at a loss to figure out what happened to him in those two and a half years" since he was fired, Marks told a news conference flanked by dozens of staff, many of them holding hands.     "I don't think we identified that he had mental health issues. We certainly identified that he had performance issues."     Marks defended the station's hiring record and said its parent company had "a very elaborate program to screen employees."     Flanagan passed background checks and came with only positive references, Marks said.     It was only after he was hired, Marks said, that things went downhill.     "Vester's behavior annoyed a lot of people in the news station," Marks said.     Flanagan, who went by the on-screen name Bryce Williams, alleged in a manifesto faxed to ABC News that he was discriminated against as a gay, black journalist.     Marks said accusations in 2013 that he was treated unfairly were "immediately investigated and found to be without merit."     During his employment, Flanagan complied with demands that he seek medical help, but he was ultimately dismissed.     He was escorted from the building by police and made an ominous aside to the news director -- handing him a wooden cross and saying "'you'll need this'," Marks said.     As he left, he also made a "derogatory comment" to Adam Ward, the cameraman he shot dead on Wednesday.     Flanagan filed a complaint with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and a civil action suit, which were dismissed, he said.     "All of these investigations determined that no reasonable person would have taken any of the cited incidents as discrimination or harassment."     After killing Ward and reporter Alison Parker live on the air, Flanagan posted a video of the attack on social media.||ROANOKE, UNITED STATES
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:56 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/SC-acquits-Romesh-Sharma-in-Budhiraja-murder-case/articleshow/48704930.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:56 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Thursday upheld the Delhi High Court order acquitting former Congress leader Romesh Sharma in the case relating to the killing of fashion designer Kunjum Budhiraja.     A bench of Justices Pinaki Chandra Ghose and R K Agrawal dismissed an appeal filed by the Delhi government challenging HC order.     The Delhi government contended that the HC had erred in acquitting Sharma but it was strongly opposed by his counsel and senior advocate Siddharth Luthra who submitted that his client was in love with Kunjum and there was no evidence to prove his involvement in the case.     Sharma, who was alleged to be a frontman of underworld don Dawood Ibrahim, was convicted by a trial court on February 15, 2008. Kunjum was killed on March 20, 1999 at Sharma's South Delhi-based 'Jai Mata Di' farm house by a group of hired gangsters from Uttar Pradesh.     The trial court had convicted Sharma and five other accused in the case and had awarded life term to all. The HC, however, acquitted Sharma and co-accused Tejendir Verdi but upheld conviction and sentence of other four accused— Sharma's nephew Surinder Mishra, Hemchand, Santram and Ramesh alias Bobby.     While acquitting Sharma, the HC had said "Romesh Sharma and Kunjum were in love, and desired the company of each other. It does not establish that Sharma had got fed up with her". It had turned down Delhi police's contention that Sharma wanted to get rid of Kunjum as she knew about his alleged illegal activities.     "A grieving lover falling over the body of his mate and performing the rituals of a marriage can well be an expression of lasting love, and need not necessarily be a drama," the HC had said.     Sharma was in judicial custody at the time of the Kunjum's murder.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Raid-on-Bengaluru-centre-reveals-horror-tales/articleshow/48704718.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:56 IST 2015||BENGALURU: A State Human Rights Commission raid on a de-addiction centre in Jnanabharati Layout, near Kengeri, southwest Bengaluru, found 90 inmates living in pathetic conditions and subjected to inhuman treatment.     Thursday's raid followed the murder of an inmate of another de-addiction centre in Kothanur recently.     The SHRC raid on Sri Santhosh Social Service Society, also known as 4S Society, followed a tipoff. According to SHRC officials, the centre has been in existence for seven years at least, but the society couldn't produce documents of having obtained permission from the social welfare department. Commission officials said the centre had the permission from the DC and the DHO.     "Most inmates are between 20 and 35 years. They showed us signs of being physically abused. The centre has violated other norms too. Although it's supposed to have one nurse for every 15 patients and at least one in-house doctor and a psychiatrist, it didn't have any," said an SHRC spokesperson.     4 arrested for killing inmate:     Kothanur police arrested a de-addiction centre staffer and three inmates for allegedly beating to death a 28-year-old inmate. Dinesh was admitted to the centre by his family as he was an alcoholic. He was later found dead in a hospital. Family members noticed several bruises on his body. Narayana, an inmate-turned-staffer, gave some medicines to Dinesh, who later turned aggressive. Narayana sought the help of inmates Suresh, Subhan and Simon, to subdue Dinesh.     When Dinesh retaliated, the quartet overpowered him till he became unconscious. He died in hospital.||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/A-jolly-good-fellow-say-Khannas-friends/articleshow/48704630.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:56 IST 2015||Sanjeev Khanna, Indrani Mukerjea's second husband and suspected ally in Sheena Bora's killing, may be the most surprising element in this macabre drama, but his friends and associates in Kolkata refused to cast aspersions on "Sanju" just yet.     From being the biggest dart enthusiast at one of Kolkata's poshest clubs (the CC&FC) to having a finger in every pie, Sanjeev was everyone's "best mate" and go-to guy who friends described as: "A doer... someone who could get things done."     The morning after Khanna's arrest, TOI spoke to Ajay Rawla, the man who Khanna worked for as a consultant and whose house he was picked up from on Wednesday afternoon. "It wasn't like he was hiding like a desperate fugitive in my house. We had a meeting in the morning after which he drove me home and that's when news broke on television. We were sitting, watching, wondering what steps to take when the police arrived," explained Rawla.     Seven years his senior, Khanna's association with Rawla dates back to the time they went to Mayo College in Ajmer. Later, Khanna went on to become an aide for Rawla's pet projects. Besides running his own business in wireless communications, Khanna was there setting up chef Shaun Kenworthy and Rawla's restaurant 1658 or immersed in the heritage project of converting the Bawali Rajbari into a hotel. "He was getting all the construction work and labourers in place. He was very good in helping out with permissions through his connections with excise and contractors," remembers Kenworthy.     Khanna, who seldom missed his outings at the club, motor rallies and horse racing as a prominent face in the social circuit, was not the same man before he met Indrani, recounts Bull Banthia, a close friend. "Well-read and well-versed, Sanju had a great mechanical mind with a solution for everything," is how Bull chose to describe his "jolly good friend who loved meeting new people, hung out at the club but wasn't a social climber". "It was Indrani who emerged as this socialite and drove him to consciously build contacts with those higher up in the social rung after marriage," said the Kolkata-based entrepreneur. "That's the reason why I distanced myself from them until overnight she left Kolkata with their daughter and Sanju's wallet."     While Indrani never surfaces in conversations, his daughter Vidhie, who stayed with Indrani, is a fond subject with his friends. "He would miss his daughter but was resigned to fate, hoping that someday she would find him," said Rawla, adding, "It was Vidhie who called Sanjeev on Wednesday to give him the news."     No one seems to know about any recent interaction between Khanna and Indrani. G M Kapur, a known name in Kolkata who was Intach's state convener and happens to be Khanna's "mama", seemed disturbed with "all the theorizing" of Khanna's role in the crime. He declined to look back on Indrani and Khanna's relationship but added, "The last that there was any contact with Indrani or her family was when Vidhie visited Calcutta last year to celebrate the 75th birthday of her grandmother (Khanna's mother who lives with him)."     Khanna's Facebook posts on "karma" in the weeks and months following Sheena's alleged murder on April 24, 2012, make for interesting reading. On April 30, Khanna shared photo messages: "Say whatever, whenever the f*** you want to"; "Sometimes I get so weird, I even freak myself out".     On May 24, exactly a month after the alleged killing, he wrote: "You can never tell what people are thinking and feeling unless they tell you, and usually they lie. you ask them, 'Whats wrong?' and they say 'Nothing'. You accept this because it's easier than digging for the truth. People smile when they want to cry, they laugh when they want to scream and shout. They pretend like nothing is wrong because they don't want to face the truth. Things aren't always rainbows and butterflies, sometimes you gotta scream and cry your anger and sadness to the world, because you can only hold it in for so long before something in you snaps. so when you want to cry, cry. When you want to scream, scream. Don't hide behind fake smiles, it's ok to not be alright."     ||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Sheena-docu-Michail-add-to-mystery/articleshow/48701752.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:56 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Michail, Sheena's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered have raised a number of unanswered questions.    Two days after his mother, Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Michail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai Police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed that what he gave to police was enough to prove that Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora (who are actually parents of Indrani) as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. Some questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukherjea.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Michail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43 as mentioned in reports after her arrest.    Adding more to the suspense, Michail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Michail studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board examination, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that knew that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard that her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard that she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband who she introduced as Peter Mukherjea."    The two-member Mumbai Police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Michail, who on Wednesday, was the first one to reveal that Sheena was Indrani's daughter, twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Michail's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Michail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukherjae is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Michail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."  ||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Grandparents-are-Sheenas-mom-dad-on-birth-certificate/articleshow/48704559.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:56 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Mikhail, Sheena Bora's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered led to some unanswered questions on Thursday.    Two days after his mother Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Mikhail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed what he gave the police was enough to prove Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora, who are actually Indrani's parents, as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. However, many questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter. In many cases in India involving single mothers, grandparents are known to put in their names as father and mother.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukerjea, that is, 13 years after Sheena was born.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Mikhail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43.    Mikhail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Mikhail     studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board exam, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband, who she introduced as Peter Mukerjea."    The two-member Mumbai police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Mikhail twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Mikhail 's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time, he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Mikhail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukerjea is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Mikhail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Sheena-bowled-us-over-Rahuls-uncle/articleshow/48704552.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:56 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: Had things worked out as desired for Peter Mukherjea's first wife Shabnam and her family in Dehradun, Rahul Mukherjea and Sheena Bora would have been married for over three years now.     Shabnam's brother Shaleen Singh told TOI on Thursday that in 2011 Rahul brought Sheena to their sprawling home in Dehradun to seek approval from the family for their marriage.     The entire family-Shabnam, her younger brother Shaleen, father Anand Singh and mother Seema-were reportedly bowled over by Sheena's jovial nature and affection towards the elderly people. Impressed, the family gave its "unqualified and unanimous approval" for the wedding, which was supposed to take place within a few months, said Shaleen.     Stunned by the recent development, Shaleen said, "Sheena was among those rare persons who left a deep and lifelong impact on people. She was good-looking, a sweet person, clean of heart and good to talk to. None of us objected to the wedding."     Shaleen learnt of Sheena's murder through news channels. "It would have been great if she had become a part of the family. I don't know what was the cause and motive behind the heinous crime, but all those behind the killing of the jovial-natured girl should not be spared at any cost," he said.     A former model and tele-actor, 49-year-old Shaleen today owns the Sanskar International school in Jogiwala here. He recalled the last meeting with Shabnam and Rahul in April this year. "My father Anand Singh passed away in April. They had come to pay their respects but we did not interact much."     However, Shaleen said of late the interaction between him and his sister Shabnam was limited. Although Shabnam's farm Gul-e-Shabnam and Shaleen's residence Shankar Sadan are barely 200 metres away in Badripur, meetings between them were rare. While Shaleen and his mother stay on different floors of Shankar Sadan, Shabnam stays alone at her residence and is frequently visited by Rahul.     "There are matters in each family which we do not want to disclose. We are not against each other but do not interact much. She comes to meet our mother occasionally," said Shaleen, adding that Shabnam was passionate about painting and had a studio in her residence.     Shaleen denied having any details about the presence of Mumbai police in Dehradun. "Neither Doon police nor Mumbai police have contacted me over the issue."     Staff at Shabnam's residence said she was out-of-station but they were not aware of her whereabouts.||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Kilpauk-doctor-murder-Hubby-to-approach-court/articleshow/48704411.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:56 IST 2015||CHENNAI: It's been four days since police claimed to have solved the murder of S Sathya, 24, a PG medical student. However, her husband has put forth questions that police have failed to answer. Though investigating officers confirmed Sathya was not sexually assaulted before she was killed, they leaked to some section of media saying that they changed their stance on Wednesday and said there were indications of attempt to rape on the deceased.     Police personnel revealed the details soon after Sathya's husband Dr P Sesu, also employed at a primary health centre in Perambalur, expressed certain doubts.     He alleged the police hastily solved the case citing the state assembly, which is in motion. Sathya was found dead at her house in Kilpauk on August 20.     On August 23, police arrested Harintham Depnath, a BTech graduate, who lived at the second floor on the same apartment. Neither was there any mention about sexual assault or attempt on Sathya when the body was recovered from the house. The nor did the doctors. Police didn't tell this during the arrest of Depnath on August 23. "What forced the police to reveal about the sexual harassment attempt on my wife now?" asked Sesu.     "I want to live a peaceful life with my two sons - Tamil Nesan, 6, and Karmugilan, 4. The studies and the future of my children is important for me. I do respect the police personnel who spent sleepless nights to solve the murder, but there are questions that need to be answered," he said.     "I live in Perambalur with my children, but we speak through live video calls. I have told my sons that Sathya has gone to the God, as the Almighty likes her more. "Hereafter, we cannot speak or meet her. I don't know how far my children will admit it?" said Sesu. "I will approach the court seeking a fair probe into the murder of my wife. I want to find out the real cause behind her death. I want the real accused to get punished for his deed," said Sesu.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Woman-strangles-husbands-lover/articleshow/48704388.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:56 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A woman beat up and strangled her husband's partner, an assistant professor at a polytechnic in Choolaimedu, in their Thiruverkadu home on Thursday, police said. A court later remanded the accused, 32-year-old Shruti, in judicial custody.     Police said Sambasivam, a professor at Panimalar Engineering College in Poonamallee, used to bring Rajalakshmi, home frequently and introduced her to his wife Shruti as a colleague. He even dropped her home at night. The polytechnic where Rajalakshmi worked was part of the Panimalar group of educational institutions. Shruti initially believed the two were just colleagues until Sambasivam came home with Rajalakshmi on Tuesday and said the woman was moving in with them permanently.     On Wednesday morning, Sambasivam allegedly tied a 'mangalsutra' to Rajalakshmi in front of his wife, police said, based on Shruti's confession. A shocked Shruti picked up a fight with Sambasivam who asked her to maintain a cordial relationship and take care of Rajalakshmi. On Thursday morning, after he left for college a fight broke out between the two women.     Police said Rajalakshmi allegedly abused Sruthi and went into the bathroom. Sruthi followed her in and strangled her with the 'mangalsutra'. She then tried to make it appear that the woman had fainted in the bathroom. She took her in an autorickshaw to a nearby hospital where she was declared 'brought dead'. Doctors who noticed a few marks around her neck informed the Thiruverkadu police who registered a case of suspicious death under CrPC section 176.     The body was sent for postmortem to Kilpauk Medical College and Hospital.     After finding that the two women were at home at the time of the death, police interrogated Sruthi for more than an hour but she continued to maintain that Rajyalakshmi had died of injuries sustained when she fell down in the bathroom.     "She confessed to the murder when we told her that her fingerprints had been lifted from the scene of crime," said an investigating officer. "She said she had smashed the woman's head against the wall and later strangled her with the 'thali'." Police altered the case to murder and arrested Sruthi.     Initial inquiries revealed that Rajalakshmi had been married to a man named Rajasekhar for a while and they had separated. She then got married to Suresh, a relative who worked in a private firm, a few years ago and the couple moved into a house in Mogappair.     They allegedly had frequent quarrels as he tortured her and she left him too, police found.     Rajalakshmi then got a job with Panimalar Engineering College where she met Sambasivam. The two became friends and began seeing each other. Rajalakshmi recently moved to the polytechnic in Choolaimedu, police said.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/US-journalists-killer-annoyed-colleagues-Ex-boss/articleshow/48704167.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:19:56 IST 2015||ROANOKE, United States: The disgruntled former US television station employee who murdered two journalists had "annoyed" colleagues but showed no signs at work of any mental health issues, his former boss said Thursday.     Vester Lee Flanagan, 41, worked as a reporter for WDBJ in Roanoke, Virginia from March 2012 to February 2013, but was dismissed for poor performance and angry behavior, general manager Jeffrey Marks said.     On Wednesday, Flanagan shot and killed two of the CBS affiliate's journalists while they were conducting an on-air interview. He later fatally shot himself.     "We are still at a loss to figure out what happened to him in those two and a half years" since he was fired, Marks told a news conference flanked by dozens of staff, many of them holding hands.     "I don't think we identified that he had mental health issues. We certainly identified that he had performance issues."     Marks defended the station's hiring record and said its parent company had "a very elaborate program to screen employees."     Flanagan passed background checks and came with only positive references, Marks said.     It was only after he was hired, Marks said, that things went downhill.     "Vester's behavior annoyed a lot of people in the news station," Marks said.     Flanagan, who went by the on-screen name Bryce Williams, alleged in a manifesto faxed to ABC News that he was discriminated against as a gay, black journalist.     Marks said accusations in 2013 that he was treated unfairly were "immediately investigated and found to be without merit."     During his employment, Flanagan complied with demands that he seek medical help, but he was ultimately dismissed.     He was escorted from the building by police and made an ominous aside to the news director -- handing him a wooden cross and saying "'you'll need this'," Marks said.     As he left, he also made a "derogatory comment" to Adam Ward, the cameraman he shot dead on Wednesday.     Flanagan filed a complaint with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and a civil action suit, which were dismissed, he said.     "All of these investigations determined that no reasonable person would have taken any of the cited incidents as discrimination or harassment."     After killing Ward and reporter Alison Parker live on the air, Flanagan posted a video of the attack on social media.||ROANOKE, UNITED STATES
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Missing-man-found-dead-near-Chennai/articleshow/48470440.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:01 IST 2015||CHENNAI: The partially burnt body of a 25-year-old man which had cut injuries was found at Maraimalai Nagar on the outskirts of Chennai on Thursday morning.     Maraimalai Nagar inspector J Elangovan said the body was identified as that of Sridhar Murugan, a quality control manager with a private company.     Elangovan's wife Maheshwari, who lodged a missing complaint on Wednesday, identified the body.     She told the police that Sridhar, who hailed from Dindigul, left home for work on Wednesday and had not returned till late in the night. Maheshwari tried contact him on his cellphone, but his it was switched off.     Shen then lodged a missing complaint with the Maraimalai Nagar police.     Passersby who noticed the body behind a temple at Rail Nagar on Thursday morning alerted the police.     Police said rivalry could be the reason for the murder.     Maheshwari told the police that her husband did not have any bad habits and did not socialise much with his friends. The couple had two children, police said.     Three special teams were formed to investigate the case.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Madras-HC-refuses-to-slap-murder-charges-on-former-Tamil-Nadu-minister/articleshow/48469763.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:01 IST 2015||CHENNAI: The Madras high court has declined to order inclusion of the name of former DMK minister for fisheries K P P Samy as prime suspect in the 'disappearance' and 'murder' of a fisherman who had been raising uncomfortable questions regarding the manner crores of rupees of tsunami funds were being spent.     Justice B Rajendran rejected a criminal revision petition filed by Thiruvottriyur inspector of police, who had challenged the legality of an order passed by IV additional district and sessions judge of Ponneri on June 23.     The matter relates to the sorry tale of Valli who said she was witness to several men dragging her husband, Velu, towards the sea. She alleged that the men were associates of the then minister since her husband had been lodging complaints against Samy for the manner tsunami relief funds were being handled. Velu has not returned home since then, and it is presumed that he is no more.     The incident took place on September 25, 2006, and it was only five years later that she could register a complaint with police. Police registered a man missing case in July 2011. However, murder charges were not included, and the minister's name was not mentioned.     The present revision petition was filed by the inspector after the court refused to permit the prosecution to alter the charges by including murder against the accused.     Dismissing the petition, Justice Rajendran said that neither the prosecution nor the complainant or anyone interested in the criminal case was entitled to add or alter an existing charge. Only the trial court could decide framing of an additional charge or alter an existing charge upon arriving at a subjective satisfaction on the basis of materials available on records, he said.     "As rightly pointed out by the trial court, before evidence is let in by the prosecution and the prosecution witnesses are subjected to cross-examination, it is too early for the prosecution to have filed the petition under Section 216 of CrPC for inclusion of the charge," Justice Rajendran said.     "It is always open to the trial court to frame an additional charge or alter the existing charge, if it is convinced to do so, after completion of evidence, and before pronouncing the judgment in the sessions case," he concluded.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chandigarh/Tributes-paid-to-another-rape-victim/articleshow/48467179.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:01 IST 2015||BARNALA: Death of a minor dalit girl of a Sangrur village sparked off anger among thousands of people, who had assembled in Mehal Kalan village of Barnala to mark the 18th death anniversary of another rape and murder victim.    Hundreds of angry women and girls joined men and members of political parties, employee unions, farmers and labourers in paying tributes to the victim, who became a symbol of struggle in the area.    Young girls vowed to fight such offences bravely and asked people to support them to live with dignity and protect their honour. They asked the state and the Union government to deal strictly with persons involved in crimes against women.    Punjab Students Union (PSU) activist Hardeep Kaur Kotla, who was released four days ago after spending two months in jail for protesting against the death of another minor girl in Moga who was thrown out of a moving bus of Orbit Aviation transport company owned by Punjab deputy chief minister Sukhbir Singh Badal, gave a clarion call to women to raise their voice.    She said, "Women should not tolerate highhandedness and advances of bad elements and should come forward in quelling such behaviour to protect themselves."  ||BARNALA
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/indore/Youths-abduction-murder-spark-tension-in-Mhow/articleshow/48464553.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:01 IST 2015||MHOW: A day after a 21-year-old youth was abducted and murdered over alleged illicit relationship, the incident triggered tension in Mhow on Wednesday.     Kishanganj police station in charge Rakesh Modi said Lajwanti Bai, 55, resident of Gaikwad locality near Mhow, reported on Tuesday her son Dewal was allegedly abducted by Rajat Verma and Sunny Lodha, both from the same locality.     The information was circulated to nearby police stations.     As DIG (Indore) Santosh Singh came to know about the case, he directed SP west D Kalyan Chakrawarty to investigate the matter. Rajat, 20, Sunny, 20, and Devraj, 35, were taken into custody for interrogation during which they admitted to murder of Dewal.     By the time, interrogation was over Manpur police informed SP the body of a youth was found near Manpur following which Lajwanti Bai was taken there for its identification.     She identified the body her son.     After this, a case was registered against three along with Desh Verma, who had brought his car for abduction.     In their confession, Rajat revealed Dewal had illicit relationship with his wife due to which he took a decision to eliminate Dewal. Rajat and Sunny took Dewal on motorcycle and brought him to Mhow city where Desh was waiting in his car. They told him about going to Sitlamata falls and killed him. Later, they threw the body in front of a moving truck to erase the identity.     The accused would be produced in the court and will seek their remand for other clues.     A case was registered against all four accused and the car and the motorcycle used in the crime have been recovered.     The fourth accused Desh is on the run.||MHOW
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/entertainment/kannada/theatre/When-values-get-the-better-of-society/articleshow/48463203.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:01 IST 2015||Tatte Edli Raddhantha is a play written and directed by Mayasandra Krishnaprasad, a senior artiste in Rangayana, Mysuru. The play revolves around three families, which are bound by old ideologies and customs. It deals with how children think of their aged father, who is killed by one of his relatives. The eldest son does not even want to lodge a complaint with the police, seeking an investigation into the murder. There is also a character of a differently-abled boy, who is made a scapegoat to kill his grandfather. The play which begins with the investigation into murder of an old man sees various characters which depict the typical families living in an orthodox and conservative society.  The artistes of the play include Hariprasad Kashyap, Manjunath Shastry, Sudhir Kumar, Raghavendra Boodnur, Shivamurthy, Venkatnag Sobers, Rajesh Basavanna, Dhanya Shree and Rashmi Narayan.  It is scheduled to take place on August 13 (7.30 pm) at Kengal Hanumanthaih Kala Soudha, Ramanjaneya Temple Compound, Hanumantha Nagar.  || 
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/rajkot/Man-stabbed-to-death-by-sister-in-law-in-Rajkot/articleshow/48463197.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:01 IST 2015||RAJKOT: In a gruesome incident, 52-year-old man was stabbed to death by his sister-in-law on Tuesday late night at his residence.     According to police, deceased was identified as Hiren Raval, a resident of Megh-Malhar Apartment on Geet Gurjari Main Road in city. Accused Surabhi Raval, wife of Chetan Raval, was arrested soon after the incident. Police said that family feud was behind the murder.     "She told us that she and her brother-in-law Hiren has been at loggerhead since last eight-years over domestic issues and on Tuesday night they quarreled over the old issues and she took out a knife and stabbed him. Hiren was rushed to civil hospital by his brother but he succumbed to his injuries" said police official.     The details also emerged about the illicit or extra-marital affairs of Surabhi with Hiren Raval.     Surabhi had taken divorce from her husband Chetan a few years ago but they started living together again due to some social issues.     Hiren was unmarried and was living with Chetan Raval. Earlier, he was living with younger brother Rajesh Raval in Pramukh Palace Apartment in Jagnath Plot but after his death, he started living with Chetan Raval. Hiren was real-estate broker.     "We suspect that the relationship between the two may have led to this incident. We are questioning Surabhi over this issues and more details would emerge after the questioning" said a senior police official.     ||RAJKOT
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/entertainment/kannada/When-values-get-the-better-of-society/articleshow/48463050.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:01 IST 2015||Tatte Edli Raddhantha is a play written and directed by Mayasandra Krishnaprasad, a senior artiste in Rangayana, Mysuru. The play revolves around three families, which are bound by old ideologies and customs. It deals with how children think of their aged father, who is killed by one of his relatives. The eldest son does not even want to lodge a complaint with the police, seeking an investigation into the murder. There is also a character of a differently-abled boy, who is made a scapegoat to kill his grandfather. The play, which begins with the investigation into murder of an old man, sees various characters which depict the typical families living in an orthodox and conservative society.  The artistes of the play include Hariprasad Kashyap, Manjunath Shastry, Sudhir Kumar, Raghavendra Boodnur, Shivamurthy, Venkatnag Sobers, Rajesh Basavanna, Dhanya Shree and Rashmi Narayan.  It is scheduled to take place on August 13 (7.30 pm) at Kengal Hanumanthaih Kala Soudha, Ramanjaneya Temple Compound, Hanumantha Nagar.  || 
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/ranchi/Spell-Of-Doom-For-Witch-Hunt-Village/articleshow/48458813.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:01 IST 2015||Kanjiya Maraitoli (Mandar): Kanjiya Maraitoli is now a ghost village, with a pall of last week's horror hanging heavy over its 40-odd mud houses. The grisly mass murder of five "witches" on the night of August 7 has touched practically every home in the tiny hamlet -- every household has either a victim or an accused. As of Wednesday, thirty-one people from the village with a population of about 200 have been arrested. Several others have run away, afraid of police action.    Taking a detour from NH-75 about 40km from Ranchi, the first thing one sees is a group of very young children - including an infant - leaving the village with their belongings. The kids are led by Khushbu Tigga, the niece of Bipin Khalkho, whose death due to jaundice triggered an unprecedented witch hunt that sent shockwaves across the country. Every adult member of the Khalkho family is behind bars and the kids are heading to another village to live with their relatives.    Even in Mandar, one of the more developed blocks in rural Jharkhand, superstition runs deep - the ill prefer to visit a bhagat (witch doctor) instead of a hospital. The little ones are convinced that the five dead women were witches. "We know they were up to no good. There were times when we found Etwariya Khallkho staring at us through the window at night. 'Go to sleep or I'll suck your soul out', she'd tell us," says Khushbu. "She is responsible for my uncle's death," she adds, before heading out of the village.    Little Khushbu is one of the very few people who'll talk about what happened that night. Every other person was apparently either drunk or asleep. "I can hardly see and hear. I have no idea about what happened. I only came to know about the incident when I woke up the next morning," says an elderly tribal as he walks past.    With a bit of cajoling, an elderly couple blames the five women for most of the deaths and diseases that have taken place in the village over the last 12 years. Some even hold their "dark magic" responsible for the death of their cattle. "Etwariya was seen near a cemetery on Friday night. She definitely was a witch," mumbles Somra Khalkho, as his wife nudges him to keep quiet.    Karamdev Khalkho, son of one of the victims, Madni, said a few villagers had visited Etwariya's home and accused her of practising black magic two days before the lynching. "Her two sons assured the villagers that they would not stop their mother from being punished if they could prove the charges. None of the other women, including my mother, had any inkling that they were being targeted," says Karamdev.    Even Jacinta Khalkho's son Anil, an army jawan posted in Himachal Pradesh, had no idea about the accusations against his mother. "The entire village would visit my house whenever I was on a vacation. Bottles of rum from the army canteen were always a coveted commodity here and I brought several of them for the villagers. I never thought these same people would murder my mother," said Anil.    There is, however, a lot more to the case than meets the eye. Experts in tribal traditions say that this was not a usual case of a witch hunt. Thousands of women have been killed on the stake over the last few decades, but usually it is one, or at the most two, women who are attacked. "There has not been a case of five women being killed together in the last 25 years," says Prem Chand, founding member of Free Legal Aid Committee and an anti-witch hunt crusader.    "Also, unlike most such cases, these women had no idea that they would be targeted. The village committee usually first warns the 'witches'. Some are given an ultimatum to leave the area, while some are forced to eat faeces or stripped and paraded. Hardly any woman branded a witch is killed without a prior warning," said J N Oraon, the former mukhiya of Mandar village and an activist working to eliminate witch hunts.    Villagers say the victims were not overly friendly with each other and were not even neighbours. Also, the five women do not meet the criteria that "brands a woman a witch. "Generally, the woman is either a widow or has lost at least one of her sons -- they have to 'eat up' their closest male relative. But only two of the five were widows and none of them had a son who had died," says Premchand Ekka, a local leader and the husband of the village mukhiya.    Even the police admit that the woman would have approached them had they been taunted or harassed in the past and felt they were in any sort of danger. "The suddenness of the incident took everybody by surprise. The police station is barely a kilometre from the village, and we reached the spot within minutes after we got the information that a few women were dragged out of their houses and taken to the village assembly. By the time we reached the spot, all the five were dead. It seems that the murders were planned and executed within a couple of hours," says R N Singh, officer in charge of Mandar police station who is investigating the case.    There are others who point at a bigger scheme of things. Some reports earlier this week said the women were targeted because they were leading an anti-alcohol crusade, but the families dismissed the speculation. "My mother herself drank a bit after a hard day at the farm and she was not part of any campaign to ban alcohol in the village," said Karamdev.    Then there are rumours of a land grab conspiracy swirling around the area. "Kanjiya Maraitoli is less than a kilometre from the highway and the sprawling Ranchi will engulf this village in the near future. With every household now involved in a case of mass murder, the villagers will have no choice but to sell their land at throwaway prices to meet the judicial costs," says Barkha Lakra of Sarna Yuva Shakti, an NGO working for tribal rights. This is practically the end for the village which was connected to the power grid on June 1.    Police sources too do not rule this angle. "At the moment, we are looking at it as a case of witch hunt. But we will investigate all angles once we interrogate the accused," says officer R N Singh, adding that the police at the moment is looking for the bhagat who instigated the villagers. Police have set up a picket at the village and are doing rounds every four hours, knocking on doors and ensuring there is no more trouble.    Whatever the investigation concludes, the village will not get over the horrors of that night any time soon. Even the police is shocked by the macabre celebrations around the five mangled bodies. "The dead drunk villagers were sitting in a circle around the bodies listening to Nagpuri music When we reached the spot around midnight. The villagers did not let us take the bodies until next morning -- they wanted the neighbouring villages to see what the fate of other witches would be," says Singh.      (With inputs from Sanjay Ojha and Alok KN Mishra)  ||KANJIYA MARAITOLI (MANDAR)
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/delhi/Youths-stab-DTC-marshal-over-bus-seat/articleshow/48461091.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:01 IST 2015||A DTC bus marshal was stabbed and severely injured by a group of youths who allegedly protested against vacating a seat reserved for women. The incident happened on the Mehrauli-Badarpur Road near Saket on Wednesday night.    Police said the driver and conductor tried to catch the men but they fled. The marshal was rushed to AIIMS Trauma Centre for treatment. An attempt to murder case has been registered by the Saket police.|| 
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/CBI-files-chargesheet-in-Payal-murder-case/articleshow/48460983.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:01 IST 2015||BENGALURU: It was a telephone call from gym entrepreneur Ananth Narayan Mishra to his business associate Bhavnish Shankar, a gym instructor, that sealed the fate of his wife, Payal Surekha (left). The JP Nagar resident and Dell employeewas found murdered in her home on December 17, 2010.     Gym instructo r James Ray, who had been sacked earlier by Mishra, was visiting Bhavnish when the call came. Ray, who had come to Bhavnish to collect an experience certificate, found out that the Mishras were in JP Nagar, Bengaluru. He bore a grudge against them for firing him.     Ray soon put in place a plan and accordingly stabbed Payal to death in her JP Nagar home a few days later. She was alone at home at the time of her murder.     JP Nagar police arrested Ray soon afterwards. Allegations by Surekha's parents that their son-in-law could be involved only made things more intriguing. The elderly couple got the courts to order CBI to take up the probe. The CBI on Monday filed a charge-sheet in the case, upholding the case of the JP Nagar police.     After killing Payal, Ray discarded his jacket in Puttenahalli tank bed. "Acting on information given by him, we retrieved it," said SK Umesh, ACP (Vijayanagar), the then investigating officer.     Ray had thrown the jacket in the bushes, keeping blood stains and Payal's hair strands intact on it and providing police the clinching evidence.     Ray, however, was shrewd. He wrote to Payal's parents, saying he had been paid by their son-in-law to commit the murder. Police suspected Mishra initially. "But everything pointed to the fact that the couple was very much in love.     He was very protective of her and she of him," said Umesh.     Payal's father Deen Dayal Surekha said, "I simply didn't want the real murderer to get away."||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:01 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:01 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/SC-acquits-Romesh-Sharma-in-Budhiraja-murder-case/articleshow/48704930.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:01 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Thursday upheld the Delhi High Court order acquitting former Congress leader Romesh Sharma in the case relating to the killing of fashion designer Kunjum Budhiraja.     A bench of Justices Pinaki Chandra Ghose and R K Agrawal dismissed an appeal filed by the Delhi government challenging HC order.     The Delhi government contended that the HC had erred in acquitting Sharma but it was strongly opposed by his counsel and senior advocate Siddharth Luthra who submitted that his client was in love with Kunjum and there was no evidence to prove his involvement in the case.     Sharma, who was alleged to be a frontman of underworld don Dawood Ibrahim, was convicted by a trial court on February 15, 2008. Kunjum was killed on March 20, 1999 at Sharma's South Delhi-based 'Jai Mata Di' farm house by a group of hired gangsters from Uttar Pradesh.     The trial court had convicted Sharma and five other accused in the case and had awarded life term to all. The HC, however, acquitted Sharma and co-accused Tejendir Verdi but upheld conviction and sentence of other four accused— Sharma's nephew Surinder Mishra, Hemchand, Santram and Ramesh alias Bobby.     While acquitting Sharma, the HC had said "Romesh Sharma and Kunjum were in love, and desired the company of each other. It does not establish that Sharma had got fed up with her". It had turned down Delhi police's contention that Sharma wanted to get rid of Kunjum as she knew about his alleged illegal activities.     "A grieving lover falling over the body of his mate and performing the rituals of a marriage can well be an expression of lasting love, and need not necessarily be a drama," the HC had said.     Sharma was in judicial custody at the time of the Kunjum's murder.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Raid-on-Bengaluru-centre-reveals-horror-tales/articleshow/48704718.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:01 IST 2015||BENGALURU: A State Human Rights Commission raid on a de-addiction centre in Jnanabharati Layout, near Kengeri, southwest Bengaluru, found 90 inmates living in pathetic conditions and subjected to inhuman treatment.     Thursday's raid followed the murder of an inmate of another de-addiction centre in Kothanur recently.     The SHRC raid on Sri Santhosh Social Service Society, also known as 4S Society, followed a tipoff. According to SHRC officials, the centre has been in existence for seven years at least, but the society couldn't produce documents of having obtained permission from the social welfare department. Commission officials said the centre had the permission from the DC and the DHO.     "Most inmates are between 20 and 35 years. They showed us signs of being physically abused. The centre has violated other norms too. Although it's supposed to have one nurse for every 15 patients and at least one in-house doctor and a psychiatrist, it didn't have any," said an SHRC spokesperson.     4 arrested for killing inmate:     Kothanur police arrested a de-addiction centre staffer and three inmates for allegedly beating to death a 28-year-old inmate. Dinesh was admitted to the centre by his family as he was an alcoholic. He was later found dead in a hospital. Family members noticed several bruises on his body. Narayana, an inmate-turned-staffer, gave some medicines to Dinesh, who later turned aggressive. Narayana sought the help of inmates Suresh, Subhan and Simon, to subdue Dinesh.     When Dinesh retaliated, the quartet overpowered him till he became unconscious. He died in hospital.||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/A-jolly-good-fellow-say-Khannas-friends/articleshow/48704630.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:01 IST 2015||Sanjeev Khanna, Indrani Mukerjea's second husband and suspected ally in Sheena Bora's killing, may be the most surprising element in this macabre drama, but his friends and associates in Kolkata refused to cast aspersions on "Sanju" just yet.     From being the biggest dart enthusiast at one of Kolkata's poshest clubs (the CC&FC) to having a finger in every pie, Sanjeev was everyone's "best mate" and go-to guy who friends described as: "A doer... someone who could get things done."     The morning after Khanna's arrest, TOI spoke to Ajay Rawla, the man who Khanna worked for as a consultant and whose house he was picked up from on Wednesday afternoon. "It wasn't like he was hiding like a desperate fugitive in my house. We had a meeting in the morning after which he drove me home and that's when news broke on television. We were sitting, watching, wondering what steps to take when the police arrived," explained Rawla.     Seven years his senior, Khanna's association with Rawla dates back to the time they went to Mayo College in Ajmer. Later, Khanna went on to become an aide for Rawla's pet projects. Besides running his own business in wireless communications, Khanna was there setting up chef Shaun Kenworthy and Rawla's restaurant 1658 or immersed in the heritage project of converting the Bawali Rajbari into a hotel. "He was getting all the construction work and labourers in place. He was very good in helping out with permissions through his connections with excise and contractors," remembers Kenworthy.     Khanna, who seldom missed his outings at the club, motor rallies and horse racing as a prominent face in the social circuit, was not the same man before he met Indrani, recounts Bull Banthia, a close friend. "Well-read and well-versed, Sanju had a great mechanical mind with a solution for everything," is how Bull chose to describe his "jolly good friend who loved meeting new people, hung out at the club but wasn't a social climber". "It was Indrani who emerged as this socialite and drove him to consciously build contacts with those higher up in the social rung after marriage," said the Kolkata-based entrepreneur. "That's the reason why I distanced myself from them until overnight she left Kolkata with their daughter and Sanju's wallet."     While Indrani never surfaces in conversations, his daughter Vidhie, who stayed with Indrani, is a fond subject with his friends. "He would miss his daughter but was resigned to fate, hoping that someday she would find him," said Rawla, adding, "It was Vidhie who called Sanjeev on Wednesday to give him the news."     No one seems to know about any recent interaction between Khanna and Indrani. G M Kapur, a known name in Kolkata who was Intach's state convener and happens to be Khanna's "mama", seemed disturbed with "all the theorizing" of Khanna's role in the crime. He declined to look back on Indrani and Khanna's relationship but added, "The last that there was any contact with Indrani or her family was when Vidhie visited Calcutta last year to celebrate the 75th birthday of her grandmother (Khanna's mother who lives with him)."     Khanna's Facebook posts on "karma" in the weeks and months following Sheena's alleged murder on April 24, 2012, make for interesting reading. On April 30, Khanna shared photo messages: "Say whatever, whenever the f*** you want to"; "Sometimes I get so weird, I even freak myself out".     On May 24, exactly a month after the alleged killing, he wrote: "You can never tell what people are thinking and feeling unless they tell you, and usually they lie. you ask them, 'Whats wrong?' and they say 'Nothing'. You accept this because it's easier than digging for the truth. People smile when they want to cry, they laugh when they want to scream and shout. They pretend like nothing is wrong because they don't want to face the truth. Things aren't always rainbows and butterflies, sometimes you gotta scream and cry your anger and sadness to the world, because you can only hold it in for so long before something in you snaps. so when you want to cry, cry. When you want to scream, scream. Don't hide behind fake smiles, it's ok to not be alright."     ||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Sheena-docu-Michail-add-to-mystery/articleshow/48701752.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:01 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Michail, Sheena's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered have raised a number of unanswered questions.    Two days after his mother, Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Michail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai Police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed that what he gave to police was enough to prove that Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora (who are actually parents of Indrani) as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. Some questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukherjea.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Michail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43 as mentioned in reports after her arrest.    Adding more to the suspense, Michail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Michail studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board examination, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that knew that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard that her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard that she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband who she introduced as Peter Mukherjea."    The two-member Mumbai Police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Michail, who on Wednesday, was the first one to reveal that Sheena was Indrani's daughter, twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Michail's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Michail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukherjae is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Michail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."  ||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Grandparents-are-Sheenas-mom-dad-on-birth-certificate/articleshow/48704559.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:01 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Mikhail, Sheena Bora's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered led to some unanswered questions on Thursday.    Two days after his mother Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Mikhail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed what he gave the police was enough to prove Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora, who are actually Indrani's parents, as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. However, many questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter. In many cases in India involving single mothers, grandparents are known to put in their names as father and mother.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukerjea, that is, 13 years after Sheena was born.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Mikhail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43.    Mikhail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Mikhail     studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board exam, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband, who she introduced as Peter Mukerjea."    The two-member Mumbai police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Mikhail twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Mikhail 's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time, he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Mikhail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukerjea is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Mikhail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Sheena-bowled-us-over-Rahuls-uncle/articleshow/48704552.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:01 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: Had things worked out as desired for Peter Mukherjea's first wife Shabnam and her family in Dehradun, Rahul Mukherjea and Sheena Bora would have been married for over three years now.     Shabnam's brother Shaleen Singh told TOI on Thursday that in 2011 Rahul brought Sheena to their sprawling home in Dehradun to seek approval from the family for their marriage.     The entire family-Shabnam, her younger brother Shaleen, father Anand Singh and mother Seema-were reportedly bowled over by Sheena's jovial nature and affection towards the elderly people. Impressed, the family gave its "unqualified and unanimous approval" for the wedding, which was supposed to take place within a few months, said Shaleen.     Stunned by the recent development, Shaleen said, "Sheena was among those rare persons who left a deep and lifelong impact on people. She was good-looking, a sweet person, clean of heart and good to talk to. None of us objected to the wedding."     Shaleen learnt of Sheena's murder through news channels. "It would have been great if she had become a part of the family. I don't know what was the cause and motive behind the heinous crime, but all those behind the killing of the jovial-natured girl should not be spared at any cost," he said.     A former model and tele-actor, 49-year-old Shaleen today owns the Sanskar International school in Jogiwala here. He recalled the last meeting with Shabnam and Rahul in April this year. "My father Anand Singh passed away in April. They had come to pay their respects but we did not interact much."     However, Shaleen said of late the interaction between him and his sister Shabnam was limited. Although Shabnam's farm Gul-e-Shabnam and Shaleen's residence Shankar Sadan are barely 200 metres away in Badripur, meetings between them were rare. While Shaleen and his mother stay on different floors of Shankar Sadan, Shabnam stays alone at her residence and is frequently visited by Rahul.     "There are matters in each family which we do not want to disclose. We are not against each other but do not interact much. She comes to meet our mother occasionally," said Shaleen, adding that Shabnam was passionate about painting and had a studio in her residence.     Shaleen denied having any details about the presence of Mumbai police in Dehradun. "Neither Doon police nor Mumbai police have contacted me over the issue."     Staff at Shabnam's residence said she was out-of-station but they were not aware of her whereabouts.||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Kilpauk-doctor-murder-Hubby-to-approach-court/articleshow/48704411.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:01 IST 2015||CHENNAI: It's been four days since police claimed to have solved the murder of S Sathya, 24, a PG medical student. However, her husband has put forth questions that police have failed to answer. Though investigating officers confirmed Sathya was not sexually assaulted before she was killed, they leaked to some section of media saying that they changed their stance on Wednesday and said there were indications of attempt to rape on the deceased.     Police personnel revealed the details soon after Sathya's husband Dr P Sesu, also employed at a primary health centre in Perambalur, expressed certain doubts.     He alleged the police hastily solved the case citing the state assembly, which is in motion. Sathya was found dead at her house in Kilpauk on August 20.     On August 23, police arrested Harintham Depnath, a BTech graduate, who lived at the second floor on the same apartment. Neither was there any mention about sexual assault or attempt on Sathya when the body was recovered from the house. The nor did the doctors. Police didn't tell this during the arrest of Depnath on August 23. "What forced the police to reveal about the sexual harassment attempt on my wife now?" asked Sesu.     "I want to live a peaceful life with my two sons - Tamil Nesan, 6, and Karmugilan, 4. The studies and the future of my children is important for me. I do respect the police personnel who spent sleepless nights to solve the murder, but there are questions that need to be answered," he said.     "I live in Perambalur with my children, but we speak through live video calls. I have told my sons that Sathya has gone to the God, as the Almighty likes her more. "Hereafter, we cannot speak or meet her. I don't know how far my children will admit it?" said Sesu. "I will approach the court seeking a fair probe into the murder of my wife. I want to find out the real cause behind her death. I want the real accused to get punished for his deed," said Sesu.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Woman-strangles-husbands-lover/articleshow/48704388.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:01 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A woman beat up and strangled her husband's partner, an assistant professor at a polytechnic in Choolaimedu, in their Thiruverkadu home on Thursday, police said. A court later remanded the accused, 32-year-old Shruti, in judicial custody.     Police said Sambasivam, a professor at Panimalar Engineering College in Poonamallee, used to bring Rajalakshmi, home frequently and introduced her to his wife Shruti as a colleague. He even dropped her home at night. The polytechnic where Rajalakshmi worked was part of the Panimalar group of educational institutions. Shruti initially believed the two were just colleagues until Sambasivam came home with Rajalakshmi on Tuesday and said the woman was moving in with them permanently.     On Wednesday morning, Sambasivam allegedly tied a 'mangalsutra' to Rajalakshmi in front of his wife, police said, based on Shruti's confession. A shocked Shruti picked up a fight with Sambasivam who asked her to maintain a cordial relationship and take care of Rajalakshmi. On Thursday morning, after he left for college a fight broke out between the two women.     Police said Rajalakshmi allegedly abused Sruthi and went into the bathroom. Sruthi followed her in and strangled her with the 'mangalsutra'. She then tried to make it appear that the woman had fainted in the bathroom. She took her in an autorickshaw to a nearby hospital where she was declared 'brought dead'. Doctors who noticed a few marks around her neck informed the Thiruverkadu police who registered a case of suspicious death under CrPC section 176.     The body was sent for postmortem to Kilpauk Medical College and Hospital.     After finding that the two women were at home at the time of the death, police interrogated Sruthi for more than an hour but she continued to maintain that Rajyalakshmi had died of injuries sustained when she fell down in the bathroom.     "She confessed to the murder when we told her that her fingerprints had been lifted from the scene of crime," said an investigating officer. "She said she had smashed the woman's head against the wall and later strangled her with the 'thali'." Police altered the case to murder and arrested Sruthi.     Initial inquiries revealed that Rajalakshmi had been married to a man named Rajasekhar for a while and they had separated. She then got married to Suresh, a relative who worked in a private firm, a few years ago and the couple moved into a house in Mogappair.     They allegedly had frequent quarrels as he tortured her and she left him too, police found.     Rajalakshmi then got a job with Panimalar Engineering College where she met Sambasivam. The two became friends and began seeing each other. Rajalakshmi recently moved to the polytechnic in Choolaimedu, police said.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/US-journalists-killer-annoyed-colleagues-Ex-boss/articleshow/48704167.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:01 IST 2015||ROANOKE, United States: The disgruntled former US television station employee who murdered two journalists had "annoyed" colleagues but showed no signs at work of any mental health issues, his former boss said Thursday.     Vester Lee Flanagan, 41, worked as a reporter for WDBJ in Roanoke, Virginia from March 2012 to February 2013, but was dismissed for poor performance and angry behavior, general manager Jeffrey Marks said.     On Wednesday, Flanagan shot and killed two of the CBS affiliate's journalists while they were conducting an on-air interview. He later fatally shot himself.     "We are still at a loss to figure out what happened to him in those two and a half years" since he was fired, Marks told a news conference flanked by dozens of staff, many of them holding hands.     "I don't think we identified that he had mental health issues. We certainly identified that he had performance issues."     Marks defended the station's hiring record and said its parent company had "a very elaborate program to screen employees."     Flanagan passed background checks and came with only positive references, Marks said.     It was only after he was hired, Marks said, that things went downhill.     "Vester's behavior annoyed a lot of people in the news station," Marks said.     Flanagan, who went by the on-screen name Bryce Williams, alleged in a manifesto faxed to ABC News that he was discriminated against as a gay, black journalist.     Marks said accusations in 2013 that he was treated unfairly were "immediately investigated and found to be without merit."     During his employment, Flanagan complied with demands that he seek medical help, but he was ultimately dismissed.     He was escorted from the building by police and made an ominous aside to the news director -- handing him a wooden cross and saying "'you'll need this'," Marks said.     As he left, he also made a "derogatory comment" to Adam Ward, the cameraman he shot dead on Wednesday.     Flanagan filed a complaint with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and a civil action suit, which were dismissed, he said.     "All of these investigations determined that no reasonable person would have taken any of the cited incidents as discrimination or harassment."     After killing Ward and reporter Alison Parker live on the air, Flanagan posted a video of the attack on social media.||ROANOKE, UNITED STATES
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:01 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/SC-acquits-Romesh-Sharma-in-Budhiraja-murder-case/articleshow/48704930.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:01 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Thursday upheld the Delhi High Court order acquitting former Congress leader Romesh Sharma in the case relating to the killing of fashion designer Kunjum Budhiraja.     A bench of Justices Pinaki Chandra Ghose and R K Agrawal dismissed an appeal filed by the Delhi government challenging HC order.     The Delhi government contended that the HC had erred in acquitting Sharma but it was strongly opposed by his counsel and senior advocate Siddharth Luthra who submitted that his client was in love with Kunjum and there was no evidence to prove his involvement in the case.     Sharma, who was alleged to be a frontman of underworld don Dawood Ibrahim, was convicted by a trial court on February 15, 2008. Kunjum was killed on March 20, 1999 at Sharma's South Delhi-based 'Jai Mata Di' farm house by a group of hired gangsters from Uttar Pradesh.     The trial court had convicted Sharma and five other accused in the case and had awarded life term to all. The HC, however, acquitted Sharma and co-accused Tejendir Verdi but upheld conviction and sentence of other four accused— Sharma's nephew Surinder Mishra, Hemchand, Santram and Ramesh alias Bobby.     While acquitting Sharma, the HC had said "Romesh Sharma and Kunjum were in love, and desired the company of each other. It does not establish that Sharma had got fed up with her". It had turned down Delhi police's contention that Sharma wanted to get rid of Kunjum as she knew about his alleged illegal activities.     "A grieving lover falling over the body of his mate and performing the rituals of a marriage can well be an expression of lasting love, and need not necessarily be a drama," the HC had said.     Sharma was in judicial custody at the time of the Kunjum's murder.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Raid-on-Bengaluru-centre-reveals-horror-tales/articleshow/48704718.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:01 IST 2015||BENGALURU: A State Human Rights Commission raid on a de-addiction centre in Jnanabharati Layout, near Kengeri, southwest Bengaluru, found 90 inmates living in pathetic conditions and subjected to inhuman treatment.     Thursday's raid followed the murder of an inmate of another de-addiction centre in Kothanur recently.     The SHRC raid on Sri Santhosh Social Service Society, also known as 4S Society, followed a tipoff. According to SHRC officials, the centre has been in existence for seven years at least, but the society couldn't produce documents of having obtained permission from the social welfare department. Commission officials said the centre had the permission from the DC and the DHO.     "Most inmates are between 20 and 35 years. They showed us signs of being physically abused. The centre has violated other norms too. Although it's supposed to have one nurse for every 15 patients and at least one in-house doctor and a psychiatrist, it didn't have any," said an SHRC spokesperson.     4 arrested for killing inmate:     Kothanur police arrested a de-addiction centre staffer and three inmates for allegedly beating to death a 28-year-old inmate. Dinesh was admitted to the centre by his family as he was an alcoholic. He was later found dead in a hospital. Family members noticed several bruises on his body. Narayana, an inmate-turned-staffer, gave some medicines to Dinesh, who later turned aggressive. Narayana sought the help of inmates Suresh, Subhan and Simon, to subdue Dinesh.     When Dinesh retaliated, the quartet overpowered him till he became unconscious. He died in hospital.||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/A-jolly-good-fellow-say-Khannas-friends/articleshow/48704630.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:01 IST 2015||Sanjeev Khanna, Indrani Mukerjea's second husband and suspected ally in Sheena Bora's killing, may be the most surprising element in this macabre drama, but his friends and associates in Kolkata refused to cast aspersions on "Sanju" just yet.     From being the biggest dart enthusiast at one of Kolkata's poshest clubs (the CC&FC) to having a finger in every pie, Sanjeev was everyone's "best mate" and go-to guy who friends described as: "A doer... someone who could get things done."     The morning after Khanna's arrest, TOI spoke to Ajay Rawla, the man who Khanna worked for as a consultant and whose house he was picked up from on Wednesday afternoon. "It wasn't like he was hiding like a desperate fugitive in my house. We had a meeting in the morning after which he drove me home and that's when news broke on television. We were sitting, watching, wondering what steps to take when the police arrived," explained Rawla.     Seven years his senior, Khanna's association with Rawla dates back to the time they went to Mayo College in Ajmer. Later, Khanna went on to become an aide for Rawla's pet projects. Besides running his own business in wireless communications, Khanna was there setting up chef Shaun Kenworthy and Rawla's restaurant 1658 or immersed in the heritage project of converting the Bawali Rajbari into a hotel. "He was getting all the construction work and labourers in place. He was very good in helping out with permissions through his connections with excise and contractors," remembers Kenworthy.     Khanna, who seldom missed his outings at the club, motor rallies and horse racing as a prominent face in the social circuit, was not the same man before he met Indrani, recounts Bull Banthia, a close friend. "Well-read and well-versed, Sanju had a great mechanical mind with a solution for everything," is how Bull chose to describe his "jolly good friend who loved meeting new people, hung out at the club but wasn't a social climber". "It was Indrani who emerged as this socialite and drove him to consciously build contacts with those higher up in the social rung after marriage," said the Kolkata-based entrepreneur. "That's the reason why I distanced myself from them until overnight she left Kolkata with their daughter and Sanju's wallet."     While Indrani never surfaces in conversations, his daughter Vidhie, who stayed with Indrani, is a fond subject with his friends. "He would miss his daughter but was resigned to fate, hoping that someday she would find him," said Rawla, adding, "It was Vidhie who called Sanjeev on Wednesday to give him the news."     No one seems to know about any recent interaction between Khanna and Indrani. G M Kapur, a known name in Kolkata who was Intach's state convener and happens to be Khanna's "mama", seemed disturbed with "all the theorizing" of Khanna's role in the crime. He declined to look back on Indrani and Khanna's relationship but added, "The last that there was any contact with Indrani or her family was when Vidhie visited Calcutta last year to celebrate the 75th birthday of her grandmother (Khanna's mother who lives with him)."     Khanna's Facebook posts on "karma" in the weeks and months following Sheena's alleged murder on April 24, 2012, make for interesting reading. On April 30, Khanna shared photo messages: "Say whatever, whenever the f*** you want to"; "Sometimes I get so weird, I even freak myself out".     On May 24, exactly a month after the alleged killing, he wrote: "You can never tell what people are thinking and feeling unless they tell you, and usually they lie. you ask them, 'Whats wrong?' and they say 'Nothing'. You accept this because it's easier than digging for the truth. People smile when they want to cry, they laugh when they want to scream and shout. They pretend like nothing is wrong because they don't want to face the truth. Things aren't always rainbows and butterflies, sometimes you gotta scream and cry your anger and sadness to the world, because you can only hold it in for so long before something in you snaps. so when you want to cry, cry. When you want to scream, scream. Don't hide behind fake smiles, it's ok to not be alright."     ||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Sheena-docu-Michail-add-to-mystery/articleshow/48701752.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:01 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Michail, Sheena's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered have raised a number of unanswered questions.    Two days after his mother, Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Michail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai Police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed that what he gave to police was enough to prove that Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora (who are actually parents of Indrani) as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. Some questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukherjea.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Michail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43 as mentioned in reports after her arrest.    Adding more to the suspense, Michail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Michail studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board examination, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that knew that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard that her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard that she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband who she introduced as Peter Mukherjea."    The two-member Mumbai Police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Michail, who on Wednesday, was the first one to reveal that Sheena was Indrani's daughter, twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Michail's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Michail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukherjae is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Michail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."  ||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Grandparents-are-Sheenas-mom-dad-on-birth-certificate/articleshow/48704559.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:01 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Mikhail, Sheena Bora's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered led to some unanswered questions on Thursday.    Two days after his mother Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Mikhail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed what he gave the police was enough to prove Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora, who are actually Indrani's parents, as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. However, many questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter. In many cases in India involving single mothers, grandparents are known to put in their names as father and mother.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukerjea, that is, 13 years after Sheena was born.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Mikhail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43.    Mikhail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Mikhail     studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board exam, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband, who she introduced as Peter Mukerjea."    The two-member Mumbai police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Mikhail twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Mikhail 's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time, he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Mikhail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukerjea is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Mikhail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Sheena-bowled-us-over-Rahuls-uncle/articleshow/48704552.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:01 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: Had things worked out as desired for Peter Mukherjea's first wife Shabnam and her family in Dehradun, Rahul Mukherjea and Sheena Bora would have been married for over three years now.     Shabnam's brother Shaleen Singh told TOI on Thursday that in 2011 Rahul brought Sheena to their sprawling home in Dehradun to seek approval from the family for their marriage.     The entire family-Shabnam, her younger brother Shaleen, father Anand Singh and mother Seema-were reportedly bowled over by Sheena's jovial nature and affection towards the elderly people. Impressed, the family gave its "unqualified and unanimous approval" for the wedding, which was supposed to take place within a few months, said Shaleen.     Stunned by the recent development, Shaleen said, "Sheena was among those rare persons who left a deep and lifelong impact on people. She was good-looking, a sweet person, clean of heart and good to talk to. None of us objected to the wedding."     Shaleen learnt of Sheena's murder through news channels. "It would have been great if she had become a part of the family. I don't know what was the cause and motive behind the heinous crime, but all those behind the killing of the jovial-natured girl should not be spared at any cost," he said.     A former model and tele-actor, 49-year-old Shaleen today owns the Sanskar International school in Jogiwala here. He recalled the last meeting with Shabnam and Rahul in April this year. "My father Anand Singh passed away in April. They had come to pay their respects but we did not interact much."     However, Shaleen said of late the interaction between him and his sister Shabnam was limited. Although Shabnam's farm Gul-e-Shabnam and Shaleen's residence Shankar Sadan are barely 200 metres away in Badripur, meetings between them were rare. While Shaleen and his mother stay on different floors of Shankar Sadan, Shabnam stays alone at her residence and is frequently visited by Rahul.     "There are matters in each family which we do not want to disclose. We are not against each other but do not interact much. She comes to meet our mother occasionally," said Shaleen, adding that Shabnam was passionate about painting and had a studio in her residence.     Shaleen denied having any details about the presence of Mumbai police in Dehradun. "Neither Doon police nor Mumbai police have contacted me over the issue."     Staff at Shabnam's residence said she was out-of-station but they were not aware of her whereabouts.||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Kilpauk-doctor-murder-Hubby-to-approach-court/articleshow/48704411.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:01 IST 2015||CHENNAI: It's been four days since police claimed to have solved the murder of S Sathya, 24, a PG medical student. However, her husband has put forth questions that police have failed to answer. Though investigating officers confirmed Sathya was not sexually assaulted before she was killed, they leaked to some section of media saying that they changed their stance on Wednesday and said there were indications of attempt to rape on the deceased.     Police personnel revealed the details soon after Sathya's husband Dr P Sesu, also employed at a primary health centre in Perambalur, expressed certain doubts.     He alleged the police hastily solved the case citing the state assembly, which is in motion. Sathya was found dead at her house in Kilpauk on August 20.     On August 23, police arrested Harintham Depnath, a BTech graduate, who lived at the second floor on the same apartment. Neither was there any mention about sexual assault or attempt on Sathya when the body was recovered from the house. The nor did the doctors. Police didn't tell this during the arrest of Depnath on August 23. "What forced the police to reveal about the sexual harassment attempt on my wife now?" asked Sesu.     "I want to live a peaceful life with my two sons - Tamil Nesan, 6, and Karmugilan, 4. The studies and the future of my children is important for me. I do respect the police personnel who spent sleepless nights to solve the murder, but there are questions that need to be answered," he said.     "I live in Perambalur with my children, but we speak through live video calls. I have told my sons that Sathya has gone to the God, as the Almighty likes her more. "Hereafter, we cannot speak or meet her. I don't know how far my children will admit it?" said Sesu. "I will approach the court seeking a fair probe into the murder of my wife. I want to find out the real cause behind her death. I want the real accused to get punished for his deed," said Sesu.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Woman-strangles-husbands-lover/articleshow/48704388.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:01 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A woman beat up and strangled her husband's partner, an assistant professor at a polytechnic in Choolaimedu, in their Thiruverkadu home on Thursday, police said. A court later remanded the accused, 32-year-old Shruti, in judicial custody.     Police said Sambasivam, a professor at Panimalar Engineering College in Poonamallee, used to bring Rajalakshmi, home frequently and introduced her to his wife Shruti as a colleague. He even dropped her home at night. The polytechnic where Rajalakshmi worked was part of the Panimalar group of educational institutions. Shruti initially believed the two were just colleagues until Sambasivam came home with Rajalakshmi on Tuesday and said the woman was moving in with them permanently.     On Wednesday morning, Sambasivam allegedly tied a 'mangalsutra' to Rajalakshmi in front of his wife, police said, based on Shruti's confession. A shocked Shruti picked up a fight with Sambasivam who asked her to maintain a cordial relationship and take care of Rajalakshmi. On Thursday morning, after he left for college a fight broke out between the two women.     Police said Rajalakshmi allegedly abused Sruthi and went into the bathroom. Sruthi followed her in and strangled her with the 'mangalsutra'. She then tried to make it appear that the woman had fainted in the bathroom. She took her in an autorickshaw to a nearby hospital where she was declared 'brought dead'. Doctors who noticed a few marks around her neck informed the Thiruverkadu police who registered a case of suspicious death under CrPC section 176.     The body was sent for postmortem to Kilpauk Medical College and Hospital.     After finding that the two women were at home at the time of the death, police interrogated Sruthi for more than an hour but she continued to maintain that Rajyalakshmi had died of injuries sustained when she fell down in the bathroom.     "She confessed to the murder when we told her that her fingerprints had been lifted from the scene of crime," said an investigating officer. "She said she had smashed the woman's head against the wall and later strangled her with the 'thali'." Police altered the case to murder and arrested Sruthi.     Initial inquiries revealed that Rajalakshmi had been married to a man named Rajasekhar for a while and they had separated. She then got married to Suresh, a relative who worked in a private firm, a few years ago and the couple moved into a house in Mogappair.     They allegedly had frequent quarrels as he tortured her and she left him too, police found.     Rajalakshmi then got a job with Panimalar Engineering College where she met Sambasivam. The two became friends and began seeing each other. Rajalakshmi recently moved to the polytechnic in Choolaimedu, police said.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/US-journalists-killer-annoyed-colleagues-Ex-boss/articleshow/48704167.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:01 IST 2015||ROANOKE, United States: The disgruntled former US television station employee who murdered two journalists had "annoyed" colleagues but showed no signs at work of any mental health issues, his former boss said Thursday.     Vester Lee Flanagan, 41, worked as a reporter for WDBJ in Roanoke, Virginia from March 2012 to February 2013, but was dismissed for poor performance and angry behavior, general manager Jeffrey Marks said.     On Wednesday, Flanagan shot and killed two of the CBS affiliate's journalists while they were conducting an on-air interview. He later fatally shot himself.     "We are still at a loss to figure out what happened to him in those two and a half years" since he was fired, Marks told a news conference flanked by dozens of staff, many of them holding hands.     "I don't think we identified that he had mental health issues. We certainly identified that he had performance issues."     Marks defended the station's hiring record and said its parent company had "a very elaborate program to screen employees."     Flanagan passed background checks and came with only positive references, Marks said.     It was only after he was hired, Marks said, that things went downhill.     "Vester's behavior annoyed a lot of people in the news station," Marks said.     Flanagan, who went by the on-screen name Bryce Williams, alleged in a manifesto faxed to ABC News that he was discriminated against as a gay, black journalist.     Marks said accusations in 2013 that he was treated unfairly were "immediately investigated and found to be without merit."     During his employment, Flanagan complied with demands that he seek medical help, but he was ultimately dismissed.     He was escorted from the building by police and made an ominous aside to the news director -- handing him a wooden cross and saying "'you'll need this'," Marks said.     As he left, he also made a "derogatory comment" to Adam Ward, the cameraman he shot dead on Wednesday.     Flanagan filed a complaint with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and a civil action suit, which were dismissed, he said.     "All of these investigations determined that no reasonable person would have taken any of the cited incidents as discrimination or harassment."     After killing Ward and reporter Alison Parker live on the air, Flanagan posted a video of the attack on social media.||ROANOKE, UNITED STATES
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/jaipur/Investigation-of-a-dacoity-case-helps-Alwar-police-to-solve-the-murder-case-of-former-Nagar-Palika-chairman/articleshow/48460914.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:15 IST 2015||JAIPUR: While solving cases of loot and dacoity, the Alwar police on Wednesday managed to solve the murder mystery of former Nagar Palika chairman of Gangapur city. Police have established that it was a contract killing which was planned by a person of Sawai Madhopur having a land dispute with the deceased over 4 bigha of Land.    Though the murder case was under the jurisdiction of the Sawai Madhopur police the Alwar police got the major breakthrough by arresting four people involved in the murder case. After the arrest the Alwar police shared some developments of the case to Sawai Madhopur police who too managed to arrest two more persons.    DC Jain, Inspector general of police, Jaipur range under whose jurisdiction Alwar comes, talking to TOI on Wednesday, said, "We were actually investigating a loot and dacoity case of Alwar in which we had arrested some persons. While we interrogated them it was found that they were involved in the murder case of Prakash Agarwal former Nagar Palika Chairman of Gangapur city. The interrogation helped us to know each and every aspect of the murder case and finally we could arrest four persons in this connection."    Elaborating further, Jain, said, "Actually prior to the murder of Agarwal he had purchased a 4 beegha land for a farm house from one Shivcharan Meena. Shivkishan was not happy with the deal and both the parties were even fighting a case in the court. Later Monu Meena the son of Shivcharan got in touch with one Shivkishan alais Shaukeen Meena and urged him to kill Agarwal and promised him to pay Rs 10 lakh."    "While Shaukeen was on his way to kill Agarwal he was stuck in a police patrolling and was arrested for breaking the security cordon and possessing illegal weapon. While he was in Jail in Alwar he met the kingpin Yogesh and requested if he can execute the murder. Finally, Yogesh hired contract killers and the victim Agarwal was killed," Jain added.    Agarwal was shot dead by two bike-borne shooters when he was parking his car at his house in Gangapur on June 9 over property dispute. The arrested accused were identified as Yogesh Yogi, Shaukin alias Shivkishan, Chintu Chinmay, Shivcharan Meena, Monu Aga, Rajendra alias Chirda.  ||JAIPUR
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/pune/Double-murder-suspect-dies-in-Sassoon-hospital/articleshow/48460821.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:15 IST 2015||PUNE: A 25-year-old man, who was arrested recently for a double murder by the Pune rural police, died while undergoing treatment at the Sassoon general hospital on Tuesday.    The deceased, Ajay Maruti Bhosale from Khed, was arrested and a 15-year-old boy was detained on August 8 on the charges of killing rag-pickers Dinu Bhoir (45) and Kisan Waghmare (55) in Khed on July 29.    Bhosale was in police custody remand till August 17 while the minor was sent to an observation home.    Inspector Santosh Gosavi, in-charge of the Khed police station, said, "Bhosale was admitted to a primary health centre on August 9 after he complained of stomach ache. He was given a discharged the same day. He had to be hospitalised again after he complained of stomach ache, vomiting, breathing problem and high blood pressure the next day. The medical officer treating him at the PHC advised us to refer him to Sassoon for further treatment." Bhosale was rushed to the Sassoon hospital the same day, but he died while undergoing treatment.  ||PUNE
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/pune/Techie-murder-Auto-driver-had-no-RTO-badge/articleshow/48460810.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:15 IST 2015||PUNE: The autorickshaw driver, who brutally murdered an IBM employee in Pirangut ghat on August 2, did not possess the mandatory badge issued by the RTO.    The regional transport office (RTO) issues badges to autorickshaw and cab drivers after scrutiny of required documents and police verification.    The accused, Uttam Gadhve alias Utya, had rented the vehicle from an acquaintance, identified as one Ganesh (full name not known) from Nana Peth. Gadhve told police that Ganesh is a vehicle dealer who would charge him Rs 300 per day as rent.    Gadhve's daily earnings did not cross Rs 600. Mohan Shenoy, the techie he murdered in cold blood, used to pay him Rs 200 to Rs 300 even for short trips. The engineer's largesse ultimately proved to be his undoing.    An RTO official said that procuring a licence and a badge are necessary for driving autorickshaws in the city. A badge is issued after thorough police verification, which involves checking of previous police records of the applicant as well as records of traffic tickets. As per the Motor Vehicles Act, autorickshaw drivers need to wear uniforms and display the badges compulsorily during duty hours.    "The RTO and the traffic police both work towards ensuring that autorickshaw drivers do not flout these norms," said deputy RTO Anil Valiv.    "Gadhve was out on bail granted in connection with a previous crime when he killed Shenoy. The Motor Vehicles Act is not linked to the Indian Penal Code and hence it is difficult to decide if a criminal should be allowed to drive a public service vehicle," said Sanjay Patil, senior police inspector, Yerawada police station. "I appeal to passengers to remain vigilant, question autorickshaw drivers to check if they have valid licences and badges. If a complaint is registered against a driver, we can check his police record and past history," he added.    A senior RTO official said that while permit is not easily suspended, fines are collected in case of violation of norms. Badges which allow individuals to drive a public service vehicle are deemed valid till the licence is valid. "Fines are collected for autorickshaw owner if the driver of his rented vehicle is not following the norms," he said.    The Pune RTO has been carrying out frequent drives to keep a check on autorickshaw drivers. "The drives are conducted independently or jointly with the traffic police," said Valiv.    Sarang Awad, deputy commissioner of police (traffic), said, "If we catch autorickshaw drivers without uniforms or badges, we register offences against them and impose fine on them."    "Autorickshaw drivers who do not wear uniforms or carry badges should be pulled up. There are many who own more than one autorickshaw and give them on double the rent to drivers who do not have badges or licences," said an autorickshaw driver.    Nitin Pawar, convener of the Rickshaw Panchayat the main union of autorickshaw drivers in the city, said, "We maintain records and do not accept membership of anyone who does not have a valid licence and a badge. About 80% autorickshaw drivers in the city are either attached to the union or were associated with it in the past."    Pawar said that one way to keep a check on errant drivers is to give permits to only those who drive the autorickshaws themselves and are dependant on them for their livelihood.  ||PUNE
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/pune/Mother-flat-owner-plotted-teens-murder/articleshow/48460789.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:15 IST 2015||PUNE: Thirteen-year-old Chaitanya Balpande's mother and her landlord had planned his murder on August 5, the Vishrantwadi police told magisterial court on Wednesday.    Rakhi alias Rekha Balpande (36) from Tingrenagar was arrested the next day after investigations revealed that Chaitanaya was beaten to death with a cricket bat. Rakhi is in police custody remand till Thursday.    A day later, her landlord Sumit More (25) of Sainiknagar in Yerawada, was arrested for allegedly abetting in the crime.    Rakhi had first claimed that he slipped and fell in the bathroom but later confessed that she had beaten him. She was arrested after investigations revealed that she had killed her child as he had become an obstacle in her second marriage with More.    More was presented before the Khadki cantonment court, judicial magistrate first class S K Bangad around 4.10pm, following the expiry of his police custody remand on Wednesday.    Assistant inspector Suryakant Marode of the Vishrantwadi police station, who is investigating the case, filed a plea for extending his police custody remand for 10 days.    Marode submitted before the court that he has invoked section 120 (b) (criminal conspiracy) of the Indian Penal Code on Rakhi and her paramour after their interrogation had revealed that they had plotted the murder.    Assistant public prosecutor Sheela Khadke argued that the custodial interrogation of More was essential as the police has recovered the victim's blood stained clothes t-shirt, inner wear and track pants from More, which he had hidden after the incident.    The suspect was involved in a serious crime and pleaded to give sufficient time to the police to collect more evidence in the case. More's interrogation was required to ascertain whether he had taken the help of anyone else, she added.    Opposing the prosecutions plea, defence lawyer Anay Kulkarni argued that his client (More) was in police custody remand for five days since his arrest.    He said More's custodial interrogation was not essential because the court had given sufficient time to police to conduct investigations.    He submitted the investigating officer has recovered the bat from Rakhi and that nothing more was required to be recovered from his client. He pleaded to send his client in magisterial custody.    The court after hearing both sides came to the conclusion that the custodial interrogation of the suspect was essential to conduct further investigations.    The prosecution's case is that Chaitanya died due to internal multiple injuries on August 5.      ||PUNE
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Gangster-with-pistol-arrested-in-Chennai/articleshow/48460550.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:15 IST 2015||CHENNAI: Police arrested a notorious gangster, C D Mani, from Medavakkam on Tuesday and seized weapons, including a pistol, from him. Police said he was rounded up from a hide-out in Medavakkam along with three accomplices. Mani is accused in eight murder cases. He used to sell CDs on Thomas Road and thus acquired the title.     He was detained under Goondas Act four times and was last held in 2013. His detention was set aside in 2014 after which he immediately went underground. Police said he is involved in murder, extortion, real estate fraud and threatening.     Police was on the lookout for him in a case in which Recently, he allegedly hurled a crude bomb on a building constructed by Jaganathan, 48, of Kumaran Colony, West Saidapet, once a history-sheeter. Jaganathan, also an associate of 'Punk' Kumar, who was killed in an encounter in 2006, has a long-running feud with Mani's gang.||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/kolkata/Man-found-dead-at-mall-parking-lot/articleshow/48460422.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:15 IST 2015||KOLKATA: The blood-spattered body of a 25-year-old was found in the parking lot of South City Mall on Wednesday evening. Police can't say yet if it was accident, suicide or murder.     The victim was identified as Arkaprabha Dey, a resident of Alipore Road. Around 8.15pm, shoppers and security guards spotted his body lying in a pool of blood in the parking lot. He was taken to AMRI Hospital in Dhakuria where he was declared dead on arrival. "The circumstances point to suicide but all angles are being probed," said a police officer.     Mall employees are being questioned and police have sought CCTV footage of the mall to trace Dey's movements. Officers are speaking to close relatives to find out if he was depressed and if he gone to the mall by himself or with someone.     This is not the first unnatural death in the high-end South City complex. At least six persons have fallen to their deaths from the housing complex adjoining the mall.||KOLKATA
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/RSP-MPs-letter-to-Sushma-on-Indian-convict-hogs-Lok-Sabha-limelight/articleshow/48460362.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:15 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: An innocuous letter written by RSP member N K Premachandran seeking government aid for a murder convict in Oman unexpectedly hogged the limelight during the debate in Lok Sabha on Wednesday, eventually allowing BJP to score a point on "humanitarian grounds".     The issue came up when Premachandran attacked foreign minister Sushma Swaraj for continuing in office when she had violated the Constitution by facilitating travel papers for Lalit Modi.     He said Swaraj's "favour" for Modi had violated the oath of the Constitution that a minister takes by saying "I shall discharge my official duties without fear or favour and without ill-will or affection".     Interrupting his speech, Swaraj said since Premachandran had said that acting on "humanitarian grounds'' was a violation of the Constitution, why had he sought her intervention on the same grounds for a murder convict who was in an Omani prison for the last 18 years.     Taking offence, Premachandran said comparing him to Lalit Modi was unfair. "The minister is equating me with Lalit Modi. But the situation is entirely different. Here, Lalit Modi requested the minister, and without informing the ministry, without informing the prime minister, without informing the finance minister, without informing the mission in London, she directed to give the travel documents,'' he said.     Within minutes, Congress vice-president Rahul Gandhi sought to know what had happened to the plea. Responding on behalf of the government, finance minister Arun Jaitley made a scathing attack, "The difficulty with Rahul Gandhi is that he is an expert without knowledge. So, without knowing the case, he is presuming that Shrimati Sushmaji only wanted to help one man and not these persons.''     Jaitley went on to elaborate how the murder convict, Madhavan Pillai, and two other Indians were serving life sentence in an Omani jail since 1997 and the efforts made by the Indian government to petition for a reduction in their jail term.     However, Premachandran caught the eye with his brief speech, largely because Congressmen found his articulation of reasons for seeking the foreign minister's resignation better than that of their own party. Also, because of the way he put forth his argument despite being given only a brief while to speak.     Premachandran said Swaraj assured the UK that travel documents for Lalit Modi would not affect bilateral relations because the UPA government had told the country that helping the former IPL boss would definitely impact the relationship.     Questioning Swaraj's "humanitarian consideration" argument, the Kerala MP said, "If Dawood Ibrahim is in Dubai or Pakistan, his wife is ailing in Mumbai... will travel documents be provided to Dawood on humanitarian ground so that he can travel to India to assist his wife? Is it proper?"     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Realtor-fired-at-by-three-men-on-bike/articleshow/48460297.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:15 IST 2015||MUMBAI: Five rounds of bullets were fired at a property developer in Nalasopara by three bike-borne men around 11.45 pm on Tuesday.     Javed Ansari (29) and his friend were having a drink when the trio, known to Ansari, came along. One of the pillion riders fired at Ansari, another assaulted his friend with glass bottles. Ansari,who was hit on the hand and abdomen, is in a serious condition.     The police said that enmity over some property is a possible cause for the firing.     This incident comes a day after a real-estate agent riding a two-wheeler was shot dead in Bhayander, allegedly by his friend riding pillion on the same motorbike.     A case of attempt to murder has been registered against the unidentified trio at Tuling police station. A search has been launched for the shooter, based on the details given by Ansari's friend.||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/ahmedabad/Serial-killer-caught-in-double-trap/articleshow/48460192.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:15 IST 2015||AHMEDABAD: Kirti Gemar, a serial killer recently arrested for three murders including that of two dentist brothers and a gas agency manager, had planned to escape the long arms of the law, Bollywood style.     Kirti had spotted his lookalike at a tea stall whom he later befriended. The lookalike — a factory-worker named Shyam Prasad Yadav from UP — lived in Chatral. Kirti's plan was to kill Yadav after committing his last robbery with him, and thus become a 'dead man' in police records.     Crime branch officials told TOI that Kirti failed to execute his nefarious plan as the police got a tip off just a few days back about Kirti coming to the city.     "In the raid that followed, the police nabbed 'Kirti' but were surprised to hear him speaking in Hindi with a prominent UP accent," said a source in the police.     Sources further said that Kirti is known to speak with a heavy Gujarati accent.     "It was then that we realized that we had caught the wrong man," said a police official. "When the police asked where Kirti was, Yadav quickly pointed at the serial killer who was running away as he had seen the police coming. He was nabbed and his game plan was foiled." Both Yadav and Kirti were arrested as they had planned a robbery together, said a crime branch official.     "Till the last moment, Yadav had no knowledge of Kirti's plan to kill him to become a 'dead man' in police records," said a police official.     Incidentally, it is interesting how Kirti persuaded Yadav to share a room with him.     "He told Yadav that he was alone and did not have money to pay for a rented room by himself," said a police official. "Yadav was convinced because Kirti promised to pay half the rent."     Later, Kirti also persuaded him to commit a robbery so that they could overcome their financial problems. "It was only after the robbery that Kirti had planned to eliminate Yadav, his lookalike," said a police official. Incidentally, Kirti is booked in three other murder cases besides the killing of two dentist brothers and the gas agency manager.||AHMEDABAD
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Woman-hubby-and-friend-get-life-for-killing-mother-over-property-row/articleshow/48460187.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:15 IST 2015||MUMBAI: A sessions court on Wednesday sentenced a woman, her husband and a friend to life imprisonment for killing her 55-year-old mother over a property dispute in 2013. The couple—Naina (28) and Atul Pawar (30)—and their friend Mangesh Bhosale were found guilty by judge AMA Khan.     Public prosecutor Sumesh Panjwani said among the 13 witnesses was the victim Kamal's niece Kranti Desai, who saw the incident. Kranti told the court that there were frequent fights between Naina and her mother. She said she lived in the same locality in Mankhurd as her aunt and used to go to sleep in her house at night. Kranti said on September 29, 2013, when she went to her aunt's house, she saw Naina, Atul and Mangesh having dinner. Soon, Atul and Mangesh left. Kranti said she fell asleep next to her aunt, but suddenly woke up and saw the victim had fallen off the bed. She alleged that she then saw Mangesh pressing her aunt's neck while Naina held her hand over her mouth. Kranti said when the accused saw her, they warned her not to reveal the incident to anyone. Then they went back to sleep. The next morning, they forced Kranti to go to her mother and say the victim was not waking up. When Kranti's mother arrived, she realised that the victim was dead. Naina told her that she had been complaining of chest pain before going to sleep. As funeral arrangements were underway, Kranti told her mother about the murder. The police were alerted and the trio fled. They were nabbed a week later.||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:15 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:15 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/SC-acquits-Romesh-Sharma-in-Budhiraja-murder-case/articleshow/48704930.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:15 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Thursday upheld the Delhi High Court order acquitting former Congress leader Romesh Sharma in the case relating to the killing of fashion designer Kunjum Budhiraja.     A bench of Justices Pinaki Chandra Ghose and R K Agrawal dismissed an appeal filed by the Delhi government challenging HC order.     The Delhi government contended that the HC had erred in acquitting Sharma but it was strongly opposed by his counsel and senior advocate Siddharth Luthra who submitted that his client was in love with Kunjum and there was no evidence to prove his involvement in the case.     Sharma, who was alleged to be a frontman of underworld don Dawood Ibrahim, was convicted by a trial court on February 15, 2008. Kunjum was killed on March 20, 1999 at Sharma's South Delhi-based 'Jai Mata Di' farm house by a group of hired gangsters from Uttar Pradesh.     The trial court had convicted Sharma and five other accused in the case and had awarded life term to all. The HC, however, acquitted Sharma and co-accused Tejendir Verdi but upheld conviction and sentence of other four accused— Sharma's nephew Surinder Mishra, Hemchand, Santram and Ramesh alias Bobby.     While acquitting Sharma, the HC had said "Romesh Sharma and Kunjum were in love, and desired the company of each other. It does not establish that Sharma had got fed up with her". It had turned down Delhi police's contention that Sharma wanted to get rid of Kunjum as she knew about his alleged illegal activities.     "A grieving lover falling over the body of his mate and performing the rituals of a marriage can well be an expression of lasting love, and need not necessarily be a drama," the HC had said.     Sharma was in judicial custody at the time of the Kunjum's murder.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Raid-on-Bengaluru-centre-reveals-horror-tales/articleshow/48704718.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:15 IST 2015||BENGALURU: A State Human Rights Commission raid on a de-addiction centre in Jnanabharati Layout, near Kengeri, southwest Bengaluru, found 90 inmates living in pathetic conditions and subjected to inhuman treatment.     Thursday's raid followed the murder of an inmate of another de-addiction centre in Kothanur recently.     The SHRC raid on Sri Santhosh Social Service Society, also known as 4S Society, followed a tipoff. According to SHRC officials, the centre has been in existence for seven years at least, but the society couldn't produce documents of having obtained permission from the social welfare department. Commission officials said the centre had the permission from the DC and the DHO.     "Most inmates are between 20 and 35 years. They showed us signs of being physically abused. The centre has violated other norms too. Although it's supposed to have one nurse for every 15 patients and at least one in-house doctor and a psychiatrist, it didn't have any," said an SHRC spokesperson.     4 arrested for killing inmate:     Kothanur police arrested a de-addiction centre staffer and three inmates for allegedly beating to death a 28-year-old inmate. Dinesh was admitted to the centre by his family as he was an alcoholic. He was later found dead in a hospital. Family members noticed several bruises on his body. Narayana, an inmate-turned-staffer, gave some medicines to Dinesh, who later turned aggressive. Narayana sought the help of inmates Suresh, Subhan and Simon, to subdue Dinesh.     When Dinesh retaliated, the quartet overpowered him till he became unconscious. He died in hospital.||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/A-jolly-good-fellow-say-Khannas-friends/articleshow/48704630.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:15 IST 2015||Sanjeev Khanna, Indrani Mukerjea's second husband and suspected ally in Sheena Bora's killing, may be the most surprising element in this macabre drama, but his friends and associates in Kolkata refused to cast aspersions on "Sanju" just yet.     From being the biggest dart enthusiast at one of Kolkata's poshest clubs (the CC&FC) to having a finger in every pie, Sanjeev was everyone's "best mate" and go-to guy who friends described as: "A doer... someone who could get things done."     The morning after Khanna's arrest, TOI spoke to Ajay Rawla, the man who Khanna worked for as a consultant and whose house he was picked up from on Wednesday afternoon. "It wasn't like he was hiding like a desperate fugitive in my house. We had a meeting in the morning after which he drove me home and that's when news broke on television. We were sitting, watching, wondering what steps to take when the police arrived," explained Rawla.     Seven years his senior, Khanna's association with Rawla dates back to the time they went to Mayo College in Ajmer. Later, Khanna went on to become an aide for Rawla's pet projects. Besides running his own business in wireless communications, Khanna was there setting up chef Shaun Kenworthy and Rawla's restaurant 1658 or immersed in the heritage project of converting the Bawali Rajbari into a hotel. "He was getting all the construction work and labourers in place. He was very good in helping out with permissions through his connections with excise and contractors," remembers Kenworthy.     Khanna, who seldom missed his outings at the club, motor rallies and horse racing as a prominent face in the social circuit, was not the same man before he met Indrani, recounts Bull Banthia, a close friend. "Well-read and well-versed, Sanju had a great mechanical mind with a solution for everything," is how Bull chose to describe his "jolly good friend who loved meeting new people, hung out at the club but wasn't a social climber". "It was Indrani who emerged as this socialite and drove him to consciously build contacts with those higher up in the social rung after marriage," said the Kolkata-based entrepreneur. "That's the reason why I distanced myself from them until overnight she left Kolkata with their daughter and Sanju's wallet."     While Indrani never surfaces in conversations, his daughter Vidhie, who stayed with Indrani, is a fond subject with his friends. "He would miss his daughter but was resigned to fate, hoping that someday she would find him," said Rawla, adding, "It was Vidhie who called Sanjeev on Wednesday to give him the news."     No one seems to know about any recent interaction between Khanna and Indrani. G M Kapur, a known name in Kolkata who was Intach's state convener and happens to be Khanna's "mama", seemed disturbed with "all the theorizing" of Khanna's role in the crime. He declined to look back on Indrani and Khanna's relationship but added, "The last that there was any contact with Indrani or her family was when Vidhie visited Calcutta last year to celebrate the 75th birthday of her grandmother (Khanna's mother who lives with him)."     Khanna's Facebook posts on "karma" in the weeks and months following Sheena's alleged murder on April 24, 2012, make for interesting reading. On April 30, Khanna shared photo messages: "Say whatever, whenever the f*** you want to"; "Sometimes I get so weird, I even freak myself out".     On May 24, exactly a month after the alleged killing, he wrote: "You can never tell what people are thinking and feeling unless they tell you, and usually they lie. you ask them, 'Whats wrong?' and they say 'Nothing'. You accept this because it's easier than digging for the truth. People smile when they want to cry, they laugh when they want to scream and shout. They pretend like nothing is wrong because they don't want to face the truth. Things aren't always rainbows and butterflies, sometimes you gotta scream and cry your anger and sadness to the world, because you can only hold it in for so long before something in you snaps. so when you want to cry, cry. When you want to scream, scream. Don't hide behind fake smiles, it's ok to not be alright."     ||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Sheena-docu-Michail-add-to-mystery/articleshow/48701752.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:15 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Michail, Sheena's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered have raised a number of unanswered questions.    Two days after his mother, Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Michail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai Police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed that what he gave to police was enough to prove that Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora (who are actually parents of Indrani) as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. Some questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukherjea.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Michail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43 as mentioned in reports after her arrest.    Adding more to the suspense, Michail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Michail studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board examination, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that knew that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard that her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard that she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband who she introduced as Peter Mukherjea."    The two-member Mumbai Police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Michail, who on Wednesday, was the first one to reveal that Sheena was Indrani's daughter, twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Michail's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Michail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukherjae is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Michail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."  ||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Grandparents-are-Sheenas-mom-dad-on-birth-certificate/articleshow/48704559.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:15 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Mikhail, Sheena Bora's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered led to some unanswered questions on Thursday.    Two days after his mother Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Mikhail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed what he gave the police was enough to prove Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora, who are actually Indrani's parents, as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. However, many questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter. In many cases in India involving single mothers, grandparents are known to put in their names as father and mother.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukerjea, that is, 13 years after Sheena was born.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Mikhail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43.    Mikhail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Mikhail     studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board exam, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband, who she introduced as Peter Mukerjea."    The two-member Mumbai police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Mikhail twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Mikhail 's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time, he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Mikhail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukerjea is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Mikhail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Sheena-bowled-us-over-Rahuls-uncle/articleshow/48704552.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:15 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: Had things worked out as desired for Peter Mukherjea's first wife Shabnam and her family in Dehradun, Rahul Mukherjea and Sheena Bora would have been married for over three years now.     Shabnam's brother Shaleen Singh told TOI on Thursday that in 2011 Rahul brought Sheena to their sprawling home in Dehradun to seek approval from the family for their marriage.     The entire family-Shabnam, her younger brother Shaleen, father Anand Singh and mother Seema-were reportedly bowled over by Sheena's jovial nature and affection towards the elderly people. Impressed, the family gave its "unqualified and unanimous approval" for the wedding, which was supposed to take place within a few months, said Shaleen.     Stunned by the recent development, Shaleen said, "Sheena was among those rare persons who left a deep and lifelong impact on people. She was good-looking, a sweet person, clean of heart and good to talk to. None of us objected to the wedding."     Shaleen learnt of Sheena's murder through news channels. "It would have been great if she had become a part of the family. I don't know what was the cause and motive behind the heinous crime, but all those behind the killing of the jovial-natured girl should not be spared at any cost," he said.     A former model and tele-actor, 49-year-old Shaleen today owns the Sanskar International school in Jogiwala here. He recalled the last meeting with Shabnam and Rahul in April this year. "My father Anand Singh passed away in April. They had come to pay their respects but we did not interact much."     However, Shaleen said of late the interaction between him and his sister Shabnam was limited. Although Shabnam's farm Gul-e-Shabnam and Shaleen's residence Shankar Sadan are barely 200 metres away in Badripur, meetings between them were rare. While Shaleen and his mother stay on different floors of Shankar Sadan, Shabnam stays alone at her residence and is frequently visited by Rahul.     "There are matters in each family which we do not want to disclose. We are not against each other but do not interact much. She comes to meet our mother occasionally," said Shaleen, adding that Shabnam was passionate about painting and had a studio in her residence.     Shaleen denied having any details about the presence of Mumbai police in Dehradun. "Neither Doon police nor Mumbai police have contacted me over the issue."     Staff at Shabnam's residence said she was out-of-station but they were not aware of her whereabouts.||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Kilpauk-doctor-murder-Hubby-to-approach-court/articleshow/48704411.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:15 IST 2015||CHENNAI: It's been four days since police claimed to have solved the murder of S Sathya, 24, a PG medical student. However, her husband has put forth questions that police have failed to answer. Though investigating officers confirmed Sathya was not sexually assaulted before she was killed, they leaked to some section of media saying that they changed their stance on Wednesday and said there were indications of attempt to rape on the deceased.     Police personnel revealed the details soon after Sathya's husband Dr P Sesu, also employed at a primary health centre in Perambalur, expressed certain doubts.     He alleged the police hastily solved the case citing the state assembly, which is in motion. Sathya was found dead at her house in Kilpauk on August 20.     On August 23, police arrested Harintham Depnath, a BTech graduate, who lived at the second floor on the same apartment. Neither was there any mention about sexual assault or attempt on Sathya when the body was recovered from the house. The nor did the doctors. Police didn't tell this during the arrest of Depnath on August 23. "What forced the police to reveal about the sexual harassment attempt on my wife now?" asked Sesu.     "I want to live a peaceful life with my two sons - Tamil Nesan, 6, and Karmugilan, 4. The studies and the future of my children is important for me. I do respect the police personnel who spent sleepless nights to solve the murder, but there are questions that need to be answered," he said.     "I live in Perambalur with my children, but we speak through live video calls. I have told my sons that Sathya has gone to the God, as the Almighty likes her more. "Hereafter, we cannot speak or meet her. I don't know how far my children will admit it?" said Sesu. "I will approach the court seeking a fair probe into the murder of my wife. I want to find out the real cause behind her death. I want the real accused to get punished for his deed," said Sesu.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Woman-strangles-husbands-lover/articleshow/48704388.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:15 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A woman beat up and strangled her husband's partner, an assistant professor at a polytechnic in Choolaimedu, in their Thiruverkadu home on Thursday, police said. A court later remanded the accused, 32-year-old Shruti, in judicial custody.     Police said Sambasivam, a professor at Panimalar Engineering College in Poonamallee, used to bring Rajalakshmi, home frequently and introduced her to his wife Shruti as a colleague. He even dropped her home at night. The polytechnic where Rajalakshmi worked was part of the Panimalar group of educational institutions. Shruti initially believed the two were just colleagues until Sambasivam came home with Rajalakshmi on Tuesday and said the woman was moving in with them permanently.     On Wednesday morning, Sambasivam allegedly tied a 'mangalsutra' to Rajalakshmi in front of his wife, police said, based on Shruti's confession. A shocked Shruti picked up a fight with Sambasivam who asked her to maintain a cordial relationship and take care of Rajalakshmi. On Thursday morning, after he left for college a fight broke out between the two women.     Police said Rajalakshmi allegedly abused Sruthi and went into the bathroom. Sruthi followed her in and strangled her with the 'mangalsutra'. She then tried to make it appear that the woman had fainted in the bathroom. She took her in an autorickshaw to a nearby hospital where she was declared 'brought dead'. Doctors who noticed a few marks around her neck informed the Thiruverkadu police who registered a case of suspicious death under CrPC section 176.     The body was sent for postmortem to Kilpauk Medical College and Hospital.     After finding that the two women were at home at the time of the death, police interrogated Sruthi for more than an hour but she continued to maintain that Rajyalakshmi had died of injuries sustained when she fell down in the bathroom.     "She confessed to the murder when we told her that her fingerprints had been lifted from the scene of crime," said an investigating officer. "She said she had smashed the woman's head against the wall and later strangled her with the 'thali'." Police altered the case to murder and arrested Sruthi.     Initial inquiries revealed that Rajalakshmi had been married to a man named Rajasekhar for a while and they had separated. She then got married to Suresh, a relative who worked in a private firm, a few years ago and the couple moved into a house in Mogappair.     They allegedly had frequent quarrels as he tortured her and she left him too, police found.     Rajalakshmi then got a job with Panimalar Engineering College where she met Sambasivam. The two became friends and began seeing each other. Rajalakshmi recently moved to the polytechnic in Choolaimedu, police said.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/US-journalists-killer-annoyed-colleagues-Ex-boss/articleshow/48704167.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:15 IST 2015||ROANOKE, United States: The disgruntled former US television station employee who murdered two journalists had "annoyed" colleagues but showed no signs at work of any mental health issues, his former boss said Thursday.     Vester Lee Flanagan, 41, worked as a reporter for WDBJ in Roanoke, Virginia from March 2012 to February 2013, but was dismissed for poor performance and angry behavior, general manager Jeffrey Marks said.     On Wednesday, Flanagan shot and killed two of the CBS affiliate's journalists while they were conducting an on-air interview. He later fatally shot himself.     "We are still at a loss to figure out what happened to him in those two and a half years" since he was fired, Marks told a news conference flanked by dozens of staff, many of them holding hands.     "I don't think we identified that he had mental health issues. We certainly identified that he had performance issues."     Marks defended the station's hiring record and said its parent company had "a very elaborate program to screen employees."     Flanagan passed background checks and came with only positive references, Marks said.     It was only after he was hired, Marks said, that things went downhill.     "Vester's behavior annoyed a lot of people in the news station," Marks said.     Flanagan, who went by the on-screen name Bryce Williams, alleged in a manifesto faxed to ABC News that he was discriminated against as a gay, black journalist.     Marks said accusations in 2013 that he was treated unfairly were "immediately investigated and found to be without merit."     During his employment, Flanagan complied with demands that he seek medical help, but he was ultimately dismissed.     He was escorted from the building by police and made an ominous aside to the news director -- handing him a wooden cross and saying "'you'll need this'," Marks said.     As he left, he also made a "derogatory comment" to Adam Ward, the cameraman he shot dead on Wednesday.     Flanagan filed a complaint with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and a civil action suit, which were dismissed, he said.     "All of these investigations determined that no reasonable person would have taken any of the cited incidents as discrimination or harassment."     After killing Ward and reporter Alison Parker live on the air, Flanagan posted a video of the attack on social media.||ROANOKE, UNITED STATES
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:15 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/SC-acquits-Romesh-Sharma-in-Budhiraja-murder-case/articleshow/48704930.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:15 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Thursday upheld the Delhi High Court order acquitting former Congress leader Romesh Sharma in the case relating to the killing of fashion designer Kunjum Budhiraja.     A bench of Justices Pinaki Chandra Ghose and R K Agrawal dismissed an appeal filed by the Delhi government challenging HC order.     The Delhi government contended that the HC had erred in acquitting Sharma but it was strongly opposed by his counsel and senior advocate Siddharth Luthra who submitted that his client was in love with Kunjum and there was no evidence to prove his involvement in the case.     Sharma, who was alleged to be a frontman of underworld don Dawood Ibrahim, was convicted by a trial court on February 15, 2008. Kunjum was killed on March 20, 1999 at Sharma's South Delhi-based 'Jai Mata Di' farm house by a group of hired gangsters from Uttar Pradesh.     The trial court had convicted Sharma and five other accused in the case and had awarded life term to all. The HC, however, acquitted Sharma and co-accused Tejendir Verdi but upheld conviction and sentence of other four accused— Sharma's nephew Surinder Mishra, Hemchand, Santram and Ramesh alias Bobby.     While acquitting Sharma, the HC had said "Romesh Sharma and Kunjum were in love, and desired the company of each other. It does not establish that Sharma had got fed up with her". It had turned down Delhi police's contention that Sharma wanted to get rid of Kunjum as she knew about his alleged illegal activities.     "A grieving lover falling over the body of his mate and performing the rituals of a marriage can well be an expression of lasting love, and need not necessarily be a drama," the HC had said.     Sharma was in judicial custody at the time of the Kunjum's murder.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Raid-on-Bengaluru-centre-reveals-horror-tales/articleshow/48704718.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:15 IST 2015||BENGALURU: A State Human Rights Commission raid on a de-addiction centre in Jnanabharati Layout, near Kengeri, southwest Bengaluru, found 90 inmates living in pathetic conditions and subjected to inhuman treatment.     Thursday's raid followed the murder of an inmate of another de-addiction centre in Kothanur recently.     The SHRC raid on Sri Santhosh Social Service Society, also known as 4S Society, followed a tipoff. According to SHRC officials, the centre has been in existence for seven years at least, but the society couldn't produce documents of having obtained permission from the social welfare department. Commission officials said the centre had the permission from the DC and the DHO.     "Most inmates are between 20 and 35 years. They showed us signs of being physically abused. The centre has violated other norms too. Although it's supposed to have one nurse for every 15 patients and at least one in-house doctor and a psychiatrist, it didn't have any," said an SHRC spokesperson.     4 arrested for killing inmate:     Kothanur police arrested a de-addiction centre staffer and three inmates for allegedly beating to death a 28-year-old inmate. Dinesh was admitted to the centre by his family as he was an alcoholic. He was later found dead in a hospital. Family members noticed several bruises on his body. Narayana, an inmate-turned-staffer, gave some medicines to Dinesh, who later turned aggressive. Narayana sought the help of inmates Suresh, Subhan and Simon, to subdue Dinesh.     When Dinesh retaliated, the quartet overpowered him till he became unconscious. He died in hospital.||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/A-jolly-good-fellow-say-Khannas-friends/articleshow/48704630.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:15 IST 2015||Sanjeev Khanna, Indrani Mukerjea's second husband and suspected ally in Sheena Bora's killing, may be the most surprising element in this macabre drama, but his friends and associates in Kolkata refused to cast aspersions on "Sanju" just yet.     From being the biggest dart enthusiast at one of Kolkata's poshest clubs (the CC&FC) to having a finger in every pie, Sanjeev was everyone's "best mate" and go-to guy who friends described as: "A doer... someone who could get things done."     The morning after Khanna's arrest, TOI spoke to Ajay Rawla, the man who Khanna worked for as a consultant and whose house he was picked up from on Wednesday afternoon. "It wasn't like he was hiding like a desperate fugitive in my house. We had a meeting in the morning after which he drove me home and that's when news broke on television. We were sitting, watching, wondering what steps to take when the police arrived," explained Rawla.     Seven years his senior, Khanna's association with Rawla dates back to the time they went to Mayo College in Ajmer. Later, Khanna went on to become an aide for Rawla's pet projects. Besides running his own business in wireless communications, Khanna was there setting up chef Shaun Kenworthy and Rawla's restaurant 1658 or immersed in the heritage project of converting the Bawali Rajbari into a hotel. "He was getting all the construction work and labourers in place. He was very good in helping out with permissions through his connections with excise and contractors," remembers Kenworthy.     Khanna, who seldom missed his outings at the club, motor rallies and horse racing as a prominent face in the social circuit, was not the same man before he met Indrani, recounts Bull Banthia, a close friend. "Well-read and well-versed, Sanju had a great mechanical mind with a solution for everything," is how Bull chose to describe his "jolly good friend who loved meeting new people, hung out at the club but wasn't a social climber". "It was Indrani who emerged as this socialite and drove him to consciously build contacts with those higher up in the social rung after marriage," said the Kolkata-based entrepreneur. "That's the reason why I distanced myself from them until overnight she left Kolkata with their daughter and Sanju's wallet."     While Indrani never surfaces in conversations, his daughter Vidhie, who stayed with Indrani, is a fond subject with his friends. "He would miss his daughter but was resigned to fate, hoping that someday she would find him," said Rawla, adding, "It was Vidhie who called Sanjeev on Wednesday to give him the news."     No one seems to know about any recent interaction between Khanna and Indrani. G M Kapur, a known name in Kolkata who was Intach's state convener and happens to be Khanna's "mama", seemed disturbed with "all the theorizing" of Khanna's role in the crime. He declined to look back on Indrani and Khanna's relationship but added, "The last that there was any contact with Indrani or her family was when Vidhie visited Calcutta last year to celebrate the 75th birthday of her grandmother (Khanna's mother who lives with him)."     Khanna's Facebook posts on "karma" in the weeks and months following Sheena's alleged murder on April 24, 2012, make for interesting reading. On April 30, Khanna shared photo messages: "Say whatever, whenever the f*** you want to"; "Sometimes I get so weird, I even freak myself out".     On May 24, exactly a month after the alleged killing, he wrote: "You can never tell what people are thinking and feeling unless they tell you, and usually they lie. you ask them, 'Whats wrong?' and they say 'Nothing'. You accept this because it's easier than digging for the truth. People smile when they want to cry, they laugh when they want to scream and shout. They pretend like nothing is wrong because they don't want to face the truth. Things aren't always rainbows and butterflies, sometimes you gotta scream and cry your anger and sadness to the world, because you can only hold it in for so long before something in you snaps. so when you want to cry, cry. When you want to scream, scream. Don't hide behind fake smiles, it's ok to not be alright."     ||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Sheena-docu-Michail-add-to-mystery/articleshow/48701752.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:15 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Michail, Sheena's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered have raised a number of unanswered questions.    Two days after his mother, Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Michail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai Police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed that what he gave to police was enough to prove that Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora (who are actually parents of Indrani) as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. Some questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukherjea.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Michail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43 as mentioned in reports after her arrest.    Adding more to the suspense, Michail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Michail studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board examination, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that knew that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard that her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard that she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband who she introduced as Peter Mukherjea."    The two-member Mumbai Police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Michail, who on Wednesday, was the first one to reveal that Sheena was Indrani's daughter, twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Michail's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Michail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukherjae is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Michail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."  ||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Grandparents-are-Sheenas-mom-dad-on-birth-certificate/articleshow/48704559.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:15 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Mikhail, Sheena Bora's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered led to some unanswered questions on Thursday.    Two days after his mother Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Mikhail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed what he gave the police was enough to prove Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora, who are actually Indrani's parents, as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. However, many questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter. In many cases in India involving single mothers, grandparents are known to put in their names as father and mother.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukerjea, that is, 13 years after Sheena was born.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Mikhail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43.    Mikhail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Mikhail     studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board exam, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband, who she introduced as Peter Mukerjea."    The two-member Mumbai police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Mikhail twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Mikhail 's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time, he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Mikhail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukerjea is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Mikhail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Sheena-bowled-us-over-Rahuls-uncle/articleshow/48704552.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:15 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: Had things worked out as desired for Peter Mukherjea's first wife Shabnam and her family in Dehradun, Rahul Mukherjea and Sheena Bora would have been married for over three years now.     Shabnam's brother Shaleen Singh told TOI on Thursday that in 2011 Rahul brought Sheena to their sprawling home in Dehradun to seek approval from the family for their marriage.     The entire family-Shabnam, her younger brother Shaleen, father Anand Singh and mother Seema-were reportedly bowled over by Sheena's jovial nature and affection towards the elderly people. Impressed, the family gave its "unqualified and unanimous approval" for the wedding, which was supposed to take place within a few months, said Shaleen.     Stunned by the recent development, Shaleen said, "Sheena was among those rare persons who left a deep and lifelong impact on people. She was good-looking, a sweet person, clean of heart and good to talk to. None of us objected to the wedding."     Shaleen learnt of Sheena's murder through news channels. "It would have been great if she had become a part of the family. I don't know what was the cause and motive behind the heinous crime, but all those behind the killing of the jovial-natured girl should not be spared at any cost," he said.     A former model and tele-actor, 49-year-old Shaleen today owns the Sanskar International school in Jogiwala here. He recalled the last meeting with Shabnam and Rahul in April this year. "My father Anand Singh passed away in April. They had come to pay their respects but we did not interact much."     However, Shaleen said of late the interaction between him and his sister Shabnam was limited. Although Shabnam's farm Gul-e-Shabnam and Shaleen's residence Shankar Sadan are barely 200 metres away in Badripur, meetings between them were rare. While Shaleen and his mother stay on different floors of Shankar Sadan, Shabnam stays alone at her residence and is frequently visited by Rahul.     "There are matters in each family which we do not want to disclose. We are not against each other but do not interact much. She comes to meet our mother occasionally," said Shaleen, adding that Shabnam was passionate about painting and had a studio in her residence.     Shaleen denied having any details about the presence of Mumbai police in Dehradun. "Neither Doon police nor Mumbai police have contacted me over the issue."     Staff at Shabnam's residence said she was out-of-station but they were not aware of her whereabouts.||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Kilpauk-doctor-murder-Hubby-to-approach-court/articleshow/48704411.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:15 IST 2015||CHENNAI: It's been four days since police claimed to have solved the murder of S Sathya, 24, a PG medical student. However, her husband has put forth questions that police have failed to answer. Though investigating officers confirmed Sathya was not sexually assaulted before she was killed, they leaked to some section of media saying that they changed their stance on Wednesday and said there were indications of attempt to rape on the deceased.     Police personnel revealed the details soon after Sathya's husband Dr P Sesu, also employed at a primary health centre in Perambalur, expressed certain doubts.     He alleged the police hastily solved the case citing the state assembly, which is in motion. Sathya was found dead at her house in Kilpauk on August 20.     On August 23, police arrested Harintham Depnath, a BTech graduate, who lived at the second floor on the same apartment. Neither was there any mention about sexual assault or attempt on Sathya when the body was recovered from the house. The nor did the doctors. Police didn't tell this during the arrest of Depnath on August 23. "What forced the police to reveal about the sexual harassment attempt on my wife now?" asked Sesu.     "I want to live a peaceful life with my two sons - Tamil Nesan, 6, and Karmugilan, 4. The studies and the future of my children is important for me. I do respect the police personnel who spent sleepless nights to solve the murder, but there are questions that need to be answered," he said.     "I live in Perambalur with my children, but we speak through live video calls. I have told my sons that Sathya has gone to the God, as the Almighty likes her more. "Hereafter, we cannot speak or meet her. I don't know how far my children will admit it?" said Sesu. "I will approach the court seeking a fair probe into the murder of my wife. I want to find out the real cause behind her death. I want the real accused to get punished for his deed," said Sesu.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Woman-strangles-husbands-lover/articleshow/48704388.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:15 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A woman beat up and strangled her husband's partner, an assistant professor at a polytechnic in Choolaimedu, in their Thiruverkadu home on Thursday, police said. A court later remanded the accused, 32-year-old Shruti, in judicial custody.     Police said Sambasivam, a professor at Panimalar Engineering College in Poonamallee, used to bring Rajalakshmi, home frequently and introduced her to his wife Shruti as a colleague. He even dropped her home at night. The polytechnic where Rajalakshmi worked was part of the Panimalar group of educational institutions. Shruti initially believed the two were just colleagues until Sambasivam came home with Rajalakshmi on Tuesday and said the woman was moving in with them permanently.     On Wednesday morning, Sambasivam allegedly tied a 'mangalsutra' to Rajalakshmi in front of his wife, police said, based on Shruti's confession. A shocked Shruti picked up a fight with Sambasivam who asked her to maintain a cordial relationship and take care of Rajalakshmi. On Thursday morning, after he left for college a fight broke out between the two women.     Police said Rajalakshmi allegedly abused Sruthi and went into the bathroom. Sruthi followed her in and strangled her with the 'mangalsutra'. She then tried to make it appear that the woman had fainted in the bathroom. She took her in an autorickshaw to a nearby hospital where she was declared 'brought dead'. Doctors who noticed a few marks around her neck informed the Thiruverkadu police who registered a case of suspicious death under CrPC section 176.     The body was sent for postmortem to Kilpauk Medical College and Hospital.     After finding that the two women were at home at the time of the death, police interrogated Sruthi for more than an hour but she continued to maintain that Rajyalakshmi had died of injuries sustained when she fell down in the bathroom.     "She confessed to the murder when we told her that her fingerprints had been lifted from the scene of crime," said an investigating officer. "She said she had smashed the woman's head against the wall and later strangled her with the 'thali'." Police altered the case to murder and arrested Sruthi.     Initial inquiries revealed that Rajalakshmi had been married to a man named Rajasekhar for a while and they had separated. She then got married to Suresh, a relative who worked in a private firm, a few years ago and the couple moved into a house in Mogappair.     They allegedly had frequent quarrels as he tortured her and she left him too, police found.     Rajalakshmi then got a job with Panimalar Engineering College where she met Sambasivam. The two became friends and began seeing each other. Rajalakshmi recently moved to the polytechnic in Choolaimedu, police said.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/US-journalists-killer-annoyed-colleagues-Ex-boss/articleshow/48704167.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:15 IST 2015||ROANOKE, United States: The disgruntled former US television station employee who murdered two journalists had "annoyed" colleagues but showed no signs at work of any mental health issues, his former boss said Thursday.     Vester Lee Flanagan, 41, worked as a reporter for WDBJ in Roanoke, Virginia from March 2012 to February 2013, but was dismissed for poor performance and angry behavior, general manager Jeffrey Marks said.     On Wednesday, Flanagan shot and killed two of the CBS affiliate's journalists while they were conducting an on-air interview. He later fatally shot himself.     "We are still at a loss to figure out what happened to him in those two and a half years" since he was fired, Marks told a news conference flanked by dozens of staff, many of them holding hands.     "I don't think we identified that he had mental health issues. We certainly identified that he had performance issues."     Marks defended the station's hiring record and said its parent company had "a very elaborate program to screen employees."     Flanagan passed background checks and came with only positive references, Marks said.     It was only after he was hired, Marks said, that things went downhill.     "Vester's behavior annoyed a lot of people in the news station," Marks said.     Flanagan, who went by the on-screen name Bryce Williams, alleged in a manifesto faxed to ABC News that he was discriminated against as a gay, black journalist.     Marks said accusations in 2013 that he was treated unfairly were "immediately investigated and found to be without merit."     During his employment, Flanagan complied with demands that he seek medical help, but he was ultimately dismissed.     He was escorted from the building by police and made an ominous aside to the news director -- handing him a wooden cross and saying "'you'll need this'," Marks said.     As he left, he also made a "derogatory comment" to Adam Ward, the cameraman he shot dead on Wednesday.     Flanagan filed a complaint with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and a civil action suit, which were dismissed, he said.     "All of these investigations determined that no reasonable person would have taken any of the cited incidents as discrimination or harassment."     After killing Ward and reporter Alison Parker live on the air, Flanagan posted a video of the attack on social media.||ROANOKE, UNITED STATES
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/goa/4-held-for-murdering-man-at-Velsao-beach/articleshow/48459353.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:20 IST 2015||VASCO: Verna police arrested two women and two men for allegedly murdering a 35-year-old man Vijay Shrivastava from Birla at Velsao beach.    The body of Shrivastava was found near the Consua chapel on Tuesday morning. While investigating the case, police found that the deceased was murdered at Velsao beach and his body was dumped at Consua. Verna police registered a case of unnatural death in this connection.    It is alleged that the deceased used to harass the main accused who is a widow and mother of two kids to get married to him. Police said that the deceased was assaulted with the intention of teaching him a lesson, but he later succumbed to his injuries.        A lifeguard from Velsao beach helped the police to crack the case. He gave police the rickshaw number in which the body was transferred from Velsao to Consua. He also told them that two women and one man were assaulting the victim.        Police first succeeded in arresting rickshaw driver Samashekarappa Yemmetti, 23, of Birla. Later, the main accused Renuka Chavan, 35, her friend Meenadevi Yadav, 35, and her husband Mulchandra Yadav, 52, were arrested. All are residents of Zuarinagar, Birla.        Police said that the deceased worked as a helper for fishing trawlers at Velsao beach and Chavan came there to buy fish to resell it in the market. The deceased used to harass Chavan and tried forcing her to get married to him.    Unable to bear the harassment any longer, Chavan decided to teach him a lesson with help from her friends. On Monday at around 3:30pm they assaulted him at Velsao beach. When they realised that he was dead they called Yemmetti to dispose off his body.    Verna police inspector Shailesh Narvekar said that they have arrested them under Section 302, 201 read with 34 of IPC.    ||VASCO
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/BJP-turns-defence-into-attack-as-House-finally-debates-Lalitgate/articleshow/48459841.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:20 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: Marked by verbal pyrotechnics, slogan shouting and aggressive body language, the showdown over 'Lalitgate' in the Lok Sabha on Wednesday saw BJP, on the back foot for much of the monsoon session, hit back at Congress with some keen legal arguments and sharp oratory to pin it down over UPA's record of scams.Surprised at the government accepting Congress leader Mallikarjuna Kharge's adjournment motion, the opposition party was also fairly isolated with non-NDA parties ranging from BJD, AIADMK, TRS, INLD to AAP slamming Congress for disruptionist tactics while reminding the party of the UPA legacy of Commonwealth, 2G and the Coalgate scams.Foreign minister Sushma Swaraj, at the receiving end of Rahul Gandhi's accusations that her family benefitted monetarily from controversial ex-IPL chief Lalit Modi, did not hesitate to return fire. "I want to tell Rahul Gandhi, you love going on vacations. On your next vacation, when you are alone, read the history of your family and come back and ask 'Mamma, how much money did we get in the Quattrocchi incident?'" Swaraj said referring to the Bofors bribery case.Pressing on, Swaraj turned to Warren Anderson, a key figure in the Bhopal gas tragedy case, being allowed to get away from India and said: "If someone had done something clandestinely, it is their government which helped Quattrocchi and Anderson get away."Rahul had his moments during a brief speech when he targeted PM Narendra Modi for being absent. Claiming the PM had failed to deliver on his pledge to stop corruption, he said: "Today, he (PM) does not have the guts to sit in the House." People had believed the PM's election promise that he wouldn't accept a bribe nor would he let anyone take a bribe. But he had failed to make good that pledge, Rahul said.The Congress leader reiterated his charge that Swaraj's family had received money from Lalit Modi and recalled a personal encounter where the minister hadn't been able to meet his eye after he told her he was speaking the truth about her association with the former IPL boss. "You held my hand and asked why are you angry with me. I said I am speaking the truth," Rahul said.But apart from a few flashes, Congress found itself outgunned during the debate with BJP leaders like Finance Minister Arun Jaitley mixing legal arguments on the IPL case with political barbs. "You ran a failed, corrupt government. So, now you are sabotaging India's growth story," Jaitley said. Congress, having staged a walkout, didn't exercise its right to reply to Jaitley's speech and missed out on having the last word.Jaitley said the Congress-led UPA government had built a "make believe" case against the fallen cricket czar, one that had little chance of bringing him to justice. It was the NDA that had moved against Lalit Modi on a case where he could soon be a fugitive and face extradition.Responding to allegations of money making against Swaraj's family, Jaitley slammed Rahul, saying: "The difficulty with him is that he is an expert without knowledge." Suggesting that the Gandhi family's purported sense of entitlement obscured it from seeing that children of most families had to work for their living, the finance minister said Swaraj had offered a comprehensive personal defence.While Swaraj claimed her daughter was just one of many junior lawyers who had worked for a firm hired by Lalit Modi, Jaitley said: "They (Gandhis) have mastered the art of living comfortably without working for a living."Though Congress MPs kept up the din while Swaraj was speaking with some even attempting to obstruct her till they were foiled by some BJP members, the opposition party was discomfited by lack of support in the House. Many parties criticized Congress, saying disruption of Parliament over its demand for the resignations of Swaraj and the CMs of Rajasthan and Madhya Pradesh had prevented other issues from being raised.Interestingly, even allies like the one-MP MIM was unhappy with Congress. "I don't know why Congress agreed to this debate. I wonder whether it was a chilli or a laddoo offered by parliamentary affairs minister Venkaiah Naidu that made Congress change its stance," MIM leader Asaduddin Owaisi said.Larger regional parties like BJD and AIADMK were critical of Congress blocking Parliament. "We have not learnt how to jump in and out of the well unscathed," BJD leader Bhartruhari Mahtab told Congress benches. When he was heckled, Mahtab responded by saying "That is the problem, you do not understand that the government must protect the people and their wealth and not loot them."||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/delhi/Cellmates-beat-undertrial-to-death-in-Tihar/articleshow/48459779.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:20 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: Four Tihar inmates killed their cellmate, an undertrial, on Tuesday night with iron bars ripped out of a window. The murderous attack in the prison's high-security ward lasted close to 10 minutes.The victim, Deepak Sharma, 30, was going to sleep in jail 8-9 when he was accosted and mercilessly stabbed and beaten to death. Sharma, a resident of Vikaspuri cluster, was listed as a "bad character" in police records and was behind bars since 2013. He had three robbery and dacoity cases against his name.The attackers have been identified as Sat Pal Bedi, Manpreet Singh, Riyaz and Suraj, investigators said. The deadly assault took place around 9.55pm, well after lockdown. The killers were lodged in barrack B4 of high-security ward 5.The main accused in Tuesday night's attack, Bedi, is a life convict and an accused in two other murder cases. Singh has two cases of murder against his name — one in Tihar and the other outside. Riyaz too is a murder accused and Suraj has two cases of robbery and dacoity.Warders and senior jail authorities got to know of the incident around10.15pm. The police were informed an hour later.A guard heard Sharma scream and rushed in to stop the attackers. The victim, who had deep, bleeding gashes on his head, face, around his eyes and hands, was rushed to DDU Hospital. But he was dead by the time he was wheeled in, police said.The attackers had first thrashed Sharma with their bare hands and then stabbed him repeatedly with the iron rods. It was probably a fight for supremacy, police said. The iron bars used in the attack had been carefully sharpened, indicating that the killers had made meticulous preparations.Sharma, sources said, was initially friendly with his attackers. Later, he distanced himself and formed a rival group.An inquiry is on to figure out how the attackers managed to break pieces of an iron window and crafted improvised weapons out of them."We have shifted Bedi to an isolation cell and tightened security. Checks are stricter now. The victim had never complained of intimidation or harassment. Had he given any such hint we would have kept him away from the killers," DIG (Prisons) Mukesh Prasad said. A murder case has been registered at Hari Nagar police station.Sharma's body was sent for post-mortem on Wednesday but none from his family had arrived till Wednesday evening to claim it.Police said the victim's parents had died long ago. If no relative claims the body, the police will allow the autopsy and initiate process of cremation.||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/delhi/I-will-grow-old-in-jail-said-killer/articleshow/48459697.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:20 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: "I have spent my childhood and youth here, and now I will even grow old here (in Tihar)." Jailed for the past 13 years, this was the statement given by 37-year-old Sat Pal Bedi during interrogation.    Sources said Bedi is not at all remorseful of what happened on Tuesday night and has reportedly confessed to attacking the undertrial, Deepak.    A resident of Inderpuri Camp, he was out on parole and returned to Tihar in 2008. He hatched the plan to attack Deepak while the others helped him, police said.    Due to his notorious nature Bedi has been punished more than 25 times while in prison, but he hasn't learnt a lesson, said a jail official. Lodged in the high security ward, he had developed a crime syndicate.    The three accused and the deceased undertrial were also inside the same barrack and were supposedly the best of friends.    They were seen together during activity time and had formed a gang, sources said. With two cases of murder against him, Bedi has been convicted to life imprisonment twice. If proved, Deepak's murder will be his third.    He had been brought to Tihar from Rohini jail when a reshuffle of inmates was done. A senior official said that when he was in Rohini jail, he had badly injured himself and blamed jail authorities for it.    "He cut himself up with a blade and even branded himself with hot iron rods. When he was presented in court, he told the judge that the jail authorities had poured boiling oil on him. An FIR was filed in the case but during investigation his lie was nailed. We then got the FIR cancelled," said a senior jail official on the condition of anonymity.    Living in jail for quite some time now, Bedi has developed a supremacy over other inmates.    He wanted to teach Deepak a lesson as he had started keeping away from the gang, sources said.  ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/lucknow/Keeping-dear-departed-alive-in-needy-strangers/articleshow/48459690.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:20 IST 2015||LUCKNOW: When tragedy strikes, such a call can become all the more challenging. "The moment I saw my father Dharamveer Pandey (52) after the accident, I knew it was the end," said Deepika Pandey (24), a police constable. While her father was in the ICU at the Trauma Centre at the King George's Medical University, she came to know about one Lalta Prasad whose family had donated his organs for transplant. Dr Peeyush Shrivastava helped her understand more. "I decided immediately that if my father didn't survive, I will donate his organs," she said, adding, "Thus, even in his death, my father saved three lives."    Terming it as best form of charity, Deepika recalled how her mother had reacted. "She was told about it only after the funeral pyre cooled but later, she was grateful to be the wife of a man who was helpful to people in life as well as after death," she said.    MCom second year student Suraj Sahu (22) convinced his relatively not-so-educated family for organ donation of his uncle Braj Bihari after he was declared brain dead at KGMU. "Dr Vijay Gupta counseled me," recalled Suraj, adding, "Papa was reluctant, thinking it would bring family disrepute if society misconstrued that we sold chacha's organs for money. But I made him see that it was about saving people's life." Suraj said other family members objected to 'tearing of body' which they described as unholy. But Suraj convinced all there was nothing more sacred than saving lives through organ donation. The liver was sent immediately to a poor patient in Delhi by air ambulance while kidneys were donated to two others. "We later met Navina Gupta from Allahabad, who received one of the kidneys. There was no end to her gratitude. Navina had given up hope but we made it possible for her to live. She gave us infinite blessings," said Suraj.    KGMU is the only center in north India providing cadaveric organ donation so far. It has successfully undertaken 10 procedures giving life to 25 patients. All donor families have urged government to support the programme.    The stories of donations inspired Sanjeev Kumar (31), a plumber to donate organs of his maternal uncle, Badluram, who was murdered in Kakori earlier this year. "The thought of being able to save other lives was very satisfying," said Sanjeev, who took pains to convince the family. "The liver was sent to Delhi. One of the kidneys was sent for a woman in SGPGI and the other to KGMU." he said.      NO GREATER LOVE    Ruchika (18) and her grandmother Kamlapati (65), don't just share blood and DNA, but also an organ. In August 2014, Kamlapati donated one of her kidneys to Ruchika, whose own had failed in 2012. "I only wanted to save my child, even at the risk of my life. Of what consequence was my life if something happened to her. She is young and has to see life," said Kamlapati. Ruchika is now in her final year of graduation from Gorakhpur University.  ||LUCKNOW
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/lucknow/Infidelity-led-to-pvt-executives-murder/articleshow/48459488.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:20 IST 2015||LUCKNOW: Infidelity, friendship-gone-sour, and a raging determination to restore 'family honour'— The story behind the murder of private company executive Rajesh Srivastava, gunned down last week, has all the ingredients to inspire a sleazy B-town potboiler. With the arrest of two persons who were part of the plot to eliminate Rajesh, police have discovered that unlike most crimes of passion that are instantaneous, the buildup to this murder was prolonged and several efforts had been made to prevent it.    Father of a young daughter himself, Rajesh was involved romantically with a friend's wife. His wife and mother were aware of illicit relationship, but could do nothing to stop him. His friends had warned him too, but he paid no heed to them.    Rajesh and Ajeet Mishra used to work at a computer and hardware material store located across IIM Bypass road in Madiaon. Ajeet later switched over to a finance company as human resource manager. The two, however, remained friends and visited each other's house. Incidentally, Ajeet's wife and Rajesh, both belonged to Bahraich and happened to be in the same bus during a visit to their native district almost a year ago. "Rajesh sat next to the woman and the two exchanged cellphone numbers," said SSP Rajesh Pandey. Within a few weeks, the two started 'sexting' each other and got drawn into an affair. Rajesh kept recording intimate phone calls and also clicked photographs of the woman.    One day, Ajeet's neighbour told him that Rajesh had been visiting his Preetinagar house regularly in his absence. "When Ajeet confronted Rajesh, instead of apologizing, Rajesh described Ajeet as weak, impotent and a dalla (pimp). He also played out the phone recordings and showed Ajeet the photographs," said sub-inspector Ranbahadur Singh from city's crime branch who worked on the case.    Vowing revenge, Ajeet, his elder brother Ankit and friends Pradeep and Saurabh hatched a conspiracy to eliminate Rajesh. Both Pradeep and Saurabh were also from Madiaon area. Ankit ran a cosmetics and undergarments store at Keshavnagar and being eldest in the family after father's death, wanted to restore the family's honour and save his brother from further embarrassment.    On August 7, Pradeep and Saurabh allegedly invited Rajesh to a liquor shop. As Rajesh was heading back home heavily drunk, Ankit confronted him on IIM Road and killed him with a countrymade firearm. Police on Wednesday nabbed Ankit and Saurabh and recovered the firearm used in the crime. Efforts to trace Ajeet and Pradeep were on. Police said Pradeep and Saurabh would be booked for criminal conspiracy to murder while the remaining two have been charged for murder.    The Mishra family hails from Lakhimpur. Ajeet, like Rajesh, has a young daughter, said police.  ||LUCKNOW
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/lucknow/Chowk-police-detain-3-for-questioning-in-Raza-murder-case/articleshow/48459405.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:20 IST 2015||LUCKNOW: On the basis of cellphone call records, Chowk police detained three persons on Wednesday for questioning. Though police tried hard to break Laiq Abbas down, the history-sheeter booked in 40 criminal cases did not reveal the name of his aide. Through a network of informers and with the help of CCTV footage, the police managed to identify his aide.    On Tuesday, Abbas along with another person had shot down Taqi Raza, the caretaker of Shia Wakf board property and owner of a school at Victoria Street, around 7am. The two were at loggerheads over a piece of land under the Wakf Board. Police have secured CCTV footage from a house located next to the scene of the crime.    "On developing it, we have got a name. The person used to work for Abbas in the past and had been summoned for this job," added a police officer working on the case. The people who remained in touch with Abbas before the murder have been detained for questioning. The police officer did not divulge the name of the aide.    Jawad accuses Wakf Board of sheltering mafia    Shia cleric Maulana Kalbe Jawad has accused the Shia Central Wakf Board of sheltering mafia that lead to the murderous end of advocate Taqi Raza on Tuesday. He alleged the Board of inaction against the encroachment activity on wakf land, Nazim Sahab ka Imambara, for several years. "Had the Board been harsh against the usurper since the beginning, the incident would not have occurred," he said. Responding to the allegation, Waseem Rizvi, chairperson, Shia Central Wakf Board said, "The assailant Laiq Abbas and others like him have the hand of Maulana Kalbe Jawad over them, because of which they commit anti social activities."  ||LUCKNOW
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bhopal/I-Day-freedom-State-to-create-record-by-releasing-671-prisoners/articleshow/48458623.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:20 IST 2015||BHOPAL: First time in 59 years on Independence Day, Madhya Pradesh will set a record by setting free 671 convicts, including three women, who were sentenced to life for murder. The convicts will be released from 33 different jails of the state. Of 671 prisoners to be released, a maximum of 96 will be released from Gwalior, followed by Jabalpur with 90 murder convicts. Seventy-five prisoners serving life term will be released from Bhopal followed by Ujjain with 59 murder convicts. Around 100 of those to be freed are 60 years of age or above. Those who will be released have completed 14 years in jail.     Life-term convicts are released every Independence Day and Republic Day since 1956, barring a few occasions. Number of murder convicts released on Independence Day is a quantum leap this year as no prisoners were released in 2014 and 2015.     Tamil Nadu government's arbitrary decision in February 2014 to release those convicted in assassination of former Prime Minister Rajiv Gandhi had created the impasse as it was done without the nod of CBI, the agency investigating Rajiv Gandhi murder case.     The then government at the Centre had approached Supreme Court against the Tamil Nadu government's decision after which apex court suspended release of prisoners, notwithstanding quantum of sentence served.     The states appealed against the decision and in its interim order recently, Supreme Court permitted state governments to release prisoners in cases investigated by a state investigative agency. It paved the way for release of 671 prisoners in Madhya Pradesh.     State governments are vested with powers under Sections 432 and 433 of CrPC to release a life convict after completion of 14 years in jail even though life imprisonment, which technically means to be behind bars till death.     Earlier, deputy inspector general (prisons) R S Vijayvargiya said life convicts were granted clemency, but now as per directive of apex court, a prisoner has to make an appeal for his release, which will be first considered at a district level committee, comprising district collector, superintendent of police, deputy director persecution and jail superintendent. If the committee finds it suitable, the appeal of a prisoner would be forwarded at jail headquarters here and final orders will be issued accordingly, he said.||BHOPAL
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Aghast-LS-Speaker-says-frequent-disruptions-damaging-for-democracy/articleshow/48457899.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:20 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: Speaker Sumitra Mahajan on Wednesday said Congress was "wrong" in obstructing external affairs minister Sushma Swaraj when she spoke in Lok Sabha and said she felt "aghast" at the frequent disruptions which are "damaging" for democracy.She suggested that her decision to have the Lok Sabha TV show opposition members shouting slogans in the well and carrying placards might have played a role in their agreeing to a discussion on the Lalit Modi row allegedly involving Swaraj."You (Congress) have said what you want. Now you are obstructing the minister (Swaraj) from replying ... That was very much wrong," she told Karan Thapar on India Today.Asked about the disruption by BJP members when Congress vice-president Rahul Gandhi spoke, she said that was a "retaliation".Mahajan said she was with those who felt "disillusioned" at the disruptions in Parliament leading to a virtual washout of the monsoon session and said she wanted to stop members from rushing to the well and carrying placards."If I can do these two things, I will consider my speakership successful," she said. "Having such unruly behaviour of members, I am also aghast. We have not come here for this. May be, it is damaging to democracy I agree with this," Sumitra Mahajan said. Told that such disruptions had occurred earlier, including by BJP, she said "obstruction is never good" and she was trying to make a start.Blaming Congress for the impasse, she said the main opposition did not come to the meeting called by her on the request of Samajwadi Party leader Mulayam Singh Yadav and insisted on its "first resignation, then discussion" demand.She had suspended 25 Congress members because of their "persistent" disruption as she wanted to show "mirrors" to members."People must learn. Parliament has some rules and they must be followed," she said.Mahajan, however, added that she did not feel happy using the cane and does not want another such episode of suspension.Asked about the Congress's charge that she acted under the government's pressure, she said that it was not in her nature that somebody can run her and also added that she would not shy away from taking action against ruling NDA members if faced with a similar situation.She said she felt bad but not angry at the protests attacking her, including by youth Congress members outside her home.||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/ahmedabad/Gova-Rabari-wanted-to-run-an-extortion-racket-from-Jail/articleshow/48455270.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:20 IST 2015||AHMEDABAD: Crime branch officials suspect that Gova Rabari, serving a life term in Vadadara jail had ordered for two pistols and live cartridges for his men outside jail to run a extortion racket. City crime branch sleuths on Sunday arrested Gaurav Tomar, native of Murena in Madhya Pradesh with two pistols and 16 live cartridges.     Crime branch officials said Gova Rabari, presently serving a life term at Vadodara Central Jail in the sensational Chetan Patel (Battery) murder case, which took place within the premises of Sabarmati Central Jail in August 2005 had asked Tomar to arrange for the weapons when the two met in Vadodara Jail.     Tomar, a member of dreaded Vishal Goswami gang was held by city crime branch earlier this year for firing on the car of the owners of Nand jewellers, which is located on CG Road.     Tomar later was bailed out. However the city police detained him under the Prevention of Anti Social Activities act and was sent to Vadodara jail, where he and Gova met.     Deputy commissioner of police, crime branch Deepan Bhadran sadi Gova in the jail had asked him to arrange for weapons for his men.     "Later on coming out the jail Tomar made a trip to Murena and brought the weapons. He was to hand the weapons to one Sagar Rabari, who working at Gova's office at Jashodanagar in Amraiwadi" added Bhadran.     However before Tomar could hand over the weapons and ammunition to Sagar Rabari he was nabbed by the crime branch officials.     Assistant commissioner of police, crime branch KN Patel said they suspect that Gova Rabari wanted to run extortion racket from the jail premises through his men outside and that is why he wanted weapons.     "We are also probing whether Gova wanted to eliminate someone or not," added ACP Patel.     On the other hand cops also suspect that, that one of his gang member Vishal Naik, also a convict in the Chetan Battery murder case had recently jumped furlough and is still on the run. "The weapons could well might be for him" added Patel.     Naik, while lodged in Sabarmati Central jail had created sensation by stating that some Jail officials are hands in gloves with the inmates and are running illegal phone centers from the jail.     Vishal Naik was then shifted to Lajpor central jail in Surat.     "Following the accusations an SIT was constituted by Police Commissioner Shivanand Jha but was later dissolved suspiciously," said a senior police official. City crime branch has launched a hunt for Vishal Naik across the State. "We have got his locations several times but by the time we reach he is gone," said a crime branch official.     DCP Bhadran added that they will arrest Gova Rabari on transfer warrant from the Vadodara central jail. "At the same time we will also hunt for Vishal Naik," added Bhadran.     ||AHMEDABAD
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:20 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:20 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/SC-acquits-Romesh-Sharma-in-Budhiraja-murder-case/articleshow/48704930.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:20 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Thursday upheld the Delhi High Court order acquitting former Congress leader Romesh Sharma in the case relating to the killing of fashion designer Kunjum Budhiraja.     A bench of Justices Pinaki Chandra Ghose and R K Agrawal dismissed an appeal filed by the Delhi government challenging HC order.     The Delhi government contended that the HC had erred in acquitting Sharma but it was strongly opposed by his counsel and senior advocate Siddharth Luthra who submitted that his client was in love with Kunjum and there was no evidence to prove his involvement in the case.     Sharma, who was alleged to be a frontman of underworld don Dawood Ibrahim, was convicted by a trial court on February 15, 2008. Kunjum was killed on March 20, 1999 at Sharma's South Delhi-based 'Jai Mata Di' farm house by a group of hired gangsters from Uttar Pradesh.     The trial court had convicted Sharma and five other accused in the case and had awarded life term to all. The HC, however, acquitted Sharma and co-accused Tejendir Verdi but upheld conviction and sentence of other four accused— Sharma's nephew Surinder Mishra, Hemchand, Santram and Ramesh alias Bobby.     While acquitting Sharma, the HC had said "Romesh Sharma and Kunjum were in love, and desired the company of each other. It does not establish that Sharma had got fed up with her". It had turned down Delhi police's contention that Sharma wanted to get rid of Kunjum as she knew about his alleged illegal activities.     "A grieving lover falling over the body of his mate and performing the rituals of a marriage can well be an expression of lasting love, and need not necessarily be a drama," the HC had said.     Sharma was in judicial custody at the time of the Kunjum's murder.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Raid-on-Bengaluru-centre-reveals-horror-tales/articleshow/48704718.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:20 IST 2015||BENGALURU: A State Human Rights Commission raid on a de-addiction centre in Jnanabharati Layout, near Kengeri, southwest Bengaluru, found 90 inmates living in pathetic conditions and subjected to inhuman treatment.     Thursday's raid followed the murder of an inmate of another de-addiction centre in Kothanur recently.     The SHRC raid on Sri Santhosh Social Service Society, also known as 4S Society, followed a tipoff. According to SHRC officials, the centre has been in existence for seven years at least, but the society couldn't produce documents of having obtained permission from the social welfare department. Commission officials said the centre had the permission from the DC and the DHO.     "Most inmates are between 20 and 35 years. They showed us signs of being physically abused. The centre has violated other norms too. Although it's supposed to have one nurse for every 15 patients and at least one in-house doctor and a psychiatrist, it didn't have any," said an SHRC spokesperson.     4 arrested for killing inmate:     Kothanur police arrested a de-addiction centre staffer and three inmates for allegedly beating to death a 28-year-old inmate. Dinesh was admitted to the centre by his family as he was an alcoholic. He was later found dead in a hospital. Family members noticed several bruises on his body. Narayana, an inmate-turned-staffer, gave some medicines to Dinesh, who later turned aggressive. Narayana sought the help of inmates Suresh, Subhan and Simon, to subdue Dinesh.     When Dinesh retaliated, the quartet overpowered him till he became unconscious. He died in hospital.||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/A-jolly-good-fellow-say-Khannas-friends/articleshow/48704630.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:20 IST 2015||Sanjeev Khanna, Indrani Mukerjea's second husband and suspected ally in Sheena Bora's killing, may be the most surprising element in this macabre drama, but his friends and associates in Kolkata refused to cast aspersions on "Sanju" just yet.     From being the biggest dart enthusiast at one of Kolkata's poshest clubs (the CC&FC) to having a finger in every pie, Sanjeev was everyone's "best mate" and go-to guy who friends described as: "A doer... someone who could get things done."     The morning after Khanna's arrest, TOI spoke to Ajay Rawla, the man who Khanna worked for as a consultant and whose house he was picked up from on Wednesday afternoon. "It wasn't like he was hiding like a desperate fugitive in my house. We had a meeting in the morning after which he drove me home and that's when news broke on television. We were sitting, watching, wondering what steps to take when the police arrived," explained Rawla.     Seven years his senior, Khanna's association with Rawla dates back to the time they went to Mayo College in Ajmer. Later, Khanna went on to become an aide for Rawla's pet projects. Besides running his own business in wireless communications, Khanna was there setting up chef Shaun Kenworthy and Rawla's restaurant 1658 or immersed in the heritage project of converting the Bawali Rajbari into a hotel. "He was getting all the construction work and labourers in place. He was very good in helping out with permissions through his connections with excise and contractors," remembers Kenworthy.     Khanna, who seldom missed his outings at the club, motor rallies and horse racing as a prominent face in the social circuit, was not the same man before he met Indrani, recounts Bull Banthia, a close friend. "Well-read and well-versed, Sanju had a great mechanical mind with a solution for everything," is how Bull chose to describe his "jolly good friend who loved meeting new people, hung out at the club but wasn't a social climber". "It was Indrani who emerged as this socialite and drove him to consciously build contacts with those higher up in the social rung after marriage," said the Kolkata-based entrepreneur. "That's the reason why I distanced myself from them until overnight she left Kolkata with their daughter and Sanju's wallet."     While Indrani never surfaces in conversations, his daughter Vidhie, who stayed with Indrani, is a fond subject with his friends. "He would miss his daughter but was resigned to fate, hoping that someday she would find him," said Rawla, adding, "It was Vidhie who called Sanjeev on Wednesday to give him the news."     No one seems to know about any recent interaction between Khanna and Indrani. G M Kapur, a known name in Kolkata who was Intach's state convener and happens to be Khanna's "mama", seemed disturbed with "all the theorizing" of Khanna's role in the crime. He declined to look back on Indrani and Khanna's relationship but added, "The last that there was any contact with Indrani or her family was when Vidhie visited Calcutta last year to celebrate the 75th birthday of her grandmother (Khanna's mother who lives with him)."     Khanna's Facebook posts on "karma" in the weeks and months following Sheena's alleged murder on April 24, 2012, make for interesting reading. On April 30, Khanna shared photo messages: "Say whatever, whenever the f*** you want to"; "Sometimes I get so weird, I even freak myself out".     On May 24, exactly a month after the alleged killing, he wrote: "You can never tell what people are thinking and feeling unless they tell you, and usually they lie. you ask them, 'Whats wrong?' and they say 'Nothing'. You accept this because it's easier than digging for the truth. People smile when they want to cry, they laugh when they want to scream and shout. They pretend like nothing is wrong because they don't want to face the truth. Things aren't always rainbows and butterflies, sometimes you gotta scream and cry your anger and sadness to the world, because you can only hold it in for so long before something in you snaps. so when you want to cry, cry. When you want to scream, scream. Don't hide behind fake smiles, it's ok to not be alright."     ||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Sheena-docu-Michail-add-to-mystery/articleshow/48701752.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:20 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Michail, Sheena's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered have raised a number of unanswered questions.    Two days after his mother, Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Michail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai Police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed that what he gave to police was enough to prove that Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora (who are actually parents of Indrani) as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. Some questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukherjea.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Michail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43 as mentioned in reports after her arrest.    Adding more to the suspense, Michail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Michail studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board examination, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that knew that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard that her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard that she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband who she introduced as Peter Mukherjea."    The two-member Mumbai Police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Michail, who on Wednesday, was the first one to reveal that Sheena was Indrani's daughter, twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Michail's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Michail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukherjae is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Michail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."  ||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Grandparents-are-Sheenas-mom-dad-on-birth-certificate/articleshow/48704559.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:20 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Mikhail, Sheena Bora's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered led to some unanswered questions on Thursday.    Two days after his mother Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Mikhail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed what he gave the police was enough to prove Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora, who are actually Indrani's parents, as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. However, many questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter. In many cases in India involving single mothers, grandparents are known to put in their names as father and mother.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukerjea, that is, 13 years after Sheena was born.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Mikhail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43.    Mikhail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Mikhail     studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board exam, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband, who she introduced as Peter Mukerjea."    The two-member Mumbai police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Mikhail twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Mikhail 's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time, he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Mikhail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukerjea is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Mikhail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Sheena-bowled-us-over-Rahuls-uncle/articleshow/48704552.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:20 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: Had things worked out as desired for Peter Mukherjea's first wife Shabnam and her family in Dehradun, Rahul Mukherjea and Sheena Bora would have been married for over three years now.     Shabnam's brother Shaleen Singh told TOI on Thursday that in 2011 Rahul brought Sheena to their sprawling home in Dehradun to seek approval from the family for their marriage.     The entire family-Shabnam, her younger brother Shaleen, father Anand Singh and mother Seema-were reportedly bowled over by Sheena's jovial nature and affection towards the elderly people. Impressed, the family gave its "unqualified and unanimous approval" for the wedding, which was supposed to take place within a few months, said Shaleen.     Stunned by the recent development, Shaleen said, "Sheena was among those rare persons who left a deep and lifelong impact on people. She was good-looking, a sweet person, clean of heart and good to talk to. None of us objected to the wedding."     Shaleen learnt of Sheena's murder through news channels. "It would have been great if she had become a part of the family. I don't know what was the cause and motive behind the heinous crime, but all those behind the killing of the jovial-natured girl should not be spared at any cost," he said.     A former model and tele-actor, 49-year-old Shaleen today owns the Sanskar International school in Jogiwala here. He recalled the last meeting with Shabnam and Rahul in April this year. "My father Anand Singh passed away in April. They had come to pay their respects but we did not interact much."     However, Shaleen said of late the interaction between him and his sister Shabnam was limited. Although Shabnam's farm Gul-e-Shabnam and Shaleen's residence Shankar Sadan are barely 200 metres away in Badripur, meetings between them were rare. While Shaleen and his mother stay on different floors of Shankar Sadan, Shabnam stays alone at her residence and is frequently visited by Rahul.     "There are matters in each family which we do not want to disclose. We are not against each other but do not interact much. She comes to meet our mother occasionally," said Shaleen, adding that Shabnam was passionate about painting and had a studio in her residence.     Shaleen denied having any details about the presence of Mumbai police in Dehradun. "Neither Doon police nor Mumbai police have contacted me over the issue."     Staff at Shabnam's residence said she was out-of-station but they were not aware of her whereabouts.||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Kilpauk-doctor-murder-Hubby-to-approach-court/articleshow/48704411.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:20 IST 2015||CHENNAI: It's been four days since police claimed to have solved the murder of S Sathya, 24, a PG medical student. However, her husband has put forth questions that police have failed to answer. Though investigating officers confirmed Sathya was not sexually assaulted before she was killed, they leaked to some section of media saying that they changed their stance on Wednesday and said there were indications of attempt to rape on the deceased.     Police personnel revealed the details soon after Sathya's husband Dr P Sesu, also employed at a primary health centre in Perambalur, expressed certain doubts.     He alleged the police hastily solved the case citing the state assembly, which is in motion. Sathya was found dead at her house in Kilpauk on August 20.     On August 23, police arrested Harintham Depnath, a BTech graduate, who lived at the second floor on the same apartment. Neither was there any mention about sexual assault or attempt on Sathya when the body was recovered from the house. The nor did the doctors. Police didn't tell this during the arrest of Depnath on August 23. "What forced the police to reveal about the sexual harassment attempt on my wife now?" asked Sesu.     "I want to live a peaceful life with my two sons - Tamil Nesan, 6, and Karmugilan, 4. The studies and the future of my children is important for me. I do respect the police personnel who spent sleepless nights to solve the murder, but there are questions that need to be answered," he said.     "I live in Perambalur with my children, but we speak through live video calls. I have told my sons that Sathya has gone to the God, as the Almighty likes her more. "Hereafter, we cannot speak or meet her. I don't know how far my children will admit it?" said Sesu. "I will approach the court seeking a fair probe into the murder of my wife. I want to find out the real cause behind her death. I want the real accused to get punished for his deed," said Sesu.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Woman-strangles-husbands-lover/articleshow/48704388.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:20 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A woman beat up and strangled her husband's partner, an assistant professor at a polytechnic in Choolaimedu, in their Thiruverkadu home on Thursday, police said. A court later remanded the accused, 32-year-old Shruti, in judicial custody.     Police said Sambasivam, a professor at Panimalar Engineering College in Poonamallee, used to bring Rajalakshmi, home frequently and introduced her to his wife Shruti as a colleague. He even dropped her home at night. The polytechnic where Rajalakshmi worked was part of the Panimalar group of educational institutions. Shruti initially believed the two were just colleagues until Sambasivam came home with Rajalakshmi on Tuesday and said the woman was moving in with them permanently.     On Wednesday morning, Sambasivam allegedly tied a 'mangalsutra' to Rajalakshmi in front of his wife, police said, based on Shruti's confession. A shocked Shruti picked up a fight with Sambasivam who asked her to maintain a cordial relationship and take care of Rajalakshmi. On Thursday morning, after he left for college a fight broke out between the two women.     Police said Rajalakshmi allegedly abused Sruthi and went into the bathroom. Sruthi followed her in and strangled her with the 'mangalsutra'. She then tried to make it appear that the woman had fainted in the bathroom. She took her in an autorickshaw to a nearby hospital where she was declared 'brought dead'. Doctors who noticed a few marks around her neck informed the Thiruverkadu police who registered a case of suspicious death under CrPC section 176.     The body was sent for postmortem to Kilpauk Medical College and Hospital.     After finding that the two women were at home at the time of the death, police interrogated Sruthi for more than an hour but she continued to maintain that Rajyalakshmi had died of injuries sustained when she fell down in the bathroom.     "She confessed to the murder when we told her that her fingerprints had been lifted from the scene of crime," said an investigating officer. "She said she had smashed the woman's head against the wall and later strangled her with the 'thali'." Police altered the case to murder and arrested Sruthi.     Initial inquiries revealed that Rajalakshmi had been married to a man named Rajasekhar for a while and they had separated. She then got married to Suresh, a relative who worked in a private firm, a few years ago and the couple moved into a house in Mogappair.     They allegedly had frequent quarrels as he tortured her and she left him too, police found.     Rajalakshmi then got a job with Panimalar Engineering College where she met Sambasivam. The two became friends and began seeing each other. Rajalakshmi recently moved to the polytechnic in Choolaimedu, police said.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/US-journalists-killer-annoyed-colleagues-Ex-boss/articleshow/48704167.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:20 IST 2015||ROANOKE, United States: The disgruntled former US television station employee who murdered two journalists had "annoyed" colleagues but showed no signs at work of any mental health issues, his former boss said Thursday.     Vester Lee Flanagan, 41, worked as a reporter for WDBJ in Roanoke, Virginia from March 2012 to February 2013, but was dismissed for poor performance and angry behavior, general manager Jeffrey Marks said.     On Wednesday, Flanagan shot and killed two of the CBS affiliate's journalists while they were conducting an on-air interview. He later fatally shot himself.     "We are still at a loss to figure out what happened to him in those two and a half years" since he was fired, Marks told a news conference flanked by dozens of staff, many of them holding hands.     "I don't think we identified that he had mental health issues. We certainly identified that he had performance issues."     Marks defended the station's hiring record and said its parent company had "a very elaborate program to screen employees."     Flanagan passed background checks and came with only positive references, Marks said.     It was only after he was hired, Marks said, that things went downhill.     "Vester's behavior annoyed a lot of people in the news station," Marks said.     Flanagan, who went by the on-screen name Bryce Williams, alleged in a manifesto faxed to ABC News that he was discriminated against as a gay, black journalist.     Marks said accusations in 2013 that he was treated unfairly were "immediately investigated and found to be without merit."     During his employment, Flanagan complied with demands that he seek medical help, but he was ultimately dismissed.     He was escorted from the building by police and made an ominous aside to the news director -- handing him a wooden cross and saying "'you'll need this'," Marks said.     As he left, he also made a "derogatory comment" to Adam Ward, the cameraman he shot dead on Wednesday.     Flanagan filed a complaint with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and a civil action suit, which were dismissed, he said.     "All of these investigations determined that no reasonable person would have taken any of the cited incidents as discrimination or harassment."     After killing Ward and reporter Alison Parker live on the air, Flanagan posted a video of the attack on social media.||ROANOKE, UNITED STATES
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/mumbai/Indrani-driver-likely-to-be-approver-cell-locations-match-events/articleshow/48703153.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:20 IST 2015||Mumbai: Shyamvar Rai, the driver of Indrani Mukerjea who spilled the beans on Sheena Bora's murder, is almost certain to turn approver in the case, said police sources.     The police now claim he was not involved in the actual murder on April 24, 2012, but stood guard outside the car at Bandra's Land's End as Sheena was strangulated in the car. Later he helped dispose of the body.     City police commissioner Rakesh Maria, who has been handling the case personally, said on Thursday that they have traced the person who had forged Sheena's signatures on a letter of resignation sent to the Mumbai Metro authorities, her employer, and another letter to her landlord giving up her apartment. The person claimed to have acted at Indrani's behest and cops have copies of incriminating email exchange between the two. His statement has been recorded. Sheena's resignation letter was mailed on May 5 and the landlord got the letter in July.     An approver in legal terms means an accomplice to a crime who confesses his or her guilt and gives evidence against others involved, usually for a lesser punishment.     The police decision to turn him an approver is significant as evidence in the case so far seemed weak with the Raigad police not conducting a post-mortem on the charred body suspected to be Sheena's that they recovered in May 2012 to find out the cause of death. They did not preserve the body nor did they register a murder or Accidental Death Report as is mandatory. In this scenario, it could be challenging for the police to prove Sheena was murdered, sources said.     Rai, who was arrested last week in a case of illegal possession of a weapon, broke down during interrogation and told the police Indrani and her second husband Sanjeev Khanna strangulated Sheena while he kept watch outside the car in Bandra. The next day he drove them to Raigad and helped burn the corpse with petrol and dump it in the ravines. He said he acted on Indrani's instructions and received monetary benefits.     Asked if Rai would be turned approver, an officer said: "It is too early to say anything, but yes, we have kept that option open and will legally examine whether he will be helpful to the investigation.''     Rai's admission ties in with another important piece of evidence: the mobile call detail reports (CDR) of Sheena, Indrani, Rai and Khanna. The location in the reports confirmed Indrani, Rai and Khanna were at Land's End on April 24 and then travelled together to Raigad the next day.     On Thursday, Maria, with joint commissioner Deven Bharti, deputy commissioner (zone 7) Satyanarayan Choudhary interrogated Rai and Indrani together. They also supervised the teams that had gone to Guwhati and Kolkata, spending over 10 hours in Khar police station. Sheena's sibling Michail Bora and their grandparents' statements have been recorded. Khanna was brought from Kolkata to the city on Thursday night.     Based on interrogation details, police said Khanna brought sedatives from Kolkata which were mixed in water and Sheena was forced to drink it after she was pulled into the car near National College in Bandra on April 24. Once she passed out, she was strangulated by Indrani and Khanna. Then they drove to the Mukerjeas' family home in Worli and parked in the garage. Peter Mukerjea is believed to have been on holiday at that time. Next day, Indrani and her accomplices got a suitcase and stuffed Sheena's body into it along with old clothes and drove off for Raigad. In a secluded place, they burnt the suitcase with the body inside and dumped it into a ravine. It is emerging that Maria was tipped off about the murder two months ago and posted inspector Dinesh Kadam at Khar police station.     Sharda, Rai's wife, told reporters her husband was innocent. "My husband is scared of darkness. He never speaks to women. It's not possible he could have killed a woman," she said, adding that Rai used to work as an auto driver before joining Indrani's employment. The couple, who married in 2007, have an eight-year-old daughter and three-month-old son.     ||MUMBAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/SC-acquits-Romesh-Sharma-in-Budhiraja-murder-case/articleshow/48704930.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:20 IST 2015||NEW DELHI: The Supreme Court on Thursday upheld the Delhi High Court order acquitting former Congress leader Romesh Sharma in the case relating to the killing of fashion designer Kunjum Budhiraja.     A bench of Justices Pinaki Chandra Ghose and R K Agrawal dismissed an appeal filed by the Delhi government challenging HC order.     The Delhi government contended that the HC had erred in acquitting Sharma but it was strongly opposed by his counsel and senior advocate Siddharth Luthra who submitted that his client was in love with Kunjum and there was no evidence to prove his involvement in the case.     Sharma, who was alleged to be a frontman of underworld don Dawood Ibrahim, was convicted by a trial court on February 15, 2008. Kunjum was killed on March 20, 1999 at Sharma's South Delhi-based 'Jai Mata Di' farm house by a group of hired gangsters from Uttar Pradesh.     The trial court had convicted Sharma and five other accused in the case and had awarded life term to all. The HC, however, acquitted Sharma and co-accused Tejendir Verdi but upheld conviction and sentence of other four accused— Sharma's nephew Surinder Mishra, Hemchand, Santram and Ramesh alias Bobby.     While acquitting Sharma, the HC had said "Romesh Sharma and Kunjum were in love, and desired the company of each other. It does not establish that Sharma had got fed up with her". It had turned down Delhi police's contention that Sharma wanted to get rid of Kunjum as she knew about his alleged illegal activities.     "A grieving lover falling over the body of his mate and performing the rituals of a marriage can well be an expression of lasting love, and need not necessarily be a drama," the HC had said.     Sharma was in judicial custody at the time of the Kunjum's murder.     ||NEW DELHI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/bengaluru/Raid-on-Bengaluru-centre-reveals-horror-tales/articleshow/48704718.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:20 IST 2015||BENGALURU: A State Human Rights Commission raid on a de-addiction centre in Jnanabharati Layout, near Kengeri, southwest Bengaluru, found 90 inmates living in pathetic conditions and subjected to inhuman treatment.     Thursday's raid followed the murder of an inmate of another de-addiction centre in Kothanur recently.     The SHRC raid on Sri Santhosh Social Service Society, also known as 4S Society, followed a tipoff. According to SHRC officials, the centre has been in existence for seven years at least, but the society couldn't produce documents of having obtained permission from the social welfare department. Commission officials said the centre had the permission from the DC and the DHO.     "Most inmates are between 20 and 35 years. They showed us signs of being physically abused. The centre has violated other norms too. Although it's supposed to have one nurse for every 15 patients and at least one in-house doctor and a psychiatrist, it didn't have any," said an SHRC spokesperson.     4 arrested for killing inmate:     Kothanur police arrested a de-addiction centre staffer and three inmates for allegedly beating to death a 28-year-old inmate. Dinesh was admitted to the centre by his family as he was an alcoholic. He was later found dead in a hospital. Family members noticed several bruises on his body. Narayana, an inmate-turned-staffer, gave some medicines to Dinesh, who later turned aggressive. Narayana sought the help of inmates Suresh, Subhan and Simon, to subdue Dinesh.     When Dinesh retaliated, the quartet overpowered him till he became unconscious. He died in hospital.||BENGALURU
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/A-jolly-good-fellow-say-Khannas-friends/articleshow/48704630.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:20 IST 2015||Sanjeev Khanna, Indrani Mukerjea's second husband and suspected ally in Sheena Bora's killing, may be the most surprising element in this macabre drama, but his friends and associates in Kolkata refused to cast aspersions on "Sanju" just yet.     From being the biggest dart enthusiast at one of Kolkata's poshest clubs (the CC&FC) to having a finger in every pie, Sanjeev was everyone's "best mate" and go-to guy who friends described as: "A doer... someone who could get things done."     The morning after Khanna's arrest, TOI spoke to Ajay Rawla, the man who Khanna worked for as a consultant and whose house he was picked up from on Wednesday afternoon. "It wasn't like he was hiding like a desperate fugitive in my house. We had a meeting in the morning after which he drove me home and that's when news broke on television. We were sitting, watching, wondering what steps to take when the police arrived," explained Rawla.     Seven years his senior, Khanna's association with Rawla dates back to the time they went to Mayo College in Ajmer. Later, Khanna went on to become an aide for Rawla's pet projects. Besides running his own business in wireless communications, Khanna was there setting up chef Shaun Kenworthy and Rawla's restaurant 1658 or immersed in the heritage project of converting the Bawali Rajbari into a hotel. "He was getting all the construction work and labourers in place. He was very good in helping out with permissions through his connections with excise and contractors," remembers Kenworthy.     Khanna, who seldom missed his outings at the club, motor rallies and horse racing as a prominent face in the social circuit, was not the same man before he met Indrani, recounts Bull Banthia, a close friend. "Well-read and well-versed, Sanju had a great mechanical mind with a solution for everything," is how Bull chose to describe his "jolly good friend who loved meeting new people, hung out at the club but wasn't a social climber". "It was Indrani who emerged as this socialite and drove him to consciously build contacts with those higher up in the social rung after marriage," said the Kolkata-based entrepreneur. "That's the reason why I distanced myself from them until overnight she left Kolkata with their daughter and Sanju's wallet."     While Indrani never surfaces in conversations, his daughter Vidhie, who stayed with Indrani, is a fond subject with his friends. "He would miss his daughter but was resigned to fate, hoping that someday she would find him," said Rawla, adding, "It was Vidhie who called Sanjeev on Wednesday to give him the news."     No one seems to know about any recent interaction between Khanna and Indrani. G M Kapur, a known name in Kolkata who was Intach's state convener and happens to be Khanna's "mama", seemed disturbed with "all the theorizing" of Khanna's role in the crime. He declined to look back on Indrani and Khanna's relationship but added, "The last that there was any contact with Indrani or her family was when Vidhie visited Calcutta last year to celebrate the 75th birthday of her grandmother (Khanna's mother who lives with him)."     Khanna's Facebook posts on "karma" in the weeks and months following Sheena's alleged murder on April 24, 2012, make for interesting reading. On April 30, Khanna shared photo messages: "Say whatever, whenever the f*** you want to"; "Sometimes I get so weird, I even freak myself out".     On May 24, exactly a month after the alleged killing, he wrote: "You can never tell what people are thinking and feeling unless they tell you, and usually they lie. you ask them, 'Whats wrong?' and they say 'Nothing'. You accept this because it's easier than digging for the truth. People smile when they want to cry, they laugh when they want to scream and shout. They pretend like nothing is wrong because they don't want to face the truth. Things aren't always rainbows and butterflies, sometimes you gotta scream and cry your anger and sadness to the world, because you can only hold it in for so long before something in you snaps. so when you want to cry, cry. When you want to scream, scream. Don't hide behind fake smiles, it's ok to not be alright."     ||
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/guwahati/Sheena-docu-Michail-add-to-mystery/articleshow/48701752.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:20 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Michail, Sheena's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered have raised a number of unanswered questions.    Two days after his mother, Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Michail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai Police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed that what he gave to police was enough to prove that Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora (who are actually parents of Indrani) as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. Some questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukherjea.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Michail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43 as mentioned in reports after her arrest.    Adding more to the suspense, Michail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Michail studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board examination, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that knew that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard that her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard that she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband who she introduced as Peter Mukherjea."    The two-member Mumbai Police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Michail, who on Wednesday, was the first one to reveal that Sheena was Indrani's daughter, twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Michail's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Michail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukherjae is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Michail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."  ||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Grandparents-are-Sheenas-mom-dad-on-birth-certificate/articleshow/48704559.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:20 IST 2015||GUWAHATI: The persistent silence of Mikhail, Sheena Bora's younger brother, on the identity of their biological father and the manner in which his sister's birth certificate was registered led to some unanswered questions on Thursday.    Two days after his mother Indrani Mukherjea's arrest, Mikhail (25) on Thursday handed over a bunch of photographs and documents to Mumbai police officials who arrived here for investigation. He claimed what he gave the police was enough to prove Sheena was murdered for 'both honour and property'.    What raised many an eyebrow was the mention of Upendra Kumar Bora and Durga Ranee Bora, who are actually Indrani's parents, as father and mother of Sheena in her birth certificate. However, many questioned whether Indrani's parents lent their names to Sheena to protect their daughter. In many cases in India involving single mothers, grandparents are known to put in their names as father and mother.    Another thing that caught attention was the time when the birth certificate was issued. The certificate was made on April 30, 2002, the year Indrani married Peter Mukerjea, that is, 13 years after Sheena was born.    Sheena's birth certificate may also raise questions about Indrani's actual age. According to it, Sheena was born on February 11, 1989. Some of Indrani's close friends said she could be around 19 years old when she bore Sheena because she had passed her board examination from St Mary's (Guwahati) in 1985. A year and a half later, she gave birth to Mikhail. Presuming her to be 15 when she passed out, Indrani should be 45 now, not 43.    Mikhail refused to say anything about his and Sheena's birth certificates. Instead, he merely said, "I will soon reveal my biological father's name."    Teachers at Sudarshan School here, where Sheena and Mikhail     studied, said they only saw the children's grandparents. P Mishra, a mathematics teacher who was Sheena's tutor at home, said, "I never saw her parents. Sometimes, I would see her grandparents, who were old and caring."    The frequent change of place by Indrani after her board exam, too, raised suspicion about her life after school. One of her friends said, "After Indrani passed her board exam, we came to know that she had joined Cotton College in Guwahati. Then we heard her parents had sent her to Shillong for studies. A few years later, we heard she had borne two children. Then, she disappeared. In 2003, I bumped into her at Kolkata airport with her husband, who she introduced as Peter Mukerjea."    The two-member Mumbai police team, led by inspector Kedar Pawar, questioned Mikhail twice during the day. The first round of interrogation took place at Mikhail 's maternal grandparents' house where he and Sheena were raised. The second time, he was questioned at Dispur police station.    Before he was questioned by police, Mikhail said, "Only Indrani knows the actual motive behind Sheena's killing. I believe there are multiple possibilities. Sheena's relationship with Rahul Mukerjea is one of them. My mother did not like it. Property is another reason. I fear I might be the next target. She may try to acquire this (Guwahati) property."    Disowning his mother, Mikhail said, "The world knows about her multiple relationships that she had made for money and fame."    Pointing to a plot near his grandparents' place, he added, "My mother sold this plot a few years ago because she needed money to clear her loans. It was in my grandmother's name."||GUWAHATI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/Sheena-bowled-us-over-Rahuls-uncle/articleshow/48704552.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:20 IST 2015||DEHRADUN: Had things worked out as desired for Peter Mukherjea's first wife Shabnam and her family in Dehradun, Rahul Mukherjea and Sheena Bora would have been married for over three years now.     Shabnam's brother Shaleen Singh told TOI on Thursday that in 2011 Rahul brought Sheena to their sprawling home in Dehradun to seek approval from the family for their marriage.     The entire family-Shabnam, her younger brother Shaleen, father Anand Singh and mother Seema-were reportedly bowled over by Sheena's jovial nature and affection towards the elderly people. Impressed, the family gave its "unqualified and unanimous approval" for the wedding, which was supposed to take place within a few months, said Shaleen.     Stunned by the recent development, Shaleen said, "Sheena was among those rare persons who left a deep and lifelong impact on people. She was good-looking, a sweet person, clean of heart and good to talk to. None of us objected to the wedding."     Shaleen learnt of Sheena's murder through news channels. "It would have been great if she had become a part of the family. I don't know what was the cause and motive behind the heinous crime, but all those behind the killing of the jovial-natured girl should not be spared at any cost," he said.     A former model and tele-actor, 49-year-old Shaleen today owns the Sanskar International school in Jogiwala here. He recalled the last meeting with Shabnam and Rahul in April this year. "My father Anand Singh passed away in April. They had come to pay their respects but we did not interact much."     However, Shaleen said of late the interaction between him and his sister Shabnam was limited. Although Shabnam's farm Gul-e-Shabnam and Shaleen's residence Shankar Sadan are barely 200 metres away in Badripur, meetings between them were rare. While Shaleen and his mother stay on different floors of Shankar Sadan, Shabnam stays alone at her residence and is frequently visited by Rahul.     "There are matters in each family which we do not want to disclose. We are not against each other but do not interact much. She comes to meet our mother occasionally," said Shaleen, adding that Shabnam was passionate about painting and had a studio in her residence.     Shaleen denied having any details about the presence of Mumbai police in Dehradun. "Neither Doon police nor Mumbai police have contacted me over the issue."     Staff at Shabnam's residence said she was out-of-station but they were not aware of her whereabouts.||DEHRADUN
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Kilpauk-doctor-murder-Hubby-to-approach-court/articleshow/48704411.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:20 IST 2015||CHENNAI: It's been four days since police claimed to have solved the murder of S Sathya, 24, a PG medical student. However, her husband has put forth questions that police have failed to answer. Though investigating officers confirmed Sathya was not sexually assaulted before she was killed, they leaked to some section of media saying that they changed their stance on Wednesday and said there were indications of attempt to rape on the deceased.     Police personnel revealed the details soon after Sathya's husband Dr P Sesu, also employed at a primary health centre in Perambalur, expressed certain doubts.     He alleged the police hastily solved the case citing the state assembly, which is in motion. Sathya was found dead at her house in Kilpauk on August 20.     On August 23, police arrested Harintham Depnath, a BTech graduate, who lived at the second floor on the same apartment. Neither was there any mention about sexual assault or attempt on Sathya when the body was recovered from the house. The nor did the doctors. Police didn't tell this during the arrest of Depnath on August 23. "What forced the police to reveal about the sexual harassment attempt on my wife now?" asked Sesu.     "I want to live a peaceful life with my two sons - Tamil Nesan, 6, and Karmugilan, 4. The studies and the future of my children is important for me. I do respect the police personnel who spent sleepless nights to solve the murder, but there are questions that need to be answered," he said.     "I live in Perambalur with my children, but we speak through live video calls. I have told my sons that Sathya has gone to the God, as the Almighty likes her more. "Hereafter, we cannot speak or meet her. I don't know how far my children will admit it?" said Sesu. "I will approach the court seeking a fair probe into the murder of my wife. I want to find out the real cause behind her death. I want the real accused to get punished for his deed," said Sesu.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/chennai/Woman-strangles-husbands-lover/articleshow/48704388.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:20 IST 2015||CHENNAI: A woman beat up and strangled her husband's partner, an assistant professor at a polytechnic in Choolaimedu, in their Thiruverkadu home on Thursday, police said. A court later remanded the accused, 32-year-old Shruti, in judicial custody.     Police said Sambasivam, a professor at Panimalar Engineering College in Poonamallee, used to bring Rajalakshmi, home frequently and introduced her to his wife Shruti as a colleague. He even dropped her home at night. The polytechnic where Rajalakshmi worked was part of the Panimalar group of educational institutions. Shruti initially believed the two were just colleagues until Sambasivam came home with Rajalakshmi on Tuesday and said the woman was moving in with them permanently.     On Wednesday morning, Sambasivam allegedly tied a 'mangalsutra' to Rajalakshmi in front of his wife, police said, based on Shruti's confession. A shocked Shruti picked up a fight with Sambasivam who asked her to maintain a cordial relationship and take care of Rajalakshmi. On Thursday morning, after he left for college a fight broke out between the two women.     Police said Rajalakshmi allegedly abused Sruthi and went into the bathroom. Sruthi followed her in and strangled her with the 'mangalsutra'. She then tried to make it appear that the woman had fainted in the bathroom. She took her in an autorickshaw to a nearby hospital where she was declared 'brought dead'. Doctors who noticed a few marks around her neck informed the Thiruverkadu police who registered a case of suspicious death under CrPC section 176.     The body was sent for postmortem to Kilpauk Medical College and Hospital.     After finding that the two women were at home at the time of the death, police interrogated Sruthi for more than an hour but she continued to maintain that Rajyalakshmi had died of injuries sustained when she fell down in the bathroom.     "She confessed to the murder when we told her that her fingerprints had been lifted from the scene of crime," said an investigating officer. "She said she had smashed the woman's head against the wall and later strangled her with the 'thali'." Police altered the case to murder and arrested Sruthi.     Initial inquiries revealed that Rajalakshmi had been married to a man named Rajasekhar for a while and they had separated. She then got married to Suresh, a relative who worked in a private firm, a few years ago and the couple moved into a house in Mogappair.     They allegedly had frequent quarrels as he tortured her and she left him too, police found.     Rajalakshmi then got a job with Panimalar Engineering College where she met Sambasivam. The two became friends and began seeing each other. Rajalakshmi recently moved to the polytechnic in Choolaimedu, police said.     ||CHENNAI
http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/us/US-journalists-killer-annoyed-colleagues-Ex-boss/articleshow/48704167.cms||Tue Sep 01 09:20:20 IST 2015||ROANOKE, United States: The disgruntled former US television station employee who murdered two journalists had "annoyed" colleagues but showed no signs at work of any mental health issues, his former boss said Thursday.     Vester Lee Flanagan, 41, worked as a reporter for WDBJ in Roanoke, Virginia from March 2012 to February 2013, but was dismissed for poor performance and angry behavior, general manager Jeffrey Marks said.     On Wednesday, Flanagan shot and killed two of the CBS affiliate's journalists while they were conducting an on-air interview. He later fatally shot himself.     "We are still at a loss to figure out what happened to him in those two and a half years" since he was fired, Marks told a news conference flanked by dozens of staff, many of them holding hands.     "I don't think we identified that he had mental health issues. We certainly identified that he had performance issues."     Marks defended the station's hiring record and said its parent company had "a very elaborate program to screen employees."     Flanagan passed background checks and came with only positive references, Marks said.     It was only after he was hired, Marks said, that things went downhill.     "Vester's behavior annoyed a lot of people in the news station," Marks said.     Flanagan, who went by the on-screen name Bryce Williams, alleged in a manifesto faxed to ABC News that he was discriminated against as a gay, black journalist.     Marks said accusations in 2013 that he was treated unfairly were "immediately investigated and found to be without merit."     During his employment, Flanagan complied with demands that he seek medical help, but he was ultimately dismissed.     He was escorted from the building by police and made an ominous aside to the news director -- handing him a wooden cross and saying "'you'll need this'," Marks said.     As he left, he also made a "derogatory comment" to Adam Ward, the cameraman he shot dead on Wednesday.     Flanagan filed a complaint with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and a civil action suit, which were dismissed, he said.     "All of these investigations determined that no reasonable person would have taken any of the cited incidents as discrimination or harassment."     After killing Ward and reporter Alison Parker live on the air, Flanagan posted a video of the attack on social media.||ROANOKE, UNITED STATES
